
 
 
 
 Produced by Ted Garvin, David King, and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team
 
 
 
 
 
 A SELECTION
 
 FROM THE
 
 DISCOURSES OF EPICTETUS
 
 WITH
 
 THE ENCHEIRIDION
 
 
 TRANSLATED BY
 
 GEORGE LONG
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS.
 
 
 EPICTETUS (BIOGRAPHICAL NOTE)
 
 A SELECTION FROM THE DISCOURSES OF EPICTETUS
 
 THE ENCHEIRIDION, OR MANUAL
 
 
 
 
 EPICTETUS.
 
 
 Very little is known of the life of Epictetus. It is said that he was a
 native of Hierapolis in Phrygia, a town between the Maeander and a
 branch of the Maeander named the Lycus. Hierapolis is mentioned in the
 epistle of Paul to the people of Colossae (Coloss. iv., 13); from which
 it has been concluded that there was a Christian church in Hierapolis in
 the time of the apostle. The date of the birth of Epictetus is unknown.
 The only recorded fact of his early life is that he was a slave in Rome,
 and his master was Epaphroditus, a profligate freedman of the Emperor
 Nero. There is a story that the master broke his slave's leg by
 torturing him; but it is better to trust to the evidence of Simplicius,
 the commentator on the Encheiridion, or Manual, who says that Epictetus
 was weak in body and lame from an early age. It is not said how he
 became a slave; but it has been asserted in modern times that the
 parents sold the child. I have not, however, found any authority for
 this statement.
 
 It may be supposed that the young slave showed intelligence, for his
 master sent or permitted him to attend the lectures of C. Musonius
 Rufus, an eminent Stoic philosopher. It may seem strange that such a
 master should have wished to have his slave made into a philosopher; but
 Garnier, the author of a "Memoire sur les Ouvrages d'Epictete," explains
 this matter very well in a communication to Schweighaeuser. Garnier
 says: "Epictetus, born at Hierapolis of Phrygia of poor parents, was
 indebted apparently for the advantages of a good education to the whim,
 which was common at the end of the Republic and under the first
 emperors, among the great of Rome to reckon among their numerous slaves
 grammarians, poets, rhetoricians, and philosophers, in the same way as
 rich financiers in these later ages have been led to form at a great
 cost rich and numerous libraries. This supposition is the only one which
 can explain to us how a wretched child, born as poor as Irus, had
 received a good education, and how a rigid Stoic was the slave of
 Epaphroditus, one of the officers of the imperial guard. For we cannot
 suspect that it was through predilection for the Stoic doctrine, and for
 his own use, that the confidant and the minister of the debaucheries of
 Nero would have desired to possess such a slave."
 
 Some writers assume that Epictetus was manumitted by his master, but I
 can find no evidence for this statement. Epaphroditus accompanied Nero
 when he fled from Rome before his enemies, and he aided the miserable
 tyrant in killing himself. Domitian (Sueton., Domit. 14), afterwards put
 Epaphroditus to death for this service to Nero. We may conclude that
 Epictetus in some way obtained his freedom, and that he began to teach
 at Rome; but after the expulsion of the philosophers from Rome by
 Domitian, A.D. 89, he retired to Nicopolis in Epirus, a city built by
 Augustus to commemorate the victory at Actium. Epictetus opened a school
 or lecture room at Nicopolis, where he taught till he was an old man.
 The time of his death is unknown. Epictetus was never married, as we
 learn from Lucian (Demonax, c. 55, torn, ii., ed. Hemsterh., p. 393).
 When Epictetus was finding fault with Demonax, and advising him to take
 a wife and beget children, for this also, as Epictetus said, was a
 philosopher's duty, to leave in place of himself another in the
 universe, Demonax refuted the doctrine by answering: Give me then,
 Epictetus, one of your own daughters. Simplicius says (Comment., c. 46,
 p. 432, ed. Schweigh.) that Epictetus lived alone a long time. At last
 he took a woman into his house as a nurse for a child, which one of
 Epictetus' friends was going to expose on account of his poverty, but
 Epictetus took the child and brought it up.
 
 Epictetus wrote nothing; and all that we have under his name was written
 by an affectionate pupil, Arrian, afterwards the historian of Alexander
 the Great, who, as he tells us, took down in writing the philosopher's
 discourses ("Epistle of Arrian to Lucius Gellius," p. i). These
 Discourses formed eight books, but only four are extant under the title
 of [Greek: Epichtaeton diatribai]. Simplicius, in his commentary on the
 [Greek: Egcheiridion] or Manual, states that this work also was put
 together by Arrian, who selected from the discourses of Epictetus what
 he considered to be most useful, and most necessary, and most adapted to
 move men's minds. Simplicius also says that the contents of the
 Encheiridion are found nearly altogether and in the same words in
 various parts of the Discourses. Arrian also wrote a work on the life
 and death of Epictetus. The events of the philosopher's studious life
 were probably not many nor remarkable; but we should have been glad if
 this work had been preserved, which told, as Simplicius says, what kind
 of man Epictetus was.
 
 Photius (Biblioth., 58) mentions among Arrian's works "Conversations
 with Epictetus," [Greek: Homiliai Epichtaeton], in twelve books. Upton
 thinks that this work is only another name for the Discourses, and that
 Photius has made the mistake of taking the Conversations to be a
 different work from the Discourses. Yet Photius has enumerated eight
 books of the Discourses and twelve books of the Conversations.
 Schweighaeuser observes that Photius had not seen these works of Arrian
 on Epictetus, for so he concludes from the brief notice of these works
 by Photius. The fact is that Photius does not say that he had read these
 books, as he generally does when he is speaking of the books which he
 enumerates in his Bibliotheca. The conclusion is that we are not certain
 that there was a work of Arrian entitled "The Conversations of
 Epictetus."
 
 Upton remarks in a note on iii., 23 (p. 184, Trans.), that "there are
 many passages in these dissertations which are ambiguous or rather
 confused on account of the small questions, and because the matter is
 not expanded by oratorical copiousness, not to mention other causes."
 The discourses of Epictetus, it is supposed, were spoken extempore, and
 so one thing after another would come into the thoughts of the speaker
 (Wolf). Schweighaeuser also observes in a note (ii., 336 of his edition)
 that the connection of the discourse is sometimes obscure through the
 omission of some words which are necessary to indicate the connection of
 the thoughts. The reader then will find that he cannot always understand
 Epictetus, if he does not read him very carefully, and some passages
 more than once. He must also think and reflect, or he will miss the
 meaning. I do not say that the book is worth all this trouble. Every man
 must judge for himself. But I should not have translated the book, if I
 had not thought it worth study; and I think that all books of this kind
 require careful reading, if they are worth reading at all.
 
 G.L.
 
 
 
 
 A SELECTION FROM THE DISCOURSES OF EPICTETUS.
 
 
 OF THE THINGS WHICH ARE IN OUR POWER AND NOT IN OUR POWER.--Of all the
 faculties (except that which I shall soon mention), you will find not
 one which is capable of contemplating itself, and, consequently, not
 capable either of approving or disapproving. How far does the grammatic
 art possess the contemplating power? As far as forming a judgment about
 what is written and spoken. And how far music? As far as judging about
 melody. Does either of them then contemplate itself? By no means. But
 when you must write something to your friend, grammar will tell you what
 words you should write; but whether you should write or not, grammar
 will not tell you. And so it is with music as to musical sounds; but
 whether you should sing at the present time and play on the lute, or do
 neither, music will not tell you. What faculty then will tell you? That
 which contemplates both itself and all other things. And what is this
 faculty? The rational faculty; for this is the only faculty that we have
 received which examines itself, what it is, and what power it has, and
 what is the value of this gift, and examines all other faculties: for
 what else is there which tells us that golden things are beautiful, for
 they do not say so themselves? Evidently it is the faculty which is
 capable of judging of appearances. What else judges of music, grammar,
 and the other faculties, proves their uses, and points out the occasions
 for using them? Nothing else.
 
 What then should a man have in readiness in such circumstances? What
 else than this? What is mine, and what is not mine; and what is
 permitted to me, and what is not permitted to me. I must die. Must I
 then die lamenting? I must be put in chains. Must I then also lament? I
 must go into exile. Does any man then hinder me from going with smiles
 and cheerfulness and contentment? Tell me the secret which you possess.
 I will not, for this is in my power. But I will put you in chains. Man,
 what are you talking about? Me, in chains? You may fetter my leg, but my
 will not even Zeus himself can overpower. I will throw you into prison.
 My poor body, you mean. I will cut your head off. When then have I told
 you that my head alone cannot be cut off? These are the things which
 philosophers should meditate on, which they should write daily, in which
 they should exercise themselves.
 
 What then did Agrippinus say? He said, "I am not a hindrance to myself."
 When it was reported to him that his trial was going on in the Senate,
 he said: "I hope it may turn out well; but it is the fifth hour of the
 day"--this was the time when he was used to exercise himself and then
 take the cold bath,--"let us go and take our exercise." After he had
 taken his exercise, one comes and tells him, "You have been condemned."
 "To banishment," he replies, "or to death?" "To banishment." "What about
 my property?" "It is not taken from you." "Let us go to Aricia then," he
 said, "and dine."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 HOW A MAN ON EVERY OCCASION CAN MAINTAIN HIS PROPER CHARACTER.--To the
 rational animal only is the irrational intolerable; but that which is
 rational is tolerable. Blows are not naturally intolerable. How is that?
 See how the Lacedaemonians endure whipping when they have learned that
 whipping is consistent with reason. To hang yourself is not intolerable.
 When then you have the opinion that it is rational, you go and hang
 yourself. In short, if we observe, we shall find that the animal man is
 pained by nothing so much as by that which is irrational; and, on the
 contrary, attracted to nothing so much as to that which is rational.
 
 Only consider at what price you sell your own will: if for no other
 reason, at least for this, that you sell it not for a small sum. But
 that which is great and superior perhaps belongs to Socrates and such as
 are like him. Why then, if we are naturally such, are not a very great
 number of us like him? Is it true then that all horses become swift,
 that all dogs are skilled in tracking footprints? What then, since I am
 naturally dull, shall I, for this reason, take no pains? I hope not.
 Epictetus is not superior to Socrates; but if he is not inferior, this
 is enough for me; for I shall never be a Milo, and yet I do not neglect
 my body; nor shall I be a Croesus, and yet I do not neglect my property;
 nor, in a word, do we neglect looking after anything because we despair
 of reaching the highest degree.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 HOW A MAN SHOULD PROCEED FROM THE PRINCIPLE OF GOD BEING THE FATHER OF
 ALL MEN TO THE REST.--If a man should be able to assent to this doctrine
 as he ought, that we are all sprung from God in an especial manner, and
 that God is the father both of men and of gods, I suppose that he would
 never have any ignoble or mean thoughts about himself. But if Caesar (the
 emperor) should adopt you, no one could endure your arrogance; and if
 you know that you are the son of Zeus, will you not be elated? Yet we do
 not so; but since these two things are mingled in the generation of man,
 body in common with the animals, and reason and intelligence in common
 with the gods, many incline to this kinship, which is miserable and
 mortal; and some few to that which is divine and happy. Since then it is
 of necessity that every man uses everything according to the opinion
 which he has about it, those, the few, who think that they are formed
 for fidelity and modesty and a sure use of appearances have no mean or
 ignoble thoughts about themselves; but with the many it is quite the
 contrary. For they say, What am I? A poor, miserable man, with my
 wretched bit of flesh. Wretched, indeed; but you possess something
 better than your bit of flesh. Why then do you neglect that which is
 better, and why do you attach yourself to this?
 
 Through this kinship with the flesh, some of us inclining to it become
 like wolves, faithless and treacherous and mischievous; some become like
 lions, savage and bestial and untamed; but the greater part of us become
 foxes, and other worse animals. For what else is a slanderer and
 malignant man than a fox, or some other more wretched and meaner animal?
 See then and take care that you do not become some one of these
 miserable things.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 OF PROGRESS OR IMPROVEMENT.--He who is making progress, having learned
 from philosophers that desire means the desire of good things, and
 aversion means aversion from bad things; having learned too that
 happiness and tranquillity are not attainable by man otherwise than by
 not failing to obtain what he desires, and not falling into that which
 he would avoid; such a man takes from himself desire altogether and
 confers it, but he employs his aversion only on things which are
 dependent on his will. For if he attempts to avoid anything independent
 of his will, he knows that sometimes he will fall in with something
 which he wishes to avoid, and he will be unhappy. Now if virtue promises
 good fortune and tranquillity and happiness, certainly also the progress
 towards virtue is progress towards each of these things. For it is
 always true that to whatever point the perfecting of anything leads us,
 progress is an approach towards this point.
 
 How then do we admit that virtue is such as I have said, and yet seek
 progress in other things and make a display of it? What is the product
 of virtue? Tranquillity. Who then makes improvement? Is it he who has
 read many books of Chrysippus? But does virtue consist in having
 understood Chrysippus? If this is so, progress is clearly nothing else
 than knowing a great deal of Chrysippus. But now we admit that virtue
 produces one thing, and we declare that approaching near to it is
 another thing, namely, progress or improvement. Such a person, says one,
 is already able to read Chrysippus by himself. Indeed, sir, you are
 making great progress. What kind of progress? But why do you mock the
 man? Why do you draw him away from the perception of his own
 misfortunes? Will you not show him the effect of virtue that he may
 learn where to look for improvement? Seek it there, wretch, where your
 work lies. And where is your work? In desire and in aversion, that you
 may not be disappointed in your desire, and that you may not fall into
 that which you would avoid; in your pursuit and avoiding, that you
 commit no error; in assent and suspension of assent, that you be not
 deceived. The first things, and the most necessary are those which I
 have named. But if with trembling and lamentation you seek not to fall
 into that which you avoid, tell me how you are improving.
 
 Do you then show me your improvement in these things? If I were talking
 to an athlete, I should say, Show me your shoulders; and then he might
 say, Here are my Halteres. You and your Halteres look to that. I should
 reply, I wish to see the effect of the Halteres. So, when you say: Take
 the treatise on the active powers ([Greek: hormea]), and see how I have
 studied it, I reply: Slave, I am not inquiring about this, but how you
 exercise pursuit and avoidance, desire and aversion, how you design and
 purpose and prepare yourself, whether conformably to nature or not. If
 conformably, give me evidence of it, and I will say that you are making
 progress; but if not conformably, be gone, and not only expound your
 books, but write such books yourself; and what will you gain by it? Do
 you not know that the whole book costs only five denarii? Does then the
 expounder seem to be worth more than five denarii? Never then look for
 the matter itself in one place, and progress towards it in another.
 Where then is progress? If any of you, withdrawing himself from
 externals, turns to his own will ([Greek: proairesis]) to exercise it
 and to improve it by labor, so as to make it conformable to nature,
 elevated, free, unrestrained, unimpeded, faithful, modest; and if he has
 learned that he who desires or avoids the things which are not in his
 power can neither be faithful nor free, but of necessity he must change
 with them and be tossed about with them as in a tempest, and of
 necessity must subject himself to others who have the power to procure
 or prevent what lie desires or would avoid; finally, when he rises in
 the morning, if he observes and keeps these rules, bathes as a man of
 fidelity, eats as a modest man; in like manner, if in every matter that
 occurs he works out his chief principles ([Greek: ta proaegoumena]) as
 the runner does with reference to running, and the trainer of the voice
 with reference to the voice--this is the man who truly makes progress,
 and this is the man who has not travelled in vain. But if he has
 strained his efforts to the practice of reading books, and labors only
 at this, and has travelled for this, I tell him to return home
 immediately, and not to neglect his affairs there; for this for which he
 has travelled is nothing. But the other thing is something, to study how
 a man can rid his life of lamentation and groaning, and saying, Woe to
 me, and wretched that I am, and to rid it also of misfortune and
 disappointment, and to learn what death is, and exile, and prison, and
 poison, that he may be able to say when he is in fetters, Dear Crito, if
 it is the will of the gods that it be so, let it be so; and not to say,
 Wretched am I, an old man: have I kept my gray hairs for this? Who is it
 that speaks thus? Do you think that I shall name some man of no repute
 and of low condition? Does not Priam say this? Does not Oedipus say
 this? Nay, all kings say it! For what else is tragedy than the
 perturbations ([Greek: pathae]) of men who value externals exhibited in
 this kind of poetry? But if a man must learn by fiction that no external
 things which are independent of the will concern us, for my part I
 should like this fiction, by the aid of which I should live happily and
 undisturbed. But you must consider for yourselves what you wish.
 
 What then does Chrysippus teach us? The reply is, to know that these
 things are not false, from which happiness comes and tranquillity
 arises. Take my books, and you will learn how true and conformable to
 nature are the things which make me free from perturbations. O great
 good fortune! O the great benefactor who points out the way! To
 Triptolemus all men have erected temples and altars, because he gave us
 food by cultivation; but to him who discovered truth and brought it to
 light and communicated it to all, not the truth which shows us how to
 live, but how to live well, who of you for this reason has built an
 altar, or a temple, or has dedicated a statue, or who worships God for
 this? Because the gods have given the vine, or wheat, we sacrifice to
 them; but because they have produced in the human mind that fruit by
 which they designed to show us the truth which relates to happiness,
 shall we not thank God for this?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 AGAINST THE ACADEMICS.--If a man, said Epictetus, opposes evident
 truths, it is not easy to find arguments by which we shall make him
 change his opinion. But this does not arise either from the man's
 strength or the teacher's weakness; for when the man, though he has been
 confuted, is hardened like a stone, how shall we then be able to deal
 with him by argument?
 
 Now there are two kinds of hardening, one of the understanding, the
 other of the sense of shame, when a man is resolved not to assent to
 what is manifest nor to desist from contradictions. Most of us are
 afraid of mortification of the body, and would contrive all means to
 avoid such a thing, but we care not about the soul's mortification. And
 indeed with regard to the soul, if a man be in such a state as not to
 apprehend anything, or understand at all, we think that he is in a bad
 condition; but if the sense of shame and modesty are deadened, this we
 call even power (or strength).
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 OF PROVIDENCE.--From everything, which is or happens in the world, it is
 easy to praise Providence, if a man possesses these two qualities: the
 faculty of seeing what belongs and happens to all persons and things,
 and a grateful disposition. If he does not possess these two qualities,
 one man will not see the use of things which are and which happen:
 another will not be thankful for them, even if he does know them. If God
 had made colors, but had not made the faculty of seeing them, what would
 have been their use? None at all. On the other hand, if he had made the
 faculty of vision, but had not made objects such as to fall under the
 faculty, what in that case also would have been the use of it? None at
 all. Well, suppose that he had made both, but had not made light? In
 that case, also, they would have been of no use. Who is it then who has
 fitted this to that and that to this?
 
 What, then, are these things done in us only? Many, indeed, in us only,
 of which the rational animal had peculiar need; but you will find many
 common to us with irrational animals. Do they then understand what is
 done? By no means. For use is one thing, and understanding is another;
 God had need of irrational animals to make use of appearances, but of us
 to understand the use of appearances. It is therefore enough for them to
 eat and to drink, and to copulate, and to do all the other things which
 they severally do. But for us, to whom he has given also the
 intellectual faculty, these things are not sufficient; for unless we act
 in a proper and orderly manner, and conformably to the nature and
 constitution of each thing, we shall never attain our true end. For
 where the constitutions of living beings are different, there also the
 acts and the ends are different. In those animals then whose
 constitution is adapted only to use, use alone is enough; but in an
 animal (man), which has also the power of understanding the use, unless
 there be the due exercise of the understanding, he will never attain his
 proper end. Well then God constitutes every animal, one to be eaten,
 another to serve for agriculture, another to supply cheese, and another
 for some like use; for which purposes what need is there to understand
 appearances and to be able to distinguish them? But God has introduced
 man to be a spectator of God and of his works; and not only a spectator
 of them, but an interpreter. For this reason it is shameful for man to
 begin and to end where irrational animals do; but rather he ought to
 begin where they begin, and to end where nature ends in us; and nature
 ends in contemplation and understanding, and in a way of life
 conformable to nature. Take care then not to die without having been
 spectators of these things.
 
 But you take a journey to Olympia to see the work of Phidias, and all of
 you think it a misfortune to die without having seen such things. But
 when there is no need to take a journey, and where a man is, there he
 has the works (of God) before him, will you not desire to see and
 understand them? Will you not perceive either what you are, or what you
 were born for, or what this is for which you have received the faculty
 of sight? But you may say, There are some things disagreeable and
 troublesome in life. And are there none at Olympia? Are you not
 scorched? Are you not pressed by a crowd? Are you not without
 comfortable means of bathing? Are you not wet when it rains? Have you
 not abundance of noise, clamor, and other disagreeable things? But I
 suppose that setting all these things off against the magnificence of
 the spectacle, you bear and endure. Well then and have you not received
 faculties by which you will be able to bear all that happens? Have you
 not received greatness of soul? Have you not received manliness? Have
 you not received endurance? And why do I trouble myself about anything
 that can happen if I possess greatness of soul? What shall distract my
 mind, or disturb me, or appear painful? Shall I not use the power for
 the purposes for which I received it, and shall I grieve and lament over
 what happens?
 
 Come, then, do you also having observed these things look to the
 faculties which you have, and when you have looked at them, say: Bring
 now, O Zeus, any difficulty that thou pleasest, for I have means given
 to me by thee and powers for honoring myself through the things which
 happen. You do not so; but you sit still, trembling for fear that some
 things will happen, and weeping, and lamenting, and groaning for what
 does happen; and then you blame the gods. For what is the consequence of
 such meanness of spirit but impiety? And yet God has not only given us
 these faculties, by which we shall be able to bear everything that
 happens without being depressed or broken by it; but, like a good king
 and a true father, He has given us these faculties free from hindrance,
 subject to no compulsion, unimpeded, and has put them entirely in our
 own power, without even having reserved to Himself any power of
 hindering or impeding. You, who have received these powers free and as
 your own, use them not; you do not even see what you have received, and
 from whom; some of you being blinded to the giver, and not even
 acknowledging your benefactor, and others, through meanness of spirit,
 betaking yourselves to fault-finding and making charges against God. Yet
 I will show to you that you have powers and means for greatness of soul
 and manliness; but what powers you have for finding fault making
 accusations, do you show me.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 HOW FROM THE FACT THAT WE ARE AKIN TO GOD A MAN MAY PROCEED TO THE
 CONSEQUENCES.--I indeed think that the old man ought to be sitting here,
 not to contrive how you may have no mean thoughts nor mean and ignoble
 talk about yourselves, but to take care that there be not among us any
 young men of such a mind, that when they have recognized their kinship
 to God, and that we are fettered by these bonds, the body, I mean, and
 its possessions, and whatever else on account of them is necessary to us
 for the economy and commerce of life, they should intend to throw off
 these things as if they were burdens painful and intolerable, and to
 depart to their kinsmen. But this is the labor that your teacher and
 instructor ought to be employed upon, if he really were what he should
 be. You should come to him and say: Epictetus, we can no longer endure
 being bound to this poor body, and feeding it, and giving it drink and
 rest, and cleaning it, and for the sake of the body complying with the
 wishes of these and of those. Are not these things indifferent and
 nothing to us; and is not death no evil? And are we not in a manner
 kinsmen of God, and did we not come from him? Allow us to depart to the
 place from which we came; allow us to be released at last from these
 bonds by which we are bound and weighed down. Here there are robbers and
 thieves and courts of justice, and those who are named tyrants, and
 think that they have some power over us by means of the body and its
 possessions. Permit us to show them that they have no power over any
 man. And I on my part would say: Friends, wait for God: when he shall
 give the signal and release you from this service, then go to him; but
 for the present endure to dwell in this place where he has put you.
 Short indeed is this time of your dwelling here, and easy to bear for
 those who are so disposed; for what tyrant, or what thief, or what
 courts of justice are formidable to those who have thus considered as
 things of no value the body and the possessions of the body? Wait then,
 do not depart without a reason.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 OF CONTENTMENT.--With respect to gods, there are some who say that a
 divine being does not exist; others say that it exists, but is inactive
 and careless, and takes no forethought about anything; a third class say
 that such a being exists and exercises forethought, but only about great
 things and heavenly things, and about nothing on the earth; a fourth
 class say that a divine being exercises forethought both about things on
 the earth and heavenly things, but in a general way only, and not about
 things severally. There is a fifth class to whom Ulysses and Socrates
 belong, who say:
 
   I move not without thy knowledge.--Iliad, x., 278.
 
 Before all other things then it is necessary to inquire about each of
 these opinions, whether it is affirmed truly or not truly. For if there
 are no gods, how is it our proper end to follow them? And if they exist,
 but take no care of anything, in this case also how will it be right to
 follow them? But if indeed they do exist and look after things, still if
 there is nothing communicated from them to men, nor in fact to myself,
 how even so is it right (to follow them)? The wise and good man then,
 after considering all these things, submits his own mind to him who
 administers the whole, as good citizens do to the law of the state. He
 who is receiving instruction ought to come to be instructed with this
 intention, How shall I follow the gods in all things, how shall I be
 contented with the divine administration, and how can I become free? For
 he is free to whom everything happens according to his will, and whom no
 man can hinder. What then, is freedom madness? Certainly not; for
 madness and freedom do not consist. But, you say, I would have
 everything result just as I like, and in whatever way I like. You are
 mad, you are beside yourself. Do you not know that freedom is a noble
 and valuable thing? But for me inconsiderately to wish for things to
 happen as I inconsiderately like, this appears to be not only not noble,
 but even most base. For how do we proceed in the matter of writing? Do I
 wish to write the name of Dion as I choose? No, but I am taught to
 choose to write it as it ought to be written. And how with respect to
 music? In the same manner. And what universally in every art or science?
 Just the same. If it were not so, it would be of no value to know
 anything, if knowledge were adapted to every man's whim. Is it then in
 this alone, in this which is the greatest and the chief thing, I mean
 freedom, that I am permitted to will inconsiderately? By no means; but
 to be instructed is this, to learn to wish that everything may happen as
 it does. And how do things happen? As the disposer has disposed them?
 And he has appointed summer and winter, and abundance and scarcity, and
 virtue and vice, and all such opposites for the harmony of the whole;
 and to each of us he has given a body, and parts of the body, and
 possessions, and companions.
 
 What then remains, or what method is discovered of holding commerce with
 them? Is there such a method by which they shall do what seems fit to
 them, and we not the less shall be in a mood which is conformable to
 nature? But you are unwilling to endure, and are discontented; and if
 you are alone, you call it solitude; and if you are with men, you call
 them knaves and robbers; and you find fault with your own parents and
 children, and brothers and neighbors. But you ought when you are alone
 to call this condition by the name of tranquillity and freedom, and to
 think yourself like to the gods; and when you are with many, you ought
 not to call it crowd, nor trouble, nor uneasiness, but festival and
 assembly, and so accept all contentedly.
 
 What then is the punishment of those who do not accept? It is to be what
 they are. Is any person dissatisfied with being alone? Let him be alone.
 Is a man dissatisfied with his parents? Let him be a bad son, and
 lament. Is he dissatisfied with his children? Let him be a bad father.
 Cast him into prison. What prison? Where he is already, for he is there
 against his will; and where a man is against his will, there he is in
 prison. So Socrates was not in prison, for he was there willingly. Must
 my leg then be lamed? Wretch, do you then on account of one poor leg
 find fault with the world? Will you not willingly surrender it for the
 whole? Will you not withdraw from it? Will you not gladly part with it
 to him who gave it? And will you be vexed and discontented with the
 things established by Zeus, which he, with the Moirae (fates) who were
 present and spinning the thread of your generation, defined and put in
 order? Know you not how small a part you are compared with the whole. I
 mean with respect to the body, for as to intelligence you are not
 inferior to the gods nor less; for the magnitude of intelligence is not
 measured by length nor yet by height, but by thoughts.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 HOW EVERYTHING MAY BE DONE ACCEPTABLY TO THE GODS.--When some one asked,
 How may a man eat acceptably to the gods, he answered: If he can eat
 justly and contentedly, and with equanimity, and temperately, and
 orderly, will it not be also acceptable to the gods? But when you have
 asked for warm water and the slave has not heard, or if he did hear has
 brought only tepid water, or he is not even found to be in the house,
 then not to be vexed or to burst with passion, is not this acceptable to
 the gods? How then shall a man endure such persons as this slave? Slave
 yourself, will you not bear with your own brother, who has Zeus for his
 progenitor, and is like a son from the same seeds and of the same
 descent from above? But if you have been put in any such higher place,
 will you immediately make yourself a tyrant? Will you not remember who
 you are, and whom you rule? That they are kinsmen, that they are
 brethren by nature, that they are the offspring of Zeus? But I have
 purchased them, and they have not purchased me. Do you see in what
 direction you are looking, that it is towards the earth, towards the
 pit, that it is towards these wretched laws of dead men? but towards the
 laws of the gods you are not looking.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 WHAT PHILOSOPHY PROMISES.--When a man was consulting him how he should
 persuade his brother to cease being angry with him, Epictetus replied:
 Philosophy does not propose to secure for a man any external thing. If
 it did (or if it were not, as I say), philosophy would be allowing
 something which is not within its province. For as the carpenter's
 material is wood, and that of the statuary is copper, so the matter of
 the art of living is each man's life. When then is my brother's? That
 again belongs to his own art; but with respect to yours, it is one of
 the external things, like a piece of land, like health, like reputation.
 But Philosophy promises none of these. In every circumstance I will
 maintain, she says, the governing part conformable to nature. Whose
 governing part? His in whom I am, she says.
 
 How then shall my brother cease to be angry with me? Bring him to me and
 I will tell him. But I have nothing to say to you about his anger.
 
 When the man who was consulting him said, I seek to know this, How, even
 if my brother is not reconciled to me, shall I maintain myself in a
 state conformable to nature? Nothing great, said Epictetus, is produced
 suddenly, since not even the grape or the fig is. If you say to me now
 that you want a fig, I will answer to you that it requires time: let it
 flower first, then put forth fruit, and then ripen. Is then the fruit of
 a fig-tree not perfected suddenly and in one hour, and would you possess
 the fruit of a man's mind in so short a time and so easily? Do not
 expect it, even if I tell you.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 THAT WE OUGHT NOT TO BE ANGRY WITH THE ERRORS (FAULTS) OF OTHERS.--Ought
 not then this robber and this adulterer to be destroyed? By no means say
 so, but speak rather in this way: This man who has been mistaken and
 deceived about the most important things, and blinded, not in the
 faculty of vision which distinguishes white and black, but in the
 faculty which distinguishes good and bad, should we not destroy him? If
 you speak thus you will see how inhuman this is which you say, and that
 it is just as if you would say, Ought we not to destroy this blind and
 deaf man? But if the greatest harm is the privation of the greatest
 things, and the greatest thing in every man is the will or choice such
 as it ought to be, and a man is deprived of this will, why are you also
 angry with him? Man, you ought not to be affected contrary to nature by
 the bad things of another. Pity him rather; drop this readiness to be
 offended and to hate, and these words which the many utter: "These
 accursed and odious fellows." How have you been made so wise at once?
 and how are you so peevish? Why then are we angry? Is it because we
 value so much the things of which these men rob us? Do not admire your
 clothes, and then you will not be angry with the thief. Consider this
 matter thus: you have fine clothes; your neighbor has not; you have a
 window; you wish to air the clothes. The thief does not know wherein
 man's good consists, but he thinks that it consist in having fine
 clothes, the very thing which you also think. Must he not then come and
 take them away? When you show a cake to greedy persons, and swallow it
 all yourself, do you expect them not to snatch it from you? Do not
 provoke them; do not have a window; do not air your clothes. I also
 lately had an iron lamp placed by the side of my household gods; hearing
 a noise at the door, I ran down, and found that the lamp had been
 carried off. I reflected that he who had taken the lamp had done nothing
 strange. What then? To-morrow, I said, you will find an earthen lamp;
 for a man only loses that which he has. I have lost my garment. The
 reason is that you had a garment. I have a pain in my head. Have you any
 pain in your horns? Why then are you troubled? For we only lose those
 things, we have only pains about those things, which we possess.
 
 But the tyrant will chain--what? The leg. He will take away--what? The
 neck. What then will he not chain and not take away? The will. This is
 why the ancients taught the maxim, Know thyself. Therefore we ought to
 exercise ourselves in small things, and beginning with them to proceed
 to the greater. I have pain in the head. Do not say, Alas! I have pain
 in the ear. Do not say alas! And I do not say that you are not allowed
 to groan, but do not groan inwardly; and if your slave is slow in
 bringing a bandage, do not cry out and torment yourself, and say, Every
 body hates me; for who would not hate such a man? For the future,
 relying on these opinions, walk about upright, free; not trusting to the
 size of your body, as an athlete, for a man ought not to be invincible
 in the way that an ass is.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 HOW WE SHOULD BEHAVE TO TYRANTS.--If a man possesses any superiority, or
 thinks that he does when he does not, such a man, if he is uninstructed,
 will of necessity be puffed up through it. For instance, the tyrant
 says, I am master of all! And what can you do for me? Can you give me
 desire which shall have no hindrance? How can you? Have you the
 infallible power of avoiding what you would avoid? Have you the power of
 moving towards an object without error? And how do you possess this
 power? Come, when you are in a ship, do you trust to yourself or to the
 helmsman? And when you are in a chariot, to whom do you trust but to the
 driver? And how is it in all other arts? Just the same. In what, then,
 lies your power? All men pay respect to me. Well, I also pay respect to
 my platter, and I wash it and wipe it; and for the sake of my oil-flask,
 I drive a peg into the wall. Well, then, are these things superior to
 me? No, but they supply some of my wants, and for this reason I take
 care of them. Well, do I not attend to my ass? Do I not wash his feet?
 Do I not clean him? Do you not know that every man has regard to
 himself, and to you just the same as he has regard to his ass? For who
 has regard to you as a man? Show me. Who wishes to become like you? Who
 imitates you, as he imitates Socrates? But I can cut off your head. You
 say right. I had forgotten that I must have regard to you, as I would to
 a fever and the bile, and raise an altar to you, as there is at Rome an
 altar to fever.
 
 What is it then that disturbs and terrifies the multitude? Is it the
 tyrant and his guards? (By no means.) I hope that it is not so. It is
 not possible that what is by nature free can be disturbed by anything
 else, or hindered by any other thing than by itself. But it is a man's
 own opinions which disturb him. For when the tyrant says to a man, I
 will chain your leg, he who values his leg says, Do not; have pity. But
 he who values his own will says, If it appears more advantageous to you,
 chain it. Do you not care? I do not care. I will show you that I am
 master. You cannot do that. Zeus has set me free; do you think that he
 intended to allow his own son to be enslaved? But you are master of my
 carcase; take it. So when you approach me, you have no regard to me? No,
 but I have regard to myself; and if you wish me to say that I have
 regard to you also, I tell you that I have the same regard to you that I
 have to my pipkin.
 
 What then? When absurd notions about things independent of our will, as
 if they were good and (or) bad, lie at the bottom of our opinions, we
 must of necessity pay regard to tyrants: for I wish that men would pay
 regard to tyrants only, and not also to the bedchamber men. How is it
 that the man becomes all at once wise, when Caesar has made him
 superintendent of the close stool? How is it that we say immediately,
 Felicion spoke sensibly to me? I wish he were ejected from the
 bedchamber, that he might again appear to you to be a fool.
 
 Has a man been exalted to the tribuneship? All who meet him offer their
 congratulations; one kisses his eyes, another the neck, and the slaves
 kiss his hands. He goes to his house, he finds torches lighted. He
 ascends the Capitol; he offers a sacrifice on the occasion. Now who ever
 sacrificed for having had good desires? for having acted conformably to
 nature? For in fact we thank the gods for those things in which we place
 our good.
 
 A person was talking to me to-day about the priesthood of Augustus. I
 say to him: Man, let the thing alone; you will spend much for no
 purpose. But he replies, Those who draw up agreements will write my
 name. Do you then stand by those who read them, and say to such persons,
 It is I whose name is written there? And if you can now be present on
 ail such occasions, what will you do when you are dead? My name will
 remain. Write it on a stone, and it will remain. But come, what
 remembrance of you will there be beyond Nicopolis? But I shall wear a
 crown of gold. If you desire a crown at all, take a crown of roses and
 put it on, for it will be more elegant in appearance.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 AGAINST THOSE WHO WISH TO BE ADMIRED.--When a man holds his proper
 station in life, he does not gape after things beyond it. Man, what do
 you wish to happen to you? I am satisfied if I desire and avoid
 conformably to nature, if I employ movements towards and from an object
 as I am by nature formed to do, and purpose and design and assent. Why
 then do you strut before us as if you had swallowed a spit? My wish has
 always been that those who meet me should admire me, and those who
 follow me should exclaim, O the great philosopher! Who are they by whom
 you wish to be admired? Are they not those of whom you are used to say
 that they are mad? Well, then, do you wish to be admired by madmen?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ON PRAECOGNITIONS.--Praecognitions are common to all men, and praecognition
 is not contradictory to praecognition. For who of us does not assume that
 Good is useful and eligible, and in all circumstances that we ought to
 follow and pursue it? And who of us does not assume that Justice is
 beautiful and becoming? When then does the contradiction arise? It
 arises in the adaptation of the praecognitions to the particular cases.
 When one man says, "He has done well; he is a brave man," and another
 says, "Not so; but he has acted foolishly," then the disputes arise
 among men. This is the dispute among the Jews and the Syrians and the
 Egyptians and the Romans; not whether holiness should be preferred to
 all things and in all cases should be pursued, but whether it is holy to
 eat pig's flesh or not holy. You will find this dispute also between
 Agamemnon and Achilles; for call them forth. What do you say, Agamemnon?
 ought not that to be done which is proper and right? "Certainly." Well,
 what do you say, Achilles? do you not admit that what is good ought to
 be done? "I do most certainly." Adapt your praecognitions then to the
 present matter. Here the dispute begins. Agamemnon says, "I ought not to
 give up Chryseis to her father." Achilles says, "You ought." It is
 certain that one of the two makes a wrong adaptation of the praecognition
 of "ought" or "duty." Further, Agamemnon says, "Then if I ought to
 restore Chryseis, it is fit that I take his prize from some of you."
 Achilles replies, "Would you then take her whom I love?" "Yes, her whom
 you love." "Must I then be the only man who goes without a prize? and
 must I be the only man who has no prize?" Thus the dispute begins.
 
 What then is education? Education is the learning how to adapt the
 natural praecognitions to the particular things conformably to nature;
 and then to distinguish that of things some are in our power, but others
 are not. In our power are will and all acts which depend on the will;
 things not in our power are the body, the parts of the body,
 possessions, parents, brothers, children, country, and, generally, all
 with whom we live in society. In what then should we place the good? To
 what kind of things ([Greek: ousia]) shall we adapt it? To the things
 which are in our power? Is not health then a good thing, and soundness
 of limb, and life, and are not children and parents and country? Who
 will tolerate you if you deny this?
 
 Let us then transfer the notion of good to these things. Is it possible,
 then, when a man sustains damage and does not obtain good things, that
 he can be happy? It is not possible. And can he maintain towards society
 a proper behavior? He can not. For I am naturally formed to look after
 my own interest. If it is my interest to have an estate in land, it is
 my interest also to take it from my neighbor. If it is my interest to
 have a garment, it is my interest also to steal it from the bath. This
 is the origin of wars, civil commotions, tyrannies, conspiracies. And
 how shall I be still able to maintain my duty towards Zeus? For if I
 sustain damage and am unlucky, he takes no care of me. And what is he to
 me if he cannot help me? And further, what is he to me if he allows me
 to be in the condition in which I am? I now begin to hate him. Why then
 do we build temples, why setup statues to Zeus, as well as to evil
 demons, such as to Fever; and how is Zeus the Saviour, and how the giver
 of rain, and the giver of fruits? And in truth if we place the nature of
 Good in any such things, all this follows.
 
 What should we do then? This is the inquiry of the true philosopher who
 is in labor. Now I do not see what the good is nor the bad. Am I not
 mad? Yes. But suppose that I place the good somewhere among the things
 which depend on the will; all will laugh at me. There will come some
 greyhead wearing many gold rings on his fingers, and he will shake his
 head and say: "Hear, my child. It is right that you should philosophize;
 but you ought to have some brains also; all this that you are doing is
 silly. You learn the syllogism from philosophers; but you know how to
 act better than philosophers do." Man why then do you blame me, if I
 know? What shall I say to this slave? If I am silent, he will burst. I
 must speak in this way: "Excuse me, as you would excuse lovers; I am not
 my own master; I am mad."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 HOW WE SHOULD STRUGGLE WITH CIRCUMSTANCES.--It is circumstances
 (difficulties) which show what men are. Therefore when a difficulty
 falls upon you, remember that God, like a trainer of wrestlers, has
 matched you with a rough young man. For what purpose? you may say. Why,
 that you may become an Olympic conqueror; but it is not accomplished
 without sweat. In my opinion no man has had a more profitable difficulty
 than you have had, if you choose to make use of it as an athlete would
 deal with a young antagonist. We are now sending a scout to Rome; but no
 man sends a cowardly scout, who, if he only hears a noise and sees a
 shadow anywhere, comes running back in terror and reports that the enemy
 is close at hand. So now if you should come and tell us: "Fearful is the
 state of affairs at Rome; terrible is death; terrible is exile; terrible
 is calumny; terrible is poverty; fly, my friends, the enemy is near," we
 shall answer: "Begone, prophesy for yourself; we have committed only one
 fault, that we sent such a scout."
 
 Diogenes, who was sent as a scout before you, made a different report to
 us. He says that death is no evil, for neither is it base; he says that
 fame (reputation) is the noise of madmen. And what has this spy said
 about pain, about pleasure, and about poverty? He says that to be naked
 is better than any purple robe, and to sleep on the bare ground is the
 softest bed; and he gives as a proof of each thing that he affirms his
 own courage, his tranquillity, his freedom, and the healthy appearance
 and compactness of his body. There is no enemy near, he says; all is
 peace. How so, Diogenes? "See," he replies, "if I am struck, if I have
 been wounded, if I have fled from any man." This is what a scout ought
 to be. But you come to us and tell us one thing after another. Will you
 not go back, and you will see clearer when you have laid aside fear?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ON THE SAME.--If these things are true, and if we are not silly, and are
 not acting hypocritically when we say that the good of man is in the
 will, and the evil too, and that everything else does not concern us,
 why are we still disturbed, why are we still afraid? The things about
 which we have been busied are in no man's power; and the things which
 are in the power of others, we care not for. What kind of trouble have
 we still?
 
 But give me directions. Why should I give you directions? Has not Zeus
 given you directions? Has he not given to you what is your own free from
 hindrance and free from impediment, and what is not your own subject to
 hindrance and impediment? What directions then, what kind of orders did
 you bring when you came from him? Keep by every means what is your own;
 do not desire what belongs to others. Fidelity (integrity) is your own,
 virtuous shame is your own; who then can take these things from you? who
 else than yourself will hinder you from using them? But how do you act?
 When you seek what is not your own, you lose that which is your own.
 Having such promptings and commands from Zeus, what kind do you still
 ask from me? Am I more powerful than he, am I more worthy of confidence?
 But if you observe these, do you want any others besides? "Well, but he
 has not given these orders," you will say. Produce your praecognitions
 ([Greek: prolaepseis]), produce these proofs of philosophers, produce
 what you have often heard, and produce what you have said yourself,
 produce what you have read, produce what you have meditated on; and you
 will then see that all these things are from God.
 
 If I have set my admiration on the poor body, I have given myself up to
 be a slave; if on my poor possessions, I also make myself a slave. For I
 immediately make it plain with what I may be caught; as if the snake
 draws in his head, I tell you to strike that part of him which he
 guards; and do you be assured that whatever part you choose to guard,
 that part your master will attack. Remembering this, whom will you still
 flatter or fear?
 
 But I should like to sit where the Senators sit. Do you see that you are
 putting yourself in straits, you are squeezing yourself? How then shall
 I see well in any other way in the amphitheatre? Man, do not be a
 spectator at all, and you will not be squeezed. Why do you give yourself
 trouble? Or wait a little, and when the spectacle is over, seat yourself
 in the place reserved for the Senators and sun yourself. For remember
 this general truth, that it is we who squeeze ourselves, who put
 ourselves in straits; that is, our opinions squeeze us and put us in
 straits. For what is it to be reviled? Stand by a stone and revile it,
 and what will you gain? If then a man listens like a stone, what profit
 is there to the reviler? But if the reviler has as a stepping-stone (or
 ladder) the weakness of him who is reviled, then he accomplishes
 something. Strip him. What do you mean by him? Lay hold of his garment,
 strip it off. I have insulted you. Much good may it do you.
 
 This was the practice of Socrates; this was the reason why he always had
 one face. But we choose to practise and study anything rather than the
 means by which we shall be unimpeded and free. You say: "Philosophers
 talk paradoxes." But are there no paradoxes in the other arts? And what
 is more paradoxical than to puncture a man's eye in order that he may
 see? If any one said this to a man ignorant of the surgical art, would
 he not ridicule the speaker? Where is the wonder, then, if in philosophy
 also many things which are true appear paradoxical to the inexperienced?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 IN HOW MANY WAYS APPEARANCES EXIST, AND WHAT AIDS WE SHOULD PROVIDE
 AGAINST THEM.--Appearances are to us in four ways. For either things
 appear as they are; or they are not, and do not even appear to be; or
 they are, and do not appear to be; or they are not, and yet appear to
 be. Further, in all these cases to form a right judgment (to hit the
 mark) is the office of an educated man. But whatever it is that annoys
 (troubles) us, to that we ought to apply a remedy. If the sophisms of
 Pyrrho and of the Academics are what annoys (troubles), we must apply
 the remedy to them. If it is the persuasion of appearances, by which
 some things appear to be good, when they are not good, let us seek a
 remedy for this. If it is habit which annoys us, we must try to seek aid
 against habit. What aid, then, can we find against habit? The contrary
 habit. You hear the ignorant say: "That unfortunate person is dead; his
 father and mother are overpowered with sorrow; he was cut off by an
 untimely death and in a foreign land." Hear the contrary way of
 speaking. Tear yourself from these expressions; oppose to one habit the
 contrary habit; to sophistry oppose reason, and the exercise and
 discipline of reason; against persuasive (deceitful) appearances we
 ought to have manifest praecognitions ([Greek: prolaepseis]), cleared of
 all impurities and ready to hand.
 
 When death appears an evil, we ought to have this rule in readiness,
 that it is fit to avoid evil things, and that death is a necessary
 thing. For what shall I do, and where shall I escape it? Suppose that I
 am not Sarpedon, the son of Zeus, nor able to speak in this noble way. I
 will go and I am resolved either to behave bravely myself or to give to
 another the opportunity of doing so; if I cannot succeed in doing
 anything myself, I will not grudge another the doing of something noble.
 Suppose that it is above our power to act thus; is it not in our power
 to reason thus? Tell me where I can escape death; discover for me the
 country, show me the men to whom I must go, whom death does not visit.
 Discover to me a charm against death. If I have not one, what do you
 wish me to do? I cannot escape from death. Shall I not escape from the
 fear of death, but shall I die lamenting and trembling? For the origin
 of perturbation is this, to wish for something, and that this should not
 happen. Therefore if I am able to change externals according to my wish,
 I change them; but if I cannot, I am ready to tear out the eyes of him
 who hinders me. For the nature of man is not to endure to be deprived of
 the good, and not to endure the falling into the evil. Then at last,
 when I am neither able to change circumstances nor to tear out the eyes
 of him who hinders me, I sit down and groan, and abuse whom I can, Zeus
 and the rest of the gods. For if they do not care for me, what are they
 to me? Yes, but you will be an impious man. In what respect, then, will
 it be worse for me than it is now? To sum up, remember that unless piety
 and your interest be in the same thing, piety cannot be maintained in
 any man. Do not these things seem necessary (true)?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 THAT WE OUGHT NOT TO BE ANGRY WITH MEN; AND WHAT ARE THE SMALL AND THE
 GREAT THINGS AMONG MEN.--What is the cause of assenting to anything? The
 fact that it appears to be true. It is not possible then to assent to
 that which appears not to be true. Why? Because this is the nature of
 the understanding, to incline to the true, to be dissatisfied with the
 false, and in matters uncertain to withhold assent. What is the proof of
 this? Imagine (persuade yourself), if you can, that it is now night. It
 is not possible. Take away your persuasion that it is day. It is not
 possible. Persuade yourself or take away your persuasion that the stars
 are even in number. It is impossible. When then any man assents to that
 which is false, be assured that he did not intend to assent to it as
 false, for every soul is unwillingly deprived of the truth, as Plato
 says; but the falsity seemed to him to be true. Well, in acts what have
 we of the like kind as we have here truth or falsehood? We have the fit
 and the not fit (duty and not duty), the profitable and the
 unprofitable, that which is suitable to a person and that which is not,
 and whatever is like these. Can then a man think that a thing is useful
 to him and not choose it? He cannot. How says Medea?
 
   "'Tis true I know what evil I shall do,
   But passion overpowers the better counsel."
 
 She thought that to indulge her passion and take vengeance on her
 husband was more profitable than to spare her children. It was so; but
 she was deceived. Show her plainly that she is deceived, and she will
 not do it; but so long as you do not show it, what can she follow except
 that which appears to herself (her opinion)? Nothing else. Why then are
 you angry with the unhappy woman that she has been bewildered about the
 most important things, and is become a viper instead of a human
 creature? And why not, if it is possible, rather pity, as we pity the
 blind and the lame, so those who are blinded and maimed in the faculties
 which are supreme?
 
 Whoever then clearly remembers this, that to man the measure of every
 act is the appearance (the opinion), whether the thing appears good or
 bad. If good, he is free from blame; if bad, himself suffers the
 penalty, for it is impossible that he who is deceived can be one person,
 and he who suffers another person--whoever remembers this will not be
 angry with any man, will not be vexed at any man, will not revile or
 blame any man, nor hate, nor quarrel with any man.
 
 So then all these great and dreadful deeds have this origin, in the
 appearance (opinion)? Yes, this origin and no other. The Iliad is
 nothing else than appearance and the use of appearances. It appeared to
 Alexander to carry off the wife of Menelaus. It appeared to Helene to
 follow him. If then it had appeared to Menelaus to feel that it was a
 gain to be deprived of such a wife, what would have happened? Not only
 would the Iliad have been lost, but the Odyssey also. On so small a
 matter then did such great things depend? But what do you mean by such
 great things? Wars and civil commotions, and the destruction of many men
 and cities. And what great matter is this? Is it nothing? But what great
 matter is the death of many oxen, and many sheep, and many nests of
 swallows or storks being burnt or destroyed? Are these things then like
 those? Very like. Bodies of men are destroyed, and the bodies of oxen
 and sheep; the dwellings of men are burnt, and the nests of storks. What
 is there in this great or dreadful? Or show me what is the difference
 between a man's house and a stork's nest, as far as each is a dwelling;
 except that man builds his little houses of beams and tiles and bricks,
 and the stork builds them of sticks and mud. Are a stork and a man then
 like things? What say you? In body they are very much alike.
 
 Does a man then differ in no respect from a stork? Don't suppose that I
 say so; but there is no difference in these matters (which I have
 mentioned). In what then is the difference? Seek and you will find that
 there is a difference in another matter. See whether it is not in a man
 the understanding of what he does, see if it is not in social community,
 in fidelity, in modesty, in steadfastness, in intelligence. Where then
 is the great good and evil in men? It is where the difference is. If the
 difference is preserved and remains fenced round, and neither modesty is
 destroyed, nor fidelity, nor intelligence, then the man also is
 preserved; but if any of these things is destroyed and stormed like a
 city, then the man too perishes: and in this consist the great things.
 Alexander, you say, sustained great damage then when the Hellenes
 invaded and when they ravaged Troy, and when his brothers perished. By
 no means; for no man is damaged by an action which is not his own; but
 what happened at that time was only the destruction of stork's nests.
 Now the ruin of Alexander was when he lost the character of modesty,
 fidelity, regard to hospitality, and to decency. When was Achilles
 ruined? Was it when Patroclus died? Not so. But it happened when he
 began to be angry, when he wept for a girl, when he forgot that he was
 at Troy not to get mistresses, but to fight. These things are the ruin
 of men, this is being besieged, this is the destruction of cities, when
 right opinions are destroyed, when they are corrupted.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ON CONSTANCY (OR FIRMNESS).--The being (nature) of the good is a certain
 will; the being of the bad is a certain kind of will. What, then, are
 externals? Materials for the will, about which the will being conversant
 shall obtain its own good or evil. How shall it obtain the good? If it
 does not admire (over-value) the materials; for the opinions about the
 materials, if the opinions are right, make the will good: but perverse
 and distorted opinions make the will bad. God has fixed this law, and
 says, "If you would have anything good, receive it from yourself." You
 say, No, but I will have it from another. Do not so: but receive it from
 yourself. Therefore when the tyrant threatens and calls me, I say, Whom
 do you threaten? If he says, I will put you in chains, I say, You
 threaten my hands and my feet. If he says, I will cut off your head, I
 reply, You threaten my head. If he says, I will throw you into prison, I
 say, You threaten the whole of this poor body. If he threatens me with
 banishment, I say the same. Does he then not threaten you at all? If I
 feel that all these things do not concern me, he does not threaten me at
 all; but if I fear any of them, it is I whom he threatens. Whom then do
 I fear? the master of what? The master of things which are in my own
 power? There is no such master. Do I fear the master of things which are
 not in my power? And what are these things to me?
 
 Do you philosophers then teach us to despise kings? I hope not. Who
 among us teaches to claim against them the power over things which they
 possess? Take my poor body, take my property, take my reputation, take
 those who are about me. If I advise any persons to claim these things,
 they may truly accuse me. Yes, but I intend to command your opinions
 also. And who has given you this power? How can you conquer the opinion
 of another man? By applying terror to it, he replies, I will conquer it.
 Do you not know that opinion conquers itself, and is not conquered by
 another? But nothing else can conquer will except the will itself. For
 this reason too the law of God is most powerful and most just, which is
 this: Let the stronger always be superior to the weaker. Ten are
 stronger than one. For what? For putting in chains, for killing, for
 dragging whither they choose, for taking away what a man has. The ten
 therefore conquer the one in this in which they are stronger. In what
 then are the ten weaker? If the one possesses right opinions and the
 others do not. Well then, can the ten conquer in this matter? How is it
 possible? If we were placed in the scales, must not the heavier draw
 down the scale in which it is.
 
 How strange then that Socrates should have been so treated by the
 Athenians. Slave, why do you say Socrates? Speak of the thing as it is:
 how strange that the poor body of Socrates should have been carried off
 and dragged to prison by stronger men, and that anyone should have given
 hemlock to the poor body of Socrates, and that it should breathe out the
 life. Do these things seem strange, do they seem unjust, do you on
 account of these things blame God? Had Socrates then no equivalent for
 these things? Where then for him was the nature of good? Whom shall we
 listen to, you or him? And what does Socrates say? "Anytus and Melitus
 can kill me, but they cannot hurt me." And further, he says, "If it so
 pleases God, so let it be."
 
 But show me that he who has the inferior principles overpowers him who
 is superior in principles. You will never show this, nor come near
 showing it; for this is the law of nature and of God that the superior
 shall always overpower the inferior. In what? In that in which it is
 superior. One body is stronger than another: many are stronger than one:
 the thief is stronger than he who is not a thief. This is the reason why
 I also lost my lamp, because in wakefulness the thief was superior to
 me. But the man bought the lamp at this price: for a lamp he became a
 thief, a faithless fellow, and like a wild beast. This seemed to him a
 good bargain. Be it so. But a man has seized me by the cloak, and is
 drawing me to the public place: then others bawl out, Philosopher, what
 has been the use of your opinions? see, you are dragged to prison, you
 are going to be beheaded. And what system of philosophy ([Greek:
 eisagogaen)] could I have made so that, if a stronger man should have
 laid hold of my cloak, I should not be dragged off; that if ten men
 should have laid hold of me and cast me into prison, I should not be
 cast in? Have I learned nothing else then? I have learned to see that
 everything which happens, if it be independent of my will, is nothing to
 me. I may ask, if you have not gained by this. Why then do you seek
 advantage in anything else than in that in which you have learned that
 advantage is?
 
 Will you not leave the small arguments ([Greek: logaria]) about these
 matters to others, to lazy fellows, that they may sit in a corner and
 receive their sorry pay, or grumble that no one gives them anything; and
 will you not come forward and make use of what you have learned? For it
 is not these small arguments that are wanted now; the writings of the
 Stoics are full of them. What then is the thing which is wanted? A man
 who shall apply them, one who by his acts shall bear testimony to his
 words. Assume, I intreat you, this character, that we may no longer use
 in the schools the examples of the ancients, but may have some example
 of our own.
 
 To whom then does the contemplation of these matters (philosophical
 inquiries) belong? To him who has leisure, for man is an animal that
 loves contemplation. But it is shameful to contemplate these things as
 runaway slaves do; we should sit, as in a theatre, free from
 distraction, and listen at one time to the tragic actor, at another time
 to the lute-player; and not do as slaves do. As soon as the slave has
 taken his station he praises the actor and at the same time looks round;
 then if any one calls out his master's name, the slave is immediately
 frightened and disturbed. It is shameful for philosophers thus to
 contemplate the works of nature. For what is a master? Man is not the
 master of man; but death is, and life and pleasure and pain; for if he
 comes without these things, bring Caesar to me and you will see how firm
 I am. But when he shall come with these things, thundering and
 lightning, and when I am afraid of them, what do I do then except to
 recognize my master like the runaway slave? But so long as I have any
 respite from these terrors, as a runaway slave stands in the theatre, so
 do I. I bathe, I drink, I sing; but all this I do with terror and
 uneasiness. But if I shall release myself from my masters, that is from
 those things by means of which masters are formidable, what further
 trouble have I, what master have I still?
 
 What then, ought we to publish these things to all men? No, but we ought
 to accommodate ourselves to the ignorant ([Greek: tois idiotais]) and to
 say: "This man recommends to me that which he thinks good for himself. I
 excuse him." For Socrates also excused the jailer who had the charge of
 him in prison and was weeping when Socrates was going to drink the
 poison, and said, "How generously he laments over us." Does he then say
 to the jailer that for this reason we have sent away the women? No, but
 he says it to his friends who were able to hear (understand) it; and he
 treats the jailer as a child.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 THAT CONFIDENCE (COURAGE) IS NOT INCONSISTENT WITH CAUTION.--The opinion
 of the philosophers perhaps seem to some to be a paradox; but still let
 us examine as well as we can, if it is true that it is possible to do
 everything both with caution and with confidence. For caution seems to
 be in a manner contrary to confidence, and contraries are in no way
 consistent. That which seems to many to be a paradox in the matter under
 consideration in my opinion is of this kind; if we asserted that we
 ought to employ caution and confidence in the same things, men might
 justly accuse us of bringing together things which cannot be united. But
 now where is the difficulty in what is said? for if these things are
 true, which have been often said and often proved, that the nature of
 good is in the use of appearances, and the nature of evil likewise, and
 that things independent of our will do not admit either the nature of
 evil or of good, what paradox do the philosophers assert if they say
 that where things are not dependent on the will, there you should employ
 confidence, but where they are dependent on the will, there you should
 employ caution? For if the bad consists in the bad exercise of the will,
 caution ought only to be used where things are dependent on the will.
 But if things independent of the will and not in our power are nothing
 to us, with respect to these we must employ confidence; and thus we
 shall both be cautious and confident, and indeed confident because of
 our caution. For by employing caution towards things which are really
 bad, it will result that we shall have confidence with respect to things
 which are not so.
 
 We are then in the condition of deer; when they flee from the huntsmen's
 feathers in fright, whither do they turn and in what do they seek refuge
 as safe? They turn to the nets, and thus they perish by confounding
 things which are objects of fear with things that they ought not to
 fear. Thus we also act: in what cases do we fear? In things which are
 independent of the will. In what cases on the contrary do we behave with
 confidence, as if there were no danger? In things dependent on the will.
 To be deceived then, or to act rashly, or shamelessly, or with base
 desire to seek something, does not concern us at all, if we only hit the
 mark in things which are independent of our will. But where there is
 death or exile or pain or infamy, there we attempt to run away, there we
 are struck with terror. Therefore, as we may expect it to happen with
 those who err in the greatest matters, we convert natural confidence
 (that is, according to nature) into audacity, desperation, rashness,
 shamelessness; and we convert natural caution and modesty into cowardice
 and meanness, which are full of fear and confusion. For if a man should
 transfer caution to those things in which the will may be exercised and
 the acts of the will, he will immediately by willing to be cautious have
 also the power of avoiding what he chooses; but if he transfer it to the
 things which are not in his power and will, and attempt to avoid the
 things which are in the power of others, he will of necessity fear, he
 will be unstable, he will be disturbed; for death or pain is not
 formidable, but the fear of pain or death. For this reason we commend
 the poet, who said:
 
   "Not death is evil, but a shameful death."
 
 Confidence (courage) then ought to be employed against death, and
 caution against the fear of death. But now we do the contrary, and
 employ against death the attempt to escape; and to our opinion about it
 we employ carelessness, rashness, and indifference. These things
 Socrates properly used to call tragic masks; for as to children masks
 appear terrible and fearful from inexperience, we also are affected in
 like manner by events (the things which happen in life) for no other
 reason than children are by masks. For what is a child? Ignorance. What
 is a child? Want of knowledge. For when a child knows these things, he
 is in no way inferior to us. What is death? A tragic mask. Turn it and
 examine it. See, it does not bite. The poor body must be separated from
 the spirit either now or later as it was separated from it before. Why
 then are you troubled if it be separated now? for if it is not separated
 now, it will be separated afterwards. Why? That the period of the
 universe may be completed, for it has need of the present, and of the
 future, and of the past. What is pain? A mask. Turn it and examine it.
 The poor flesh is moved roughly, then on the contrary smoothly. If this
 does not satisfy (please) you, the door is open; if it does, bear (with
 things). For the door ought to be open for all occasions; and so we have
 no trouble.
 
 What then is the fruit of these opinions? It is that which ought to be
 the most noble and the most becoming to those who are really educated,
 release from perturbation, release from fear. Freedom. For in these
 matters we must not believe the many, who say that free persons only
 ought to be educated, but we should rather believe the philosophers who
 say that the educated only are free. How is this? In this manner: Is
 freedom anything else than the power of living as we choose? Nothing
 else. Tell me then, ye men, do you wish to live in error? We do not. No
 one then who lives in error is free. Do you wish to live in fear? Do you
 wish to live in sorrow? Do you wish to live in perturbation? By no
 means. No one then who is in a state of fear or sorrow or perturbation
 is free; but whoever is delivered from sorrows and fears and
 perturbations, he is at the same time also delivered from servitude. How
 then can we continue to believe you, most dear legislators, when you
 say, We only allow free persons to be educated? For philosophers say we
 allow none to be free except the educated; that is, God does not allow
 it. When then a man has turned round before the praetor his own slave,
 has he done nothing? He has done something. What? He has turned round
 his own slave before the praetor. Has he done nothing more? Yes: he is
 also bound to pay for him the tax called the twentieth. Well then, is
 not the man who has gone through this ceremony become free? No more than
 he is become free from perturbations. Have you who are able to turn
 round (free) others no master? is not money your master, or a girl or a
 boy, or some tyrant or some friend of the tyrant? Why do you trouble
 then when you are going off to any trial (danger) of this kind? It is
 for this reason that I often say, study and hold in readiness these
 principles by which you may determine what those things are with
 reference to which you ought to be cautious, courageous in that which
 does not depend on your will, cautious in that which does depend on it.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 OF TRANQUILLITY (FREEDOM FROM PERTURBATION).--Consider, you who are
 going into court, what you wish to maintain and what you wish to succeed
 in. For if you wish to maintain a will conformable to nature, you have
 every security, every facility, you have no troubles. For if you wish to
 maintain what is in your own power and is naturally free, and if you are
 content with these, what else do you care for? For who is the master of
 such things? Who can take them away? If you choose to be modest and
 faithful, who shall not allow you to be so? If you choose not to be
 restrained or compelled, who shall compel you to desire what you think
 that you ought not to desire? who shall compel you to avoid what you do
 not think fit to avoid? But what do you say? The judge will determine
 against you something that appears formidable; but that you should also
 suffer in trying to avoid it, how can he do that? When then the pursuit
 of objects and the avoiding of them are in your power, what else do you
 care for? Let this be your preface, this your narrative, this your
 confirmation, this your victory, this your peroration, this your
 applause (or the approbation which you will receive).
 
 Therefore Socrates said to one who was reminding him to prepare for his
 trial, Do you not think then that I have been preparing for it all my
 life? By what kind of preparation? I have maintained that which was in
 my own power. How then? I have never done anything unjust either in my
 private or in my public life.
 
 But if you wish to maintain externals also, your poor body, your little
 property, and your little estimation, I advise you to make from this
 moment all possible preparation, and then consider both the nature of
 your judge and your adversary. If it is necessary to embrace his knees,
 embrace his knees; if to weep, weep; if to groan, groan. For when you
 have subjected to externals what is your own, then be a slave and do not
 resist, and do not sometimes choose to be a slave, and sometimes not
 choose, but with all your mind be one or the other, either free or a
 slave, either instructed or uninstructed, either a well-bred cock or a
 mean one, either endure to be beaten until you die or yield at once; and
 let it not happen to you to receive many stripes and then to yield. But
 if these things are base, determine immediately. Where is the nature of
 evil and good? It is where truth is: where truth is and where nature is,
 there is caution: where truth is, there is courage where nature is.
 
 For this reason also it is ridiculous to say, Suggest something to me
 (tell me what to do). What should I suggest to you? Well, form my mind
 so as to accommodate itself to any event. Why that is just the same as
 if a man who is ignorant of letters should say, Tell me what to write
 when any name is proposed to me. For if I should tell him to write Dion,
 and then another should come and propose to him not the name of Dion but
 that of Theon, what will be done? what will he write? But if you have
 practised writing, you are also prepared to write (or to do) anything
 that is required. If you are not, what can I now suggest? For if
 circumstances require something else, what will you say, or what will
 you do? Remember then this general precept and you will need no
 suggestion. But if you gape after externals, you must of necessity
 ramble up and down in obedience to the will of your master. And who is
 the master? He who has the power over the things which you seek to gain
 or try to avoid.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 HOW MAGNANIMITY IS CONSISTENT WITH CARE.--Things themselves (materials)
 are indifferent; but the use of them is not indifferent. How then shall
 a man preserve firmness and tranquillity, and at the same time be
 careful and neither rash nor negligent? If he imitates those who play at
 dice. The counters are indifferent; the dice are indifferent. How do I
 know what the cast will be? But to use carefully and dexterously the
 cast of the dice, this is my business. Thus then in life also the chief
 business is this: distinguish and separate things, and say: Externals
 are not in my power: will is in my power. Where shall I seek the good
 and the bad? Within, in the things which are my own. But in what does
 not belong to you call nothing either good or bad, or profit or damage
 or anything of the kind.
 
 What then? Should we use such things carelessly? In no way: for this on
 the other hand is bad for the faculty of the will, and consequently
 against nature; but we should act carefully because the use is not
 indifferent, and we should also act with firmness and freedom from
 perturbations because the material is indifferent. For where the
 material is not indifferent, there no man can hinder me or compel me.
 Where I can be hindered and compelled, the obtaining of those things is
 not in my power, nor is it good or bad; but the use is either bad or
 good, and the use is in my power. But it is difficult to mingle and to
 bring together these two things--the carefulness of him who is affected
 by the matter (or things about him), and the firmness of him who has no
 regard for it; but it is not impossible: and if it is, happiness is
 impossible. But we should act as we do in the case of a voyage. What can
 I do? I can choose the master of the ship, the sailors, the day, the
 opportunity. Then comes a storm. What more have I to care for? for my
 part is done. The business belongs to another, the master. But the ship
 is sinking--what then have I to do? I do the only thing that I can, not
 to be drowned full of fear, nor screaming nor blaming God, but knowing
 that what has been produced must also perish: for I am not an immortal
 being, but a man, a part of the whole, as an hour is a part of the day:
 I must be present like the hour, and past like the hour. What difference
 then does it make to me how I pass away, whether by being suffocated or
 by a fever, for I must pass through some such means.
 
 How then is it said that some external things are according to nature
 and others contrary to nature? It is said as it might be said if we were
 separated from union (or society): for to the foot I shall say that it
 is according to nature for it to be clean; but if you take it as a foot
 and as a thing not detached (independent), it will befit it both to step
 into the mud and tread on thorns, and sometimes to be cut off for the
 good of the whole body; otherwise it is no longer a foot. We should
 think in some such way about ourselves also. What are you? A man. If you
 consider yourself as detached from other men, it is according to nature
 to live to old age, to be rich, to be healthy. But if you consider
 yourself as a man and a part of a certain whole, it is for the sake of
 that whole that at one time you should be sick, at another time take a
 voyage and run into danger, and at another time be in want, and in some
 cases die prematurely. Why then are you troubled? Do you not know, that
 as a foot is no longer a foot if it is detached from the body, so you
 are no longer a man if you are separated from other men. For what is a
 man? A part of a state, of that first which consists of gods and of men;
 then of that which is called next to it, which is a small image of the
 universal state. What then must I be brought to trial; must another have
 a fever, another sail on the sea, another die, and another be condemned?
 Yes, for it is impossible in such a universe of things, among so many
 living together, that such things should not happen, some to one and
 others to others. It is your duty then since you are come here, to say
 what you ought, to arrange these things as it is fit. Then some one
 says, "I shall charge you with doing me wrong." Much good may it do you:
 I have done my part; but whether you also have done yours, you must look
 to that; for there is some danger of this too, that it may escape your
 notice.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 OF INDIFFERENCE.--The hypothetical proposition is indifferent: the
 judgment about it is not indifferent, but it is either knowledge or
 opinion or error. Thus life is indifferent: the use is not indifferent.
 When any man then tells you that these things also are indifferent, do
 not become negligent; and when a man invites you to be careful (about
 such things), do not become abject and struck with admiration of
 material things. And it is good for you to know your own preparation and
 power, that in those matters where you have not been prepared, you may
 keep quiet, and not be vexed, if others have the advantage over you. For
 you too in syllogisms will claim to have the advantage over them; and if
 others should be vexed at this, you will console them by saying, "I have
 learned them, and you have not." Thus also where there is need of any
 practice, seek not that which is acquired from the need (of such
 practice), but yield in that matter to those who have had practice, and
 be yourself content with firmness of mind.
 
 Go and salute a certain person. How? Not meanly. But I have been shut
 out, for I have not learned to make my way through the window; and when
 I have found the door shut, I must either come back or enter through the
 window. But still speak to him. In what way? Not meanly. But suppose
 that you have not got what you wanted. Was this your business, and not
 his? Why then do you claim that which belongs to another? Always
 remember what is your own, and what belongs to another; and you will not
 be disturbed. Chrysippus therefore said well, So long as future things
 are uncertain, I always cling to those which are more adapted to the
 conservation of that which is according to nature; for God himself has
 given me the faculty of such choice. But if I knew that it was fated (in
 the order of things) for me to be sick, I would even move towards it;
 for the foot also, if it had intelligence, would move to go into the
 mud. For why are ears of corn produced? Is it not that they may become
 dry? And do they not become dry that they may be reaped? for they are
 not separated from communion with other things. If then they had
 perception, ought they to wish never to be reaped? But this is a curse
 upon ears of corn to be never reaped. So we must know that in the case
 of men too it is a curse not to die, just the same as not to be ripened
 and not to be reaped. But since we must be reaped, and we also know that
 we are reaped, we are vexed at it; for we neither know what we are nor
 have we studied what belongs to man, as those who have studied horses
 know what belongs to horses. But Chrysantas when he was going to strike
 the enemy checked himself when he heard the trumpet sounding a retreat:
 so it seemed better to him to obey the general's command than to follow
 his own inclination. But not one of us chooses, even when necessity
 summons, readily to obey it, but weeping and groaning we suffer what we
 do suffer, and we call them "circumstances." What kind of circumstances,
 man? If you give the name of circumstances to the things which are
 around you, all things are circumstances; but if you call hardships by
 this name, what hardship is there in the dying of that which has been
 produced? But that which destroys is either a sword, or a wheel, or the
 sea, or a tile, or a tyrant. Why do you care about the way of going down
 to Hades? All ways are equal. But if you will listen to the truth, the
 way which the tyrant sends you is shorter. A tyrant never killed a man
 in six months: but a fever is often a year about it. All these things
 are only sound and the noise of empty names.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 HOW WE OUGHT TO USE DIVINATION.--Through an unreasonable regard to
 divination many of us omit many duties. For what more can the diviner
 see than death or danger or disease, or generally things of that kind?
 If then I must expose myself to danger for a friend, and if it is my
 duty even to die for him, what need have I then for divination? Have I
 not within me a diviner who has told me the nature of good and of evil,
 and has explained to me the signs (or marks) of both? What need have I
 then to consult the viscera of victims or the flight of birds, and why
 do I submit when he says, It is for your interest? For does he know what
 is for my interest, does he know what is good; and as he has learned the
 signs of the viscera, has he also learned the signs of good and evil?
 For if he knows the signs of these, he knows the signs both of the
 beautiful and of the ugly, and of the just and of the unjust. Do you
 tell me, man, what is the thing which is signified for me: is it life or
 death, poverty or wealth? But whether these things are for my interest
 or whether they are not, I do not intend to ask you. Why don't you give
 your opinion on matters of grammar, and why do you give it here about
 things on which we are all in error and disputing with one another?
 
 What then leads us to frequent use of divination? Cowardice, the dread
 of what will happen. This is the reason why we flatter the diviners.
 Pray, master, shall I succeed to the property of my father? Let us see:
 let us sacrifice on the occasion. Yes, master, as fortune chooses. When
 he has said, You shall succeed to the inheritance, we thank him as if we
 received the inheritance from him. The consequence is that they play
 upon us.
 
 Will you not then seek the nature of good in the rational animal? for if
 it is not there, you will not choose to say that it exists in any other
 thing (plant or animal). What then? are not plants and animals also the
 works of God? They are; but they are not superior things, nor yet parts
 of the gods. But you are a superior thing; you are a portion separated
 from the Deity; you have in yourself a certain portion of him. Why then
 are you ignorant of your own noble descent? Why do you not know whence
 you came? will you not remember when you are eating who you are who eat
 and whom you feed? When you are in social intercourse, when you are
 exercising yourself, when you are engaged in discussion, know you not
 that you are nourishing a god, that you are exercising a god? Wretch,
 you are carrying about a god with you, and you know it not. Do you think
 that I mean some god of silver or of gold, and external? You carry him
 within yourself, and you perceive not that you are polluting him by
 impure thoughts and dirty deeds. And if an image of God were present,
 you would not dare to do any of the things which you are doing; but when
 God himself is present within and sees all and hears all, you are not
 ashamed of thinking such things and doing such things, ignorant as you
 are of your own nature and subject to the anger of God. Then why do we
 fear when we are sending a young man from the school into active life,
 lest he should do anything improperly, eat improperly, have improper
 intercourse with women; and lest the rags in which he is wrapped should
 debase him, lest fine garments should make him proud. This youth (if he
 acts thus) does not know his own God; he knows not with whom he sets out
 (into the world). But can we endure when he says, "I wish I had you
 (God) with me." Have you not God with you? and do you seek for any other
 when you have him? or will God tell you anything else than this? If you
 were a statue of Phidias, either Athena or Zeus, you would think both of
 yourself and of the artist, and if you had any understanding (power of
 perception) you would try to do nothing unworthy of him who made you or
 of yourself, and try not to appear in an unbecoming dress (attitude) to
 those who look upon you. But now because Zeus has made you, for this
 reason do you care not how you shall appear? And yet is the artist (in
 the one case) like the artist in the other? or the work in the one case
 like the other? And what work of an artist, for instance, has in itself
 the faculties, which the artist shows in making it? Is it not marble or
 bronze, or gold or ivory? and the Athena of Phidias, when she has once
 extended the hand and received in it the figure of Victory, stands in
 that attitude for ever. But the works of God have power of motion, they
 breathe, they have the faculty of using the appearances of things and
 the power of examining them. Being the work of such an artist do you
 dishonor him? And what shall I say, not only that he made you, but also
 entrusted you to yourself and made you a deposit to yourself? Will you
 not think of this too, but do you also dishonor your guardianship? But
 if God had entrusted an orphan to you, would you thus neglect him? He
 has delivered yourself to your own care, and says: "I had no one fitter
 to entrust him to than yourself; keep him for me such as he is by
 nature, modest, faithful, erect, unterrified, free from passion and
 perturbation." And then you do not keep him such.
 
 But some will say, Whence has this fellow got the arrogance which he
 displays and these supercilious looks? I have not yet so much gravity as
 befits a philosopher; for I do not yet feel confidence in what I have
 learned and in what I have assented to. I still fear my own weakness.
 Let me get confidence and then you shall see a countenance such as I
 ought to have and an attitude such as I ought to have; then I will show
 to you the statue, when it is perfected, when it is polished. What do
 you expect? a supercilious countenance? Does the Zeus at Olympia lift up
 his brow? No, his look is fixed as becomes him who is ready to say:
 
   Irrevocable is my word and shall not fail.--Iliad, i., 526.
 
 Such will I show myself to you, faithful, modest, noble, free from
 perturbation. What, and immortal, too, except from old age, and from
 sickness? No, but dying as becomes a god, sickening as becomes a god.
 This power I possess; this I can do. But the rest I do not possess, nor
 can I do. I will show the nerves (strength) of a philosopher. What
 nerves are these? A desire never disappointed, an aversion which never
 falls on that which it would avoid, a proper pursuit ([Greek: hormaen]),
 a diligent purpose, an assent which is not rash. These you shall see.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 THAT WHEN WE CANNOT FULFIL THAT WHICH THE CHARACTER OF A MAN PROMISES,
 WE ASSUME THE CHARACTER OF A PHILOSOPHER.--It is no common (easy) thing
 to do this only, to fulfil the promise of a man's nature. For what is a
 man? The answer is, A rational and mortal being. Then by the rational
 faculty from whom are we separated? From wild beasts. And from what
 others? From sheep and like animals. Take care then to do nothing like a
 wild beast; but if you do, you have lost the character of a man; you
 have not fulfilled your promise. See that you do nothing like a sheep;
 but if you do, in this case also the man is lost. What then do we do as
 sheep? When we act gluttonously, when we act lewdly, when we act rashly,
 filthily, inconsiderately, to what have we declined? To sheep. What have
 we lost? The rational faculty. When we act contentiously and harmfully
 and passionately and violently, to what have we declined? To wild
 beasts. Consequently some of us are great wild beasts, and others little
 beasts, of a bad disposition and small, whence we may say, Let me be
 eaten by a lion. But in all these ways the promise of a man acting as a
 man is destroyed. For when is a conjunctive (complex) proposition
 maintained? When it fulfils what its nature promises; so that the
 preservation of a complex proposition is when it is a conjunction of
 truths. When is a disjunctive maintained? When it fulfils what it
 promises. When are flutes, a lyre, a horse, a dog, preserved? (When they
 severally keep their promise.) What is the wonder then if man also in
 like manner is preserved, and in like manner is lost? Each man is
 improved and preserved by corresponding acts, the carpenter by acts of
 carpentry, the grammarian by acts of grammar. But if a man accustoms
 himself to write ungrammatically, of necessity his art will be corrupted
 and destroyed. Thus modest actions preserve the modest man, and immodest
 actions destroy him; and actions of fidelity preserve the faithful man,
 and the contrary actions destroy him. And on the other hand contrary
 actions strengthen contrary characters: shamelessness strengthens the
 shameless man, faithlessness the faithless man, abusive words the
 abusive man, anger the man of an angry temper, and unequal receiving and
 giving make the avaricious man more avaricious.
 
 For this reason philosophers admonish us not to be satisfied with
 learning only, but also to add study, and then practice. For we have
 long been accustomed to do contrary things, and we put in practice
 opinions which are contrary to true opinions. If then we shall not also
 put in practice right opinions, we shall be nothing more than the
 expositors of the opinions of others. For now who among us is not able
 to discourse according to the rules of art about good and evil things
 (in this fashion)? That of things some are good, and some are bad, and
 some are indifferent: the good then are virtues, and the things which
 participate in virtues; and the bad are the contrary; and the
 indifferent are wealth, health, reputation. Then, if in the midst of our
 talk there should happen some greater noise than usual, or some of those
 who are present should laugh at us, we are disturbed. Philosopher, where
 are the things which you were talking about? Whence did you produce and
 utter them? From the lips, and thence only. Why then do you corrupt the
 aids provided by others? Why do you treat the weightiest matters as if
 you were playing a game of dice? For it is one thing to lay up bread and
 wine as in a storehouse, and another thing to eat. That which has been
 eaten, is digested, distributed, and is become sinews, flesh, bones,
 blood, healthy color, healthy breath. Whatever is stored up, when you
 choose you can readily take and show it; but you have no other advantage
 from it except so far as to appear to possess it. For what is the
 difference between explaining these doctrines and those of men who have
 different opinions? Sit down now and explain according to the rules of
 art the opinions of Epicurus, and perhaps you will explain his opinions
 in a more useful manner than Epicurus himself. Why then do you call
 yourself a Stoic? Why do you deceive the many? Why do you act the part
 of a Jew, when you are a Greek? Do you not see how (why) each is called
 a Jew, or a Syrian, or an Egyptian? and when we see a man inclining to
 two sides, we are accustomed to say, This man is not a Jew, but he acts
 as one. But when he has assumed the affects of one who has been imbued
 with Jewish doctrine and has adopted that sect, then he is in fact and
 he is named a Jew.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 HOW WE MAY DISCOVER THE DUTIES OF LIFE FROM NAMES.--Consider who you
 are. In the first place, you are a man; and this is one who has nothing
 superior to the faculty of the will, but all other things subjected to
 it; and the faculty itself he possesses unenslaved and free from
 subjection. Consider then from what things you have been separated by
 reason. You have been separated from wild beasts; you have been
 separated from domestic animals ([Greek: probaton]). Further, you are a
 citizen of the world, and a part of it, not one of the subservient
 (serving), but one of the principal (ruling) parts, for you are capable
 of comprehending the divine administration and of considering the
 connection of things. What then does the character of a citizen promise
 (profess)? To hold nothing as profitable to himself; to deliberate about
 nothing as if he were detached from the community, but to act as the
 hand or foot would do, if they had reason and understood the
 constitution of nature, for they would never put themselves in motion
 nor desire anything otherwise than with reference to the whole.
 Therefore, the philosophers say well, that if the good man had
 foreknowledge of what would happen, he would co-operate towards his own
 sickness and death and mutilation, since he knows that these things are
 assigned to him according to the universal arrangement, and that the
 whole is superior to the part, and the state to the citizen. But now
 because we do not know the future, it is our duty to stick to the things
 which are in their nature more suitable for our choice, for we were made
 among other things for this.
 
 After this, remember that you are a son. What does this character
 promise? To consider that everything which is the son's belongs to the
 father, to obey him in all things, never to blame him to another, nor to
 say or do anything which does him injury, to yield to him in all things
 and give way, co-operating with him as far as you can. After this know
 that you are a brother also, and that to this character it is due to
 make concessions; to be easily persuaded, to speak good of your brother,
 never to claim in opposition to him any of the things which are
 independent of the will, but readily to give them up, that you may have
 the larger share in what is dependent on the will. For see what a thing
 it is, in place of a lettuce, if it should so happen, or a seat, to gain
 for yourself goodness of disposition. How great is the advantage.
 
 Next to this, if you are a senator of any state, remember that you are a
 senator; if a youth, that you are a youth; if an old man, that you are
 an old man; for each of such names, if it comes to be examined, marks
 out the proper duties. But if you go and blame your brother, I say to
 you, You have forgotten who you are and what is your name. In the next
 place, if you were a smith and made a wrong use of the hammer, you would
 have forgotten the smith; and if you have forgotten the brother and
 instead of a brother have become an enemy, would you appear not to have
 changed one thing for another in that case? And if instead of a man, who
 is a tame animal and social, you are become a mischievous wild beast,
 treacherous, and biting, have you lost nothing? But (I suppose) you must
 lose a bit of money that you may suffer damage? And does the loss of
 nothing else do a man damage? If you had lost the art of grammar or
 music, would you think the loss of it a damage? and if you shall lose
 modesty, moderation ([Greek: chtastolaen]) and gentleness, do you think
 the loss nothing? And yet the things first mentioned are lost by some
 cause external and independent of the will, and the second by our own
 fault; and as to the first neither to have them nor to lose them is
 shameful; but as to the second, not to have them and to lose them is
 shameful and matter of reproach and a misfortune.
 
 What then? shall I not hurt him who has hurt me? In the first place
 consider what hurt ([Greek: blabae]) is, and remember what you have
 heard from the philosophers. For if the good consists in the will
 (purpose, intention, [Greek: proaireeis]), and the evil also in the
 will, see if what you say is not this: What then, since that man has
 hurt himself by doing an unjust act to me, shall I not hurt myself by
 doing some unjust act to him? Why do we not imagine to ourselves
 (mentally think of) something of this kind? But where there is any
 detriment to the body or to our possession, there is harm there; and
 where the same thing happens to the faculty of the will, there is (you
 suppose) no harm; for he who has been deceived or he who has done an
 unjust act neither suffers in the head nor in the eye nor in the hip,
 nor does he lose his estate; and we wish for nothing else than (security
 to) these things. But whether we shall have the will modest and faithful
 or shameless and faithless, we care not the least, except only in the
 school so far as a few words are concerned. Therefore our proficiency is
 limited to these few words; but beyond them it does not exist even in
 the slightest degree.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 WHAT THE BEGINNING OF PHILOSOPHY IS.--The beginning of philosophy, to
 him at least who enters on it in the right way and by the door is a
 consciousness of his own weakness and inability about necessary things;
 for we come into the world with no natural notion of a right-angled
 triangle, or of a diesis (a quarter tone), or of a half-tone; but we
 learn each of these things by a certain transmission according to art;
 and for this reason those who do not know them do not think that they
 know them. But as to good and evil, and beautiful and ugly, and becoming
 and unbecoming, and happiness and misfortune, and proper and improper,
 and what we ought to do and what we ought not to do, who ever came into
 the world without having an innate idea of them? Wherefore we all use
 these names, and we endeavor to fit the preconceptions to the several
 cases (things) thus: he has done well; he has not done well; he has done
 as he ought, not as he ought; he has been unfortunate, he has been
 fortunate; he is unjust, he is just; who does not use these names? who
 among us defers the use of them till he has learned them, as he defers
 the use of the words about lines (geometrical figures) or sounds? And
 the cause of this is that we come into the world already taught as it
 were by nature some things on this matter ([Greek: topon]), and
 proceeding from these we have added to them self-conceit ([Greek:
 oiaesin]). For why, a man says, do I not know the beautiful and the
 ugly? Have I not the notion of it? You have. Do I not adapt it to
 particulars? You do. Do I not then adapt it properly? In that lies the
 whole question; and conceit is added here; for beginning from these
 things which are admitted men proceed to that which is matter of dispute
 by means of unsuitable adaptation; for if they possessed this power of
 adaptation in addition to those things, what would hinder them from
 being perfect? But now since you think that you properly adapt the
 preconceptions to the particulars, tell me whence you derive this
 (assume that you do so). Because I think so. But it does not seem so to
 another, and he thinks that he also makes a proper adaptation; or does
 he not think so? He does think so. Is it possible then that both of you
 can properly apply the preconceptions to things about which you have
 contrary opinions? It is not possible. Can you then show us anything
 better towards adapting the preconceptions beyond your thinking that you
 do? Does the madman do any other things than the things which seem to
 him right? Is then this criterion sufficient for him also? It is not
 sufficient. Come then to something which is superior to seeming ([Greek:
 tou dochein]). What is this?
 
 Observe, this is the beginning of philosophy, a perception of the
 disagreement of men with one another, and an inquiry into the cause of
 the disagreement, and a condemnation and distrust of that which only
 "seems," and a certain investigation of that which "seems" whether it
 "seems" rightly, and a discovery of some rule ([Greek: chanonos]), as we
 have discovered a balance in the determination of weights, and a
 carpenter's rule (or square) in the case of straight and crooked
 things.--This is the beginning of philosophy. Must we say that all
 things are right which seem so to all? And how is it possible that
 contradictions can be right?--Not all then, but all which seem to us to
 be right.--How more to you than those which seem right to the Syrians?
 why more than what seem right to the Egyptians? why more than what seems
 right to me or to any other man? Not at all more. What then "seems" to
 every man is not sufficient for determining what "is"; for neither in
 the case of weights nor measures are we satisfied with the bare
 appearance, but in each case we have discovered a certain rule. In this
 matter then is there no rule superior to what "seems"? And how is it
 possible that the most necessary things among men should have no sign
 (mark), and be incapable of being discovered? There is then some rule.
 And why then do we not seek the rule and discover it, and afterwards use
 it without varying from it, not even stretching out the finger without
 it? For this, I think, is that which when it is discovered cures of
 their madness those who use mere "seeming" as a measure, and misuse it;
 so that for the future proceeding from certain things (principles) known
 and made clear we may use in the case of particular things the
 preconceptions which are distinctly fixed.
 
 What is the matter presented to us about which we are inquiring?
 Pleasure (for example). Subject it to the rule, throw it into the
 balance. Ought the good to be such a thing that it is fit that we have
 confidence in it? Yes. And in which we ought to confide? It ought to be.
 Is it fit to trust to anything which is insecure? No. Is then pleasure
 anything secure? No. Take it then and throw it out of the scale, and
 drive it far away from the place of good things. But if you are not
 sharp-sighted, and one balance is not enough for you, bring another. Is
 it fit to be elated over what is good? Yes. Is it proper then to be
 elated over present pleasure? See that you do not say that it is proper;
 but if you do, I shall then not think you worthy even of the balance.
 Thus things are tested and weighed when the rules are ready. And to
 philosophize is this, to examine and confirm the rules; and then to use
 them when they are known is the act of a wise and good man.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 OF DISPUTATION OR DISCUSSION.--What things a man must learn in order to
 be able to apply the art of disputation, has been accurately shown by
 our philosophers (the Stoics); but with respect to the proper use of the
 things, we are entirely without practice. Only give to any of us, whom
 you please, an illiterate man to discuss with, and he cannot discover
 how to deal with the man. But when he has moved the man a little, if he
 answers beside the purpose, he does not know how to treat him, but he
 then either abuses or ridicules him, and says, He is an illiterate man;
 it is not possible to do anything with him. Now a guide, when he has
 found a man out of the road, leads him into the right way; he does not
 ridicule or abuse him and then leave him. Do you also show the
 illiterate man the truth, and you will see that he follows. But so long
 as you do not show him the truth, do not ridicule him, but rather feel
 your own incapacity.
 
 Now this was the first and chief peculiarity of Socrates, never to be
 irritated in argument, never to utter anything abusive, anything
 insulting, but to bear with abusive persons and to put an end to the
 quarrel. If you would know what great power he had in this way, read the
 Symposium of Xenophon, and you will see how many quarrels he put an end
 to. Hence with good reason in the poets also this power is most highly
 praised:
 
   Quickly with skill he settles great disputes.
   Hesiod, Theogony, v. 87.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ON ANXIETY (SOLICITUDE).--When I see a man anxious, I say, What does
 this man want? If he did not want something which is not in his power,
 how could he be anxious? For this reason a lute player when he is
 singing by himself has no anxiety, but when he enters the theatre, he is
 anxious, even if he has a good voice and plays well on the lute; for he
 not only wishes to sing well, but also to obtain applause: but this is
 not in his power. Accordingly, where he has skill, there he has
 confidence. Bring any single person who knows nothing of music, and the
 musician does not care for him. But in the matter where a man knows
 nothing and has not been practised, there he is anxious. What matter is
 this? He knows not what a crowd is or what the praise of a crowd is.
 However, he has learned to strike the lowest chord and the highest; but
 what the praise of the many is, and what power it has in life, he
 neither knows nor has he thought about it. Hence he must of necessity
 tremble and grow pale. Is any man then afraid about things which are not
 evils? No. Is he afraid about things which are evils, but still so far
 within his power that they may not happen? Certainly he is not. If then
 the things which are independent of the will are neither good nor bad,
 and all things which do depend on the will are within our power, and no
 man can either take them from us or give them to us, if we do not
 choose, where is room left for anxiety? But we are anxious about our
 poor body, our little property, about the will of Caesar; but not anxious
 about things internal. Are we anxious about not forming a false opinion?
 No, for this is in my power. About not exerting our movements contrary
 to nature? No, not even about this. When then you see a man pale, as the
 physician says, judging from the complexion, this man's spleen is
 disordered, that man's liver; so also say, this man's desire and
 aversion are disordered, he is not in the right way, he is in a fever.
 For nothing else changes the color, or causes trembling or chattering of
 the teeth, or causes a man to
 
   Sink in his knees and shift from foot to foot.
   Iliad, xiii., 281.
 
 For this reason, when Zeno was going to meet Antigonus, he was not
 anxious, for Antigonus had no power over any of the things which Zeno
 admired; and Zeno did not care for those things over which Antigonus had
 power. But Antigonus was anxious when he was going to meet Zeno, for he
 wished to please Zeno; but this was a thing external (out of his power).
 But Zeno did not want to please Antigonus; for no man who is skilled in
 any art wishes to please one who has no such skill.
 
 Should I try to please you? Why? I suppose, you know the measure by
 which one man is estimated by another. Have you taken pains to learn
 what is a good man and what is a bad man, and how a man becomes one or
 the other? Why then are you not good yourself? How, he replies, am I not
 good? Because no good man laments or groans or weeps, no good man is
 pale and trembles, or says, How will he receive me, how will he listen
 to me? Slave, just as it pleases him. Why do you care about what belongs
 to others? Is it now his fault if he receives badly what proceeds from
 you? Certainly. And is it possible that a fault should be one man's, and
 the evil in another? No. Why then are you anxious about that which
 belongs to others? Your question is reasonable; but I am anxious how I
 shall speak to him. Cannot you then speak to him as you choose? But I
 fear that I may be disconcerted? If you are going to write the name of
 Dion, are you afraid that you would be disconcerted? By no means. Why?
 is it not because you have practised writing the name? Certainly. Well,
 if you were going to read the name, would you not feel the same? and
 why? Because every art has a certain strength and confidence in the
 things which belong to it. Have you then not practised speaking? and
 what else did you learn in the school? Syllogisms and sophistical
 propositions? For what purpose? was it not for the purpose of
 discoursing skilfully? and is not discoursing skilfully the same as
 discoursing seasonably and cautiously and with intelligence, and also
 without making mistakes and without hindrance, and besides all this with
 confidence? Yes. When then you are mounted on a horse and go into a
 plain, are you anxious at being matched against a man who is on foot,
 and anxious in a matter in which you are practised, and he is not? Yes,
 but that person (to whom I am going to speak) has power to kill me.
 Speak the truth, then, unhappy man, and do not brag, nor claim to be a
 philosopher, nor refuse to acknowledge your masters, but so long as you
 present this handle in your body, follow every man who is stronger than
 yourself. Socrates used to practice speaking, he who talked as he did to
 the tyrants, to the dicasts (judges), he who talked in his prison.
 Diogenes had practised speaking, he who spoke as he did to Alexander, to
 the pirates, to the person who bought him. These men were confident in
 the things which they practised. But do you walk off to your own affairs
 and never leave them: go and sit in a corner, and weave syllogisms, and
 propose them to another. There is not in you the man who can rule a
 state.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 TO NASO.--When a certain Roman entered with his son and listened to one
 reading, Epictetus said, This is the method of instruction; and he
 stopped. When the Roman asked him to go on, Epictetus said, Every art
 when it is taught causes labor to him who is unacquainted with it and is
 unskilled in it, and indeed the things which proceed from the arts
 immediately show their use in the purpose for which they were made; and
 most of them contain something attractive and pleasing. For indeed to be
 present and to observe how a shoemaker learns is not a pleasant thing;
 but the shoe is useful and also not disagreeable to look at. And the
 discipline of a smith when he is learning is very disagreeable to one
 who chances to be present and is a stranger to the art: but the work
 shows the use of the art. But you will see this much more in music; for
 if you are present while a person is learning, the discipline will
 appear most disagreeable; and yet the results of music are pleasing and
 delightful to those who know nothing of music. And here we conceive the
 work of a philosopher to be something of this kind: he must adapt his
 wish ([Greek: boulaesin]) to what is going on, so that neither any of
 the things which are taking place shall take place contrary to our wish,
 nor any of the things which do not take place shall not take place when
 we wish that they should. From this the result is to those who have so
 arranged the work of philosophy, not to fail in the desire, nor to fall
 in with that which they would avoid; without uneasiness, without fear,
 without perturbation to pass through life themselves, together with
 their associates maintaining the relations both natural and acquired, as
 the relation of son, of father, of brother, of citizen, of man, of wife,
 of neighbor, of fellow-traveller, of ruler, of ruled. The work of a
 philosopher we conceive to be something like this. It remains next to
 inquire how this must be accomplished.
 
 We see then that the carpenter ([Greek: techton]) when he has learned
 certain things becomes a carpenter; the pilot by learning certain things
 becomes a pilot. May it not then in philosophy also not be sufficient to
 wish to be wise and good, and that there is also a necessity to learn
 certain things? We inquire then what these things are. The philosophers
 say that we ought first to learn that there is a God and that he
 provides for all things; also that it is not possible to conceal from
 him our acts, or even our intentions and thoughts. The next thing is to
 learn what is the nature of the gods; for such as they are discovered to
 be, he, who would please and obey them, must try with all his power to
 be like them. If the divine is faithful, man also must be faithful; if
 it is free, man also must be free; if beneficent, man also must be
 beneficent; if magnanimous, man also must be magnanimous; as being then
 an imitator of God he must do and say everything consistently with this
 fact.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 TO OR AGAINST THOSE WHO OBSTINATELY PERSIST IN WHAT THEY HAVE
 DETERMINED.--When some persons have heard these words, that a man ought
 to be constant (firm), and that the will is naturally free and not
 subject to compulsion, but that all other things are subject to
 hindrance, to slavery, and are in the power of others, they suppose that
 they ought without deviation to abide by everything which they have
 determined. But in the first place that which has been determined ought
 to be sound (true). I require tone (sinews) in the body, but such as
 exists in a healthy body, in an athletic body; but if it is plain to me
 that you have the tone of a frenzied man and you boast of it, I shall
 say to you, Man, seek the physician; this is not tone, but atony
 (deficiency in right tone). In a different way something of the same
 kind is felt by those who listen to these discourses in a wrong manner;
 which was the case with one of my companions, who for no reason resolved
 to starve himself to death. I heard of it when it was the third day of
 his abstinence from food, and I went to inquire what had happened. "I
 have resolved," he said. "But still tell me what it was which induced
 you to resolve; for if you have resolved rightly, we shall sit with you
 and assist you to depart, but if you have made an unreasonable
 resolution, change your mind." "We ought to keep to our determinations."
 "What are you doing, man? We ought to keep not to all our
 determinations, but to those which are right; for if you are now
 persuaded that it is right, do not change your mind, if you think fit,
 but persist and say, We ought to abide by our determinations. Will you
 not make the beginning and lay the foundation in an inquiry whether the
 determination is sound or not sound, and so then build on it firmness
 and security? But if you lay a rotten and ruinous foundation, will not
 your miserable little building fall down the sooner, the more and the
 stronger are the materials which you shall lay on it? Without any reason
 would you withdraw from us out of life a man who is a friend and a
 companion, a citizen of the same city, both the great and the small
 city? Then while you are committing murder and destroying a man who has
 done no wrong, do you say that you ought to abide by your
 determinations? And if it ever in any way came into your head to kill
 me, ought you to abide by your determinations?"
 
 Now this man was with difficulty persuaded to change his mind. But it is
 impossible to convince some persons at present; so that I seem now to
 know what I did not know before, the meaning of the common saying, that
 you can neither persuade nor break a fool. May it never be my lot to
 have a wise fool for my friend; nothing is more untractable. "I am
 determined," the man says. Madmen are also, but the more firmly they
 form a judgment on things which do not exist, the more hellebore they
 require. Will you not act like a sick man and call in the physician?--I
 am sick, master, help me; consider what I must do: it is my duty to obey
 you. So it is here also: I know not what I ought to do, but I am come to
 learn.--Not so; but speak to me about other things: upon this I have
 determined.--What other things? for what is greater and more useful than
 for you to be persuaded that it is not sufficient to have made your
 determination and not to change it. This is the tone (energy) of
 madness, not of health.--I will die, if you compel me to this.--Why,
 man? What has happened?--I have determined--I have had a lucky escape
 that you have not determined to kill me--I take no money. Why?--I have
 determined--Be assured that with the very tone (energy) which you now
 use in refusing to take, there is nothing to hinder you at some time
 from inclining without reason to take money, and then saying, I have
 determined. As in a distempered body, subject to defluxions, the humor
 inclines sometimes to these parts, and then to those, so too a sickly
 soul knows not which way to incline; but if to this inclination and
 movement there is added a tone (obstinate resolution), then the evil
 becomes past help and cure.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 THAT WE DO NOT STRIVE TO USE OUR OPINIONS ABOUT GOOD AND EVIL.--Where is
 the good? In the will. Where is the evil? In the will. Where is neither
 of them? In those things which are independent of the will. Well then?
 Does any one among us think of these lessons out of the schools? Does
 any one meditate (strive) by himself to give an answer to things as in
 the case of questions?--Is it day?--Yes.--Is it night?--No.--Well, is
 the number of stars even?--I cannot say.--When money is shown (offered)
 to you, have you studied to make the proper answer, that money is not a
 good thing? Have you practised yourself in these answers, or only
 against sophisms? Why do you wonder then if in the cases which you have
 studied, in those you have improved; but in those which you have not
 studied, in those you remain the same? When the rhetorician knows that
 he has written well, that he has committed to memory what he has
 written, and brings an agreeable voice, why is he still anxious? Because
 he is not satisfied with having studied. What then does he want? To be
 praised by the audience? For the purpose then of being able to practise
 declamation he has been disciplined; but with respect to praise and
 blame he has not been disciplined. For when did he hear from any one
 what praise is, what blame is, what the nature of each is, what kind of
 praise should be sought, or what kind of blame should be shunned? And
 when did he practise this discipline which follows these words (things)?
 Why then do you still wonder, if in the matters which a man has learned,
 there he surpasses others, and in those in which he has not been
 disciplined, there he is the same with the many. So the lute player
 knows how to play, sings well, and has a fine dress, and yet he trembles
 when he enters on the stage; for these matters he understands, but he
 does not know what a crowd is, nor the shouts of a crowd, nor what
 ridicule is. Neither does he know what anxiety is, whether it is our
 work or the work of another, whether it is possible to stop it or not.
 For this reason if he has been praised, he leaves the theatre puffed up,
 but if he has been ridiculed, the swollen bladder has been punctured and
 subsides.
 
 This is the case also with ourselves. What do we admire? Externals.
 About what things are we busy? Externals. And have we any doubt then why
 we fear or why we are anxious? What then happens when we think the
 things, which are coming on us, to be evils? It is not in our power not
 to be afraid, it is not in our power not to be anxious. Then we say,
 Lord God, how shall I not be anxious? Fool, have you not hands, did not
 God make them for you? Sit down now and pray that your nose may not run.
 Wipe yourself rather and do not blame him. Well then, has he given to
 you nothing in the present case? Has he not given to you endurance? Has
 he not given to you magnanimity? Has he not given to you manliness? When
 you have such hands do you still look for one who shall wipe your nose?
 But we neither study these things nor care for them. Give me a man who
 cares how he shall do anything, not for the obtaining of a thing, but
 who cares about his own energy. What man, when he is walking about,
 cares for his own energy? Who, when he is deliberating, cares about his
 own deliberation, and not about obtaining that about which he
 deliberates? And if he succeeds, he is elated and says, How well we have
 deliberated; did I not tell you, brother, that it is impossible, when we
 have thought about anything, that it should not turn out thus? But if
 the thing should turn out otherwise, the wretched man is humbled; he
 knows not even what to say about what has taken place. Who among us for
 the sake of this matter has consulted a seer? Who among us as to his
 actions has not slept in indifference? Who? Give (name) to me one that I
 may see the man whom I have long been looking for, who is truly noble
 and ingenuous, whether young or old; name him.
 
 What then are the things which are heavy on us and disturb us? What else
 than opinions? What else than opinions lies heavy upon him who goes away
 and leaves his companions and friends and places and habits of life? Now
 little children, for instance, when they cry on the nurse leaving them
 for a short time, forget their sorrow if they receive a small cake. Do
 you choose then that we should compare you to little children? No, by
 Zeus, for I do not wish to be pacified by a small cake, but by right
 opinions. And what are these? Such as a man ought to study all day, and
 not to be affected by anything that is not his own, neither by companion
 nor place nor gymnasia, and not even by his own body, but to remember
 the law and to have it before his eyes. And what is the divine law? To
 keep a man's own, not to claim that which belongs to others, but to use
 what is given, and when it is not given, not to desire it; and when a
 thing is taken away, to give it up readily and immediately, and to be
 thankful for the time that a man has had the use of it, if you would not
 cry for your nurse and mamma. For what matter does it make by what thing
 a man is subdued, and on what he depends? In what respect are you better
 than he who cries for a girl, if you grieve for a little gymnasium, and
 little porticos, and young men, and such places of amusement? Another
 comes and laments that he shall no longer drink the water of Dirce. Is
 the Marcian water worse than that of Dirce? But I was used to the water
 of Dirce. And you in turn will be used to the other. Then if you become
 attached to this also, cry for this too, and try to make a verse like
 the verse of Euripides,
 
   The hot baths of Nero and the Marcian water.
 
 See how tragedy is made when common things happen to silly men.
 
 When then shall I see Athens again and the Acropolis? Wretch, are you
 not content with what you see daily? Have you anything better or greater
 to see than the sun, the moon, the stars, the whole earth, the sea? But
 if indeed you comprehend Him who administers the whole, and carry him
 about in yourself, do you still desire small stones and a beautiful
 rock?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 HOW WE MUST ADAPT PRECONCEPTIONS TO PARTICULAR CASES.--What is the first
 business of him who philosophizes? To throw away self-conceit ([Greek:
 oiaesis]). For it is impossible for a man to begin to learn that which
 he thinks that he knows. As to things then which ought to be done and
 ought not to be done, and good and bad, and beautiful and ugly, all of
 us talking of them at random go to the philosophers; and on these
 matters we praise, we censure, we accuse, we blame, we judge and
 determine about principles honorable and dishonorable. But why do we go
 to the philosophers? Because we wish to learn what we do not think that
 we know. And what is this? Theorems. For we wish to learn what
 philosophers say as being something elegant and acute; and some wish to
 learn that they may get profit from what they learn. It is ridiculous
 then to think that a person wishes to learn one thing, and will learn
 another; or further, that a man will make proficiency in that which he
 does not learn. But the many are deceived by this which deceived also
 the rhetorician Theopompus, when he blames even Plato for wishing
 everything to be defined. For what does he say? Did none of us before
 you use the words good or just, or do we utter the sounds in an
 unmeaning and empty way without understanding what they severally
 signify? Now who tells you, Theopompus, that we had not natural notions
 of each of these things and preconceptions ([Greek: prolaepseis])? But
 it is not possible to adapt preconceptions to their correspondent
 objects if we have not distinguished (analyzed) them, and inquired what
 object must be subjected to each preconception. You may make the same
 charge against physicians also. For who among us did not use the words
 healthy and unhealthy before Hippocrates lived, or did we utter these
 words as empty sounds? For we have also a certain preconception of
 health, but we are not able to adapt it. For this reason one says,
 Abstain from food; another says, Give food; another says, Bleed; and
 another says, Use cupping. What is the reason? is it any other than that
 a man cannot properly adapt the preconceptions of health to particulars?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 HOW WE SHOULD STRUGGLE AGAINST APPEARANCES.--Every habit and faculty is
 maintained and increased by the corresponding actions: the habit of
 walking by walking, the habit of running by running. If you would be a
 good reader, read; if a writer, write. But when you shall not have read
 for thirty days in succession, but have done something else, you will
 know the consequence. In the same way, if you shall have lain down ten
 days, get up and attempt to make a long walk, and you will see how your
 legs are weakened. Generally then if you would make anything a habit, do
 it; if you would not make it a habit, do not do it, but accustom
 yourself to do something else in place of it.
 
 So it is with respect to the affections of the soul: when you have been
 angry, you must know that not only has this evil befallen you, but that
 you have also increased the habit, and in a manner thrown fuel upon
 fire.
 
 In this manner certainly, as philosophers say, also diseases of the mind
 grow up. For when you have once desired money, if reason be applied to
 lead to a perception of the evil, the desire is stopped, and the ruling
 faculty of our mind is restored to the original authority. But if you
 apply no means of cure, it no longer returns to the same state, but
 being again excited by the corresponding appearance, it is inflamed to
 desire quicker than before: and when this takes place continually, it is
 henceforth hardened (made callous), and the disease of the mind confirms
 the love of money. For he who has had a fever, and has been relieved
 from it, is not in the same state that he was before, unless he has been
 completely cured. Something of the kind happens also in diseases of the
 soul. Certain traces and blisters are left in it, and unless a man shall
 completely efface them, when he is again lashed on the same places, the
 lash will produce not blisters (weals) but sores. If then you wish not
 to be of an angry temper, do not feed the habit: throw nothing on it
 which will increase it: at first keep quiet, and count the days on which
 you have not been angry. I used to be in passion every day; now every
 second day; then every third, then every fourth. But if you have
 intermitted thirty days, make a sacrifice to God. For the habit at first
 begins to be weakened, and then is completely destroyed. "I have not
 been vexed to-day, nor the day after, nor yet on any succeeding day
 during two or three months; but I took care when some exciting things
 happened." Be assured that you are in a good way.
 
 How then shall this be done? Be willing at length to be approved by
 yourself, be willing to appear beautiful to God, desire to be in purity
 with your own pure self and with God. Then when any such appearance
 visits you, Plato says, Have recourse to expiations, go a suppliant to
 the temples of the averting deities. It is even sufficient if you resort
 to the society of noble and just men, and compare yourself with them,
 whether you find one who is living or dead.
 
 But in the first place, be not hurried away by the rapidity of the
 appearance, but say, Appearances, wait for me a little; let me see who
 you are, and what you are about; let me put you to the test. And then do
 not allow the appearance to lead you on and draw lively pictures of the
 things which will follow; for if you do, it will carry you off wherever
 it pleases. But rather bring in to oppose it some other beautiful and
 noble appearance, and cast out this base appearance. And if you are
 accustomed to be exercised in this way, you will see what shoulders,
 what sinews, what strength you have. But now it is only trifling words,
 and nothing more.
 
 This is the true athlete, the man who exercises himself against such
 appearances. Stay, wretch, do not be carried away. Great is the combat,
 divine is the work; it is for kingship, for freedom, for happiness, for
 freedom from perturbation. Remember God; call on him as a helper and
 protector, as men at sea call on the Dioscuri in a storm. For what is a
 greater storm than that which comes from appearances which are violent
 and drive away the reason? For the storm itself, what else is it but an
 appearance? For take away the fear of death, and suppose as many
 thunders and lightnings as you please, and you will know what calm and
 serenity there is in the ruling faculty. But if you have once been
 defeated and say that you will conquer hereafter, and then say the same
 again, be assured that you will at last be in so wretched a condition
 and so weak that you will not even know afterwards that you are doing
 wrong, but you will even begin to make apologies (defences) for your
 wrong-doing, and then you will confirm the saying of Hesiod to be true,
 
   With constant ills the dilatory strives.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 OF INCONSISTENCY.--Some things men readily confess, and other things
 they do not. No one then will confess that he is a fool or without
 understanding; but quite the contrary you will hear all men saying, I
 wish that I had fortune equal to my understanding. But men readily
 confess that they are timid, and they say: I am rather timid, I confess;
 but as to other respects you will not find me to be foolish. A man will
 not readily confess that he is intemperate; and that he is unjust, he
 will not confess at all. He will by no means confess that he is envious
 or a busybody. Most men will confess that they are compassionate. What
 then is the reason?
 
 The chief thing (the ruling thing) is inconsistency and confusion in the
 things which relate to good and evil. But different men have different
 reasons; and generally what they imagine to be base, they do not confess
 at all. But they suppose timidity to be a characteristic of a good
 disposition, and compassion also; but silliness to be the absolute
 characteristic of a slave. And they do not at all admit (confess) the
 things which are offences against society. But in the case of most
 errors for this reason chiefly they are induced to confess them, because
 they imagine that there is something involuntary in them as in timidity
 and compassion; and if a man confess that he is in any respect
 intemperate, he alleges love (or passion) as an excuse for what is
 involuntary. But men do not imagine injustice to be at all involuntary.
 There is also in jealousy, as they suppose, something involuntary; and
 for this reason they confess to jealousy also.
 
 Living then among such men, who are so confused, so ignorant of what
 they say, and of the evils which they have or have not, and why they
 have them, or how they shall be relieved of them, I think it is worth
 the trouble for a man to watch constantly (and to ask) whether I also am
 one of them, what imagination I have about myself, how I conduct myself,
 whether I conduct myself as a prudent man, whether I conduct myself as a
 temperate man, whether I ever say this, that I have been taught to be
 prepared for everything that may happen. Have I the consciousness, which
 a man who knows nothing ought to have, that I know nothing? Do I go to
 my teacher as men go to oracles, prepared to obey? or do I like a
 snivelling boy go to my school to learn history and understand the books
 which I did not understand before, and, if it should happen so, to
 explain them also to others? Man, you have had a fight in the house with
 a poor slave, you have turned the family upside down, you have
 frightened the neighbors, and you come to me as if you were a wise man,
 and you take your seat and judge how I have explained some word, and how
 I have babbled whatever came into my head. You come full of envy, and
 humbled, because you bring nothing from home; and you sit during the
 discussion thinking of nothing else than how your father is disposed
 towards you and your brother. What are they saying about me there? now
 they think that I am improving, and are saying, He will return with all
 knowledge. I wish I could learn everything before I return; but much
 labor is necessary, and no one sends me anything, and the baths at
 Nicopolis are dirty; everything is bad at home, and bad here.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ON FRIENDSHIP.--What a man applies himself to earnestly, that he
 naturally loves. Do men then apply themselves earnestly to the things
 which are bad? By no means. Well, do they apply themselves to things
 which in no way concern themselves? Not to these either. It remains then
 that they employ themselves earnestly only about things which are good;
 and if they are earnestly employed about things, they love such things
 also. Whoever then understands what is good can also know how to love;
 but he who cannot distinguish good from bad, and things which are
 neither good nor bad from both, how can he possess the power of loving?
 To love, then, is only in the power of the wise.
 
 For universally, be not deceived, every animal is attached to nothing so
 much as to its own interests. Whatever then appears to it an impediment
 to this interest, whether this be a brother, or a father, or a child, or
 beloved, or lover, it hates, spurns, curses; for its nature is to love
 nothing so much as its own interests: this is father, and brother, and
 kinsman, and country, and God. When then the gods appear to us to be an
 impediment to this, we abuse them and throw down their statues and burn
 their temples, as Alexander ordered the temples of Aesculapius to be
 burned when his dear friend died.
 
 For this reason, if a man put in the same place his interest, sanctity,
 goodness, and country, and parents, and friends, all these are secured:
 but if he puts in one place his interest, in another his friends, and
 his country and his kinsmen and justice itself, all these give way,
 being borne down by the weight of interest. For where the I and the Mine
 are placed, to that place of necessity the animal inclines; if in the
 flesh, there is the ruling power; if in the will, it is there; and if it
 is in externals, it is there. If then I am there where my will is, then
 only shall I be a friend such as I ought to be, and son, and father; for
 this will be my interest, to maintain the character of fidelity, of
 modesty, of patience, of abstinence, of active co-operation, of
 observing my relations (towards all). But if I put myself in one place,
 and honesty in another, then the doctrine of Epicurus becomes strong,
 which asserts either that there is no honesty or it is that which
 opinion holds to be honest (virtuous).
 
 It was through this ignorance that the Athenians and the Lacedaemonians
 quarrelled, and the Thebans with both; and the great king quarrelled
 with Hellas, and the Macedonians with both: and the Romans with the
 Getae. And still earlier the Trojan war happened for these reasons.
 Alexander was the guest of Menelaus, and if any man had seen their
 friendly disposition, he would not have believed any one who said that
 they were not friends. But there was cast between them (as between dogs)
 a bit of meat, a handsome woman, and about her war arose. And now when
 you see brothers to be friends appearing to have one mind, do not
 conclude from this anything about their friendship, not even if they
 swear it and say that it is impossible for them to be separated from one
 another. For the ruling principle of a bad man cannot be trusted; it is
 insecure, has no certain rule by which it is directed, and is
 overpowered at different times by different appearances. But examine,
 not what other men examine, if they are born of the same parents and
 brought up together, and under the same pedagogue; but examine this
 only, wherein they place their interest, whether in externals or in the
 will. If in externals, do not name them friends, no more than name them
 trustworthy or constant, or brave or free; do not name them even men, if
 you have any judgment. For that is not a principle of human nature which
 makes them bite one another, and abuse one another, and occupy deserted
 places or public places, as if they were mountains, and in the courts of
 justice display the acts of robbers; nor yet that which makes them
 intemperate and adulterers and corrupters, nor that which makes them do
 whatever else men do against one another through this one opinion only,
 that of placing themselves and their interests in the things which are
 not within the power of their will. But if you hear that in truth these
 men think the good to be only there, where will is, and where there is a
 right use of appearances, no longer trouble yourself whether they are
 father or son, or brothers, or have associated a long time and are
 companions, but when you have ascertained this only, confidently declare
 that they are friends, as you declare that they are faithful, that they
 are just. For where else is friendship than where there is fidelity, and
 modesty, where there is a communion of honest things and of nothing
 else.
 
 But you may say, Such a one treated me with regard so long; and did he
 not love me? How do you know, slave, if he did not regard you in the
 same way as he wipes his shoes with a sponge, or as he takes care of his
 beast? How do you know, when you have ceased to be useful as a vessel,
 he will not throw you away like a broken platter? But this woman is my
 wife, and we have lived together so long. And how long did Eriphyle live
 with Amphiaraus, and was the mother of children and of many? But a
 necklace came between them: and what is a necklace? It is the opinion
 about such things. That was the bestial principle, that was the thing
 which broke asunder the friendship between husband and wife, that which
 did not allow the woman to be a wife nor the mother to be a mother. And
 let every man among you who has seriously resolved either to be a friend
 himself or to have another for his friend, cut out these opinions, hate
 them, drive them from his soul. And thus first of all he will not
 reproach himself, he will not be at variance with himself, he will not
 change his mind, he will not torture himself. In the next place, to
 another also, who is like himself, he will be altogether and completely
 a friend. But he will bear with the man who is unlike himself, he will
 be kind to him, gentle, ready to pardon on account of his ignorance, on
 account of his being mistaken in things of the greatest importance; but
 he will be harsh to no man, being well convinced of Plato's doctrine
 that every mind is deprived of truth unwillingly. If you cannot do this,
 yet you can do in all other respects as friends do, drink together, and
 lodge together, and sail together, and you may be born of the same
 parents, for snakes also are: but neither will they be friends, nor you,
 so long as you retain these bestial and cursed opinions.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ON THE POWER OF SPEAKING.--Every man will read a book with more pleasure
 or even with more ease, if it is written in fairer characters. Therefore
 every man will also listen more readily to what is spoken, if it is
 signified by appropriate and becoming words. We must not say then that
 there is no faculty of expression: for this affirmation is the
 characteristic of an impious and also of a timid man. Of an impious man,
 because he undervalues the gifts which come from God, just as if he
 would take away the commodity of the power of vision, or hearing, or of
 seeing. Has then God given you eyes to no purpose? and to no purpose has
 he infused into them a spirit so strong and of such skilful contrivance
 as to reach a long way and to fashion the forms of things which are
 seen? What messenger is so swift and vigilant? And to no purpose has he
 made the interjacent atmosphere so efficacious and elastic that the
 vision penetrates through the atmosphere which is in a manner moved? And
 to no purpose has he made light, without the presence of which there
 would be no use in any other thing?
 
 Man, be neither ungrateful for these gifts nor yet forget the things
 which are superior to them. But indeed for the power of seeing and
 hearing, and indeed for life itself, and for the things which contribute
 to support it, for the fruits which are dry, and for wine and oil give
 thanks to God: but remember that he has given you something else better
 than all these, I mean the power of using them, proving them, and
 estimating the value of each. For what is that which gives information
 about each of these powers, what each of them is worth? Is it each
 faculty itself? Did you ever hear the faculty of vision saying anything
 about itself? or the faculty of hearing? or wheat, or barley, or a
 horse, or a dog? No; but they are appointed as ministers and slaves to
 serve the faculty which has the power of making use of the appearances
 of things. And if you inquire what is the value of each thing, of whom
 do you inquire? who answers you? How then can any other faculty be more
 powerful than this, which uses the rest as ministers and itself proves
 each and pronounces about them? for which of them knows what itself is,
 and what is its own value? which of them knows when it ought to employ
 itself and when not? what faculty is it which opens and closes the eyes,
 and turns them away from objects to which it ought not to apply them and
 does apply them to other objects? Is it the faculty of vision? No, but
 it is the faculty of the will. What is that faculty which closes and
 opens the ears? what is that by which they are curious and inquisitive,
 or on the contrary unmoved by what is said? is it the faculty of
 hearing? It is no other than the faculty of the will. Will this faculty
 then, seeing that it is amidst all the other faculties which are blind
 and dumb and unable to see anything else except the very acts for which
 they are appointed in order to minister to this (faculty) and serve it,
 but this faculty alone sees sharp and sees what is the value of each of
 the rest; will this faculty declare to us that anything else is the
 best, or that itself is? And what else does the eye do when it is opened
 than see? But whether we ought to look on the wife of a certain person,
 and in what manner, who tells us? The faculty of the will. And whether
 we ought to believe what is said or not to believe it, and if we do
 believe, whether we ought to be moved by it or not, who tells us? Is it
 not the faculty of the will?
 
 But if you ask me what then is the most excellent of all things, what
 must I say? I cannot say the power of speaking, but the power of the
 will, when it is right ([Greek: orthae]). For it is this which uses the
 other (the power of speaking), and all the other faculties both small
 and great. For when this faculty of the will is set right, a man who is
 not good becomes good: but when it fails, a man becomes bad. It is
 through this that we are unfortunate, that we are fortunate, that we
 blame one another, are pleased with one another. In a word, it is this
 which if we neglect it makes unhappiness, and if we carefully look after
 it, makes happiness.
 
 What then is usually done? Men generally act as a traveller would do on
 his way to his own country, when he enters a good inn, and being pleased
 with it should remain there. Man, you have forgotten your purpose: you
 were not travelling to this inn, but you were passing through it. But
 this is a pleasant inn. And how many other inns are pleasant? and how
 many meadows are pleasant? yet only for passing through. But your
 purpose is this, to return to your country, to relieve your kinsmen of
 anxiety, to discharge the duties of a citizen, to marry, to beget
 children, to fill the usual magistracies. For you are not come to select
 more pleasant places, but to live in these where you were born and of
 which you were made a citizen. Something of the kind takes place in the
 matter which we are considering. Since by the aid of speech and such
 communication as you receive here you must advance to perfection, and
 purge your will and correct the faculty which makes use of the
 appearances of things; and since it is necessary also for the teaching
 (delivery) of theorems to be effected by a certain mode of expression
 and with a certain variety and sharpness, some persons captivated by
 these very things abide in them, one captivated by the expression,
 another by syllogisms, another again by sophisms, and still another by
 some other inn ([Greek: paudocheiou]) of the kind; and there they stay
 and waste away as they were among sirens.
 
 Man, your purpose (business) was to make yourself capable of using
 conformably to nature the appearances presented to you, in your desires
 not to be frustrated, in your aversion from things not to fall into that
 which you would avoid, never to have no luck (as one may say), nor ever
 to have bad luck, to be free, not hindered, not compelled, conforming
 yourself to the administration of Zeus, obeying it, well satisfied with
 this, blaming no one, charging no one with fault, able from your whole
 soul to utter these verses:
 
   Lead me, O Zeus, and thou too Destiny.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 TO (OR AGAINST) A PERSON WHO WAS ONE OF THOSE WHO WERE NOT VALUED
 (ESTEEMED) BY HIM.--A certain person said to him (Epictetus): Frequently
 I desired to hear you and came to you, and you never gave me any answer;
 and now, if it is possible, I entreat you to say something to me. Do you
 think, said Epictetus, that as there is an art in anything else, so
 there is also an art in speaking, and that he who has the art, will
 speak skilfully, and he who has not, will speak unskilfully?--I do think
 so.--He then who by speaking receives benefit himself, and is able to
 benefit others, will speak skilfully; but he who is rather damaged by
 speaking and does damage to others, will he be unskilled in this art of
 speaking? And you may find that some are damaged and others benefited by
 speaking. And are all who hear benefited by what they hear? Or will you
 find that among them also some are benefited and some damaged? There are
 both among these also, he said. In this case also then those who hear
 skilfully are benefited, and those who hear unskilfully are damaged? He
 admitted this. Is there then a skill in hearing also, as there is in
 speaking? It seems so. If you choose, consider the matter in this way
 also. The practice of music, to whom does it belong? To a musician. And
 the proper making of a statue, to whom do you think that it belongs? To
 a statuary. And the looking at a statue skilfully, does this appear to
 you to require the aid of no art? This also requires the aid of art.
 Then if speaking properly is the business of the skilful man, do you see
 that to hear also with benefit is the business of the skilful man? Now
 as to speaking and hearing perfectly, and usefully, let us for the
 present, if you please, say no more, for both of us are a long way from
 everything of the kind. But I think that every man will allow this, that
 he who is going to hear philosophers requires some amount of practice in
 hearing. Is it not so?
 
 Why then do you say nothing to me? I can only say this to you, that he
 who knows not who he is, and for what purpose he exists, and what is
 this world, and with whom he is associated, and what things are the good
 and the bad, and the beautiful and the ugly, and who neither understands
 discourse nor demonstration, nor what is true nor what is false, and who
 is not able to distinguish them, will neither desire according to nature
 nor turn away nor move towards, nor intend (to act), nor assent, nor
 dissent, nor suspend his judgment: to say all in a few words, he will go
 about dumb and blind, thinking that he is somebody, but being nobody. Is
 this so now for the first time? Is it not the fact that ever since the
 human race existed, all errors and misfortunes have arisen through this
 ignorance?
 
 This is all that I have to say to you; and I say even this not
 willingly. Why? Because you have not roused me. For what must I look to
 in order to be roused, as men who are expert in riding are roused by
 generous horses? Must I look to your body? You treat it disgracefully.
 To your dress? That is luxurious. To your behavior, to your look? That
 is the same as nothing. When you would listen to a philosopher, do not
 say to him, You tell me nothing; but only show yourself worthy of
 hearing or fit for hearing; and you will see how you will move the
 speaker.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 THAT LOGIC IS NECESSARY.--When one of those who were present said,
 Persuade me that logic is necessary, he replied, Do you wish me to prove
 this to you? The answer was, Yes. Then I must use a demonstrative form
 of speech. This was granted. How then will you know if I am cheating you
 by my argument? The man was silent. Do you see, said Epictetus, that you
 yourself are admitting that logic is necessary, if without it you cannot
 know so much as this, whether logic is necessary or not necessary?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 OF FINERY IN DRESS.--A certain young man, a rhetorician, came to see
 Epictetus, with his hair dressed more carefully than was usual and his
 attire in an ornamental style; whereupon Epictetus said, Tell me if you
 do not think that some dogs are beautiful and some horses, and so of all
 other animals. I do think so, the youth replied. Are not then some men
 also beautiful and others ugly? Certainly. Do we then for the same
 reason call each of them in the same kind beautiful, or each beautiful
 for something peculiar? And you will judge of this matter thus. Since we
 see a dog naturally formed for one thing, and a horse for another, and
 for another still, as an example, a nightingale, we may generally and
 not improperly declare each of them to be beautiful then when it is most
 excellent according to its nature; but since the nature of each is
 different, each of them seems to me to be beautiful in a different way.
 Is it not so? He admitted that it was. That then which makes a dog
 beautiful, makes a horse ugly; and that which makes a horse beautiful,
 makes a dog ugly, if it is true that their natures are different. It
 seems to be so. For I think that what makes a Pancratiast beautiful,
 makes a wrestler to be not good, and a runner to be most ridiculous; and
 he who is beautiful for the Pentathlon, is very ugly for wrestling. It
 is so, said he. What then makes a man beautiful? Is it that which in its
 kind makes both a dog and a horse beautiful? It is, he said. What then
 makes a dog beautiful? The possession of the excellence of a dog. And
 what makes a horse beautiful? The possession of the excellence of a
 horse. What then makes a man beautiful? Is it not the possession of the
 excellence of a man? And do you then, if you wish to be beautiful, young
 man, labor at this, the acquisition of human excellence? But what is
 this? Observe whom you yourself praise, when you praise many persons
 without partiality: do you praise the just or the unjust? The just.
 Whether do you praise the moderate or the immoderate? The moderate. And
 the temperate or the intemperate? The temperate. If then you make
 yourself such a person, you will know that you will make yourself
 beautiful; but so long as you neglect these things, you must be ugly
 ([Greek: aischron]), even though you contrive all you can to appear
 beautiful.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 IN WHAT A MAN OUGHT TO BE EXERCISED WHO HAS MADE PROFICIENCY; AND THAT
 WE NEGLECT THE CHIEF THINGS.--There are three things (topics, [Greek:
 topoi]) in which a man ought to exercise himself who would be wise and
 good. The first concerns the desires and the aversions, that a man may
 not fail to get what he desires, and that he may not fall into that
 which he does not desire. The second concerns the movements towards an
 object and the movements from an object, and generally in doing what a
 man ought to do, that he may act according to order, to reason, and not
 carelessly. The third thing concerns freedom from deception and rashness
 in judgment, and generally it concerns the assents ([Greek:
 sugchatatheseis]). Of these topics the chief and the most urgent is that
 which relates to the affects ([Greek: ta pathae] perturbations); for an
 affect is produced in no other way than by a failing to obtain that
 which a man desires or falling into that which a man would wish to
 avoid. This is that which brings in perturbations, disorders, bad
 fortune, misfortunes, sorrows, lamentations, and envy; that which makes
 men envious and jealous; and by these causes we are unable even to
 listen to the precepts of reason. The second topic concerns the duties
 of a man; for I ought not to be free from affects ([Greek: apathae])
 like a statue, but I ought to maintain the relations ([Greek: scheseis])
 natural and acquired, as a pious man, as a son, as a father, as a
 citizen.
 
 The third topic is that which immediately concerns those who are making
 proficiency, that which concerns the security of the other two, so that
 not even in sleep any appearance unexamined may surprise us, nor in
 intoxication, nor in melancholy. This, it may be said, is above our
 power. But the present philosophers neglecting the first topic and the
 second (the affects and duties), employ themselves on the third, using
 sophistical arguments ([Greek: metapiptontas]), making conclusions from
 questioning, employing hypotheses, lying. For a man must, it is said,
 when employed on these matters, take care that he is not deceived. Who
 must? The wise and good man. This then is all that is wanting to you.
 Have you successfully worked out the rest? Are you free from deception
 in the matter of money? If you see a beautiful girl do you resist the
 appearance? If your neighbor obtains an estate by will, are you not
 vexed? Now is there nothing else wanting to you except unchangeable
 firmness of mind ([Greek: ametaptosia])? Wretch, you hear these very
 things with fear and anxiety that some person may despise you, and with
 inquiries about what any person may say about you. And if a man come and
 tell you that in a certain conversation in which the question was, Who
 is the best philosopher, a man who was present said that a certain
 person was the chief philosopher, your little soul which was only a
 finger's length stretches out to two cubits. But if another who is
 present says, You are mistaken; it is not worth while to listen to a
 certain person, for what does he know? he has only the first principles,
 and no more? then you are confounded, you grow pale, you cry out
 immediately, I will show him who I am, that I am a great philosopher. It
 is seen by these very things: why do you wish to show it by others? Do
 you not know that Diogenes pointed out one of the sophists in this way
 by stretching out his middle finger? And then when the man was wild with
 rage, This, he said, is the certain person: I have pointed him out to
 you. For a man is not shown by the finger, as a stone or a piece of
 wood; but when any person shows the man's principles, then he shows him
 as a man.
 
 Let us look at your principles also. For is it not plain that you value
 not at all your own will ([Greek: proairesis]), but you look externally
 to things which are independent of your will? For instance, what will a
 certain person say? and what will people think of you? Will you be
 considered a man of learning; have you read Chrysippus or Antipater? for
 if you have read Archedamus also, you have every thing (that you can
 desire). Why you are still uneasy lest you should not show us who you
 are? Would you let me tell you what manner of man you have shown us that
 you are? You have exhibited yourself to us as a mean fellow, querulous,
 passionate, cowardly, finding fault with everything, blaming everybody,
 never quiet, vain: this is what you have exhibited to us. Go away now
 and read Archedamus; then if a mouse should leap down and make a noise,
 you are a dead man. For such a death awaits you as it did--what was the
 man's name--Crinis; and he too was proud, because he understood
 Archedamus. Wretch, will you not dismiss these things that do not
 concern you at all? These things are suitable to those who are able to
 learn them without perturbation, to those who can say: "I am not subject
 to anger, to grief, to envy: I am not hindered, I am not restrained.
 What remains for me? I have leisure, I am tranquil: let us see how we
 must deal with sophistical arguments; let us see how when a man has
 accepted an hypothesis he shall not be led away to any thing absurd." To
 them such things belong. To those who are happy it is appropriate to
 light a fire, to dine; if they choose, both to sing and to dance. But
 when the vessel is sinking, you come to me and hoist the sails.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 WHAT IS THE MATTER ON WHICH A GOOD MAN SHOULD BE EMPLOYED, AND IN WHAT
 WE OUGHT CHIEFLY TO PRACTISE OURSELVES.--The material for the wise and
 good man is his own ruling faculty: and the body is the material for the
 physician and the aliptes (the man who oils persons); the land is the
 matter for the husbandman. The business of the wise and good man is to
 use appearances conformably to nature: and as it is the nature of every
 soul to assent to the truth, to dissent from the false, and to remain in
 suspense as to that which is uncertain; so it is its nature to be moved
 towards the desire for the good, and to aversion from the evil; and with
 respect to that which is neither good nor bad it feels indifferent. For
 as the money-changer (banker) is not allowed to reject Caesar's coin, nor
 the seller of herbs, but if you show the coin, whether he chooses or
 not, he must give up what is sold for the coin; so it is also in the
 matter of the soul. When the good appears, it immediately attracts to
 itself; the evil repels from itself. But the soul will never reject the
 manifest appearance of the good, any more than persons will reject
 Caesar's coin. On this principle depends every movement both of man and
 God.
 
 Against (or with respect to) this kind of thing chiefly a man should
 exercise himself. As soon as you go out in the morning, examine every
 man whom you see, every man whom you hear; answer as to a question, What
 have you seen? A handsome man or woman? Apply the rule. Is this
 independent of the will, or dependent? Independent. Take it away. What
 have you seen? A man lamenting over the death of a child. Apply the
 rule. Death is a thing independent of the will. Take it away. Has the
 proconsul met you? Apply the rule. What kind of a thing is a proconsul's
 office? Independent of the will or dependent on it? Independent. Take
 this away also; it does not stand examination; cast it away; it is
 nothing to you.
 
 If we practised this and exercised ourselves in it daily from morning to
 night, something indeed would be done. But now we are forthwith caught
 half asleep by every appearance, and it is only, if ever, that in the
 school we are roused a little. Then when we go out, if we see a man
 lamenting, we say, He is undone. If we see a consul, we say, He is
 happy. If we see an exiled man, we say, He is miserable. If we see a
 poor man, we say, He is wretched; he has nothing to eat.
 
 We ought then to eradicate these bad opinions, and to this end we should
 direct all our efforts. For what is weeping and lamenting? Opinion. What
 is bad fortune? Opinion. What is civil sedition, what is divided
 opinion, what is blame, what is accusation, what is impiety, what is
 trifling? All these things are opinions, and nothing more, and opinions
 about things independent of the will, as if they were good and bad. Let
 a man transfer these opinions to things dependent on the will, and I
 engage for him that he will be firm and constant, whatever may be the
 state of things around him. Such as is a dish of water, such is the
 soul. Such as is the ray of light which falls on the water, such are the
 appearances. When the water is moved, the ray also seems to be moved,
 yet it is not moved. And when then a man is seized with giddiness, it is
 not the arts and the virtues which are confounded, but the spirit (the
 nervous power) on which they are impressed; but if the spirit be
 restored to its settled state, those things also are restored.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 MISCELLANEOUS.--When some person asked him how it happened that since
 reason has been more cultivated by the men of the present age, the
 progress made in former times was greater. In what respect, he answered,
 has it been more cultivated now, and in what respect was the progress
 greater then? For in that in which it has now been more cultivated, in
 that also the progress will now be found. At present it has been
 cultivated for the purpose of resolving syllogisms, and progress is
 made. But in former times it was cultivated for the purpose of
 maintaining the governing faculty in a condition conformable to nature,
 and progress was made. Do not then mix things which are different, and
 do not expect, when you are laboring at one thing to make progress in
 another. But see if any man among us when he is intent upon this, the
 keeping himself in a state conformable to nature and living so always,
 does not make progress. For you will not find such a man.
 
 It is not easy to exhort weak young men; for neither is it easy to hold
 (soft) cheese with a hook. But those who have a good natural
 disposition, even if you try to turn them aside, cling still more to
 reason.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 TO THE ADMINISTRATOR OF THE FREE CITIES WHO WAS AN EPICUREAN.--When the
 administrator came to visit him, and the man was an Epicurean, Epictetus
 said, It is proper for us who are not philosophers to inquire of you who
 are philosophers, as those who come to a strange city inquire of the
 citizens and those who are acquainted with it, what is the best thing in
 the world, in order that we also after inquiry may go in quest of that
 which is best and look at it, as strangers do with the things in cities.
 For that there are three things which relate to man--soul, body, and
 things external, scarcely any man denies. It remains for you
 philosophers to answer what is the best. What shall we say to men? Is
 the flesh the best? and was it for this that Maximus sailed as far as
 Cassiope in winter (or bad weather) with his son, and accompanied him
 that he might be gratified in the flesh? When the man said that it was
 not, and added, Far be that from him. Is it not fit then, Epictetus
 said, to be actively employed about the best? It is certainly of all
 things the most fit. What then do we possess which is better than the
 flesh? The soul, he replied. And the good things of the best, are they
 better, or the good things of the worse? The good things of the best.
 And are the good things of the best within the power of the will or not
 within the power of the will? They are within the power of the will. Is
 then the pleasure of the soul a thing within the power of the will? It
 is, he replied. And on what shall this pleasure depend? On itself? But
 that cannot be conceived; for there must first exist a certain substance
 or nature ([Greek: ousia]) of good, by obtaining which we shall have
 pleasure in the soul. He assented to this also. On what then shall we
 depend for this pleasure of the soul? for if it shall depend on things
 of the soul, the substance (nature) of the good is discovered; for good
 cannot be one thing, and that at which we are rationally delighted
 another thing; nor if that which precedes is not good, can that which
 comes after be good, for in order that the thing which comes after may
 be good, that which precedes must be good. But you would not affirm
 this, if you are in your right mind, for you would then say what is
 inconsistent both with Epicurus and the rest of your doctrines. It
 remains then that the pleasure of the soul is in the pleasure from
 things of the body; and again that those bodily things must be the
 things which precede and the substance (nature) of the good.
 
 Seek for doctrines which are consistent with what I say, and by making
 them your guide you will with pleasure abstain from things which have
 such persuasive power to lead us and overpower us. But if to the
 persuasive power of these things, we also devise such a philosophy as
 this which helps to push us on towards them and strengthens us to this
 end, what will be the consequence? In a piece of toreutic art which is
 the best part? the silver or the workmanship? The substance of the hand
 is the flesh; but the work of the hand is the principal part (that which
 precedes and leads the rest). The duties then are also three: those
 which are directed towards the existence of a thing; those which are
 directed towards its existence in a particular kind; and third, the
 chief or leading things themselves. So also in man we ought not to value
 the material, the poor flesh, but the principal (leading things, [Greek:
 ta proaegoumena]). What are these? Engaging in public business,
 marrying, begetting children, venerating God, taking care of parents,
 and generally, having desires, aversions ([Greek: echchlinein]),
 pursuits of things and avoidances, in the way in which we ought to do
 these things, and according to our nature. And how are we constituted by
 nature? Free, noble, modest; for what other animal blushes? what other
 is capable of receiving the appearance (the impression) of shame? and we
 are so constituted by nature as to subject pleasure to these things, as
 a minister, a servant, in order that it may call forth our activity, in
 order that it may keep us constant in acts which are conformable to
 nature.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 HOW WE MUST EXERCISE OURSELVES AGAINST APPEARANCES ([Greek:
 phantasias]).--As we exercise ourselves against sophistical questions,
 so we ought to exercise ourselves daily against appearances; for these
 appearances also propose questions to us. A certain person's son is
 dead. Answer; the thing is not within the power of the will: it is not
 an evil. A father has disinherited a certain son. What do you think of
 it? It is a thing beyond the power of the will, not an evil. Caesar has
 condemned a person. It is a thing beyond the power of the will, not an
 evil. The man is afflicted at this. Affliction is a thing which depends
 on the will: it is an evil. He has borne the condemnation bravely. That
 is a thing within the power of the will: it is a good. If we train
 ourselves in this manner, we shall make progress; for we shall never
 assent to anything of which there is not an appearance capable of being
 comprehended. Your son is dead. What has happened? Your son is dead.
 Nothing more? Nothing. Your ship is lost. What has happened? Your ship
 is lost. A man has been led to prison. What has happened? He has been
 led to prison. But that herein he has fared badly, every man adds from
 his own opinion. But Zeus, you say, does not do right in these matters.
 Why? because he has made you capable of endurance? because he has made
 you magnanimous? because he has taken from that which befalls you the
 power of being evils? because it is in your power to be happy while you
 are suffering what you suffer? because he has opened the door to you,
 when things do not please you? Man, go out and do not complain!
 
 Hear how the Romans feel towards philosophers, if you would like to
 know. Italicus, who was the most in repute of the philosophers, once
 when I was present, being vexed with his own friends and as if he was
 suffering something intolerable, said: "I cannot bear it, you are
 killing me; you will make me such as that man is," pointing to me.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 TO A CERTAIN RHETORICIAN WHO WAS GOING UP TO ROME ON A SUIT.--When a
 certain person came to him, who was going up to Rome on account of a
 suit which had regard to his rank, Epictetus inquired the reason of his
 going to Rome, and the man then asked what he thought about the matter.
 Epictetus replied: If you ask me what you will do in Rome, whether you
 will succeed or fail, I have no rule ([Greek: theoraema]) about this.
 But if you ask me how you will fare, I can tell you: if you have right
 opinions ([Greek: dogmata]), you will fare well; if they are false, you
 will fare ill. For to every man the cause of his acting is opinion. For
 what is the reason why you desired to be elected governor of the
 Cnossians? Your opinion. What is the reason that you are now going up to
 Rome? Your opinion. And going in winter, and with danger and expense? I
 must go. What tells you this? Your opinion. Then if opinions are the
 causes of all actions, and a man has bad opinions, such as the cause may
 be, such also is the effect! Have we then all sound opinions, both you
 and your adversary? And how do you differ? But have you sounder opinions
 than your adversary? Why? You think so. And so does he think that his
 opinions are better; and so do madmen. This is a bad criterion. But show
 to me that you have made some inquiry into your opinions and have taken
 some pains about them. And as now you are sailing to Rome in order to
 become governor of the Cnossians, and you are not content to stay at
 home with the honors which you had, but you desire something greater and
 more conspicuous, so when did you ever make a voyage for the purpose of
 examining your own opinions, and casting them out, if you have any that
 are bad? Whom have you approached for this purpose? What time have you
 fixed for it? What age? Go over the times of your life by yourself, if
 you are ashamed of me (knowing the fact) when you were a boy, did you
 examine your own opinions? and did you not then, as you do all things
 now, do as you did do? and when you were become a youth and attended the
 rhetoricians, and yourself practised rhetoric, what did you imagine that
 you were deficient in? And when you were a young man and engaged in
 public matters, and pleaded causes yourself, and were gaining
 reputation, who then seemed your equal? And when would you have
 submitted to any man examining and showing that your opinions are bad?
 What then do you wish me to say to you? Help me in this matter. I have
 no theorem (rule) for this. Nor have you, if you came to me for this
 purpose, come to me as a philosopher, but as to a seller of vegetables
 or a shoemaker. For what purpose then have philosophers theorems? For
 this purpose, that whatever may happen, our ruling faculty may be and
 continue to be conformable to nature. Does this seem to you a small
 thing? No; but the greatest. What then? does it need only a short time?
 and is it possible to seize it as you pass by? If you can, seize it.
 
 Then you will say, I met with Epictetus as I should meet with a stone or
 a statue: for you saw me and nothing more. But he meets with a man as a
 man, who learns his opinions, and in his turn shows his own. Learn my
 opinions: show me yours; and then say that you have visited me. Let us
 examine one another: if I have any bad opinion, take it away; if you
 have any, show it. This is the meaning of meeting with a philosopher.
 Not so (you say): but this is only a passing visit, and while we are
 hiring the vessel, we can also see Epictetus. Let us see what he says.
 Then you go away and say: Epictetus was nothing; he used solecisms and
 spoke in a barbarous way. For of what else do you come as judges? Well,
 but a man may say to me, if I attend to such matters (as you do), I
 shall have no land as you have none; I shall have no silver cups as you
 have none, nor fine beasts as you have none. In answer to tins it is
 perhaps sufficient to say: I have no need of such things; but if you
 possess many things you have need of others: whether you choose or not,
 you are poorer than I am. What then have I need of? Of that which you
 have not? of firmness, of a mind which is conformable to nature, of
 being free from perturbation.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 IN WHAT MANNER WE OUGHT TO BEAR SICKNESS.--When the need of each opinion
 comes, we ought to have it in readiness: on the occasion of breakfast,
 such opinions as relate to breakfast; in the bath, those that concern
 the bath; in bed, those that concern bed.
 
   Let sleep not come upon thy languid eyes
   Before each daily action thou hast scann'd;
   What's done amiss, what done, what left undone;
   From first to last examine all, and then
   Blame what is wrong, in what is right rejoice.
 
 And we ought to retain these verses in such way that we may use them,
 not that we may utter them aloud, as when we exclaim, "Paean Apollo."
 Again in fever we should have ready such opinions as concern a fever;
 and we ought not, as soon as the fever begins, to lose and forget all. A
 man who has a fever may say: If I philosophize any longer, may I be
 hanged: wherever I go, I must take care of the poor body, that a fever
 may not come. But what is philosophizing? Is it not a preparation
 against events which may happen? Do you not understand that you are
 saying something of this kind? "If I shall still prepare myself to bear
 with patience what happens, may I be hanged." But this is just as if a
 man after receiving blows should give up the Pancratium. In the
 Pancratium it is in our power to desist and not to receive blows.
 
 But in the other matter if we give up philosophy, what shall we gain?
 What then should a man say on the occasion of each painful thing? It was
 for this that I exercised myself, for this I disciplined myself. God
 says to you: Give me a proof that you have duly practised athletics,
 that you have eaten what you ought, that you have been exercised, that
 you have obeyed the aliptes (the oiler and rubber). Then do you show
 yourself weak when the time for action comes? Now is the time for the
 fever. Let it be borne well. Now is the time for thirst, bear it well.
 Now is the time for hunger, bear it well. Is it not in your power? Who
 shall hinder you? The physician will hinder you from drinking; but he
 cannot prevent you from bearing thirst well: and he will hinder you from
 eating; but he cannot prevent you from bearing hunger well.
 
 But I cannot attend to my philosophical studies. And for what purpose do
 you follow them? Slave, is it not that you may be happy, that you may be
 constant, is it not that you may be in a state conformable to nature and
 live so? What hinders you when you have a fever from having your ruling
 faculty conformable to nature? Here is the proof of the thing, here is
 the test of the philosopher. For this also is a part of life, like
 walking, like sailing, like journeying by land, so also is fever. Do you
 read when you are walking? No. Nor do you when you have a fever. But if
 you walk about well, you have all that belongs to a man who walks. If
 you bear a fever well, you have all that belongs to a man in a fever.
 What is it to bear a fever well? Not to blame God or man; not to be
 afflicted at that which happens, to expect death well and nobly, to do
 what must be done: when the physician comes in, not to be frightened at
 what he says; nor if he says you are doing well, to be overjoyed. For
 what good has he told you? and when you were in health, what good was
 that to you? And even if he says you are in a bad way, do not despond.
 For what is it to be ill? is it that you are near the severance of the
 soul and the body? what harm is there in this? If you are not near now,
 will you not afterwards be near? Is the world going to be turned upside
 down when you are dead? Why then do you flatter the physician? Why do
 you say if you please, master, I shall be well? Why do you give him an
 opportunity of raising his eyebrows (being proud; or showing his
 importance)? Do you not value a physician, as you do a shoemaker when he
 is measuring your foot, or a carpenter when he is building your house,
 and so treat the physician as to the body which is not yours, but by
 nature dead? He who has a fever has an opportunity of doing this: if he
 does these things, he has what belongs to him. For it is not the
 business of a philosopher to look after these externals, neither his
 wine nor his oil nor his poor body, but his own ruling power. But as to
 externals how must he act? so far as not to be careless about them.
 Where then is there reason for fear? where is there then still reason
 for anger, and of fear about what belongs to others, about things which
 are of no value? For we ought to have these two principles in readiness,
 that except the will nothing is good nor bad; and that we ought not to
 lead events, but to follow them. My brother ought not to have behaved
 thus to me. No, but he will see to that; and, however he may behave, I
 will conduct myself towards him as I ought. For this is my own business;
 that belongs to another: no man can prevent this, the other thing can be
 hindered.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ABOUT EXERCISE.--We ought not to make our exercises consist in means
 contrary to nature and adapted to cause admiration, for if we do so, we
 who call ourselves philosophers, shall not differ at all from jugglers.
 For it is difficult even to walk on a rope; and not only difficult, but
 it is also dangerous. Ought we for this reason to practice walking on a
 rope, or setting up a palm-tree, or embracing statues? By no means.
 Every thing which is difficult and dangerous is not suitable for
 practice; but that is suitable which conduces to the working out of that
 which is proposed to us. And what is that which is proposed to us as a
 thing to be worked out? To live with desire and aversion (avoidance of
 certain things) free from restraint. And what is this? Neither to be
 disappointed in that which you desire, nor to fall into anything which
 you would avoid. Towards this object then exercise (practice) ought to
 tend. For since it is not possible to have your desire not disappointed
 and your aversion free from falling into that which you would avoid,
 without great and constant practice, you must know that if you allow
 your desire and aversion to turn to things which are not within the
 power of the will, you will neither have your desire capable of
 attaining your object, nor your aversion free from the power of avoiding
 that which you would avoid. And since strong habit leads (prevails), and
 we are accustomed to employ desire and aversion only to things which are
 not within the power of our will, we ought to oppose to this habit a
 contrary habit, and where there is great slipperiness in the
 appearances, there to oppose the habit of exercise. Then at last, if
 occasion presents itself, for the purpose of trying yourself at a proper
 time you will descend into the arena to know if appearances overpower
 you as they did formerly. But at first fly far from that which is
 stronger than yourself; the contest is unequal between a charming young
 girl and a beginner in philosophy. The earthen pitcher, as the saying
 is, and the rock do not agree.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 WHAT SOLITUDE IS, AND WHAT KIND OF PERSON A SOLITARY MAN IS.--Solitude
 is a certain condition of a helpless man. For because a man is alone, he
 is not for that reason also solitary; just as though a man is among
 numbers, he is not therefore not solitary. When then we have lost either
 a brother, or a son, or a friend on whom we were accustomed to repose,
 we say that we are left solitary, though we are often in Rome, though
 such a crowd meet us, though so many live in the same place, and
 sometimes we have a great number of slaves. For the man who is solitary,
 as it is conceived, is considered to be a helpless person and exposed to
 those who wish to harm him. For this reason when we travel, then
 especially do we say that we are lonely when we fall among robbers, for
 it is not the sight of a human creature which removes us from solitude,
 but the sight of one who is faithful and modest and helpful to us. For
 if being alone is enough to make solitude, you may say that even Zeus is
 solitary in the conflagration and bewails himself saying, Unhappy that I
 am who have neither Hera, nor Athena, nor Apollo, nor brother, nor son,
 nor descendant, nor kinsman. This is what some say that he does when he
 is alone at the conflagration. For they do not understand how a man
 passes his life when he is alone, because they set out from a certain
 natural principle, from the natural desire of community and mutual love
 and from the pleasure of conversation among men. But none the less a man
 ought to be prepared in a manner for this also (being alone), to be able
 to be sufficient for himself and to be his own companion. For as Zeus
 dwells with himself, and is tranquil by himself, and thinks of his own
 administration and of its nature, and is employed in thoughts suitable
 to himself; so ought we also to be able to talk with ourselves, not to
 feel the want of others also, not to be unprovided with the means of
 passing our time; to observe the divine administration, and the relation
 of ourselves to everything else; to consider how we formerly were
 affected towards things that happened and how at present; what are still
 the things which give us pain; how these also can be cured and how
 removed; if any things require improvement, to improve them according to
 reason.
 
 Well then, if some man should come upon me when I am alone and murder
 me? Fool, not murder You, but your poor body.
 
 What kind of solitude then remains? what want? why do we make ourselves
 worse than children; and what do children do when they are left alone?
 They take up shells and ashes, and they build something, then pull it
 down, and build something else, and so they never want the means of
 passing the time. Shall I then, if you sail away, sit down and weep,
 because I have been left alone and solitary? Shall I then have no
 shells, no ashes? But children do what they do through want of thought
 (or deficiency in knowledge), and we through knowledge are unhappy.
 
 Every great power (faculty) is dangerous to beginners. You must then
 bear such things as you are able, but conformably to nature: but not ...
 Practise sometimes a way of living like a person out of health that you
 may at some time live like a man in health.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 CERTAIN MISCELLANEOUS MATTERS.--As bad tragic actors cannot sing alone,
 but in company with many, so some persons cannot walk about alone. Man,
 if you are anything, both walk alone and talk to yourself, and do not
 hide yourself in the chorus. Examine a little at last, look around, stir
 yourself up, that you may know who you are.
 
 You must root out of men these two things, arrogance (pride) and
 distrust. Arrogance then is the opinion that you want nothing (are
 deficient in nothing); but distrust is the opinion that you cannot be
 happy when so many circumstances surround you. Arrogance is removed by
 confutation; and Socrates was the first who practised this. And (to
 know) that the thing is not impossible inquire and seek. This search
 will do you no harm; and in a manner this is philosophizing, to seek how
 it is possible to employ desire and aversion ([Greek: echchlisis])
 without impediment.
 
 I am superior to you, for my father is a man of consular rank. Another
 says, I have been a tribune, but you have not. If we were horses, would
 you say, My father was swifter? I have much barley and fodder, or
 elegant neck ornaments. If then you were saying this, I said, Be it so:
 let us run then. Well, is there nothing in a man such as running in a
 horse, by which it will be known which is superior and inferior? Is
 there not modesty ([Greek: aidos]), fidelity, justice? Show yourself
 superior in these, that you may be superior as a man. If you tell me
 that you can kick violently, I also will say to you, that you are proud
 of that which is the act of an ass.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 THAT WE OUGHT TO PROCEED WITH CIRCUMSPECTION TO EVERYTHING.[Footnote:
 Compare Encheiridion, 29.]--In every act consider what precedes and what
 follows, and then proceed to the act. If you do not consider, you will
 at first begin with spirit, since you have not thought at all of the
 things which follow; but afterwards when some consequences have shown
 themselves, you will basely desist (from that which you have begun).--I
 wish to conquer at the Olympic games.--(And I too, by the gods; for it
 is a fine thing.) But consider here what precedes and what follows; and
 then, if it is for your good, undertake the thing. You must act
 according to rules, follow strict diet, abstain from delicacies,
 exercise yourself by compulsion at fixed times, in heat, in cold; drink
 no cold water, nor wine, when there is opportunity of drinking it. In a
 word, you must surrender yourself to the trainer, as you do to a
 physician. Next in the contest, you must be covered with sand, sometimes
 dislocate a hand, sprain an ankle, swallow a quantity of dust, be
 scourged with the whip; and after undergoing all this, you must
 sometimes be conquered. After reckoning all these things, if you have
 still an inclination, go to the athletic practice. If you do not reckon
 them, observe you will behave like children who at one time play as
 wrestlers, then as gladiators, then blow a trumpet, then act a tragedy,
 when they have seen and admired such things. So you also do: you are at
 one time a wrestler (athlete), then a gladiator, then a philosopher,
 then a rhetorician; but with your whole soul you are nothing: like the
 ape you imitate all that you see; and always one thing after another
 pleases you, but that which becomes familiar displeases you. For you
 have never undertaken anything after consideration, nor after having
 explored the whole matter and put it to a strict examination; but you
 have undertaken it at hazard and with a cold desire. Thus some persons
 having seen a philosopher and having heard one speak like Euphrates--and
 yet who can speak like him?--wish to be philosophers themselves.
 
 Man, consider first what the matter is (which you propose to do), then
 your own nature also, what it is able to bear. If you are a wrestler,
 look at your shoulders, your thighs, your loins: for different men are
 naturally formed for different things. Do you think that, if you do
 (what you are doing daily), you can be a philosopher? Do you think that
 you can eat as you do now, drink as you do now, and in the same way be
 angry and out of humor? You must watch, labor, conquer certain desires,
 you must depart from your kinsmen, be despised by your slaves, laughed
 at by those who meet you, in everything you must be in an inferior
 condition, as to magisterial office, in honors, in courts of justice.
 When you have considered all these things completely, then, if you think
 proper, approach to philosophy, if you would gain in exchange for these
 things freedom from perturbations, liberty, tranquillity. If you have
 not considered these things, do not approach philosophy: do not act like
 children, at one time a philosopher, then a tax collector, then a
 rhetorician, then a procurator (officer) of Caesar. These things are not
 consistent. You must be one man either good or bad; you must either
 labor at your own ruling faculty or at external things; you must either
 labor at things within or at external things; that is, you must either
 occupy the place of a philosopher or that of one of the vulgar.
 
 A person said to Rufus when Galba was murdered: Is the world now
 governed by Providence? But Rufus replied: Did I ever incidentally form
 an argument from Galba that the world is governed by Providence?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 THAT WE OUGHT WITH CAUTION TO ENTER INTO FAMILIAR INTERCOURSE WITH
 MEN.--If a man has frequent intercourse with others either for talk, or
 drinking together, or generally for social purposes, he must either
 become like them, or change them to his own fashion. For if a man places
 a piece of quenched charcoal close to a piece that is burning, either
 the quenched charcoal will quench the other, or the burning charcoal
 will light that which is quenched. Since then the danger is so great, we
 must cautiously enter into such intimacies with those of the common
 sort, and remember that it is impossible that a man can keep company
 with one who is covered with soot without being partaker of the soot
 himself. For what will you do if a man speaks about gladiators, about
 horses, about athletes, or what is worse about men? Such a person is
 bad, such a person is good; this was well done, this was done badly.
 Further, if he scoff, or ridicule, or show an ill-natured disposition?
 Is any man among us prepared like a lute-player when he takes a lute, so
 that as soon as he has touched the strings, he discovers which are
 discordant, and tunes the instrument? Such a power as Socrates had who
 in all his social intercourse could lead his companions to his own
 purpose? How should you have this power? It is therefore a necessary
 consequence that you are carried about by the common kind of people.
 
 Why then are they more powerful than you? Because they utter these
 useless words from their real opinions; but you utter your elegant words
 only from your lips; for this reason they are without strength and dead,
 and it is nauseous to listen to your exhortations and your miserable
 virtue, which is talked of everywhere (up and down). In this way the
 vulgar have the advantage over you; for every opinion ([Greek: dogma])
 is strong and invincible. Until then the good ([Greek: chompsai])
 sentiments ([Greek: hupolaepseis]) are fixed in you, and you shall have
 acquired a certain power for your security, I advise you to be careful
 in your association with common persons; if you are not, every day like
 wax in the sun there will be melted away whatever you inscribe on your
 minds in the school. Withdraw then yourselves far from the sun so long
 as you have these waxen sentiments. For this reason also philosophers
 advise men to leave their native country, because ancient habits
 distract them and do not allow a beginning to be made of a different
 habit; nor can we tolerate those who meet us and say: See such a one is
 now a philosopher, who was once so and so. Thus also physicians send
 those who have lingering diseases to a different country and a different
 air; and they do right. Do you also introduce other habits than those
 which you have; fix you opinions and exercise yourselves in them. But
 you do not so; you go hence to a spectacle, to a show of gladiators, to
 a place of exercise ([Greek: chuston]), to a circus; then you come back
 hither, and again from this place you go to those places, and still the
 same persons. And there is no pleasing (good) habit, nor attention, nor
 care about self and observation of this kind. How shall I use the
 appearances presented to me? according to nature, or contrary to nature?
 how do I answer to them? as I ought, or as I ought not? Do I say to
 those things which are independent of the will, that they do not concern
 me? For if you are not yet in this state, fly from your former habits,
 fly from the common sort, if you intend ever to begin to be something.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ON PROVIDENCE.-When you make any charge against Providence, consider,
 and you will learn that the thing has happened according to reason. Yes,
 but the unjust man has the advantage. In what? In money. Yes, for he is
 superior to you in this, that he flatters, is free from shame, and is
 watchful. What is the wonder? But see if he has the advantage over you
 in being faithful, in being modest; for you will not find it to be so;
 but wherein you are superior, there you will find that you have the
 advantage. And I once said to a man who was vexed because Philostorgus
 was fortunate: Would you choose to lie with Sura? May it never happen,
 he replied, that this day should come? Why then are you vexed, if he
 receives something in return for that which he sells; or how can you
 consider him happy who acquires those things by such means as you
 abominate; or what wrong does Providence, if he gives the better things
 to the better men? Is it not better to be modest than to be rich? He
 admitted this. Why are you vexed then, man, when you possess the better
 thing? Remember then always and have in readiness the truth, that this
 is a law of nature, that the superior has an advantage over the inferior
 in that in which he is superior; and you will never be vexed.
 
 But my wife treats me badly. Well, if any man asks you what this is,
 say, my wife treats me badly. Is there then nothing more? Nothing. My
 father gives me nothing. (What is this? my father gives me nothing. Is
 there nothing else then? Nothing); but to say that this is an evil is
 something which must be added to it externally, and falsely added. For
 this reason we must not get rid of poverty, but of the opinion about
 poverty, and then we shall be happy.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ABOUT CYNICISM.--When one of his pupils inquired of Epictetus, and he
 was a person who appeared to be inclined to Cynicism, what kind of
 person a Cynic ought to be, and what was the notion ([Greek:
 prolaepsis]) of the thing, we will inquire, said Epictetus, at leisure;
 but I have so much to say to you that he who without God attempts so
 great a matter, is hateful to God, and has no other purpose than to act
 indecently in public.
 
 In the first place, in the things which relate to yourself, you must not
 be in any respect like what you do now; you must not blame God or man;
 you must take away desire altogether, you must transfer avoidance
 ([Greek: echchlisis]) only to the things which are within the power of
 the will; you must not feel anger nor resentment or envy nor pity; a
 girl must not appear handsome to you, nor must you love a little
 reputation, nor be pleased with a boy or a cake. For you ought to know
 that the rest of men throw walls around them and houses and darkness
 when they do any such things, and they have many means of concealment. A
 man shuts the door, he sets somebody before the chamber; if a person
 comes, say that he is out, he is not at leisure. But the Cynic instead
 of all these things must use modesty as his protection; if he does not,
 he will be indecent in his nakedness and under the open sky. This is his
 house, his door; this is the slave before his bedchamber; this is his
 darkness. For he ought not to wish to hide anything that he does; and if
 he does, he is gone, he has lost the character of a Cynic, of a man who
 lives under the open sky, of a free man; he has begun to fear some
 external thing, he has begun to have need of concealment, nor can he get
 concealment when he chooses. For where shall he hide himself and how?
 And if by chance this public instructor shall be detected, this
 paedagogue, what kind of things will he be compelled to suffer? when then
 a man fears these things, is it possible for him to be bold with his
 whole soul to superintend men? It cannot be: it is impossible.
 
 In the first place then you must make your ruling faculty pure, and this
 mode of life also. Now (you should say), to me the matter to work on is
 my understanding, as wood is to the carpenter, as hides to the
 shoemaker; and my business is the right use of appearances. But the body
 is nothing to me: the parts of it are nothing to me. Death? Let it come
 when it chooses, either death of the whole or of a part. Fly, you say.
 And whither; can any man eject me out of the world? He cannot. But
 wherever I go, there is the sun, there is the moon, there are the stars,
 dreams, omens, and the conversation ([Greek: omilia]) with gods.
 
 Then, if he is thus prepared, the true Cynic cannot be satisfied with
 this; but he must know that he is sent a messenger from Zeus to men
 about good and bad things, to show them that they have wandered and are
 seeking the substance of good and evil where it is not, but where it is,
 they never think; and that he is a spy, as Diogenes was carried off to
 Philip after the battle of Chaeroneia as a spy. For in fact a Cynic is a
 spy of the things which are good for men and which are evil, and it is
 his duty to examine carefully and to come and report truly, and not to
 be struck with terror so as to point out as enemies those who are not
 enemies, nor in any other way to be perturbed by appearances nor
 confounded.
 
 It is his duty then to be able with a loud voice, if the occasion should
 arise, and appearing on the tragic stage to say like Socrates: Men,
 whither are you hurrying, what are you doing, wretches? like blind
 people you are wandering up and down; you are going by another road, and
 have left the true road; you seek for prosperity and happiness where
 they are not, and if another shows you where they are, you do not
 believe him. Why do you seek it without? In the body? It is not there.
 If you doubt, look at Myro, look at Ophellius. In possessions? It is not
 there. But if you do not believe me, look at Croesus: look at those who
 are now rich, with what lamentations their life is filled. In power? It
 is not there. If it is, those must be happy who have been twice and
 thrice consuls; but they are not. Whom shall we believe in these
 matters? You who from without see their affairs and are dazzled by an
 appearance, or the men themselves? What do they say? Hear them when they
 groan, when they grieve, when on account of these very consulships and
 glory and splendor they think that they are more wretched and in greater
 danger. Is it in royal power? It is not: if it were, Nero would have
 been happy, and Sardanapalus. But neither was Agamemnon happy, though he
 was a better man than Sardanapalus and Nero; but while others are
 snoring, what is he doing?
 
   Much from his head he tore his rooted hair:
   Iliad, x., 15.
 
 and what does he say himself?
 
   "I am perplexed," he says, "and
   Disturb'd I am," and "my heart out of my bosom
   Is leaping."
   Iliad, x., 91.
 
 Wretch, which of your affairs goes badly? Your possessions? No. Your
 body? No. But you are rich in gold and copper. What then is the matter
 with you? That part of you, whatever it is, has been neglected by you
 and is corrupted, the part with which we desire, with which we avoid,
 with which we move towards and move from things. How neglected? He knows
 not the nature of good for which he is made by nature and the nature of
 evil; and what is his own, and what belongs to another; and when
 anything that belongs to others goes badly, he says, Woe to me, for the
 Hellenes are in danger. Wretched is his ruling faculty, and alone
 neglected and uncared for. The Hellenes are going to die destroyed by
 the Trojans. And if the Trojans do not kill them, will they not die?
 Yes; but not all at once. What difference then does it make? For if
 death is an evil, whether men die altogether, or if they die singly, it
 is equally an evil. Is anything else then going to happen than the
 separation of the soul and the body? Nothing. And if the Hellenes
 perish, is the door closed, and is it not in your power to die? It is.
 Why then do you lament (and say), Oh, you are a king and have the
 sceptre of Zeus? An unhappy king does not exist more than an unhappy
 god. What then art thou? In truth a shepherd: for you weep as shepherds
 do, when a wolf has carried off one of their sheep: and these who are
 governed by you are sheep. And why did you come hither? Was your desire
 in any danger? was your aversion ([Greek: echchlisis])? was your
 movement (pursuits)? was your avoidance of things? He replies, No; but
 the wife of my brother was carried off. Was it not then a great gain to
 be deprived of an adulterous wife? Shall we be despised then by the
 Trojans? What kind of people are the Trojans, wise or foolish? If they
 are wise, why do you fight with them? If they are fools, why do you care
 about them?
 
 Do you possess the body then free or is it in servile condition? We do
 not know. Do you not know that it is the slave of fever, of gout,
 ophthalmia, dysentery, of a tyrant, of fire, of iron, of everything
 which is stronger? Yes, it is a slave. How then is it possible that
 anything which belongs to the body can be free from hindrance? and how
 is a thing great or valuable which is naturally dead, or earth, or mud?
 Well then, do you possess nothing which is free? Perhaps nothing. And
 who is able to compel you to assent to that which appears false? No man.
 And who can compel you not to assent to that which appears true? No man.
 By this then you see that there is something in you naturally free. But
 to desire or to be averse from, or to move towards an object or to move
 from it, or to prepare yourself, or to propose to do anything, which of
 you can do this, unless he has received an impression of the appearance
 of that which is profitable or a duty? No man. You have then in these
 things also something which is not hindered and is free. Wretched men,
 work out this, take care of this, seek for good here.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 THAT WE OUGHT NOT TO BE MOVED BY A DESIRE OF THOSE THINGS WHICH ARE NOT
 IN OUR POWER.--Let not that which in another is contrary to nature be an
 evil to you; for you are not formed by nature to be depressed with
 others nor to be unhappy with others, but to be happy with them. If a
 man is unhappy, remember that his unhappiness is his own fault; for God
 has made all men to be happy, to be free from perturbations. For this
 purpose he has given means to them, some things to each person as his
 own, and other things not as his own; some things subject to hindrance
 and compulsion and deprivation; and these things are not a man's own;
 but the things which are not subject to hindrances, are his own; and the
 nature of good and evil, as it was fit to be done by him who takes care
 of us and protects us like a father, he has made our own. But you say, I
 have parted from a certain person, and he is grieved. Why did he
 consider as his own that which belongs to another? why, when he looked
 on you and was rejoiced, did he not also reckon that you are a mortal,
 that it is natural for you to part from him for a foreign country?
 Therefore he suffers the consequences of his own folly. But why do you
 or for what purpose bewail yourself? Is it that you also have not
 thought of these things? but like poor women who are good for nothing,
 you have enjoyed all things in which you took pleasure, as if you would
 always enjoy them, both places and men and conversation; and now you sit
 and weep because you do not see the same persons and do not live in the
 same places. Indeed you deserve this, to be more wretched than crows and
 ravens who have the power of flying where they please and changing their
 nests for others, and crossing the seas without lamenting or regretting
 their former condition. Yes, but this happens to them because they are
 irrational creatures. Was reason then given to us by the gods for the
 purpose of unhappiness and misery, that we may pass our lives in
 wretchedness and lamentation? Must all persons be immortal and must no
 man go abroad, and must we ourselves not go abroad, but remain rooted
 like plants; and if any of our familiar friends goes abroad, must we sit
 and weep; and on the contrary, when he returns, must we dance and clap
 our hands like children?
 
 But my mother laments when she does not see me. Why has she not learned
 these principles? and I do not say this, that we should not take care
 that she may not lament, but I say that we ought not to desire in every
 way what is not our own. And the sorrow of another is another's sorrow;
 but my sorrow is my own. I then will stop my own sorrow by every means,
 for it is in my power; and the sorrow of another I will endeavor to stop
 as far as I can; but I will not attempt to do it by every means; for if
 I do, I shall be fighting against God, I shall be opposing Zeus and
 shall be placing myself against him in the administration of the
 universe; and the reward (the punishment) of this fighting against God
 and of this disobedience not only will the children of my children pay,
 but I also shall myself, both by day and by night, startled by dreams,
 perturbed, trembling at every piece of news, and having my tranquillity
 depending on the letters of others. Some person has arrived from Rome. I
 only hope there is no harm. But what harm can happen to you, where you
 are not? From Hellas (Greece) some one is come; I hope that there is no
 harm. In this way every place may be the cause of misfortune to you. Is
 it not enough for you to be unfortunate there where you are, and must
 you be so even beyond sea, and by the report of letters? Is this the way
 in which your affairs are in a state of security? Well then suppose that
 my friends have died in the places which are far from me. What else have
 they suffered than that which is the condition of mortals? Or how are
 you desirous at the same time to live to old age, and at the same time
 not to see the death of any person whom you love? Know you not that in
 the course of a long time many and various kinds of things must happen;
 that a fever shall overpower one, a robber another, and a third a
 tyrant? Such is the condition of things around us, such are those who
 live with us in the world; cold and heat, and unsuitable ways of living,
 and journeys by land, and voyages by sea, and winds, and various
 circumstances which surround us, destroy one man, and banish another,
 and throw one upon an embassy and another into an army. Sit down then in
 a flutter at all these things, lamenting, unhappy, unfortunate,
 dependent on another, and dependent not on one or two, but on ten
 thousands upon ten thousands.
 
 Did you hear this when you were with the philosophers? did you learn
 this? do you not know that human life is a warfare? that one man must
 keep watch, another must go out as a spy, and a third must fight? and it
 is not possible that all should be in one place, nor is it better that
 it should be so. But you neglecting to do the commands of the general
 complain when anything more hard than usual is imposed on you, and you
 do not observe what you make the army become as far as it is in your
 power; that if all imitate you, no man will dig a trench, no man will
 put a rampart round, nor keep watch, nor expose himself to danger, but
 will appear to be useless for the purposes of an army. Again, in a
 vessel if you go as a sailor, keep to one place and stick to it. And if
 you are ordered to climb the mast, refuse; if to run to the head of the
 ship, refuse; and what master of a ship will endure you? and will he not
 pitch you overboard as a useless thing, an impediment only and bad
 example to the other sailors? And so it is here also: every man's life
 is a kind of warfare, and it is long and diversified. You must observe
 the duty of a soldier and do every thing at the nod of the general; if
 it is possible, divining what his wishes are; for there is no
 resemblance between that general and this, neither in strength nor in
 superiority of character. Know you not that a good man does nothing for
 the sake of appearance, but for the sake of doing right? What advantage
 is it then to him to have done right? And what advantage is it to a man
 who writes the name of Dion to write it as he ought? The advantage is to
 have written it. Is there no reward then? Do you seek a reward for a
 good man greater than doing what is good and just? At Olympia you wish
 for nothing more, but it seems to you enough to be crowned at the games.
 Does it seem to you so small and worthless a thing to be good and happy?
 For these purposes being introduced by the gods into this city (the
 world), and it being now your duty to undertake the work of a man, do
 you still want nurses also and a mamma, and do foolish women by their
 weeping move you and make you effeminate? Will you thus never cease to
 be a foolish child? know you not that he who does the acts of a child,
 the older he is, the more ridiculous he is?
 
 So in this matter also: if you kiss your own child, or your brother or
 friend, never give full license to the appearance ([Greek: phantasian]),
 and allow not your pleasure to go as far as it chooses; but check it,
 and curb it as those who stand behind men in their triumphs and remind
 them that they are mortal. Do you also remind yourself in like manner,
 that he whom you love is mortal, and that what you love is nothing of
 your own; it has been given to you for the present, not that it should
 not be taken from you, nor has it been given to you for all time, but as
 a fig is given to you or a bunch of grapes at the appointed season of
 the year. But if you wish for these things in winter, you are a fool. So
 if you wish for your son or friend when it is not allowed to you, you
 must know that you are wishing for a fig in winter. For such as winter
 is to a fig, such is every event which happens from the universe to the
 things which are taken away according to its nature. And further, at the
 times when you are delighted with a thing, place before yourself the
 contrary appearances. What harm is it while you are kissing your child
 to say with a lisping voice: To-morrow you will die; and to a friend
 also: To-morrow you will go away or I shall, and never shall we see one
 another again? But these are words of bad omen--and some incantations
 also are of bad omen; but because they are useful, I don't care for
 this; only let them be useful. But do you call things to be of bad omen
 except those which are significant of some evil? Cowardice is a word of
 bad omen, and meanness of spirit, and sorrow, and grief, and
 shamelessness. These words are of bad omen; and yet we ought not to
 hesitate to utter them in order to protect ourselves against the things.
 Do you tell me that a name which is significant of any natural thing is
 of evil omen? say that even for the ears of corn to be reaped is of bad
 omen, for it signifies the destruction of the ears, but not of the
 world. Say that the falling of the leaves also is of bad omen, and for
 the dried fig to take the place of the green fig, and for raisins to be
 made from the grapes. For all these things are changes from a former
 state into other states; not a destruction, but a certain fixed economy
 and administration. Such is going away from home and a small change:
 such is death, a greater change, not from the state which now is to that
 which is not, but to that which is not now. Shall I then no longer
 exist? You will not exist, but you will be something else, of which the
 world now has need; for you also came into existence not when you chose,
 but when the world had need of you.
 
 Let these thoughts be ready to hand by night and by day; these you
 should write, these you should read; about these you should talk to
 yourself and to others. Ask a man: Can you help me at all for this
 purpose? and further, go to another and to another. Then if anything
 that is said be contrary to your wish, this reflection first will
 immediately relieve you, that it is not unexpected. For it is a great
 thing in all cases to say: I knew that I begot a son who is mortal. For
 so you also will say: I knew that I am mortal, I knew that I may leave
 my home, I knew that I may be ejected from it, I knew that I may be led
 to prison. Then if you turn round and look to yourself, and seek the
 place from which comes that which has happened, you will forthwith
 recollect that it comes from the place of things which are out of the
 power of the will, and of things which are not my own. What then is it
 to me? Then, you will ask, and this is the chief thing: And who is it
 that sent it? The leader, or the general, the state, the law of the
 state. Give it me then, for I must always obey the law in everything.
 Then, when the appearance (of things) pains you, for it is not in your
 power to prevent this, contend against it by the aid of reason, conquer
 it: do not allow it to gain strength nor to lead you to the consequences
 by raising images such as it pleases and as it pleases. If you be in
 Gyara, do not imagine the mode of living at Rome, and how many pleasures
 there were for him who lived there and how many there would be for him
 who returned to Rome; but fix your mind on this matter, how a man who
 lives in Gyara ought to live in Gyara like a man of courage. And if you
 be in Rome, do not imagine what the life in Athens is, but think only of
 the life in Rome.
 
 Then in the place of all other delights substitute this, that of being
 conscious that you are obeying God, that not in word, but in deed you
 are performing the acts of a wise and good man. For what a thing it is
 for a man to be able to say to himself: Now whatever the rest may say in
 solemn manner in the schools and may be judged to be saying in a way
 contrary to common opinion (or in a strange way), this I am doing; and
 they are sitting and are discoursing of my virtues and inquiring about
 me and praising me; and of this Zeus has willed that I shall receive
 from myself a demonstration, and shall myself know if he has a soldier
 such as he ought to have, a citizen such as he ought to have, and if he
 has chosen to produce me to the rest of mankind as a witness of the
 things which are independent of the will: See that you fear without
 reason, that you foolishly desire what you do desire; seek not the good
 in things external; seek it in yourselves: if you do not, you will not
 find it. For this purpose he leads me at one time hither, at another
 time sends me thither, shows me to men as poor, without authority, and
 sick; sends me to Gyara, leads me into prison, not because he hates
 me--far from him be such a meaning, for who hates the best of his
 servants? nor yet because he cares not for me, for he does not neglect
 any even of the smallest things; but he does this for the purpose of
 exercising me and making use of me as a witness to others. Being
 appointed to such a service, do I still care about the place in which I
 am, or with whom I am, or what men say about me? and do I not entirely
 direct my thoughts to God and to his instructions and commands?
 
 Having these things (or thoughts) always in hand, and exercising them by
 yourself, and keeping them in readiness, you will never be in want of
 one to comfort you and strengthen you. For it is not shameful to be
 without something to eat, but not to have reason sufficient for keeping
 away fear and sorrow. But if once you have gained exemption from sorrow
 and fear, will there any longer be a tyrant for you, or a tyrant's
 guard, or attendants on Caesar? Or shall any appointment to offices at
 court cause you pain, or shall those who sacrifice in the Capitol on the
 occasion of being named to certain functions, cause pain to you who have
 received so great authority from Zeus? Only do not make a proud display
 of it, nor boast of it; but show it by your acts; and if no man
 perceives it, be satisfied that you are yourself in a healthy state and
 happy.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 TO THOSE WHO FALL OFF (DESIST) FROM THEIR PURPOSE.--Consider as to the
 things which you proposed to yourself at first, which you have secured,
 and which you have not; and how you are pleased when you recall to
 memory the one, and are pained about the other; and if it is possible,
 recover the things wherein you failed. For we must not shrink when we
 are engaged in the greatest combat, but we must even take blows. For the
 combat before us is not in wrestling and the Pancration, in which both
 the successful and the unsuccessful may have the greatest merit, or may
 have little, and in truth may be very fortunate or very unfortunate; but
 the combat is for good fortune and happiness themselves. Well then, even
 if we have renounced the contest in this matter (for good fortune and
 happiness), no man hinders us from renewing the combat again, and we are
 not compelled to wait for another four years that the games at Olympia
 may come again; but as soon as you have recovered and restored yourself,
 and employ the same zeal, you may renew the combat again; and if again
 you renounce it, you may again renew it; and if you once gain the
 victory, you are like him who has never renounced the combat. Only do
 not through a habit of doing the same thing (renouncing the combat),
 begin to do it with pleasure, and then like a bad athlete go about after
 being conquered in all the circuit of the games like quails who have run
 away.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 TO THOSE WHO FEAR WANT.--Are you not ashamed at being more cowardly and
 more mean than fugitive slaves? How do they when they run away leave
 their masters? on what estates do they depend, and what domestics do
 they rely on? Do they not after stealing a little, which is enough for
 the first days, then afterwards move on through land or through sea,
 contriving one method after another for maintaining their lives? And
 what fugitive slave ever died of hunger? But you are afraid lest
 necessary things should fail you, and are sleepless by night. Wretch,
 are you so blind, and don't you see the road to which the want of
 necessaries leads?--Well, where does it lead?--to the same place to
 which a fever leads, or a stone that falls on you, to death. Have you
 not often said this yourself to your companions? have you not read much
 of this kind, and written much? and how often have you boasted that you
 were easy as to death?
 
 Learn then first what are the things which are shameful, and then tell
 us that you are a philosopher: but at present do not, even if any other
 man calls you so, allow it.
 
 Is that shameful to you which is not your own act, that of which you are
 not the cause, that which has come to you by accident, as a headache, as
 a fever? If your parents were poor, and left their property to others,
 and if while they live, they do not help you at all, is this shameful to
 you? Is this what you learned with the philosophers? Did you never hear
 that the thing which is shameful ought to be blamed, and that which is
 blamable is worthy of blame? Whom do you blame for an act which is not
 his own, which he did not do himself? Did you then make your father such
 as he is, or is it in your power to improve him? Is this power given to
 you? Well then, ought you to wish the things which are not given to you,
 or to be ashamed if you do not obtain them? And have you also been
 accustomed while you were studying philosophy to look to others and to
 hope for nothing from yourself? Lament then and groan and eat with fear
 that you may not have food to-morrow. Tremble about your poor slaves
 lest they steal, lest they run away, lest they die. So live, and
 continue to live, you who in name only have approached philosophy, and
 have disgraced its theorems as far as you can by showing them to be
 useless and unprofitable to those who take them up; you, who have never
 sought constancy, freedom from perturbation, and from passions; you who
 have not sought any person for the sake of this object, but many for the
 sake of syllogisms; you who have never thoroughly examined any of these
 appearances by yourself, Am I able to bear, or am I not able to bear?
 What remains for me to do? But as if all your affairs were well and
 secure, you have been resting on the third topic, that of things being
 unchanged, in order that you may possess unchanged--what? cowardice,
 mean spirit, the admiration of the rich, desire without attaining any
 end, and avoidance ([Greek: echchlisin]) which fails in the attempt?
 About security in these things you have been anxious.
 
 Ought you not to have gained something in addition from reason, and then
 to have protected this with security? And whom did you ever see building
 a battlement all around and encircling it with a wall? And what
 doorkeeper is placed with no door to watch? But you practise in order to
 be able to prove--what? You practise that you may not be tossed as on
 the sea through sophisms, and tossed about from what? Show me first what
 you hold, what you measure, or what you weigh; and show me the scales or
 the medimnus (the measure); or how long will you go on measuring the
 dust? Ought you not to demonstrate those things which make men happy,
 which make things go on for them in the way as they wish, and why we
 ought to blame no man, accuse no man, and acquiesce in the
 administration of the universe?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ABOUT FREEDOM.--He is free who lives as he wishes to live; who is
 neither subject to compulsion nor to hindrance, nor to force; whose
 movements to action ([Greek: hormai]) are not impeded, whose desires
 attain their purpose, and who does not fall into that which he would
 avoid ([Greek: echchliseis aperiptotoi]). Who then chooses to live in
 error? No man. Who chooses to live deceived, liable to mistake, unjust,
 unrestrained, discontented, mean? No man. Not one then of the bad lives
 as he wishes; nor is he then free. And who chooses to live in sorrow,
 fear, envy, pity, desiring and failing in his desires, attempting to
 avoid something and falling into it? Not one. Do we then find any of the
 bad free from sorrow, free from fear, who does not fall into that which
 he would avoid, and does not obtain that which he wishes? Not one; nor
 then do we find any bad man free.
 
 Further, then, answer me this question, also: does freedom seem to you
 to be something great and noble and valuable? How should it not seem so?
 Is it possible then when a man obtains anything so great and valuable
 and noble to be mean? It is not possible. When then you see any man
 subject to another or flattering him contrary to his own opinion,
 confidently affirm that this man also is not free; and not only if he do
 this for a bit of supper, but also if he does it for a government
 (province) or a consulship; and call these men little slaves who for the
 sake of little matters do these things, and those who do so for the sake
 of great things call great slaves, as they deserve to be. This is
 admitted also. Do you think that freedom is a thing independent and
 self-governing? Certainly. Whomsoever then it is in the power of another
 to hinder and compel, declare that he is not free. And do not look, I
 entreat you, after his grandfathers and great-grandfathers, or inquire
 about his being bought or sold, but if you hear him saying from his
 heart and with feeling, "Master," even if the twelve fasces precede him
 (as consul), call him a slave. And if you hear him say, "Wretch that I
 am, how much I suffer," call him a slave. If, finally, you see him
 lamenting, complaining, unhappy, call him a slave, though he wears a
 praetexta. If, then, he is doing nothing of this kind do not yet say
 that he is free, but learn his opinions, whether they are subject to
 compulsion, or may produce hindrance, or to bad fortune, and if you find
 him such, call him a slave who has a holiday in the Saturnalia; say that
 his master is from home; he will return soon, and you will know what he
 suffers.
 
 What then is that which makes a man free from hindrance and makes him
 his own master? For wealth does not do it, nor consulship, nor
 provincial government, nor royal power; but something else must be
 discovered. What then is that which when we write makes us free from
 hindrance and unimpeded? The knowledge of the art of writing. What then
 is it in playing the lute? The science of playing the lute. Therefore in
 life also it is the science of life. You have then heard in a general
 way; but examine the thing also in the several parts. Is it possible
 that he who desires any of the things which depend on others can be free
 from hindrance? No. Is it possible for him to be unimpeded? No.
 Therefore he cannot be free. Consider then, whether we have nothing
 which is in our own power only, or whether we have all things, or
 whether some things are in our own power, and others in the power of
 others. What do you mean? When you wish the body to be entire (sound) is
 it in your power or not? It is not in my power. When you wish it to be
 healthy? Neither is this in my power. When you wish it to be handsome?
 Nor is this. Life or death? Neither is this in my power. Your body then
 is another's, subject to every man who is stronger than yourself. It is.
 But your estate is it in your power to have it when you please, and as
 long as you please, and such as you please? No. And your slaves? No. And
 your clothes? No. And your house? No. And your horses? Not one of these
 things. And if you wish by all means your children to live, or your
 wife, or your brother, or your friends, is it in your power? This also
 is not in my power.
 
 Whether then have you nothing which is in your own power, which depends
 on yourself only and cannot be taken from you, or have you anything of
 the kind? I know not. Look at the thing then thus, and examine it. Is
 any man able to make you assent to that which is false? No man. In the
 matter of assent then you are free from hindrance and obstruction.
 Granted. Well; and can a man force you to desire to move towards that to
 which you do not choose? He can, for when he threatens me with death or
 bonds he compels me to desire to move towards it. If then you despise
 death and bonds, do you still pay any regard to him? No. Is then the
 despising of death an act of your own or is it not yours? It is my act.
 
 When you have made this preparation, and have practised this discipline,
 to distinguish that which belongs to another from that which is your
 own, the things which are subject to hindrance from those which are not,
 to consider the things free from hindrance to concern yourself, and
 those which are not free not to concern yourself, to keep your desire
 steadily fixed to the things which do concern yourself, and turned from
 the things which do not concern yourself; do you still fear any man? No
 one. For about what will you be afraid? About the things which are your
 own, in which consists the nature of good and evil? and who has power
 over these things? who can take them away? who can impede them? No man
 can, no more than he can impede God. But will you be afraid about your
 body and your possessions, about things which are not yours, about
 things which in no way concern you? and what else have you been studying
 from the beginning than to distinguish between your own and not your
 own, the things which are in your power and not in your power, the
 things subject to hindrance and not subject? and why have you come to
 the philosophers? was it that you may nevertheless be unfortunate and
 unhappy? You will then in this way, as I have supposed you to have done,
 be without fear and disturbance. And what is grief to you? for fear
 comes from what you expect, but grief from that which is present. But
 what further will you desire? For of the things which are within the
 power of the will, as being good and present, you have a proper and
 regulated desire; but of the things which are not in the power of the
 will you do not desire any one, and so you do not allow any place to
 that which is irrational, and impatient, and above measure hasty.
 
 Then after receiving everything from another and even yourself, are you
 angry and do you blame the giver if he takes anything from you? Who are
 you, and for what purpose did you come into the world? Did not he (God)
 introduce you here, did he not show you the light, did he not give you
 fellow-workers, and perceptions and reason? and as whom did he introduce
 you here? did he not introduce you as subject to death, and as one to
 live on the earth with a little flesh, and to observe his
 administration, and to join with him in the spectacle and the festival
 for a short time? Will you not then, as long as you have been permitted,
 after seeing the spectacle and the solemnity, when he leads you out, go
 with adoration of him and thanks for what you have heard and seen? No;
 but I would still enjoy the feast. The initiated too would wish to be
 longer in the initiation; and perhaps also those at Olympia to see other
 athletes. But the solemnity is ended; go away like a grateful and modest
 man; make room for others; others also must be born, as you were, and,
 being born, they must have a place, and houses, and necessary things.
 And if the first do not retire, what remains? Why are you insatiable?
 Why are you not content? why do you contract the world? Yes, but I would
 have my little children with me and my wife. What, are they yours? do
 they not belong to the giver, and to him who made you? then will you not
 give up what belongs to others? will you not give way to him who is
 superior? Why then did he introduce me into the world on these
 conditions? And if the conditions do not suit you, depart. He has no
 need of a spectator who is not satisfied. He wants those who join in the
 festival, those who take part in the chorus, that they may rather
 applaud, admire, and celebrate with hymns the solemnity. But those who
 can bear no trouble, and the cowardly, he will not unwillingly see
 absent from the great assembly ([Greek: panaeguris]) for they did not
 when they were present behave as they ought to do at a festival nor fill
 up their place properly, but they lamented, found fault with the deity,
 fortune, their companions; not seeing both what they had, and their own
 powers, which they received for contrary purposes, the powers of
 magnanimity, of a generous mind, manly spirit, and what we are now
 inquiring about, freedom. For what purpose then have I received these
 things? To use them. How long? So long as he who has lent them chooses.
 What if they are necessary to me? Do not attach yourself to them and
 they will not be necessary; do not say to yourself that they are
 necessary, and then they are not necessary.
 
 You then, a man may say, are you free? I wish, by the gods, and pray to
 be free; but I am not yet able to face my masters, I still value my poor
 body, I value greatly the preservation of it entire, though I do not
 possess it entire. But I can point out to you a free man, that you may
 no longer seek an example. Diogenes was free. How was he free? Not
 because he was born of free parents, but because he was himself free,
 because he had cast off all the handles of slavery, and it was not
 possible for any man to approach him, nor had any man the means of
 laying hold of him to enslave him. He had everything easily loosed,
 everything only hanging to him. If you laid hold of his property, he
 would have rather let it go and be yours, than he would have followed
 you for it; if you had laid hold of his leg, he would have let go his
 leg; if of all his body, all his poor body; his intimates, friends,
 country, just the same. For he knew from whence he had them, and from
 whom, and on what conditions. His true parents indeed, the gods, and his
 real country he would never have deserted, nor would he have yielded to
 any man in obedience to them and to their orders, nor would any man have
 died for his country more readily. For he was not used to inquire when
 he should be considered to have done anything on behalf of the whole of
 things (the universe, or all the world), but he remembered that
 everything which is done comes from thence and is done on behalf of that
 country and is commanded by him who administers it. Therefore see what
 Diogenes himself says and writes: "For this reason," he says, "Diogenes,
 it is in your power to speak both with the King of the Persians and with
 Archidamus the King of the Lacedaemonians, as you please." Was it
 because he was born of free parents? I suppose all the Athenians and all
 the Lacedaemonians, because they were born of slaves, could not talk
 with them (these kings) as they wished, but feared and paid court to
 them. Why then does he say that it is in his power? Because I do not
 consider the poor body to be my own, because I want nothing, because law
 is everything to me, and nothing else is. These were the things which
 permitted him to be free.
 
 Think of these things, these opinions, these words; look to these
 examples, if you would be free, if you desire the thing according to its
 worth. And what is the wonder if you buy so great a thing at the price
 of things so many and so great? For the sake of this which is called
 liberty, some hang themselves, others throw themselves down precipices,
 and sometimes even whole cities have perished; and will you not for the
 sake of the true and unassailable and secure liberty give back to God
 when he demands them the things which he has given? Will you not, as
 Plato says, study not to die only, but also to endure torture, and
 exile, and scourging, and, in a word, to give up all which is not your
 own? If you will not, you will be a slave among slaves, even if you be
 ten thousand times a consul; and if you make your way up to the palace
 (Caesar's residence), you will no less be a slave; and you will feel that
 perhaps philosophers utter words which are contrary to common opinion
 (paradoxes), as Cleanthes also said, but not words contrary to reason.
 For you will know by experience that the words are true, and that there
 is no profit from the things which are valued and eagerly sought to
 those who have obtained them; and to those who have not yet obtained
 them there is an imagination ([Greek: phantasia]), that when these
 things are come, all that is good will come with them; then, when they
 are come, the feverish feeling is the same, the tossing to and fro is
 the same, the satiety, the desire of things, which are not present; for
 freedom is acquired not by the full possession of the things which are
 desired, but by removing the desire. And that you may know that this is
 true, as you have labored for those things, so transfer your labor to
 these: be vigilant for the purpose of acquiring an opinion which will
 make you free; pay court to a philosopher instead of to a rich old man;
 be seen about a philosopher's doors; you will not disgrace yourself by
 being seen; you will not go away empty nor without profit, if you go to
 the philosopher as you ought, and if not (if you do not succeed), try at
 least; the trial (attempt) is not disgraceful.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ON FAMILIAR INTIMACY.--To this matter before all you must attend, that
 you be never so closely connected with any of your former intimates or
 friends as to come down to the same acts as he does. If you do not
 observe this rule, you will ruin yourself. But if the thought arises in
 your mind, "I shall seem disobliging to him and he will not have the
 same feeling towards me," remember that nothing is done without cost,
 nor is it possible for a man if he does not do the same things to be the
 same man that he was. Choose then which of the two you will have, to be
 equally loved by those by whom you were formerly loved, being the same
 with your former self; or, being superior, not to obtain from your
 friends the same that you did before.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 WHAT THINGS WE SHOULD EXCHANGE FOR OTHER THINGS.--Keep this thought in
 readiness, when you lose anything external, what you acquire in place of
 it; and if it be worth more, never say, I have had a loss; neither if
 you have got a horse in place of an ass, or an ox in place of a sheep,
 nor a good action in place of a bit of money, nor in place of idle talk
 such tranquillity as befits a man, nor in place of lewd talk if you have
 acquired modesty. If you remember this, you will always maintain your
 character such as it ought to be. But if you do not, consider that the
 times of opportunity are perishing, and that whatever pains you take
 about yourself, you are going to waste them all and overturn them. And
 it needs only a few things for the loss and overturning of all--namely,
 a small deviation from reason. For the steerer of a ship to upset it, he
 has no need of the same means as he has need of for saving it; but if he
 turns it a little to the wind, it is lost; and if he does not do this
 purposely, but has been neglecting his duty a little, the ship is lost.
 Something of the kind happens in this case also; if you only fall a
 nodding a little, all that you have up to this time collected is gone.
 Attend therefore to the appearances of things, and watch over them; for
 that which you have to preserve is no small matter, but it is modesty
 and fidelity and constancy, freedom from the affects, a state of mind
 undisturbed, freedom from fear, tranquillity, in a word liberty. For
 what will you sell these things? See what is the value of the things
 which you will obtain in exchange for these.--But shall I not obtain any
 such thing for it?--See, and if you do in return get that, see what you
 receive in place of it. I possess decency, he possesses a tribuneship:
 he possesses a praetorship, I possess modesty. But I do not make
 acclamations where it is not becoming: I will not stand up where I ought
 not; for I am free, and a friend of God. and so I obey him willingly.
 But I must not claim (seek) anything else, neither body nor possession,
 nor magistracy, nor good report, nor in fact anything. For he (God) does
 not allow me to claim (seek) them, for if he had chosen, he would have
 made them good for me; but he has not done so, and for this reason I
 cannot transgress his commands. Preserve that which is your own good in
 everything; and as to every other thing, as it is permitted, and so far
 as to behave consistently with reason in respect to them, content with
 this only. If you do not, you will be unfortunate, you will fail in all
 things, you will be hindered, you will be impeded. These are the laws
 which have been sent from thence (from God); these are the orders. Of
 these laws a man ought to be an expositor, to these he ought to submit,
 not to those of Masurius and Cassius.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 TO THOSE WHO ARE DESIROUS OF PASSING LIFE IN TRANQUILLITY.--Remember
 that not only the desire of power and of riches makes us mean and
 subject to others, but even the desire of tranquillity, and of leisure,
 and of travelling abroad, and of learning. For, to speak plainly,
 whatever the external thing may be, the value which we set upon it
 places us in subjection to others. What then is the difference between
 desiring to be a senator or not desiring to be one; what is the
 difference between desiring power or being content with a private
 station; what is the difference between saying, I am unhappy, I have
 nothing to do, but I am bound to my books as a corpse; or saying, I am
 unhappy, I have no leisure for reading? For as salutations and power are
 things external and independent of the will, so is a book. For what
 purpose do you choose to read? Tell me. For if you only direct your
 purpose to being amused or learning something, you are a silly fellow
 and incapable of enduring labor. But if you refer reading to the proper
 end, what else is this than a tranquil and happy life ([Greek: eusoia])?
 But if reading does not secure for you a happy and tranquil life, what
 is the use of it? But it does secure this, the man replies, and for this
 reason I am vexed that I am deprived of it.--And what is this tranquil
 and happy life, which any man can impede, I do not say Caesar or Caesar's
 friend, but a crow, a piper, a fever, and thirty thousand other things?
 But a tranquil and happy life contains nothing so sure as continuity and
 freedom from obstacle. Now I am called to do something: I will go then
 with the purpose of observing the measures (rules) which I must keep, of
 acting with modesty, steadiness, without desire and aversion to things
 external; and then that I may attend to men, what they say, how they are
 moved; and this not with any bad disposition, or that I may have
 something to blame or to ridicule; but I turn to myself, and ask if I
 also commit the same faults. How then shall I cease to commit them?
 Formerly I also acted wrong, but now I do not: thanks to God.
 
 What then is the reason of this? The reason is that we have never read
 for this purpose, we have never written for this purpose, so that we may
 in our actions use in a way conformable to nature the appearances
 presented to us; but we terminate in this, in learning what is said, and
 in being able to expound it to another, in resolving a syllogism, and in
 handling the hypothetical syllogism. For this reason where our study
 (purpose) is, there alone is the impediment. Would you have by all means
 the things which are not in your power? Be prevented then, be hindered,
 fail in your purpose. But if we read what is written about action
 (efforts, [Greek: hormae]), not that we may see what is said about
 action, but that we may act well; if we read what is said about desire
 and aversion (avoiding things), in order that we may neither fail in our
 desires, nor fall into that which we try to avoid; if we read what is
 said about duty (officium), in order that remembering the relations (of
 things to one another) we may do nothing irrationally nor contrary to
 these relations; we should not be vexed, in being hindered as to our
 readings, but we should be satisfied with doing the acts which are
 conformable (to the relations), and we should be reckoning not what so
 far we have been accustomed to reckon: To-day I have read so many
 verses, I have written so many; but (we should say), To-day I have
 employed my action as it is taught by the philosophers; I have not
 employed my desire; I have used avoidance ([Greek: echchlisei]) only
 with respect to things which are within the power of my will; I have not
 been afraid of such a person, I have not been prevailed upon by the
 entreaties of another; I have exercised my patience, my abstinence, my
 co-operation with others; and so we should thank God for what we ought
 to thank him.
 
 There is only one way to happiness, and let this rule be ready both in
 the morning and during the day and by night: the rule is not to look
 towards things which are out of the power of our will, to think that
 nothing is our own, to give up all things to the Divinity, to Fortune;
 to make them the superintendents of these things, whom Zeus also has
 made so; for a man to observe that only which is his own, that which
 cannot be hindered; and when we read, to refer our reading to this only,
 and our writing and our listening. For this reason I cannot call the man
 industrious, if I hear this only, that he reads and writes; and even if
 a man adds that he reads all night, I cannot say so, if he knows not to
 what he should refer his reading. For neither do you say that a man is
 industrious if he keeps awake for a girl, nor do I. But if he does it
 (reads and writes) for reputation, I say that he is a lover of
 reputation. And if he does it for money, I say that he is a lover of
 money, not a lover of labor; and if he does it through love of learning,
 I say that he is a lover of learning. But if he refers his labor to his
 own ruling power that he may keep it in a state conformable to nature
 and pass his life in that state, then only do I say that he is
 industrious. For never commend a man on account of these things which
 are common to all, but on account of his opinions (principles); for
 these are the things which belong to each man, which make his actions
 bad or good. Remembering these rules, rejoice in that which is present,
 and be content with the things which come in season. If you see anything
 which you have learned and inquired about occurring to you in your
 course of life (or opportunely applied by you to the acts of life), be
 delighted at it. If you have laid aside or have lessened bad disposition
 and a habit of reviling; if you have done so with rash temper, obscene
 words, hastiness, sluggishness; if you are not moved by what you
 formerly were, and not in the same way as you once were, you can
 celebrate a festival daily, to-day because you have behaved well in one
 act, and to-morrow because you have behaved well in another. How much
 greater is this a reason for making sacrifices than a consulship or the
 government of a province? These things come to you from yourself and
 from the gods. Remember this, who gives these things and to whom, and
 for what purpose. If you cherish yourself in these thoughts, do you
 still think that it makes any difference where you shall be happy, where
 you shall please God? Are not the gods equally distant from all places?
 Do they not see from all places alike that which is going on?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 AGAINST THE QUARRELSOME AND FEROCIOUS.--The wise and good man neither
 himself fights with any person, nor does he allow another, so far as he
 can prevent it. And an example of this as well as of all other things is
 proposed to us in the life of Socrates, who not only himself on all
 occasions avoided fights (quarrels), but would not allow even others to
 quarrel. See in Xenophon's Symposium how many quarrels he settled, how
 further he endured Thrasymachus and Polus and Callicles; how he
 tolerated his wife, and how he tolerated his son who attempted to
 confute him and to cavil with him. For he remembered well that no man
 has in his power another man's ruling principle. He wished therefore for
 nothing else than that which was his own. And what is this? Not that
 this or that man may act according to nature, for that is a thing which
 belongs to another; but that while others are doing their own acts, as
 they choose, he may nevertheless be in a condition conformable to nature
 and live in it, only doing what is his own to the end that others also
 may be in a state conformable to nature. For this is the object always
 set before him by the wise and good man. Is it to be commander (a
 praetor) of an army? No; but if it is permitted him, his object is in
 this matter to maintain his own ruling principle. Is it to marry? No;
 but if marriage is allowed to him, in this matter his object is to
 maintain himself in a condition conformable to nature. But if he would
 have his son not to do wrong or his wife, he would have what belongs to
 another not to belong to another: and to be instructed is this, to learn
 what things are a man's own and what belongs to another.
 
 How then is there left any place for fighting (quarrelling) to a man who
 has this opinion (which he ought to have)? Is he surprised at any thing
 which happens, and does it appear new to him? Does he not expect that
 which comes from the bad to be worse and more grievous than that what
 actually befalls him? And does he not reckon as pure gain whatever they
 (the bad) may do which falls short of extreme wickedness? Such a person
 has reviled you. Great thanks to him for not having struck you. But he
 has struck me also. Great thanks that he did not wound you. But he
 wounded me also. Great thanks that he did not kill you. For when did he
 learn or in what school that man is a tame animal, that men love one
 another, that an act of injustice is a great harm to him who does it.
 Since then he has not learned this and is not convinced of it, why shall
 he not follow that which seems to be for his own interest? Your neighbor
 has thrown stones. Have you then done anything wrong? But the things in
 the house have been broken. Are you then a utensil? No; but a free power
 of will. What then is given to you (to do) in answer to this? If you are
 like a wolf, you must bite in return, and throw more stones. But, if you
 consider what is proper for a man, examine your storehouse, see with
 what faculties you came into the world. Have you the disposition of a
 wild beast, have you the disposition of revenge for an injury? When is a
 horse wretched? When he is deprived of his natural faculties, not when
 he cannot crow like a cock, but when he cannot run. When is a dog
 wretched? Not when he cannot fly, but when he cannot track his game. Is
 then a man also unhappy in this way, not because he cannot strangle
 lions or embrace statues, for he did not come into the world in the
 possession of certain powers from nature for this purpose, but because
 he has lost his probity and his fidelity? People ought to meet and
 lament such a man for the misfortunes into which he has fallen; not
 indeed to lament because a man has been born or has died, but because it
 has happened to him in his lifetime to have lost the things which are
 his own, not that which he received from his father, not his land and
 house, and his inn, and his slaves; for not one of these things is a
 man's own, but all belong to others, are servile, and subject to account
 ([Greek: hupeithuna]), at different times given to different persons by
 those who have them in their power: but I mean the things which belong
 to him as a man, the marks (stamps) in his mind with which he came into
 the world, such as we seek also on coins, and if we find them we approve
 of the coins, and if we do not find the marks we reject them. What is
 the stamp on this sestertius? The stamp of Trajan. Present it. It is the
 stamp of Nero. Throw it away; it cannot be accepted, it is counterfeit.
 So also in this case: What is the stamp of his opinions? It is
 gentleness, a sociable disposition, a tolerant temper, a disposition to
 mutual affections. Produce these qualities. I accept them: I consider
 this man a citizen, I accept him as a neighbor, a companion in my
 voyages. Only see that he has not Nero's stamp. Is he passionate, is he
 full of resentment, is he fault-finding? If the whim seizes him, does he
 break the heads of those who come in his way? (If so), why then did you
 say that he is a man? Is everything judged (determined) by the bare
 form? If that is so, say that the form in wax is an apple and has the
 smell and the taste of an apple. But the external figure is not enough:
 neither then is the nose enough and the eyes to make the man, but he
 must have the opinions of a man. Here is a man who does not listen to
 reason, who does not know when he is refuted: he is an ass; in another
 man the sense of shame is become dead: he is good for nothing, he is
 anything rather than a man. This man seeks whom he may meet and kick or
 bite, so that he is not even a sheep or an ass, but a kind of wild
 beast.
 
 What then? would you have me to be despised?--By whom? by those who know
 you? and how shall those who know you despise a man who is gentle and
 modest? Perhaps you mean by those who do not know you? What is that to
 you? For no other artisan cares for the opinion of those who know not
 his art. But they will be more hostile to me for this reason. Why do you
 say "me"? Can any man injure your will, or prevent you from using in a
 natural way the appearances which are presented to you? In no way can
 he. Why then are you still disturbed and why do you choose to show
 yourself afraid? And why do you not come forth and proclaim that you are
 at peace with all men whatever they may do, and laugh at those chiefly
 who think that they can harm you? These slaves, you can say, know not
 either who I am, nor where lies my good or my evil, because they have no
 access to the things which are mine.
 
 In this way also those who occupy a strong city mock the besiegers (and
 say): What trouble these men are now taking for nothing; our wall is
 secure, we have food for a very long time, and all other resources.
 These are the things which make a city strong and impregnable; but
 nothing else than his opinions makes a man's soul impregnable. For what
 wall is so strong, or what body is so hard, or what possession is so
 safe, or what honor (rank, character) so free from assault (as a man's
 opinions)? All (other) things everywhere are perishable, easily taken by
 assault, and if any man in any way is attached to them, he must be
 disturbed, except what is bad, he must fear, lament, find his desires
 disappointed, and fall into things which he would avoid. Then do we not
 choose to make secure the only means of safety which are offered to us,
 and do we not choose to withdraw ourselves from that which is perishable
 and servile and to labor at the things which are imperishable and by
 nature free; and do we not remember that no man either hurts another or
 does good to another, but that a man's opinions about each thing, is
 that which hurts him, is that which overturns him; this is fighting,
 this is civil discord, this is war? That which made Eteocles and
 Polynices enemies was nothing else than this opinion which they had
 about royal power, their opinion about exile, that the one is the
 extreme of evils, the other the greatest good. Now this is the nature of
 every man to seek the good, to avoid the bad; to consider him who
 deprives us of the one and involves us in the other an enemy and
 treacherous, even if he be a brother, or a son, or a father. For nothing
 is more akin to us than the good; therefore, if these things (externals)
 are good and evil, neither is a father a friend to sons, nor a brother
 to a brother, but all the world is everywhere full of enemies,
 treacherous men, and sycophants. But if the will ([Greek: proairesis],
 the purpose, the intention) being what it ought to be, is the only good;
 and if the will being such as it ought not to be, is the only evil,
 where is there any strife, where is there reviling? about what? about
 the things which do not concern us? and strife with whom? with the
 ignorant, the unhappy, with those who are deceived about the chief
 things?
 
 Remembering this Socrates managed his own house and endured a very
 ill-tempered wife and a foolish (ungrateful?) son.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 AGAINST THOSE WHO LAMENT OVER BEING PITIED.--I am grieved, a man says,
 at being pitied. Whether then is the fact of your being pitied a thing
 which concerns you or those who pity you? Well, is it in your power to
 stop this pity? It is in my power, if I show them that I do not require
 pity. And whether then are you in the condition of not deserving
 (requiring) pity, or are you not in that condition? I think that I am
 not; but these persons do not pity me, for the things for which, if they
 ought to pity me, it would be proper, I mean, for my faults; but they
 pity me for my poverty, for not possessing honorable offices, for
 diseases and deaths and other such things. Whether then are you prepared
 to convince the many, that not one of these things is an evil, but that
 it is possible for a man who is poor and has no office ([Greek:
 anarchonti)] and enjoys no honor to be happy; or to show yourself to
 them as rich and in power? For the second of these things belong to a
 man who is boastful, silly, and good for nothing. And consider by what
 means the pretence must be supported. It will be necessary for you to
 hire slaves and to possess a few silver vessels, and to exhibit them in
 public, if it is possible, though they are often the same, and to
 attempt to conceal the fact that they are the same, and to have splendid
 garments, and all other things for display, and to show that you are a
 man honored by the great, and to try to sup at their houses, or to be
 supposed to sup there, and as to your person to employ some mean arts,
 that you may appear to be more handsome and nobler than you are. These
 things you must contrive, if you choose to go by the second path in
 order not to be pitied. But the first way is both impracticable and
 long, to attempt the very thing which Zeus has not been able to do, to
 convince all men what things are good and bad. Is this power given to
 you? This only is given to you, to convince yourself; and you have not
 convinced yourself. Then I ask you, do you attempt to persuade other
 men? and who has lived so long with you as you with yourself? and who
 has so much power of convincing you as you have of convincing yourself;
 and who is better disposed and nearer to you than you are to yourself?
 How then have you not yet convinced yourself in order to learn? At
 present are not things upside down? Is this what you have been earnest
 about doing, to learn to be free from grief and free from disturbance,
 and not to be humbled (abject), and to be free? Have you not heard then
 that there is only one way which leads to this end, to give up (dismiss)
 the things which do not depend on the will, to withdraw from them, and
 to admit that they belong to others? For another man then to have an
 opinion about you, of what kind is it? It is a thing independent of the
 will--Then is it nothing to you? It is nothing. When then you are still
 vexed at this and disturbed, do you think that you are convinced about
 good and evil?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ON FREEDOM FROM FEAR.--What makes the tyrant formidable? The guards, you
 say, and their swords, and the men of the bedchamber, and those who
 exclude them who would enter. Why then if you bring a boy (child) to the
 tyrant when he is with his guards, is he not afraid; or is it because
 the child does not understand these things? If then any man does
 understand what guards are and that they have swords, and comes to the
 tyrant for this very purpose because he wishes to die on account of some
 circumstance and seeks to die easily by the hand of another, is he
 afraid of the guards? No, for he wishes for the thing which makes the
 guards formidable. If then any man neither wishing to die nor to live by
 all means, but only as it may be permitted, approaches the tyrant what
 hinders him from approaching the tyrant without fear? Nothing. If then a
 man has the same opinion about his property as the man whom I have
 instanced has about his body; and also about his children and his wife,
 and in a word is so affected by some madness or despair that he cares
 not whether he possesses them or not, but like children who are playing
 with shells (quarrel) about the play, but do not trouble themselves
 about the shells, so he too has set no value on the materials (things),
 but values the pleasure that he has with them and the occupation, what
 tyrant is then formidable to him, or what guards or what swords?
 
 What hinders a man, who has clearly separated (comprehended) these
 things, from living with a light heart and bearing easily the reins,
 quietly expecting everything which can happen, and enduring that which
 has already happened? Would you have me to bear poverty? Come and you
 will know what poverty is when it has found one who can act well the
 part of a poor man. Would you have me to possess power? Let me have
 power, and also the trouble of it. Well, banishment? Wherever I shall
 go, there it will be well with me; for here also where I am, it was not
 because of the place that it was well with me, but because of my
 opinions which I shall carry off with me, for neither can any man
 deprive me of them; but my opinions alone are mine and they cannot be
 taken from me, and I am satisfied while I have them, wherever I may be
 and whatever I am doing. But now it is time to die. Why do you say to
 die? Make no tragedy show of the thing, but speak of it as it is. It is
 now time for the matter (of the body) to be resolved into the things out
 of which it was composed. And what is the formidable thing here? what is
 going to perish of the things which are in the universe? what new thing
 or wondrous is going to happen? Is it for this reason that a tyrant is
 formidable? Is it for this reason that the guards appear to have swords
 which are large and sharp? Say this to others; but I have considered
 about all these things; no man has power over me. I have been made free;
 I know his commands, no man can now lead me as a slave. I have a proper
 person to assert my freedom; I have proper judges. (I say) are you not
 the master of my body? What then is that to me? Are you not the master
 of my property? What then is that to me? Are you not the master of my
 exile or of my chains? Well, from all these things and all the poor body
 itself I depart at your bidding, when you please. Make trial of your
 power, and you will know how far it reaches.
 
 Whom then can I still fear? Those who are over the bedchamber? Lest they
 should do, what? Shut me out? If they find that I wish to enter, let
 them shut me out. Why then do you go to the doors? Because I think it
 befits me, while the play (sport) lasts, to join in it. How then are you
 not shut out? Because unless some one allows me to go in, I do not
 choose to go in, but am always content with that which happens; for I
 think that what God chooses is better than what I choose. I will attach
 myself as a minister and follower to him; I have the same movements
 (pursuits) as he has, I have the same desires; in a word, I have the
 same will ([Greek: sunthelo]). There is no shutting out for me, but for
 those who would force their way in. Why then do not I force my way in?
 Because I know that nothing good is distributed within to those who
 enter. But when I hear any man called fortunate because he is honored by
 Caesar, I say what does he happen to get? A province (the government of a
 province). Does he also obtain an opinion such as he ought? The office
 of a Prefect. Does he also obtain the power of using his office well?
 Why do I still strive to enter (Caesar's chamber)? A man scatters dried
 figs and nuts: the children seize them, and fight with one another; men
 do not, for they think them to be a small matter. But if a man should
 throw about shells, even the children do not seize them. Provinces are
 distributed: let children look to that. Money is distributed; let
 children look to that. Praetorships, consulships, are distributed; let
 children scramble for them, let them be shut out, beaten, kiss the hands
 of the giver, of the slaves: but to me these are only dried figs and
 nuts. What then? If you fail to get them, while Caesar is scattering them
 about, do not be troubled; if a dried fig come into your lap, take it
 and eat it; for so far you may value even a fig. But if I shall stoop
 down and turn another over, or be turned over by another, and shall
 flatter those who have got into (Caesar's) chamber, neither is a dried
 fig worth the trouble, nor anything else of the things which are not
 good, which the philosophers have persuaded me not to think good.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 TO A PERSON WHO HAD BEEN CHANGED TO A CHARACTER OF SHAMELESSNESS.--When
 you see another man in the possession of power (magistracy), set against
 this the fact that you have not the want (desire) of power; when you see
 another rich, see what you possess in place of riches: for if you
 possess nothing in place of them, you are miserable; but if you have not
 the want of riches, know that you possess more than this man possesses
 and what is worth much more.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 WHAT THINGS WE OUGHT TO DESPISE AND WHAT THINGS WE OUGHT TO VALUE.--The
 difficulties of all men are about external things, their helplessness is
 about external. What shall I do? how will it be? how will it turn out?
 will this happen? will that? All these are the words of those who are
 turning themselves to things which are not within the power of the will.
 For who says, How shall I not assent to that which is false? how shall I
 not turn away from the truth? If a man be of such a good disposition as
 to be anxious about these things I will remind him of this: Why are you
 anxious? The thing is in your own power, be assured; do not be
 precipitate in assenting before you apply the natural rule. On the other
 side, if a man is anxious (uneasy) about desire, lest it fail in its
 purpose and miss its end, and with respect to the avoidance of things,
 lest he should fall into that which he would avoid, I will first kiss
 (love) him, because he throws away the things about which others are in
 a flutter (others desire) and their fears, and employs his thoughts
 about his own affairs and his own condition. Then I shall say to him: If
 you do not choose to desire that which you will fail to obtain nor to
 attempt to avoid that into which you will fall, desire nothing which
 belongs to (which is in the power of) others, nor try to avoid any of
 the things which are not in your power. If you do not observe this rule,
 you must of necessity fail in your desires and fall into that which you
 would avoid. What is the difficulty here? where is there room for the
 words How will it be? and How will it turn out? and Will this happen or
 that?
 
 Now is not that which will happen independent of the will? Yes. And the
 nature of good and of evil, is it not in the things which are within the
 power of the will? Yes. Is it in your power then to treat according to
 nature everything which happens? Can any person hinder you? No man. No
 longer then say to me, How will it be? For, however it may be, you will
 dispose of it well, and the result to you will be a fortunate one. What
 would Hercules have been if he said: How shall a great lion not appear
 to me, or a great boar, or savage men? And what do you care for that? If
 a great boar appear, you will fight a greater fight; if bad men appear,
 you will relieve the earth of the bad. Suppose then that I lose my life
 in this way. You will die a good man, doing a noble act. For since he
 must certainly die, of necessity a man must be found doing something,
 either following the employment of a husbandman, or digging, or trading,
 or serving in a consulship, or suffering from indigestion or from
 diarrhoea. What then do you wish to be doing when you are found by
 death? I, for my part, would wish to be found doing something which
 belongs to a man, beneficent, suitable to the general interest, noble.
 But if I cannot be found doing things so great, I would be found doing
 at least that which I cannot be hindered from doing, that which is
 permitted me to do, correcting myself, cultivating the faculty which
 makes use of appearances, laboring at freedom from the affects (laboring
 at tranquillity of mind); rendering to the relations of life their due.
 If I succeed so far, also (I would be found) touching on (advancing to)
 the third topic (or head) safety in forming judgments about things. If
 death surprises me when I am busy about these things, it is enough for
 me if I can stretch out my hands to God and say: The means which I have
 received from thee for seeing thy administration (of the world) and
 following it I have not neglected; I have not dishonored thee by my
 acts; see how I have used my perceptions, see how I have used my
 preconceptions; have I ever blamed thee? have I been discontented with
 anything that happens, or wished it to be otherwise? have I wished to
 transgress the (established) relations (of things)? That thou hast given
 me life, I thank thee for what thou hast given. So long as I have used
 the things which are thine I am content. Take them back and place them
 wherever thou mayest choose, for thine were all things, thou gavest them
 to me. Is it not enough to depart in this state of mind? and what life
 is better and more becoming than that of a man who is in this state of
 mind? and what end is more happy?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ABOUT PURITY (CLEANLINESS).--Some persons raise a question whether the
 social feeling is contained in the nature of man; and yet I think that
 these same persons would have no doubt that love of purity is certainly
 contained in it, and that if man is distinguished from other animals by
 anything, he is distinguished by this. When then we see any other animal
 cleaning itself, we are accustomed to speak of the act with surprise,
 and to add that the animal is acting like a man; and on the other hand,
 if a man blames an animal for being dirty, straightway, as if we were
 making an excuse for it, we say that of course the animal is not a human
 creature. So we suppose that there is something superior in man, and
 that we first receive it from the gods. For since the gods by their
 nature are pure and free from corruption, so far as men approach them by
 reason, so far do they cling to purity and to a love (habit) of purity.
 But since it is impossible that man's nature ([Greek: ousia]) can be
 altogether pure, being mixed (composed) of such materials, reason is
 applied, as far as it is possible, and reason endeavors to make human
 nature love purity.
 
 The first then and highest purity is that which is in the soul; and we
 say the same of impurity. Now you could not discover the impurity of the
 soul as you could discover that of the body; but as to the soul, what
 else could you find in it than that which makes it filthy in respect to
 the acts which are her own? Now the acts of the soul are movement
 towards an object or movement from it, desire, aversion, preparation,
 design (purpose), assent. What then is it which in these acts makes the
 soul filthy and impure? Nothing else than her own bad judgments ([Greek:
 chrimata]). Consequently the impurity of the soul is the soul's bad
 opinions; and the purification of the soul is the planting in it of
 proper opinions; and the soul is pure which has proper opinions, for the
 soul alone in her own acts is free from perturbation and pollution.
 
 For we ought not even by the appearance of the body to deter the
 multitude from philosophy; but as in other things, a philosopher should
 show himself cheerful and tranquil, so also he should in the things that
 relate to the body. See, ye men, that I have nothing, that I want
 nothing; see how I am without a house, and without a city, and an exile,
 if it happens to be so, and without a hearth I live more free from
 trouble and more happily than all of noble birth and than the rich. But
 look at my poor body also and observe that it is not injured by my hard
 way of living. But if a man says this to me, who has the appearance
 (dress) and face of a condemned man, what god shall persuade me to
 approach philosophy, if it makes men such persons? Far from it; I would
 not choose to do so, even if I were going to become a wise man. I indeed
 would rather that a young man, who is making his first movements towards
 philosophy, should come to me with his hair carefully trimmed than with
 it dirty and rough, for there is seen in him a certain notion
 (appearance) of beauty and a desire of (attempt at) that which is
 becoming; and where he supposes it to be, there also he strives that it
 shall be. It is only necessary to show him (what it is), and to say:
 Young man, you seek beauty, and you do well; you must know then that it
 (is produced) grows in that part of you where you have the rational
 faculty; seek it there where you have the movements towards and
 movements from things, where you have the desires towards and the
 aversion from things; for this is what you have in yourself of a
 superior kind; but the poor body is naturally only earth; why do you
 labor about it to no purpose? if you shall learn nothing else, you will
 learn from time that the body is nothing. But if a man comes to me
 daubed with filth, dirty, with a moustache down to his knees, what can I
 say to him, by what kind of resemblance can I lead him on? For about
 what has he busied himself which resembles beauty, that I may be able to
 change him and say, Beauty is not in this, but in that? Would you have
 me to tell him, that beauty consists not in being daubed with muck, but
 that it lies in the rational part? Has he any desire of beauty? has he
 any form of it in his mind? Go and talk to a hog, and tell him not to
 roll in the mud.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 ON ATTENTION.--When you have remitted your attention for a short time,
 do not imagine this, that you will recover it when you choose; but let
 this thought be present to you, that in consequence of the fault
 committed today your affairs must be in a worse condition for all that
 follows. For first, and what causes most trouble, a habit of not
 attending is formed in you; then a habit of deferring your attention.
 And continually from time to time you drive away by deferring it the
 happiness of life, proper behavior, the being and living conformably to
 nature. If then the procrastination of attention is profitable, the
 complete omission of attention is more profitable; but if it is not
 profitable, why do you not maintain your attention constant? Today I
 choose to play. Well then, ought you not to play with attention? I
 choose to sing. What then hinders you from doing so with attention? Is
 there any part of life excepted, to which attention does not extend? For
 will you do it (anything in life) worse by using attention, and better
 by not attending at all? And what else of the things in life is done
 better by those who do not use attention? Does he who works in wood work
 better by not attending to it? Does the captain of a ship manage it
 better by not attending? and are any of the smaller acts done better by
 inattention? Do you not see that when you have let your mind loose, it
 is no longer in your power to recall it, either to propriety, or to
 modesty, or to moderation; but you do everything that comes into your
 mind in obedience to your inclinations.
 
 First then we ought to have these (rules) in readiness, and to do
 nothing without them, and we ought to keep the soul directed to this
 mark, to pursue nothing external, and nothing which belongs to others
 (or is in the power of others), but to do as he has appointed who has
 the power; we ought to pursue altogether the things which are in the
 power of the will, and all other things as it is permitted. Next to this
 we ought to remember who we are, and what is our name, and to endeavor
 to direct our duties towards the character (nature) of our several
 relations (in life) in this manner: what is the season for singing, what
 is the season for play, and in whose presence; what will be the
 consequence of the act; whether our associates will despise us, whether
 we shall despise them; when to jeer ([Greek: schopsai]), and whom to
 ridicule; and on what occasion to comply and with whom; and finally, in
 complying how to maintain our own character. But wherever you have
 deviated from any of these rules, there is damage immediately, not from
 anything external, but from the action itself.
 
 What then? is it possible to be free from faults (if you do all this)?
 It is not possible; but this is possible, to direct your efforts
 incessantly to being faultless. For we must be content if by never
 remitting this attention we shall escape at least a few errors. But now
 when you have said, Tomorrow I will begin to attend, you must be told
 that you are saying this, Today I will be shameless, disregardful of
 time and place, mean; it will be in the power of others to give me pain;
 today I will be passionate and envious. See how many evil things you are
 permitting yourself to do. If it is good to use attention tomorrow, how
 much better is it to do so today? if tomorrow it is in your interest to
 attend, much more is it today, that you may be able to do so tomorrow
 also, and may not defer it again to the third day.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 AGAINST OR TO THOSE WHO READILY TELL THEIR OWN AFFAIRS.--When a man has
 seemed to us to have talked with simplicity (candor) about his own
 affairs, how is it that at last we are ourselves also induced to
 discover to him our own secrets and we think this to be candid behavior?
 In the first place, because it seems unfair for a man to have listened
 to the affairs of his neighbor, and not to communicate to him also in
 turn our own affairs; next, because we think that we shall not present
 to them the appearance of candid men when we are silent about our own
 affairs. Indeed, men are often accustomed to say, I have told you all my
 affairs, will you tell me nothing of your own? where is this done?
 Besides, we have also this opinion that we can safely trust him who has
 already told us his own affairs; for the notion rises in our mind that
 this man could never divulge our affairs because he would be cautious
 that we also should not divulge his. In this way also the incautious are
 caught by the soldiers at Rome. A soldier sits by you in a common dress
 and begins to speak ill of Caesar; then you, as if you had received a
 pledge of his fidelity by his having begun the abuse, utter yourself
 also what you think, and then you are carried off in chains.
 
 Something of this kind happens to us also generally. Now as this man has
 confidently intrusted his affairs to me, shall I also do so to any man
 whom I meet? (No), for when I have heard, I keep silence, if I am of
 such a disposition; but he goes forth and tells all men what he has
 heard. Then, if I hear what has been done, if I be a man like him, I
 resolve to be revenged, I divulge what he has told me; I both disturb
 others, and am disturbed myself. But if I remember that one man does not
 injure another, and that every man's acts injure and profit him, I
 secure this, that I do not anything like him, but still I suffer what I
 do suffer through my own silly talk.
 
 True, but it is unfair when you have heard the secrets of your neighbor
 for you in your turn to communicate nothing to him. Did I ask you for
 your secrets, my man? did you communicate your affairs on certain terms,
 that you should in return hear mine also? If you are a babbler and think
 that all who meet you are friends, do you wish me also to be like you?
 But why, if you did well in intrusting your affairs to me, and it is not
 well for me to intrust mine to you, do you wish me to be so rash? It is
 just the same as if I had a cask which is water-tight, and you one with
 a hole in it, and you should come and deposit with me your wine that I
 might put it into my cask, and then should complain that I also did not
 intrust my wine to you, for you have a cask with a hole in it. How then
 is there any equality here? You intrusted your affairs to a man who is
 faithful and modest, to a man who thinks that his own actions alone are
 injurious and (or) useful, and that nothing external is. Would you have
 me intrust mine to you, a man who has dishonored his own faculty of
 will, and who wishes to gain some small bit of money or some office or
 promotion in the court (emperor's palace), even if you should be going
 to murder your own children, like Medea? Where (in what) is this
 equality (fairness)? But show yourself to me to be faithful, modest, and
 steady; show me that you have friendly opinions; show that your cask has
 no hole in it; and you will see how I shall not wait for you to trust me
 with your own affairs, but I myself shall come to you and ask you to
 hear mine. For who does not choose to make use of a good vessel? Who
 does not value a benevolent and faithful adviser? Who will not willingly
 receive a man who is ready to bear a share, as we may say, of the
 difficulty of his circumstances, and by this very act to ease the
 burden, by taking a part of it.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 THE ENCHEIRIDION,
 
 OR MANUAL.
 
 I.
 
 Of things some are in our power, and others are not. In our power are
 opinion ([Greek: hupolaepsis]), movement towards a thing ([Greek:
 hormae]), desire, aversion ([Greek: echchlisis]), turning from a thing;
 and in a word, whatever are our acts. Not in our power are the body,
 property, reputation, offices (magisterial power), and in a word,
 whatever are not our own acts. And the things in our power are by nature
 free, not subject to restraint or hindrance; but the things not in our
 power are weak, slavish, subject to restraint, in the power of others.
 Remember then, that if you think the things which are by nature slavish
 to be free, and the things which are in the power of others to be your
 own, you will be hindered, you will lament, you will be disturbed, you
 will blame both gods and men; but if you think that only which is your
 own to be your own, and if you think that what is another's, as it
 really is, belongs to another, no man will ever compel you, no man will
 hinder you, you will never blame any man, you will accuse no man, you
 will do nothing involuntarily (against your will), no man will harm you,
 you will have no enemy, for you will not suffer any harm.
 
 If then you desire (aim at) such great things remember that you must not
 (attempt to) lay hold of them with a small effort; but you must leave
 alone some things entirely, and postpone others for the present. But if
 you wish for these things also (such great things), and power (office)
 and wealth, perhaps you will not gain even these very things (power and
 wealth) because you aim also at those former things (such great things);
 certainly you will fail in those things through which alone happiness
 and freedom are secured. Straightway then practise saying to every harsh
 appearance: You are an appearance, and in no manner what you appear to
 be. Then examine it by the rules which you possess, and by this first
 and chiefly, whether it relates to the things which are in our power or
 to things which are not in our power; and if it relates to anything
 which is not in our power, be ready to say that it does not concern you.
 
 II.
 
 Remember that desire contains in it the profession (hope) of obtaining
 that which you desire; and the profession (hope) in aversion (turning
 from a thing) is that you will not fall into that which you attempt to
 avoid; and he who fails in his desire is unfortunate; and he who falls
 into that which he would avoid is unhappy. If then you attempt to avoid
 only the things contrary to nature which are within your power you will
 not be involved in any of the things which you would avoid. But if you
 attempt to avoid disease, or death, or poverty, you will be unhappy.
 Take away then aversion from all things which are not in our power, and
 transfer it to the things contrary to nature which are in our power. But
 destroy desire completely for the present. For if you desire anything
 which is not in our power, you must be unfortunate; but of the things in
 our power, and which it would be good to desire, nothing yet is before
 you. But employ only the power of moving towards an object and retiring
 from it; and these powers indeed only slightly and with exceptions and
 with remission.
 
 III.
 
 In everything which pleases the soul, or supplies a want, or is loved,
 remember to add this to the (description, notion): What is the nature of
 each thing, beginning from the smallest? If you love an earthen vessel,
 say it is an earthen vessel which you love; for when it has been broken
 you will not be disturbed. If you are kissing your child or wife, say
 that it is a human being whom you are kissing, for when the wife or
 child dies you will not be disturbed.
 
 IV.
 
 When you are going to take in hand any act remind yourself what kind of
 an act it is. If you are going to bathe, place before yourself what
 happens in the bath; some splashing the water, others pushing against
 one another, others abusing one another, and some stealing; and thus
 with more safety you will undertake the matter, if you say to yourself,
 I now intend to bathe, and to maintain my will in a manner conformable
 to nature. And so you will do in every act; for thus if any hindrance to
 bathing shall happen let this thought be ready. It was not this only
 that I intended, but I intended also to maintain my will in a way
 conformable to nature; but I shall not maintain it so if I am vexed at
 what happens.
 
 V.
 
 Men are disturbed not by the things which happen, but by the opinions
 about the things; for example, death is nothing terrible, for if it were
 it would have seemed so to Socrates; for the opinion about death that it
 is terrible, is the terrible thing. When then we are impeded, or
 disturbed, or grieved, let us never blame others, but ourselves--that
 is, our opinions. It is the act of an ill-instructed man to blame others
 for his own bad condition; it is the act of one who has begun to be
 instructed, to lay the blame on himself; and of one whose instruction is
 completed, neither to blame another, nor himself.
 
 VI.
 
 Be not elated at any advantage (excellence) which belongs to another. If
 a horse when he is elated should say, I am beautiful, one might endure
 it. But when you are elated, and say, I have a beautiful horse, you must
 know that you are elated at having a good horse. What then is your own?
 The use of appearances. Consequently when in the use of appearances
 you are conformable to nature, then be elated, for then you will be
 elated at something good which is your own.
 
 VII.
 
 As on a voyage when the vessel has reached a port, if you go out to get
 water it is an amusement by the way to pick up a shellfish or some bulb,
 but your thoughts ought to be directed to the ship, and you ought to be
 constantly watching if the captain should call, and then you must throw
 away all those things, that you may not be bound and pitched into the
 ship like sheep. So in life also, if there be given to you instead of a
 little bulb and a shell a wife and child, there will be nothing to
 prevent (you from taking them). But if the captain should call, run to
 the ship and leave all those things without regard to them. But if you
 are old, do not even go far from the ship, lest when you are called you
 make default.
 
 VIII.
 
 Seek not that the things which happen should happen as you wish; but
 wish the things which happen to be as they are, and you will have a
 tranquil flow of life.
 
 IX.
 
 Disease is an impediment to the body, but not to the will, unless the
 will itself chooses. Lameness is an impediment to the leg, but not to
 the will. And add this reflection on the occasion of everything that
 happens; for you will find it an impediment to something else, but not
 to yourself.
 
 X.
 
 On the occasion of every accident (event) that befalls you, remember to
 turn to yourself and inquire what power you have for turning it to use.
 If you see a fair man or a fair woman, you will find that the power to
 resist is temperance (continence). If labor (pain) be presented to you,
 you will find that it is endurance. If it be abusive words, you will
 find it to be patience. And if you have been thus formed to the (proper)
 habit, the appearances will not carry you along with them.
 
 XI.
 
 Never say about anything, I have lost it, but say I have restored it. Is
 your child dead? It has been restored. Is your wife dead? She has been
 restored. Has your estate been taken from you? Has not then this also
 been restored? But he who has taken it from me is a bad man. But what is
 it to you, by whose hands the giver demanded it back? So long as he may
 allow you, take care of it as a thing which belongs to another, as
 travellers do with their inn.
 
 XII.
 
 If you intend to improve, throw away such thoughts as these: if I
 neglect my affairs, I shall not have the means of living: unless I
 chastise my slave, he will be bad. For it is better to die of hunger and
 so to be released from grief and fear than to live in abundance with
 perturbation; and it is better for your slave to be bad than for you to
 be unhappy. Begin then from little things. Is the oil spilled? Is a
 little wine stolen? Say on the occasion, at such price is sold freedom
 from perturbation; at such price is sold tranquillity, but nothing is
 got for nothing. And when you call your slave, consider that it is
 possible that he does not hear; and if he does hear, that he will do
 nothing which you wish. But matters are not so well with him, but
 altogether well with you, that it should be in his power for you to be
 not disturbed.
 
 XIII.
 
 If you would improve, submit to be considered without sense and foolish
 with respect to externals. Wish to be considered to know nothing; and if
 you shall seem to some to be a person of importance, distrust yourself.
 For you should know that it is not easy both to keep your will in a
 condition conformable to nature and (to secure) external things: but if
 a man is careful about the one, it is an absolute necessity that he will
 neglect the other.
 
 XIV.
 
 If you would have your children and your wife and your friends to live
 for ever, you are silly; for you would have the things which are not in
 your power to be in your power, and the things which belong to others to
 be yours. So if you would have your slave to be free from faults, you
 are a fool; for you would have badness not to be badness, but something
 else. But if you wish not to fail in your desires, you are able to do
 that. Practise then this which you are able to do. He is the master of
 every man who has the power over the things which another person wishes
 or does not wish, the power to confer them on him or to take them away.
 Whoever then wishes to be free let him neither wish for anything nor
 avoid anything which depends on others: if he does not observe this
 rule, he must be a slave.
 
 XV.
 
 Remember that in life you ought to behave as at a banquet. Suppose that
 something is carried round and is opposite to you. Stretch out your hand
 and take a portion with decency. Suppose that it passes by you. Do not
 detain it. Suppose that it is not yet come to you. Do not send your
 desire forward to it, but wait till it is opposite to you. Do so with
 respect to children, so with respect to a wife, so with respect to
 magisterial offices, so with respect to wealth, and you will be some
 time a worthy partner of the banquets of the gods. But if you take none
 of the things which are set before you, and even despise them, then you
 will be not only a fellow banqueter with the gods, but also a partner
 with them in power. For by acting thus Diogenes and Heracleitus and
 those like them were deservedly divine, and were so called.
 
 XVI.
 
 When you see a person weeping in sorrow either when a child goes abroad
 or when he is dead, or when the man has lost his property, take care
 that the appearance do not hurry you away with it, as if he were
 suffering in external things. But straightway make a distinction in your
 own mind, and be in readiness to say, it is not that which has happened
 that afflicts this man, for it does not afflict another, but it is the
 opinion about this thing which afflicts the man. So far as words then do
 not be unwilling to show him sympathy, and even if it happens so, to
 lament with him. But take care that you do not lament internally also.
 
 XVII.
 
 Remember that thou art an actor in a play, of such a kind as the teacher
 (author) may choose; if short, of a short one; if long, of a long one:
 if he wishes you to act the part of a poor man, see that you act the
 part naturally; if the part of a lame man, of a magistrate, of a private
 person, (do the same). For this is your duty, to act well the part that
 is given to you; but to select the part, belongs to another.
 
 XVIII.
 
 When a raven has croaked inauspiciously, let not the appearance hurry
 you away with it; but straightway make a distinction in your mind and
 say, None of these things is signified to me, but either to my poor
 body, or to my small property, or to my reputation, or to my children,
 or to my wife: but to me all significations are auspicious if I choose.
 For whatever of these things results, it is in my power to derive
 benefit from it.
 
 XIX.
 
 You can be invincible, if you enter into no contest in which it is not
 in your power to conquer. Take care then when you observe a man honored
 before others or possessed of great power or highly esteemed for any
 reason, not to suppose him happy, and be not carried away by the
 appearance. For if the nature of the good is in our power, neither envy
 nor jealousy will have a place in us. But you yourself will not wish to
 be a general or senator ([Greek: prutanis]) or consul, but a free man:
 and there is only one way to this, to despise (care not for) the things
 which are not in our power.
 
 XX.
 
 Remember that it is not he who reviles you or strikes you, who insults
 you, but it is your opinion about these things as being insulting. When
 then a man irritates you, you must know that it is your own opinion
 which has irritated you. Therefore especially try not to be carried away
 by the appearance. For if you once gain time and delay, you will more
 easily master yourself.
 
 XXI.
 
 Let death and exile and every other thing which appears dreadful be
 daily before your eyes; but most of all death: and you will never think
 of anything mean nor will you desire anything extravagantly.
 
 XXII.
 
 If you desire philosophy, prepare yourself from the beginning to be
 ridiculed, to expect that many will sneer at you, and say, He has all at
 once returned to us as a philosopher; and whence does he get this
 supercilious look for us? Do you not show a supercilious look; but hold
 on to the things which seem to you best as one appointed by God to this
 station. And remember that if you abide in the same principles, these
 men who first ridiculed will afterwards admire you; but if you shall
 have been overpowered by them, you will bring on yourself double
 ridicule.
 
 XXIII.
 
 If it should ever happen to you to be turned to externals in order to
 please some person, you must know that you have lost your purpose in
 life. Be satisfied then in everything with being a philosopher; and if
 you wish to seem also to any person to be a philosopher, appear so to
 yourself, and you will be able to do this.
 
 XXIV.
 
 Let not these thoughts afflict you, I shall live unhonored and be nobody
 nowhere. For if want of honor ([Greek: atimia]) is an evil, you cannot
 be in evil through the means (fault) of another any more than you can be
 involved in anything base. Is it then your business to obtain the rank
 of a magistrate, or to be received at a banquet? By no means. How then
 can this be want of honor (dishonor)? And how will you be nobody
 nowhere, when you ought to be somebody in those things only which are in
 your power, in which indeed it is permitted to you to be a man of the
 greatest worth? But your friends will be without assistance! What do you
 mean by being without assistance? They will not receive money from you,
 nor will you make them Roman citizens. Who then told you that these are
 among the things which are in our power, and not in the power of others?
 And who can give to another what he has not himself? Acquire money then,
 your friends say, that we also may have something. If I can acquire
 money and also keep myself modest and faithful and magnanimous, point
 out the way, and I will acquire it. But if you ask me to lose the things
 which are good and my own, in order that you may gain the things which
 are not good, see how unfair and silly you are. Besides, which would you
 rather have, money or a faithful and modest friend? For this end then
 rather help me to be such a man, and do not ask me to do this by which I
 shall lose that character. But my country, you say, as far as it depends
 on me, will be without my help. I ask again, what help do you mean? It
 will not have porticos or baths through you. And what does this mean?
 For it is not furnished with shoes by means of a smith, nor with arms by
 means of a shoemaker. But it is enough if every man fully discharges the
 work that is his own: and if you provided it with another citizen
 faithful and modest, would you not be useful to it? Yes. Then you also
 cannot be useless to it. What place then, you say, shall I hold in the
 city? Whatever you can, if you maintain at the same time your fidelity
 and modesty. But if when you wish to be useful to the state, you shall
 lose these qualities, what profit could you be to it, if you were made
 shameless and faithless?
 
 XXV.
 
 Has any man been preferred before you at a banquet, or in being saluted,
 or in being invited to a consultation? If these things are good, you
 ought to rejoice that he has obtained them; but if bad, be not grieved
 because you have not obtained them. And remember that you cannot, if you
 do not the same things in order to obtain what is not in our own power,
 be considered worthy of the same (equal) things. For how can a man
 obtain an equal share with another when he does not visit a man's doors
 as that other man does; when he does not attend him when he goes abroad,
 as the other man does; when he does not praise (flatter) him as another
 does? You will be unjust then and insatiable, if you do not part with
 the price, in return for which those things are sold, and if you wish to
 obtain them for nothing. Well, what is the price of lettuces? An obolus
 perhaps. If then a man gives up the obolus, and receives the lettuces,
 and if you do not give up the obolus and do not obtain the lettuces, do
 not suppose that you receive less than he who has got the lettuces; for
 as he has the lettuces, so you have the obolus which you did not give.
 In the same way then in the other matter also you have not been invited
 to a man's feast, for you did not give to the host the price at which
 the supper is sold; but he sells it for praise (flattery), he sells it
 for personal attention. Give then the price, if it is for your interest,
 for which it is sold. But if you wish both not to give the price and to
 obtain the things, you are insatiable and silly. Have you nothing then
 in place of the supper? You have indeed, you have the not flattering of
 him, whom you did not choose to flatter; you have the not enduring of
 the man when he enters the room.
 
 XXVI.
 
 We may learn the wish (will) of nature from the things in which we do
 not differ from one another: for instance, when your neighbor's slave
 has broken his cup, or anything else, we are ready to say forthwith,
 that it is one of the things which happen. You must know then that when
 your cup also is broken, you ought to think as you did when your
 neighbor's cup was broken. Transfer this reflection to greater things
 also. Is another man's child or wife dead? There is no one who would not
 say, This is an event incident to man. But when a man's own child or
 wife is dead, forthwith he calls out, Woe to me, how wretched I am! But
 we ought to remember how we feel when we hear that it has happened to
 others.
 
 XXVII.
 
 As a mark is not set up for the purpose of missing the aim, so neither
 does the nature of evil exist in the world.
 
 XXVIII.
 
 If any person was intending to put your body in the power of any man
 whom you fell in with on the way, you would be vexed; but that you put
 your understanding in the power of any man whom you meet, so that if he
 should revile you, it is disturbed and troubled, are you not ashamed at
 this?
 
 XXIX.
 
 In every act observe the things which come first, and those which follow
 it; and so proceed to the act. If you do not, at first you will approach
 it with alacrity, without having thought of the things which will
 follow; but afterwards, when certain base (ugly) things have shown
 themselves, you will be ashamed. A man wishes to conquer at the Olympic
 games. I also wish indeed, for it is a fine thing. But observe both the
 things which come first, and the things which follow; and then begin the
 act. You must do everything according to rule, eat according to strict
 orders, abstain from delicacies, exercise yourself as you are bid at
 appointed times, in heat, in cold, you must not drink cold water, nor
 wine as you choose; in a word, you must deliver yourself up to the
 exercise master as you do to the physician, and then proceed to the
 contest. And sometimes you will strain the hand, put the ankle out of
 joint, swallow much dust, sometimes be flogged, and after all this be
 defeated. When you have considered all this, if you still choose, go to
 the contest: if you do not you will behave like children, who at one
 time play at wrestlers, another time as flute players, again as
 gladiators, then as trumpeters, then as tragic actors. So you also will
 be at one time an athlete, at another a gladiator, then a rhetorician,
 then a philosopher, but with your whole soul you will be nothing at all;
 but like an ape you imitate everything that you see, and one thing after
 another pleases you. For you have not undertaken anything with
 consideration, nor have you surveyed it well; but carelessly and with
 cold desire. Thus some who have seen a philosopher and having heard one
 speak, as Euphrates speaks--and who can speak as he does?--they wish to
 be philosophers themselves also. My man, first of all consider what kind
 of thing it is; and then examine your own nature, if you are able to
 sustain the character. Do you wish to be a pentathlete or a wrestler?
 Look at your arms, your thighs, examine your loins. For different men
 are formed by nature for different things. Do you think that if you do
 these things, you can eat in the same manner, drink in the same manner,
 and in the same manner loathe certain things? You must pass sleepless
 nights, endure toil, go away from your kinsmen, be despised by a slave,
 in everything have the inferior part, in honor, in office, in the courts
 of justice, in every little matter. Consider these things, if you would
 exchange for them, freedom from passions, liberty, tranquillity. If not,
 take care that, like little children, you be not now a philosopher, then
 a servant of the publicani, then a rhetorician, then a procurator
 (manager) for Caesar. These things are not consistent. You must be one
 man, either good or bad. You must either cultivate your own ruling
 faculty, or external things. You must either exercise your skill on
 internal things or on external things; that is you must either maintain
 the position of a philosopher or that of a common person.
 
 XXX.
 
 Duties are universally measured by relations ([Greek: tais schsesi]). Is
 a man a father? The precept is to take care of him, to yield to him in
 all things, to submit when he is reproachful, when he inflicts blows.
 But suppose that he is a bad father. Were you then by nature made akin
 to a good father? No; but to a father. Does a brother wrong you?
 Maintain then your own position towards him, and do not examine what he
 is doing, but what you must do that your will shall be conformable to
 nature. For another will not damage you, unless you choose: but you will
 be damaged then when you shall think that you are damaged. In this way
 then you will discover your duty from the relation of a neighbor, from
 that of a citizen, from that of a general, if you are accustomed to
 contemplate the relations.
 
 XXXI.
 
 As to piety towards the gods you must know that this is the chief thing,
 to have right opinions about them, to think that they exist, and that
 they administer the All well and justly; and you must fix yourself in
 this principle (duty), to obey them, and to yield to them in everything
 which happens, and voluntarily to follow it as being accomplished by the
 wisest intelligence. For if you do so, you will never either blame the
 gods, nor will you accuse them of neglecting you. And it is not possible
 for this to be done in any other way than by withdrawing from the things
 which are not in our power, and by placing the good and the evil only in
 those things which are in our power. For if you think that any of the
 things which are not in our power is good or bad, it is absolutely
 necessary that, when you do not obtain what you wish, and when you fall
 into those things which you do not wish, you will find fault and hate
 those who are the cause of them; for every animal is formed by nature to
 this, to fly from and to turn from the things which appear harmful and
 the things which are the cause of the harm, but to follow and admire the
 things which are useful and the causes of the useful. It is impossible
 then for a person who thinks that he is harmed to be delighted with that
 which he thinks to be the cause of the harm, as it is also impossible to
 be pleased with the harm itself. For this reason also a father is
 reviled by his son, when he gives no part to his son of the things which
 are considered to be good; and it was this which made Polynices and
 Eteocles enemies, the opinion that royal power was a good. It is for
 this reason that the cultivator of the earth reviles the gods, for this
 reason the sailor does, and the merchant, and for this reason those who
 lose their wives and their children. For where the useful (your
 interest) is, there also piety is. Consequently he who takes care to
 desire as he ought and to avoid ([Greek: echchlinein]) as he ought, at
 the same time also cares after piety. But to make libations and to
 sacrifice and to offer first-fruits according to the custom of our
 fathers, purely and not meanly nor carelessly nor scantily nor above our
 ability, is a thing which belongs to all to do.
 
 XXXII.
 
 When you have recourse to divination, remember that you do not know how
 it will turn out, but that you are come to inquire from the diviner. But
 of what kind it is, you know when you come, if indeed you are a
 philosopher. For if it is any of the things which are not in our power,
 it is absolutely necessary that it must be neither good nor bad. Do not
 then bring to the diviner desire or aversion ([Greek: echchlinein]): if
 you do, you will approach him with fear. But having determined in your
 mind that everything which shall turn out (result) is indifferent, and
 does not concern you, and whatever it may be, for it will be in your
 power to use it well, and no man will hinder this, come then with
 confidence to the gods as your advisers. And then when any advice shall
 have been given, remember whom you have taken as advisers, and whom you
 will have neglected, if you do not obey them. And go to divination, as
 Socrates said that you ought, about those matters in which all the
 inquiry has reference to the result, and in which means are not given
 either by reason nor by any other art for knowing the thing which is the
 subject of the inquiry. Wherefore when we ought to share a friend's
 danger, or that of our country, you must not consult the diviner whether
 you ought to share it. For even if the diviner shall tell you that the
 signs of the victims are unlucky, it is plain that this is a token of
 death, or mutilation of part of the body, or of exile. But reason
 prevails, that even with these risks, we should share the dangers of our
 friend, and of our country. Therefore attend to the greater diviner, the
 Pythian god, who ejected from the temple him who did not assist his
 friend, when he was being murdered.
 
 XXXIII.
 
 Immediately prescribe some character and some form to yourself, which
 you shall observe both when you are alone and when you meet with men.
 
 And let silence be the general rule, or let only what is necessary be
 said, and in few words. And rarely, and when the occasion calls, we
 shall say something; but about none of the common subjects, not about
 gladiators, nor horse-races, nor about athletes, nor about eating or
 drinking, which are the usual subjects; and especially not about men, as
 blaming them or praising them, or comparing them. If then you are able,
 bring over by your conversation, the conversation of your associates, to
 that which is proper; but if you should happen to be confined to the
 company of strangers, be silent.
 
 Let not your laughter be much, nor on many occasions, nor excessive.
 
 Refuse altogether to take an oath, if it is possible; if it is not,
 refuse as far as you are able.
 
 Avoid banquets which are given by strangers and by ignorant persons. But
 if ever there is occasion to join in them, let your attention be
 carefully fixed, that you slip not into the manners of the vulgar (the
 uninstructed). For you must know, that if your companion be impure, he
 also who keeps company with him must become impure, though he should
 happen to be pure.
 
 Take (apply) the things which relate to the body as far as the bare use,
 as food, drink, clothing, house, and slaves; but exclude everything
 which is for show or luxury.
 
 As to pleasure with women, abstain as far as you can before marriage;
 but if you do indulge in it, do it in the way which is conformable to
 custom. Do not however be disagreeable to those who indulge in these
 pleasures, or reprove them; and do not often boast that you do not
 indulge in them yourself.
 
 If a man has reported to you, that a certain person speaks ill of you,
 do not make any defence (answer) to what has been told you; but reply,
 The man did not know the rest of my faults, for he would not have
 mentioned these only.
 
 It is not necessary to go to the theatres often: but if there is ever a
 proper occasion for going, do not show yourself as being a partisan of
 any man except yourself, that is, desire only that to be done which is
 done, and for him only to gain the prize who gains the prize; for in
 this way you will meet with no hindrance. But abstain entirely from
 shouts and laughter at any (thing or person), or violent emotions. And
 when you are come away, do not talk much about what has passed on the
 stage, except about that which may lead to your own improvement. For it
 is plain, if you do talk much, that you admired the spectacle (more than
 you ought).
 
 Do not go to the hearing of certain persons' recitations, nor visit them
 readily. But if you do attend, observe gravity and sedateness, and also
 avoid making yourself disagreeable.
 
 When you are going to meet with any person, and particularly one of
 those who are considered to be in a superior condition, place before
 yourself what Socrates or Zeno would have done in such circumstances,
 and you will have no difficulty in making a proper use of the occasion.
 
 When you are going to any of those who are in great power, place before
 yourself that you will not find the man at home, that you will be
 excluded, that the door will not be opened to you, that the man will not
 care about you. And if with all this it is your duty to visit him, bear
 what happens, and never say to yourself that it was not worth the
 trouble. For this is silly, and marks the character of a man who is
 offended by externals.
 
 In company take care not to speak much and excessively about your own
 acts or dangers; for as it is pleasant to you to make mention of your
 own dangers, it is not so pleasant to others to hear what has happened
 to you. Take care also not to provoke laughter; for this is a slippery
 way towards vulgar habits, and is also adapted to diminish the respect
 of your neighbors. It is a dangerous habit also to approach obscene
 talk. When then, anything of this kind happens, if there is a good
 opportunity, rebuke the man who has proceeded to this talk; but if there
 is not an opportunity, by your silence at least, and blushing and
 expression of dissatisfaction by your countenance, show plainly that you
 are displeased at such talk.
 
 XXXIV.
 
 If you have received the impression ([Greek: phantasion]) of any
 pleasure, guard yourself against being carried away by it; but let the
 thing wait for you, and allow yourself a certain delay on your own part.
 Then think of both times, of the time when you will enjoy the pleasure,
 and of the time after the enjoyment of the pleasure, when you will
 repent and will reproach yourself. And set against these things how you
 will rejoice, if you have abstained from the pleasure, and how you will
 commend yourself. But if it seem to you seasonable to undertake (do) the
 thing, take care that the charm of it, and the pleasure, and the
 attraction of it shall not conquer you; but set on the other side the
 consideration, how much better it is to be conscious that you have
 gained this victory.
 
 XXXV.
 
 When you have decided that a thing ought to be done, and are doing it,
 never avoid being seen doing it, though the many shall form an
 unfavorable opinion about it. For if it is not right to do it, avoid
 doing the thing; but if it is right, why are you afraid of those who
 shall find fault wrongly?
 
 XXXVI.
 
 As the proposition, it is either day, or it is night, is of great
 importance for the disjunctive argument, but for the conjunctive, is of
 no value, so in a symposium (entertainment) to select the larger share
 is of great value for the body, but for the maintenance of the social
 feeling is worth nothing. When, then, you are eating with another,
 remember, to look not only to the value for the body of the things set
 before you, but also to the value of the behavior towards the host which
 ought to be observed.
 
 XXXVII.
 
 If you have assumed a character above your strength, you have both acted
 in this manner in an unbecoming way, and you have neglected that which
 you might have fulfilled.
 
 XXXVIII.
 
 In walking about, as you take care not to step on a nail, or to sprain
 your foot, so take care not to damage your own ruling faculty; and if we
 observe this rule in every act, we shall undertake this act with more
 security.
 
 XXXIX.
 
 The measure of possession (property) is to every man the body, as the
 foot is of the shoe. If then you stand on this rule (the demands of the
 body), you will maintain the measure; but if you pass beyond it, you
 must then of necessity be hurried as it were down a precipice. As also
 in the matter of the shoe, if you go beyond the (necessities of the)
 foot, the shoe is gilded, then of a purple color, then embroidered; for
 there is no limit to that which has once passed the true measure.
 
 XL.
 
 Women forthwith from the age of fourteen are called by the men
 mistresses ([Greek: churiai], dominae). Therefore, since they see that
 there is nothing else that they can obtain, but only the power of lying
 with men, they begin to decorate themselves, and to place all their
 hopes in this. It is worth our while then to take care that they may
 know that they are valued (by men) for nothing else than appearing
 (being) decent and modest and discreet.
 
 XLI.
 
 It is a mark of a mean capacity to spend much time on the things which
 concern the body, such as much exercise, much eating, much drinking,
 much easing of the body, much copulation. But these things should be
 done as subordinate things; and let all your care be directed to the
 mind.
 
 XLII.
 
 When any person treats you ill or speaks ill of you, remember that he
 does this or says this because he thinks that it is his duty. It is not
 possible then for him to follow that which seems right to you, but that
 which seems right to himself. Accordingly if he is wrong in his opinion,
 he is the person who is hurt, for he is the person who has been
 deceived; for if a man shall suppose the true conjunction to be false,
 it is not the conjunction which is hindered, but the man who has been
 deceived about it. If you proceed then from these opinions, you will be
 mild in temper to him who reviles you; for say on each occasion, It
 seemed so to him.
 
 XLIII.
 
 Everything has two handles, the one by which it may be borne, the other
 by which it may not. If your brother acts unjustly, do not lay hold of
 the act by that handle wherein he acts unjustly, for this is the handle
 which cannot be borne; but lay hold of the other, that he is your
 brother, that he was nurtured with you, and you will lay hold of the
 thing by that handle by which it can be borne.
 
 XLIV.
 
 These reasonings do not cohere: I am richer than you, therefore I am
 better than you; I am more eloquent than you, therefore I am better than
 you. On the contrary, these rather cohere: I am richer than you,
 therefore my possessions are greater than yours; I am more eloquent than
 you, therefore my speech is superior to yours. But you are neither
 possession nor speech.
 
 XLV.
 
 Does a man bathe quickly (early)? do not say that he bathes badly, but
 that he bathes quickly. Does a man drink much wine? do not say that he
 does this badly, but say that he drinks much. For before you shall have
 determined the opinion how do you know whether he is acting wrong? Thus
 it will not happen to you to comprehend some appearances which are
 capable of being comprehended, but to assent to others.
 
 XLVI.
 
 On no occasion call yourself a philosopher, and do not speak much among
 the uninstructed about theorems (philosophical rules, precepts); but do
 that which follows from them. For example, at a banquet do not say how a
 man ought to eat, but eat as you ought to eat. For remember that in this
 way Socrates also altogether avoided ostentation. Persons used to come
 to him and ask to be recommended by him to philosophers, and he used to
 take them to philosophers, so easily did he submit to being overlooked.
 Accordingly, if any conversation should arise among uninstructed persons
 about any theorem, generally be silent; for there is great danger that
 you will immediately vomit up what you have not digested. And when a man
 shall say to you that you know nothing, and you are not vexed, then be
 sure that you have begun the work (of philosophy). For even sheep do not
 vomit up their grass and show to the shepherds how much they have eaten;
 but when they have internally digested the pasture, they produce
 externally wool and milk. Do you also show not your theorems to the
 uninstructed, but show the acts which come from their digestion.
 
 XLVII.
 
 When at a small cost you are supplied with everything for the body, do
 not be proud of this; nor, if you drink water, say on every occasion, I
 drink water. But consider first how much more frugal the poor are than
 we, and how much more enduring of labor. And if you ever wish to
 exercise yourself in labor and endurance, do it for yourself, and not
 for others. Do not embrace statues; but if you are ever very thirsty,
 take a draught of cold water and spit it out, and tell no man.
 
 XLVIII.
 
 The condition and characteristic of an uninstructed person is this: he
 never expects from himself profit (advantage) nor harm, but from
 externals. The condition and characteristic of a philosopher is this: he
 expects all advantage and all harm from himself. The signs (marks) of
 one who is making progress are these: he censures no man, he praises no
 man, he blames no man, he accuses no man, he says nothing about himself
 as if he were somebody or knew something; when he is impeded at all or
 hindered, he blames himself; if a man praises him he ridicules the
 praiser to himself; if a man censures him he makes no defence; he goes
 about like weak persons, being careful not to move any of the things
 which are placed, before they are firmly fixed; he removes all desire
 from himself, and he transfers aversion ([Greek: echchlisin]) to those
 things only of the things within our power which are contrary to nature;
 he employs a moderate movement towards everything; whether he is
 considered foolish or ignorant he cares not; and in a word he watches
 himself as if he were an enemy and lying in ambush.
 
 XLIX.
 
 When a man is proud because he can understand and explain the writings
 of Chrysippus, say to yourself, If Chrysippus had not written obscurely,
 this man would have had nothing to be proud of. But what is it that I
 wish? To understand nature and to follow it. I inquire therefore who is
 the interpreter? and when I have heard that it is Chrysippus, I come to
 him (the interpreter). But I do not understand what is written, and
 therefore I seek the interpreter. And so far there is yet nothing to be
 proud of. But when I shall have found the interpreter, the thing that
 remains is to use the precepts (the lessons). This itself is the only
 thing to be proud of. But if I shall admire the exposition, what else
 have I been made unless a grammarian instead of a philosopher? except in
 one thing, that I am explaining Chrysippus instead of Homer. When, then,
 any man says to me, Read Chrysippus to me, I rather blush, when I cannot
 show my acts like to and consistent with his words.
 
 L.
 
 Whatever things (rules) are proposed to you (for the conduct of life)
 abide by them, as if they were laws, as if you would be guilty of
 impiety if you transgressed any of them. And whatever any man shall say
 about you, do not attend to it; for this is no affair of yours. How long
 will you then still defer thinking yourself worthy of the best things,
 and in no matter transgressing the distinctive reason? Have you accepted
 the theorems (rules), which it was your duty to agree to, and have you
 agreed to them? what teacher then do you still expect that you defer to
 him the correction of yourself? You are no longer a youth, but already a
 full-grown man. If, then, you are negligent and slothful, and are
 continually making procrastination after procrastination, and proposal
 (intention) after proposal, and fixing day after day, after which you
 will attend to yourself, you will not know that you are not making
 improvement, but you will continue ignorant (uninstructed) both while
 you live and till you die. Immediately then think it right to live as a
 full-grown man, and one who is making proficiency, and let everything
 which appears to you to be the best be to you a law which must not be
 transgressed. And if anything laborious or pleasant or glorious or
 inglorious be presented to you, remember that now is the contest, now
 are the Olympic games, and they cannot be deferred; and that it depends
 on one defeat and one giving way that progress is either lost or
 maintained. Socrates in this way became perfect, in all things improving
 himself, attending to nothing except to reason. But you, though you are
 not yet a Socrates, ought to live as one who wishes to be a Socrates.
 
 LI.
 
 The first and most necessary place (part, [Greek: topos]) in philosophy
 is the use of theorems (precepts, [Greek: theoraemata]), for instance,
 that we must not lie; the second part is that of demonstrations, for
 instance, How is it proved that we ought not to lie? The third is that
 which is confirmatory of these two, and explanatory, for example, How is
 this a demonstration? For what is demonstration, what is consequence,
 what is contradiction, what is truth, what is falsehood? The third part
 (topic) is necessary on account of the second, and the second on account
 of the first; but the most necessary and that on which we ought to rest
 is the first. But we do the contrary. For we spend our time on the third
 topic, and all our earnestness is about it; but we entirely neglect the
 first. Therefore we lie; but the demonstration that we ought not to lie
 we have ready to hand.
 
 LII.
 
 In every thing (circumstance) we should hold these maxims ready to hand:
 
   Lead me, O Zeus, and thou O Destiny,
   The way that I am bid by you to go:
   To follow I am ready. If I choose not,
   I make myself a wretch, and still must follow.
 
   But whoso nobly yields unto necessity,
   We hold him wise, and skill'd in things divine.
 
 And the third also: O Crito, if so it pleases the gods, so let it be;
 Anytus and Melitus are able indeed to kill me, but they cannot harm me.
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of A Selection from the Discourses of

 
 
 
 Produced by Colin Bell, Turgut Dincer, Brett Fishburne and
 the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
 http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
   THE TEACHING OF EPICTETUS:
   BEING THE ENCHEIRIDION
   OF EPICTETUS, WITH SELECTIONS
   FROM THE DISSERTATION
   AND FRAGMENTS.
 
 
   The name Epictetus is pronounced _epik-tituse_ as in
   _get_, first _i_ as in _habit_, second _i_ as in
   _police_, _u_ as in _but_.
 
 
   TRANSLATED FROM THE GREEK,
   WITH INTRODUCTION AND NOTES, BY
   T. W. ROLLESTON.
 
   NEW YORK
   HOME BOOK COMPANY,
   45 VESEY STREET.
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION.
 
 
 But for the zeal and ability of one disciple we should not now possess
 any trustworthy account of the teaching of Epictetus. For, like not a
 few other sages, he wrote nothinghis teaching was purely oral,
 delivered, in the form of lectures or discourses, to the students who
 came to him to receive their education in philosophy. One of these
 students was Flavius Arrianus, afterwards Senator and Consul of Rome,
 named by Lucian one among the first of Roman men, and known to us
 chiefly as author of the best history of Alexander the Great which was
 produced in antiquity. That history is still extant, but posterity owes
 Arrian still more abundant thanks for the copious notes of the teaching
 of Epictetus which he took down from his masters lips in Nicopolis.
 This record he afterwards published in eight books (whereof only four
 now remain), entitled the _Dissertations of Epictetus_; and out of these
 he drew the materials for compiling the little work, the _Encheiridion_,
 or Manual, of Epictetus, by which this philosopher has hitherto been
 most generally known.[1]
 
 It is clear that the _Dissertations_ were not regarded by Arrian as a
 satisfactory representation of the teaching of his master; that he
 published them, indeed, with much reluctance, and only when it appeared
 that unless he did so, certain imperfect versions of his records would
 be established as the sole sources of authoritative information about
 Epictetus. These circumstances are explained in a dedicatory letter to
 his friend Lucius Gellius, prefixed to the edition of the
 _Dissertations_ which Arrian finally resolved to issue. I here translate
 this document in full:
 
    Arrian to Lucius Gellius, hail.
 
    I did not write [in literary form and composition,
    ] the words of Epictetus in the manner in which
    a man might write such things. Neither have I put them
    forth among men, since, as I say, I did not even write
    them. But whatever I heard him speak, those things I
    endeavored to set down in his very words, so to preserve
    to myself for future times a memorial of his thought and
    unstudied speech. Naturally, therefore, they are such
    things as one man might say to another on the occasion of
    the moment, not such as he would put together with the
    idea of finding readers long afterwards. Such they are,
    and I know not how without my will or knowledge they fell
    among men. But to me it is no great matter if I shall
    appear unequal to composing such a work, and to Epictetus
    none at all if any one shall despise his discourse; for
    when he spoke it, it was evident that he had but one
    aimto stir the minds of his hearers towards the best
    things. And if, indeed, the words here written should do
    the same, then they will do, I think, that which the
    words of sages ought to do. But if not, yet let those who
    read them know this, that when he himself spoke them, it
    was impossible for the hearer to avoid feeling whatever
    Epictetus desired he should feel. But if his words, when
    they are merely words, have not this effect, perhaps it
    is that I am in fault, perhaps it could not have been
    otherwise. Farewell!
 
 The style of the _Dissertations_, as they have reached us, answers very
 well to the above account of their origin and purpose. They contain much
 that the world should be as little willing to neglect as anything that
 Greek philosophy has left us; but they contain also many repetitions,
 redundancies, incoherencies; and are absolutely devoid of any sort of
 order or system in their arrangement. Each chapter has generally
 something of a central theme, but beyond this all is chaos. The same
 theme will be dwelt on again and again in almost the same phrases;
 utterances of majestic wisdom are imbedded in pages of tedious argument,
 and any grouping of the chapters according to a progressive sequence of
 ideas will be looked for in vain.
 
 Under these conditions it was evident that the teaching of Epictetus
 could never win half the influence which its essential qualities fitted
 it to exercise. And accordingly, as another and better vehicle for this
 influence, Arrian compiled and condensed from the _Dissertations_ the
 small handbook of the Stoic philosophy known as the _Encheiridion of
 Epictetus_. This little work has made Epictetus known to very many whom
 the _Dissertations_ would never have reached. It had the
 distinctionunparalleled in the case of any other Pagan writing, if we
 except the doubtful _Sententi_ of Xystusof being adopted as a
 religious work in the early Christian Church. Two paraphrases of
 itstill extantone of which was specially designed for the use of
 monastic bodies, were produced about the sixth century A. D., in which
 very few changes were made in the text, beyond the alteration of Pagan
 names and allusions to Scriptural ones.
 
 About the same time it was made the subject of an elaborate and lengthy
 commentary by a Pagan writer, Simplicius, wherein chapter after chapter
 is dissected, discussed, and explained. It was elegantly rendered into
 Latin by the well-known scholar of the Renaissance, Angelo Politian, who
 dedicated his translation to Lorenzo de Medici. Down to the present
 day, as numerous translations testify, it has remained the most usual
 means of access to the thought of Epictetus.
 
 But inestimable as the _Encheiridion_ is, he who knows it alone has
 gained nothing like all that Epictetus has to give. It is a compendium;
 and although much more stirring and forcible than is usual with such
 works, it cannot give us the wealth of interesting allusion, reflection,
 humor, the bursts of eloquence, the abrupt and biting style, the vivid
 revelations of personal feeling, which marked the teaching of Epictetus
 in the form in which he delivered it. It seems, therefore, that to make
 him as accessible as he can be to those for whom such things have any
 value or interest, it were necessary to produce from the _Encheiridion_
 and the _Dissertations_ a third work, which should have the advantages
 of each. This is what I have endeavored to do in the present work. In it
 the whole of the _Encheiridion_ is given, and the divisions of
 subject-matter into which the _Encheiridion_ falls have been observed by
 the division of my translation into five Books, corresponding with the
 natural divisions of the _Encheiridion_Book I., treating of the first
 principles of the Stoic philosophy; Book II., dealing with the general
 application of these principles to life; Book III., with mans relations
 to his fellow-man; Book IV., with his relations to God; Book V.,
 containing, besides a couple of concluding chapters, chiefly practical
 counsels of behavior on various particular occasions, and _obiter dicta_
 on the use of the faculties. Such is the scheme of arrangement suggested
 by the _Encheiridion_; and I have filled it in by setting among the
 chapters of the _Encheiridion_ chapters or passages from the
 _Dissertations_, selected for their relevancy to the matter in hand. In
 fact, I have reversed the process by which the _Encheiridion_ came into
 being. It was condensed out of the _Dissertations_: I have expanded it
 again by drawing into it a large quantity of material from the original
 work, and subjecting the new matter thus gained to the system and order
 of sequence which I found to prevail in the _Encheiridion_. The passages
 or chapters taken from the _Dissertations_ are those which seemed to me
 most characteristic of the philosophy or the personality of Epictetus,
 and I have made it my aim to omit nothing which is essential to a full
 and clear understanding of the message he had to deliver to his
 generation. Of course there is plenty of room for differences of opinion
 as to the manner in which this conception has been here carried out; but
 I hope that the present attempt may do something to win a larger
 audience for his teaching than former editions could, in the nature of
 the case, obtain. If this hope should prove to be well founded, I shall
 expect, some day, to give the present English version a counterpart in a
 Greek text arranged on the same lines.
 
 I may add here that the reader will find an Index at the end of this
 volume, in which every paragraph is referred to its original source in
 the _Dissertations_, _Encheiridion_, or _Fragments_the references
 applying to Schweighusers standard edition of Epictetus.[2]
 
 As regards the style of my translation, I hope the tinge of archaism I
 have given it will be felt to suit the matter. I could think of no idiom
 so varied, so flexible even down to its use of various grammatical
 forms, so well suited alike to colloquy, or argument, or satire, or
 impassioned eloquence, as Elizabethan English.
 
 So much to make the plan of the present work understood; and the reader
 may perhaps wish that I would now leave him to the study of it. But
 there is much in Epictetus the significance of which will not appear to
 any one who is unacquainted with the general system of Stoic philosophy
 which formed the basis of Epictetuss ethical teaching. And I hope that
 the reader will prefer to have such information as is necessary given
 him in the form of a general introduction rather than in that of a
 multitude of notes.
 
 The founder of the Stoic philosophy was Zeno, a native of Cyprus, who
 taught in Athens, about 300 B. C., in that frescoed arcade, or Stoa,
 which gave its name to his school. His birthplace is worth noting, for
 Zeno lived at the beginning of that epoch, himself one of the first
 products of it, in which the influence of the East became strongly
 apparent in Greek thought; the period called Hellenistic in
 contradistinction to the purely Hellenic period which ended in the
 conquests of the Macedonians. In many ways the conditions of life in the
 Hellenistic period formed the most favorable _milieu_ possible for the
 development of Greek thought upon the only lines which, after Aristotle,
 it could fruitfully pursue; and this not in spite of, but even because
 of, the great degradation of political and social life from which all
 Hellendom then suffered. What the democratic polities were like, on
 which was laid the problem of confronting Philip of Macedon, we may
 conjecture from the history of the best known and assuredly not the
 worst of them, Athens. And the best type of Athenian whose rise to power
 was favored by the conditions of this time and place was Demosthenes:
 Demosthenes, the grand historical warning to all peoples against
 committing their destinies to professional orators; the statesman whose
 doubtless real veneration for his country and her past served only to
 make him a more mischievous counselor in her present difficulties; whose
 splendid power as a wielder of words was scarcely more signal than his
 incapacity and cowardice when he was called upon to match those words
 with deeds. Athens, entangling the Thebans in an alliance against
 Macedon, and then leaving them to face Alexander alone; deifying
 Demetrius the Besieger for driving out a Macedonian garrison, and
 allotting him the Parthenon itself to be his lodging and the scene of
 his unspeakable profligacies; murdering Phocion, the one man who dared
 to bring sincerity and virtue to her serviceAthens was a type of the
 Greek States of this epoch: too unprincipled for democratic government,
 too contentious for despotism, too vain to submit to foreign rule, too
 lacking in valor, purpose, union, to resist it with effect.
 
 Whatever the causes of the change may have been, the conditions of
 public life in this Hellenistic period were certainly very different
 from those which prevailed, albeit with decadence, before that vast
 breaking up of boundaries and destruction of political systems involved
 in the Macedonian conquests. The successful and inspiring conflict with
 Persia waged by the Hellenic States had for a time made all Greek hearts
 to beat with one aspiration, and had brought to the front a race of
 leaders who were capable of subduing the Greek democracies to their own
 steadfast and statesmanlike purposes. Public life was then not only a
 possible but even the most natural career for a man of talent and
 probity. The small size of the Greek States gave almost every such man
 an opportunity of action, and so keen and universal was the interest in
 politics that it threatened to lead Greek philosophy into a region in
 which philosophy is very apt to lose its vitalizing connection with
 human consciousness and experience, and to stiffen into barren
 speculation. In a word, man, as an individual, began to be too much lost
 sight of in the consideration of man as a citizen; his uses, his duties,
 the whole worth and significance of his life, came to be estimated too
 exclusively by his relations to the visible society about him. It was
 when the great Stoic Chrysippus found himself obliged to stand aloof
 from all participation in politicsFor if I counsel honorably I shall
 offend the citizens, and if basely, the Godsthat such men as he were
 led to ask themselves: Is there then any sphere of human endeavor out of
 the reach of the tyranny of circumstance? If I cannot be a citizen, what
 am I worth then simply as a man? If I can be nothing to my fellows, what
 can I be to God? To a state of things, then, which, speaking broadly,
 made public life impossible to honest men, we owe the noblest ethical
 system of antiquity; to the enforced concentration of thought upon the
 individual we owe a certain note of universality till then absent from
 Hellenic thought.
 
 But stoicism was not the only product of the speculation of this period.
 Side by side with it there started into being two other systems of
 philosophy, the necessity for combating which was doubtless of immense
 service to its development. These were Epicureanism and Pyrrhonism; and
 as the reader will find Epictetus much concerned with each of them, it
 may be desirable that I should give some brief account of their cardinal
 doctrines.
 
 Epicurus was an Athenian. After some residence in Lesbos and Lampsacus,
 he began to teach in his native city about the year 306 B.C. His ethical
 views, which are all that concern us here, were of a distinctly
 unelevating nature. Pleasure, , was pronounced to be for each man
 the end and aim of his being, and the only rational motive of action.
 This, however, was not the pleasure of the voluptuaryits highest forms,
 according to Epicurus, were gained in  and that is, a
 cheerful and unanxious temperament, with leisure for contemplation, ends
 not attainable by the criminal who lives in constant fear of detection,
 or the luxurious liver in whom satiety produces disgust and weariness.
 
 Certain bodily conditions were, however, regarded as objects in
 themselves, and partaking of the nature of the absolutely good; and all
 entanglement in human relationships was discountenanced for the
 disturbance and distress which such relationships were liable to cause.
 These doctrines were put in practice by their teacher in inuring himself
 to a hermit-like simplicity and abstemiousness of life; and his life was
 philosophically consistent with his doctrines, for it is clear that the
 end of Pleasure will be most surely gained by him who has fewest wants
 to gratify. But though the lives of Epicurus and his immediate followers
 were exceptionally sober and strict, the total effect of his doctrine
 could not but have been evil. They were purely egoistic in this
 tendencythey centered each mans activity and interest upon himself
 alone, they bade him take no thought for any other earthly or heavenly
 thing, and taught him that this ideal of indifference was realized in
 its full perfection by the Gods, who dwelt apart in divine repose while
 blind necessity had its way with human destiny.
 
 Pyrrho of Elis, a rather earlier teacher than Zeno or Epicurus, who
 is said to have studied philosophy under Indian Gymnosophists and
 Chaldean Magi, was the originator in European thought of a great and
 permanent philosophic movement. His school was inspired by the _Geist
 der stets verneint_, and the term Skeptic was first devised to describe
 its attitude. Its strength is in a discovery which inevitably takes
 place when men begin to reflect upon their own mental operationsthe
 discovery, namely, that, given a perceiving mind and a perceived object,
 it is always possible for the former, if it has the power of
 introspection, to doubt whether it has received a really true and
 faithful impression of the latter. How can we be assured that external
 objects are as we perceive them? How can we even be assured that there
 is any principle of constancy in their relations to our consciousness?
 The senses often delude us; we are convinced, in dreams, of the reality
 of appearances which, nevertheless, have no realitywhy may not all
 perception be a delusion? Why may not even our sense of the validity of
 inference and of the truth of the axioms of geometry be a pure
 hallucination? With these searching questions the Skeptic cut at the
 root of all belief, and the problems which they raise have dominated
 philosophy down to the present day. Nor in two thousand years has any
 logical answer to them ever been found. Lotze, the last thinker of
 really first-rate powers that the world has seen, practically abandons
 all inquiry into theories of perception, and starts with the
 _assumption_ that we are living in a kosmos, not a chaos; that the
 order, coherence, reason in things to which consciousness testifies, are
 realities. In antiquity, I may add, the profound problems raised by
 Pyrrhonism do not seem to have been very profoundly apprehended either
 by the Pyrrhonists or their opponents. The latter had nothing better to
 appeal to than that notoriously feeble resource, the _argumentum ad
 hominem_. If the Pyrrhonist distrusted the evidence of his senses, they
 asked, why did he avoid walking over precipices or into the sea, or eat
 bread instead of earth, or in any way make choice of means for ends? The
 Pyrrhonists answer was equally superficial. It anticipated the famous
 formula of Bishop Butler. Probability, argued they, was the guide of
 lifehaving observed certain results to follow from certain
 antecedents, the prudent man will shape his course in life accordingly,
 although, as a matter of theory and speculation, he may refuse to
 believe in the constancy of nature. This answer involves a clear
 inconsistency. It involves even a greater assumption than that which the
 Pyrrhonist refused to make as to the credibility of his perceptionsthe
 assumption of the credibility of his recollections. To the
 thorough-going Skeptic there is no such thing as past experiencehe is,
 as it were, new-born at each instant of his life.
 
 Such, in outline, were the systems against which the Stoic philosophy
 had to make good its position in the ancient world. From the first there
 seems to have been no doubt of its ability to do so, although,
 unhappily, the records which have been preserved of the teaching of its
 earliest days are few and obscure. The writings of Zeno, the founder of
 Stoicism, and of Chrysippus, his immediate successor in the leadership
 of the school, have utterly perished, while of Cleanthes, the third of
 the early Stoic teachers, very little remains beyond the profound and
 majestic Hymn to Zeus, of which I have given a translation in this work.
 The complete loss of the hundreds of treatises produced by Chrysippus is
 especially to be regretted, as he appears to have taken the main part in
 giving shape and system to the Stoic philosophy. Had Chrysippus not
 been, the Stoa had not been, was a proverbial saying which testifies to
 his fame. However, from the accounts of ancient philosophers in Diogenes
 Laertius, from Plutarch, Seneca, Cicero, and a few other authorities, we
 can learn pretty clearly what the framework of the Stoic system had
 grown to be long before Epictetus began to study it.
 
 In antiquity, a philosophic system was expected to have something to
 say for itself on three different branches of studyLogic, Physics
 (which included cosmogony and theology), and Ethics. We think of the
 Stoics chiefly in connection with the last-named of these subjects, but
 they were no less eminent in the others, and Chrysippus, in particular,
 was held to have done so much for the science of logic that a saying was
 currentIf there were dialectic among the Gods, it must be the
 dialectic of Chrysippus. Of the Stoic contributions to this science,
 scarcely any record remains.
 
 Of their physical system, however, much is known, and the reader of
 Epictetus needs to be acquainted with its general features. These were
 borrowed from an earlier thinker, Heracleitus, whose central doctrine
 was that the universe was an eternal flux and transition; everything was
 in a state of becoming, _ein Werdendes_. At the beginning of things, so
 far as they can be said to have any beginning, is the Deity in his
 purest manifestation, which, be it observed, is a strictly material one,
 a sublimated and ethereal fire,  . In this fire dwelt the
 divine creative thought and impulse. The first step in that process of
 differentiation in which development consists is the production of
 vapor, which condensed into water. Two elementary forces play their part
 in these operationsa movement towards within, and a movement towards
 without, the one a densifying, the other an expanding and straining
 force (). The former gives us solidity in matter, the other the
 qualities and energies of matter. Thus, by various degrees of density,
 we get earth, water, atmospheric air, and from air, the common element
 of earthly fire; and these elements in their various combinations, with
 their various attributes and powers, gradually produce the successive
 stages of organic life. Though all these proceed from the substance of
 the Divine Being, the Stoics recognized, in the derived substance which
 make up the universe as we have it now, various degrees of purity, of
 affinity to their original source. Mans body, for instance, with its
 passions and affections, lies comparatively far from the divine; but his
 soul is a veritable ray of the primitive fire, _Deus in corpore humano
 hospitans_. The popular mythology of the day was entirely rejected by
 the Stoics, although, as Professor Mahaffy points out, they never
 attempted to discredit orthodoxy, but, on the contrary, used its myths
 and ceremonies with the utmost reverence as vehicles of profound
 religious truths. But they certainly believed in intelligences above
 man, yet below the one Supreme Being; thus the stars and the lightning
 (the reader will observe the allusions in the Hymn of Cleanthes) are in
 some sense divinities, by virtue of the supposed purity of their fiery
 essence.
 
 Thus from the one primitive divine element the Kosmos, with all its
 hierarchy of being, is evolved. But in the Stoic system  ,[3]
 there is no continuance in any one condition. As in the normal life of
 all earthly creatures there comes a certain climax or turning point,
 after which the forces of decay gain slowly but surely on those of
 growth and resistance, so also runs the history of the universe which
 includes them all. One by one the steps by which it was formed shall be
 retraced, and the derived substances which compose it consumed and
 re-absorbed by that from which they sprang. From matter in its grossest
 form to its purest, from earth and stone and water to the highest
 intelligence in men and dmons and Gods, nothing shall escape this doom
 of dissolution; everything shall yield up its separate existence, until
 at last the indestructible element of that primeval fire is again the
 sole being that remains, and Zeus is alone in the conflagration,
 self-contemplating in the solitudes of thought. But this is not the end.
 There is no end. The plastic impulse again resumes its sway, and soon
 another cycle of world-development and world-destruction begins to run
 its course. In the language of Seneca, When that fatal day, that
 necessity of the times, shall have arrived, and it seems good to God to
 make an end of old things and ordain the better, then shall the ancient
 order be revoked and every creature be generated anew, and a race
 ignorant of guilt be given to the earth.
 
 This was the general physical system on which all Stoics were agreed,
 although there were differences of opinion upon minor points; such as
 how far these successive cycles resembled each other? some asserting
 that they did so in the minutest detail, others only in their larger
 features. It was a system, for all its superstitions, not without
 grandeur and truth. At bottom it expressed a sense of that phenomenon of
 ebb and flow, systole and diastole, the action and counteraction of
 balanced forces, which is perhaps the profoundest law of life.
 
 Two questions arise in connection with the Stoic cosmogony, which we
 must briefly discuss before proceeding farther. Are we justified in
 terming their view of the universe a materialistic one? and what was
 their doctrine of the destinies of the human soul? Now it is certainly
 the usual practice among writers on philosophy to reckon the Stoics as
 materialists, and it is unquestionably true that they denied the
 possibility of any existence which was not corporeal. Strong as they are
 on the supremacy of the human soul over the human body, sharp as is the
 line with which they divide these elements, yet the distinction is a
 moral, not a metaphysical oneeach is an actual material substance. But
 we shall be seriously mistaken, nevertheless, if we place them in the
 same class with the scientific materialists of the present day.
 According to the latter, Thought is no necessary moment in the universe,
 but merely a product of certain accidental combinations of matter, a
 product which, when these are dissolved, must disappear from existence,
 without leaving a trace of its presence behind. Again, according to most
 modern opponents of the materialistic view, Thought has an independent
 and immortal beingit existed before matter was, and would continue to
 exist if all matter were annihilated. The Stoic view differed from each
 of these modern theories. It held Thought and Matter to be eternal,
 inseparable, and, indeed, strictly identical. Being in its primitive and
 purest form was fire, a corporeal substance, but one exhibiting
 consciousness, purpose, will.
 
 As to the question of the Stoic view of the immortality of the human
 soul, it does not seem to me to deserve so much discussion as it has
 received from some commentators. It is obvious that the soul must, in
 the end, share the lot of all other existences, and be resolved into the
 Divine Being which was its source. The only question that can arise is
 whether this resolution takes place at the moment of death, or whether
 the sense of personal identity persists for a certain period beyond that
 event; and this question, which Epictetus appears to have been wise
 enough to leave an open one, is philosophically of very little
 importance. The soul is immortal, the individual perishes; this is the
 conclusion of Stoicism, and if we know this, there is little else it can
 much concern us to know.
 
 The reader who desires to gain a thorough knowledge of Hellenistic
 philosophy, and of the social and political conditions in which it
 throve, will find what he seeks in two works to which I have to express
 my large indebtedness. One is Zellers _Philosophie der Griechen_
 (_Epikureer_, _Stoiker u. Skeptiker_),[4] a monument of German research
 and erudition, in which vast masses of original material for the study
 of this most interesting, but neglected, epoch of the development of
 European intellect have been brought together, and interpreted with more
 than German lucidity and method. The other is Professor Mahaffys recent
 volume, _Greek Life and Thought_, a study of the Hellenistic period in
 various aspects, which the scholar will not read without profit, nor the
 lay-reader without pleasure.
 
 We turn now to that department of the Stoic philosophy with which the
 reader of Epictetus is most concernedits Ethics.
 
 The ethical question resolves itself into a search for the supreme
 object of human endeavor, the _Summum Bonum_, the absolute and essential
 good. This, for the Stoic, embodied itself in the formula, to live
 according to Nature. But what is Nature? The will of God, as revealed
 in the heart and conscience of those who seek to know it, and
 interpreted through the observation in a reverent and faithful spirit of
 the facts of life.
 
 Going into the subject more precisely we find certain criteria of moral
 truth established, , as they were called, that is, primitive,
 original conceptions, or, as I have rendered them in my translation,
 natural conceptions, dogmas by which all moral questions can be tried.
 If we inquire into the source of these , we shall find
 ourselves mistaken in our disposition to think that the Stoics regarded
 them as innate ideas. Innate they are not, for the Stoics held the soul
 at birth to be a _tabula rasa_, or blank page, which only experience
 could fill with character and meaning. But as Seneca says in his
 inquiry, Quomodo ad nos prima boni honestique notitia pervenerit,[5]
 although Nature alone could not teach us these things, could not equip
 us with the knowledge of them before we entered upon life, yet the
 seeds of this knowledge she does give us; the soul of every man has
 implanted in it a certain aptness or, indeed, necessity to deduce
 certain universal truths from such observation and experience as are
 common to all mankind; and these truths, the , though not
 strictly innate, have thus an inevitableness and dogmatic force not
 possessed by those which one man may reach and another miss in the
 exercise of the ordinary faculties, by argument, study, and so forth. By
 these natural conceptions the existence and character of God, and the
 general decrees of the moral law, are considered to be affirmed. If we
 inquire further how the Stoic explained the fact that some of these
 so-called inevitable and universal conclusions are denied in all
 sincerity by men like Epicurus, who were neither bad nor mad, we strike
 upon the difficulty which confronts all systems that aim at setting up
 any absolute body of truth, expressible in human language, in place of
 that partial, progressive, and infinitely varied revelation of Gods
 mind and purpose to which the uncolored facts of the worlds religious
 history seem to testify.
 
 The natural conceptions, as I have said, contain the primary doctrines
 of ethics. None of these are more important for the Stoic than that
 which declares essential Good to lie in the active, not the passive side
 of man; in the will, not in the flesh, nor in anything else which the
 will is unable to control. But a certain relative and conditional
 goodness may lie in matters which are yet of no moment to the spiritual
 man, to that part of him which seeks the essential good. And we must
 note that when Epictetus speaks of certain things as good or bad or
 indifferent, he is generally speaking of them in their relation to the
 spiritual man, and in the most absolute and unconditional sense. No evil
 can happen to the essential part of man, to that side of him which is
 related to the eternal and divine, without his own will. Hence the death
 of a beloved friend, or child, or wife, is no evil; and if it be no
 evil, we are forbidden to grieve for it, or, in the most usual phrase
 with Epictetus, we are not to be troubled or confounded by it,
 . But if this utterance should shock our natural feelings, it
 will do something which assuredly Epictetus never meant it to do. It is
 the soul of man which these events cannot injure, and it is the soul
 which is forbidden to think itself injured by them. Such love of the
 individual as may be embraced in the larger love of the All, of
 Godsuch grief for bereavements and calamities as does not overwhelm
 the inner man (ii. 19) in a wave of mortal tumult, and dull his vital
 sense of the great moral ends which he was born to pursue, is repeatedly
 and explicitly admitted by Epictetus. Thus, in iii. 2, we have him
 arguing against Epicurus that there are certain natural sympathies
 between man and his kind, and even convicting Epicurus himself of a
 secret belief in these sympathies. Epicurus had dissuaded his followers
 from marriage, and the bringing-up of children, on account of the grief
 and anxiety which such relations necessarily entail. Not so the
 Stoicsthey pressed their disciples to enter into the ordinary earthly
 relationships of husband, or wife, or citizen, and this without
 pretending to have found any means of averting the natural consequences
 which Epicurus dreaded, although they did profess to have discovered
 something in man which made him equal to the endurance of them. Again,
 although the condition of , of inward peace, of freedom from
 passions, is again and again represented by Epictetus as the mark of the
 perfect sage, we are told that this  is something quite different
 from apathya man is not to be emotionless like a statue. And a
 third passage confirming this view is to be found in Book I., ch. xi.
 (Schweighuser), where the conduct of a man who was so afflicted by the
 illness of his little daughter that he ran away from the house, and
 would hear news of her only through messages, is condemned, not for the
 affection and anxiety it proved, but for its utter unreasonableness.
 Would you, asks Epictetus, have her mother and her nurse and her
 pedagogue, who all love her too, also run away from her, and leave her
 to die in the hands of persons who neither love nor care for her at
 all? There is a grief which is really a self-indulgence, a barren,
 absorbing, paralyzing grief, which, to the soul possessed by it, makes
 every other thing in heaven and earth seem strange and cold and trivial.
 From such grief alone Epictetus would deliver us, and I think he would
 have accepted Mr. Aubrey de Veres noble sonnet on _Sorrow_ as a
 thoroughly fit poetic statement of Stoic doctrine on this subject:
 
   Count each affliction, whether light or grave,
   Gods messenger sent down to thee; do thou
   With courtesy receive him; rise and bow;
   And, ere his shadow pass thy threshold, crave
   Permission first his heavenly feet to lave;
   Then lay before him all thou hast, allow
   No cloud of passion to usurp thy brow,
   Or mar thy hospitality; no wave
   Of mortal tumult to obliterate
   The souls marmoreal calmness: Grief should be
   Like joy, majestic, equable, sedate,
   Confirming, cleansing, raising, making free,
   Strong to consume small troubles; to commend
   Great thoughts, grave thoughts, thoughts lasting to the end.
 
 But the grief that shall do this is a grief that must be _felt_. And
 Epictetus assuredly never meant to offer the Stoic philosophy as a mere
 stupefying anodyne. Make the man a Stoic, and something yet remains to
 doto make the Stoic a man. One of these purposes was not more the
 concern of Epictetus than the other. And he pursued both of them with a
 strength, sincerity, and sanity of thought, with a power of nourishing
 the heroic fiber in humanity, which, to my mind, make him the very chief
 of Pagan moralists.
 
 It is no purpose of mine to fill this preface with information which the
 reader can gain without doubt or difficulty from the author whom it
 introduces, and therefore I shall leave him to discover for himself what
 the positive ethical teaching of Epictetus was like. Nor is it,
 unhappily, possible to say much upon another subject on which Epictetus
 gives us little or no informationhis own life and circumstances.
 Arrian wrote a biography of him, but it is now entirely lost, and the
 biographical details which have been collected from Simplicius, Suidas,
 Aulus Gellius, and others are very scanty. He was born at Hierapolis, in
 Phrygia, and became, how is unknown, a slave of Epaphroditus, a freedman
 and favorite of Nero, who is recorded to have treated him with great
 cruelty. One day, it is said, Epaphroditus began twisting his leg for
 amusement. Epictetus said, If you go on you will break my leg.
 Epaphroditus persisted, the leg was broken, and Epictetus, with
 unruffled serenity, only said, Did I not tell you that you would break
 my leg? This circumstance is adduced by Celsus in his famous
 controversy with Origen as an instance of Pagan fortitude equal to
 anything which Christian martyrology had to show;[6] but it is probably
 a mere myth which grew up to account for the fact mentioned by
 Simplicius and Suidas that Epictetus was feeble in body and lame from an
 early age.
 
 Epaphroditus was probably a very bad master, and as a favorite and
 intimate of Neros must have been a bad man; but we have to thank him
 for the fact that Epictetus, while yet a slave, was sent to attend the
 philosophic lectures of Musonius Rufus, an eminent Stoic of Rome, whom
 both Epictetus and Marcus Aurelius mention with great respect. The
 system of philosophic training had been at this time long organized.
 There were masters of repute everywhere, who delivered their instruction
 in regular courses, received a fixed payment for the same, and under
 whom crowds of young men assembled from far and near to study science
 and ethicsto receive, in short, what corresponded to a university
 education in those days. The curious circumstance that a slave like
 Epictetus could participate in advantages of this kind is generally
 explained as the result of a fashionable whim which possessed Roman
 nobles at this time for having philosophers and men of culture among
 their slaves. Professor Mahaffy, in his _Greek Life and Thought_ (p.
 132), commenting on the summons of the two philosophers, Anaxarchus and
 Callisthenes, to console Alexander after his murder of Cleitus,
 observes, that it was probably usual to call in philosophers to minister
 professionally in cases of affliction. From this, to making a
 philosopher a regular adjunct to a large household, even as the baron of
 later times kept a fool, the step is not great. But Epaphroditus, one
 thinks, must have had frequent reason to rue the choice he made in
 Epictetus, if he expected his domestic philosopher to excuse his
 misdeeds as Anaxarchus did those of Alexander on the occasion above
 mentioned.
 
 In the year 94 A. D. the emperor Domitian issued a decree expelling all
 philosophers from Romean easily explainable proceeding on his part if
 there were any large number of them who, in the words of Epictetus, were
 able to look tyrants steadily in the face. Epictetus must have by this
 time obtained his freedom and set up for himself as a professor of
 philosophy, for we find him, in consequence of this decree, betaking
 himself to Nicopolis, a city of Epirus. Here he lived and taught to a
 venerable age, and here he delivered the discourses which Arrian has
 reported for us. He lived with great simplicity, and is said to have had
 no servant or other inmate of his house until he hired a nurse for an
 infant which was about to be exposed, according to the practice of those
 days when it was desired to check the inconvenient growth of a family,
 and which Epictetus rescued and brought up. The date of his death is
 unknown.
 
 And now, reader, I will take my leave of you with Arrians farewell
 salutation to Lucius Gellius, which, literally translated, is _Be
 strong_. If you need it, I know no teacher better able to make or keep
 you so than Epictetus. At any rate, to give him a fair chance of doing
 what it is in him to do for English-speaking men and women is something
 I have regarded as a sort of duty, a discharge of obligation for his
 infinite service to myself; which done to the utmost of my powers, the
 fewest forewords are the best.
 
 
   T. W. R.
 
 
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
     [Footnote 1: _The Encheiridion of Epictetus_, Translated into
     English by T. W. Rolleston. Kegan Paul, Trench, & Co., 1881.]
 
     [Footnote 2: Epicteti Dissertationum ab Arriano Digestarum Libri IV.
     et ex Deperditis Sermonibus Fragmenta. Post Io. Uptoni aliorumque
     curas, denuo ad Codicum M Storum fidem recensuit, Latina Versione,
     Adnotationibus, Indicibus illustravit Johannes Schweighuser,
     Lipsi. MDCCXCIX.
 
     Epicteti Manuale et Cebetis Tabula Grce et Latine. Schw.
     MDCCXCVIII.
 
     There are two excellent English translations of the whole extant
     works of Epictetusone by Mrs. Carter, published in the last
     century, the other by the late George Long, M. A. (Bohn Series), to
     both of which, but especially the latter, I desire to record my
     great obligations.]
 
     [Footnote 3:  , all flowsthe cardinal doctrine of the
     Heracleitean philosophy.]
 
     [Footnote 4: An English translation of this work has lately
     appeared.]
 
     [Footnote 5: Ep. 120. 4. ff.]
 
     [Footnote 6: Gregory Nazianzen, commenting on this narrative,
     remarks that it only shows how manfully _unavoidable_ sufferings may
     be borne.]
 
 
 
 
 CLEANTHES HYMN TO ZEUS.[1]
 
 
    Most glorious of the Immortals, many named, Almighty
      forever.
 
    Zeus, ruler of nature, that governest all things with
      law,
 
    Hail! for lawful it is that all mortals should address
      Thee.
 
    For we are Thy offspring, taking the image only of Thy
      voice,[2] as many mortal things as live and move upon the
      earth.
 
    Therefore will I hymn Thee, and sing Thy might forever.
 
    For Thee doth all this universe that circles round the
      earth obey, moving whithersoever Thou leadest, and is
      gladly swayed by Thee.
 
    Such a minister hast Thou in Thine invincible hands;the
      two-edged, blazing, imperishable thunderbolt.
 
    For under its stroke all Nature shuddereth, and by it
      Thou guidest aright the Universal Reason, that roams
      through all things, mingling itself with the greater and
      the lesser lights, till it have grown so great, and
      become supreme king over all.
 
    Nor is aught done on the earth without Thee, O God, nor
      in the divine sphere of the heavens, nor in the sea,
 
    Save the works that evil men do in their folly
 
    Yea, but Thou knowest even to find a place for
      superfluous things, and to order that which is
      disorderly, and things not dear to men are dear to Thee.
 
    Thus dost Thou harmonize into One all good and evil
      things, that there should be one everlasting Reason of
      them all.
 
    And this the evil among mortal men avoid and heed not;
      wretched, ever desiring to possess the good, yet they nor
      see nor hear the universal Law of God, which obeying with
      all their heart, their life would be well.
 
    But they rush graceless each to his own aim,
 
    Some cherishing lust for fame, the nurse of evil strife,
 
    Some bent on monstrous gain,
 
    Some turned to folly and the sweet works of the flesh,
 
    Hastening, indeed, to bring the very contrary of these
      things to pass.
 
    But Thou, O Zeus, the All-giver, Dweller in the darkness
      of cloud, Lord of thunder, save Thou men from their
      unhappy folly,
 
    Which do Thou, O Father, scatter from their souls; and
      give them to discover the wisdom, in whose assurance Thou
      governest all things with justice;
 
    So that being honored, they may pay Thee honor,
 
    Hymning Thy works continually, as it beseems a mortal
      man.
 
    Since there can be no greater glory for men or Gods than
      this,
 
    Duly to praise forever the Universal Law.
 
 
    NOTE:
 
    The bracketed numerals in the text refer throughout to the Notes at
    the end of the volume; each chapter having, where notes are necessary,
    its own chapter of Notes.
 
 
 THE TEACHING OF EPICTETUS.
 
 
 
 
 _BOOK I._
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 THE BEGINNING OF PHILOSOPHY.
 
 
 1. Wouldst thou be good, then first believe that thou art evil.
 
 2. The beginning of philosophy, at least with those who lay hold of it
 as they ought and enter by the door,[1] is the consciousness of their
 own feebleness and incapacity in respect of necessary things.
 
 3. For we come into the world having by nature no idea of a right-angled
 triangle, or a quarter-tone, or a semi-tone, but by a certain tradition
 of art we learn each of these things. And thus those who know them not,
 do not suppose that they know them. But good and evil, and nobleness and
 baseness, and the seemly and the unseemly, and happiness and
 misfortune, and what is our concern and what is not, and what ought to
 be done and what notwho hath come into the world without an implanted
 notion of these things? Thus we all use these terms, and endeavor to fit
 our natural conceptions to every several thing. _He did well, rightly,
 not rightly, he failed, he succeeded, he is unrighteous, he is
 righteous_which of us spareth to use terms like these? Which of us
 will defer the use of them till he hath learned them, even as ignorant
 men do not use terms of geometry or music? But this is the reason of it:
 we come into the world already, as it were, taught by Nature some things
 in this kind, and setting out from these things we have added thereto
 our own conceit.[2] _For how_, saith one, _do I not know what is noble
 and what is base_? Have I not the notion of it? Truly. _And do I not
 apply it to things severally?_ You do apply it. _Do I not, then, apply
 it rightly?_ But here lies the whole question, and here conceit entereth
 in. For setting out from things confessed by all, they go on by a false
 application to that which is disputed. For if, in addition to those
 things, they had gained also this power of application, what would then
 hinder them to be perfect? But now since you think that you apply
 rightly the natural conceptions to things severally, tell me, whence
 have you this assurance?
 
 Because it seems so to me.
 
 But to another it seems otherwiseand he, too, doth he think his
 application right or not?
 
 He doth think it.
 
 Can ye, then, both be rightly applying the conceptions in matters
 wherein your opinions contradict each other?
 
 We cannot.
 
 Have you, then, aught better to show for your application, or aught
 above this, that it seemeth so to you? But what else doth a madman do
 than those things that to him seem right? And doth this rule suffice for
 him?
 
 It doth not suffice.
 
 Come, then, to that which is above seeming. What is this?
 
 4. Behold, the beginning of philosophy is the observation of how men
 contradict each other, and the search whence cometh this contradiction,
 and the censure and mistrust of bare opinion. And it is an inquiry into
 that which seems, whether it rightly seems; and the discovery of a
 certain rule, even as we have found a balance for weights, and a plumb
 line for straight and crooked. This is the beginning of philosophy. Are
 all things right to all to whom they seem so? But how can contradictory
 things be right?
 
 Nay, then, not all things, but those that seem to us right.
 
 And why to you more than the Syrians, or to the Egyptians? Why more
 than to me or to any other man? Not at all more. Seeming, then, doth not
 for every man answer to Being; for neither in weights or measures doth
 the bare appearance content us, but for each case we have discovered
 some rule. And here, then, is there no rule above seeming? And how could
 it be that there were no evidence or discovery of things the most
 necessary for men? There is, then, a rule. And wherefore do we not seek
 it, and find it, and, having found it, henceforth use it without
 transgression, and not so much as stretch forth a finger without it? For
 this it is, I think, that when it is discovered cureth of their madness
 those that mismeasure all things by seeming alone; so that henceforth,
 setting out from things known and investigated, we may use an organized
 body of natural conceptions in all our several dealings.
 
 5. What is the subject about which we are inquiring? Pleasure? Submit it
 to the rule, cast it into the scales. Now the Good must be a thing of
 such sort that we ought to trust in it? _Truly._ And we ought to have
 faith in it? _We ought._ And ought we to trust in anything which is
 unstable? _Nay._ And hath pleasure any stability? _It hath not._ Take
 it, then, and fling it out of the scales, and set it far away from the
 place of the Good. But if you are dim of sight, and one balance doth not
 suffice, then take another. Is it right to be elated in what is good?
 _Yea._ And is it right to be elated then in the presence of a pleasure?
 See to it that thou say not it is right; or I shall not hold thee worthy
 even of the balance.[3] Thus are things judged and weighed, when the
 rules are held in readiness. And the aim of philosophy is this, to
 examine and establish the rules. And to use them when they are known is
 the task of a wise and good man.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 ON THE NATURAL CONCEPTIONS.
 
 
 1. The natural conceptions are common to all men, and one cannot
 contradict another. For which of us but affirms that the Good is
 profitable, and that we should choose it, and in all circumstances
 follow and pursue it? Which of us but affirms that uprightness is
 honorable and becoming? Where, then, doth the contradiction arise?
 Concerning the application of the natural conceptions to things
 severally. When one saith, _He did well, he is a worthy man_, and
 another, _Nay, but he did foolishly_, then there is a contradiction
 among men, one with another. And there is the same contradiction among
 the Jews and the Syrians and the Egyptians and the Romans; not whether
 that which is righteous should be preferred to all things and in all
 cases pursued, but whether this be righteous or unrighteous, to eat the
 flesh of swine. And ye can discover the same contradiction in the matter
 of Achilles and Agamemnon. For call them before us: What sayest thou,
 Agamemnon, Should not that which is right and fair come to pass?
 
 That should it.
 
 And what sayest thou, Achilles, Doth it not please thee that what is
 fair and right should be done?
 
 Of all things this doth most please me.
 
 Then make application of your natural conceptions. Whence arose this
 dispute? The one saith: _I am not bound to deliver up Chryseis to her
 father._ And the other saith: _Thou art bound._ Assuredly one of them
 must ill apply the conception of duty. And again the one saith:
 _Therefore if I should deliver up Chryseis, it is meet that I take his
 prize from one of you._ And the other: _Wouldst thou, then, take from me
 my beloved?_ He saith: _Yea, even thine._ And _shall I alone, and I
 alone, have nothing_? And thus ariseth the contradiction.
 
 2. What is it, then, to be educated? It is to learn to apply the natural
 conceptions to each thing severally according to nature; and further, to
 discern that of things that exist some are in our own power[1] and the
 rest are not in our own power. And things that are in our own power are
 the will, and all the works of the will. And things that are not in our
 own power are the body, and the parts of the body, and possessions and
 parents and brethren and children and country and, in a word, our
 associates. Where now shall we place the Good? To what objects shall we
 apply it? To those which are in our own power? Then is health not good,
 and whole limbs and life? and are not children and parents and country?
 And who will bear with you if you say this? Let us, then, transfer it to
 these things. Now, can one be happy who is injured, and has missed
 gaining what is good? He cannot. And can such a one bear himself towards
 his fellows as he ought? How is it possible that he should? For I have
 it of nature that I must seek my own profit. If it profits me to own a
 piece of land, it profits me to take it from my neighbor. If it profits
 me to have a garment, it profits me to steal it from the bath. And hence
 wars, seditions, tyrannies, conspiracies. And how shall I be able to
 maintain a right mind towards God? for if I suffer injury and
 misfortune, it cannot be but He neglects me. And what have I to do with
 Him if He cannot help me? And, again, what have I to do with Him if He
 is willing to let me continue in the evils in which I am? Henceforth I
 begin to hate Him. Why, then, do we build temples and set up statues to
 Zeus as we do to powers of evil, such as Fever?[2] And how is He now
 the Saviour and the Raingiver and the Fruitgiver? And verily, all this
 follows, if we place anywhere in external things the nature and being of
 the Good.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 THE MASTER-FACULTY.
 
 
 1. Of all our faculties ye shall find but one that can contemplate
 itself, or, therefore, approve or disapprove itself. How far hath
 grammar the power of contemplation? Only so far as to judge concerning
 letters. And music? Only so far as to judge concerning melodies. Doth
 any of them, then, contemplate itself? Not one. But when you have need
 to write to your friend, grammar will tell you how to write; but whether
 to write or not, grammar will not tell. And so with the musical art in
 the case of melodies; but whether it is now meet or not to sing or to
 play, music will not tell. What, then, will tell it? That faculty which
 both contemplates itself and all other things. And what is this? It is
 the faculty of Reason; for we have received none other which can
 consider itselfwhat it is, and what it can, and what it is worthand
 all the other faculties as well. For what else is it that tells us that
 a golden thing is beautiful, since itself doth not? Clearly it is the
 faculty which makes use of appearances. What else is it that judges of
 music and grammar, and the other faculties, and proves their uses, and
 shows the fit occasions? None else than this.
 
 2. Thus the Gods, as it was fit they should, place that only in our
 power which is the mightiest and master thing, the right use of
 appearances; but other things are not in our power. Was it that they did
 not wish it? I indeed think that had they been able they had made over
 to us those things also; but this they could in no way do. For being on
 the earth, and bound up with this flesh and with these associates, how
 was it possible that as regards these we should not be hindered by
 external things? But what saith Zeus? Epictetus, if it were possible, I
 would have made both this thy little body and thy little property free
 and unhampered. But forget not now that this is but finely tempered
 clay, and nothing of thine own. And since I could not do this, I have
 given thee a part of ourselves, this power of desiring and disliking,
 and pursuing, avoiding, and rejecting, and, in brief, the use of
 appearances. Have a care, then, of this, hold this only for thine own,
 and thou shalt never be hindered or hampered, thou shalt not lament,
 thou shalt not blame, thou shalt never flatter any man. What then? Do
 these seem trifling matters? _God forbid._ Are you, then, not content
 with them? _At least I pray the Gods I may be._[1]
 
 3. But now having one thing in our power to care for, and to cleave to,
 we rather choose to be careful of many things, and to bind ourselves to
 many things, even to the flesh, and to possessions, and to brother and
 friend, and child and slave. And being thus bound to many things, they
 lie heavy on us and drag us down. So, if the weather be not fair for
 sailing, we sit down distraught and are ever peering forth to see how
 stands the wind. _It is north._ And what is that to us? _When will the
 west wind blow?_ When it shall seem good to it, friend; or to olus. For
 it was not thee, but olus whom God made steward of the winds.[2] What
 then? It is right to devise how we may perfect the things that are our
 own, and to use the others as their nature is. And what, then, is their
 nature? As it may please God.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 THE NATURE OF THE GOOD.
 
 
 1. The subject for the good and wise man is his own master-faculty, as
 the body is for the physician and the trainer, and the soil is the
 subject for the husbandman. And the work of the good and wise man is to
 use appearances according to Nature. For it is the nature of every soul
 to consent to what is good and to reject what is evil, and to hold back
 about what is uncertain; and thus to be moved to pursue the good and to
 avoid the evil, and neither way towards what is neither good nor evil.
 For as it is not lawful for the money-changer or the seller of herbs to
 reject Csars coin, but if one present it, then, whether he will or no,
 he must give up what is sold for it, so it is also with the soul. When
 the Good appears, straightway the soul is moved towards it, and from the
 Evil. And never doth the soul reject any clear appearance of the good,
 no more than Csars coin. On this hangeth every movement both of God
 and man.
 
 2. The nature and essence of the Good is in a certain disposition of the
 Will; likewise that of the Evil. What, then, are outward things? Matter
 for the Will, about which being occupied it shall attain its own good or
 evil. How shall it attain the Good? Through not being dazzled with
 admiration of what it works on.[1] For our opinions of this, when right,
 make the will right, and when wrong make it evil. This law hath God
 established, and saith, If thou wouldst have aught of good, have it
 from thyself.
 
 3. If these things are true (and if we are not fools or hypocrites),
 that Good, for man, lies in the Will, and likewise Evil, and all other
 things are nothing to us, why are we still troubled? why do we fear? The
 things for which we have been zealous are in no other mans power; and
 for the things that are in others power we are not concerned. What
 difficulty have we now? _But direct me_, sayest thou. And why shall I
 direct thee? hath not God directed thee? hath He not given thee that
 which is thine own unhindered and unhampered, and hindered and hampered
 that which is not thine own? And what direction, what word of command
 didst thou receive from Him when thou camest thence? Hold fast
 everything which is thine owncovet not that which is alien to thee.
 And faithfulness is thine, and reverence is thine: who, then, can rob
 thee of these things? Who can hinder thee to use them, if not thyself?
 But thyself can do it, and how? When thou art zealous about things not
 thine own, and hast cast away the things that are. With such counsels
 and commands from Zeus, what wilt thou still from me? Am I greater than
 he? am I more worthy of thy faith? But if thou hold to these things, of
 what others hast thou need? _But perchance these are none of his
 commands?_ Then bring forward the natural conceptions, bring the proofs
 of the philosophers, bring the things thou hast often heard, bring the
 things that thyself hast spoken, bring what thou hast read, bring what
 thou hast pondered.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 THE PROMISE OF PHILOSOPHY.
 
 
 1. Of things that exist, some are in our own power, some are not in our
 own power. Of things that are in our own power are our opinions,
 impulses, pursuits, avoidances, and, in brief, all that is of our own
 doing. Of things that are not in our own power are the body,
 possessions, reputation, authority, and, in brief, all that is not of
 our own doing. And the things that are in our own power are in their
 nature free, not liable to hindrance or embarrassment, while the things
 that are not in our own power are strengthless, servile, subject, alien.
 
 2. Remember, then, if you hold things by their nature subject to be
 free, and things alien to be your proper concern, you will be hampered,
 you will lament, you will be troubled, you will blame Gods and men. But
 if you hold that only to be your own which is so, and the alien for what
 it is, alien, then none shall ever compel you, none shall hinder you,
 you will blame no one, accuse no one, you will not do the least thing
 unwillingly, none shall harm you, you shall have no foe, for you shall
 suffer no injury.
 
 3. Aiming, then, at things so high, remember that it is no moderate
 passion wherewith you must attempt them, but some things you must
 utterly renounce, and put some, for the present, aside. For if, let us
 say, you aim also at this, to rule and to gather riches, then you are
 like, through aiming at the chief things also, to miss these lower ends;
 and shall most assuredly miss those others, through which alone freedom
 and happiness are won. Straightway, then, practice saying to every harsh
 appearance_Thou art an Appearance and not at all the thing thou
 appearest to be_. Then examine it, and prove it by the rules you have,
 but first and above all by this, whether it concern something that is in
 our own power, or something that is not in our own power. And if the
 latter, then be the thought at hand: _It is nothing to Me._
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 THE WAY OF PHILOSOPHY.
 
 
 1. A certain Roman having entered with his son and listened to one
 lecture, This, said Epictetus, is the manner of teaching; and he was
 silent. But when the other prayed him to continue, he spake as
 follows:
 
 Every art is wearisome, in the learning of it, to the untaught and
 unskilled. Yet things that are made by the arts immediately declare
 their use, and for what they were made, and in most of them is something
 attractive and pleasing. And thus when a shoemaker is learning his trade
 it is no pleasure to stand by and observe him, but the shoe is useful,
 and moreover not unpleasing to behold. And the learning of a carpenters
 trade is very grievous to an untaught person who happens to be present,
 but the work done declares the need of the art. But far more is this
 seen in music, for if you are by where one is learning, it will appear
 the most painful of all instructions; but that which is produced by the
 musical art is sweet and delightful to hear, even to those who are
 untaught in it. And here we conceive the work of one who studies
 philosophy to be some such thing, that he must fit his desire to all
 events, so that nothing may come to pass against our will, nor may aught
 fail to come to pass that we wish for. Whence it results to those who so
 order it, that they never fail to obtain what they would, nor to avoid
 what they would not, living, as regards themselves, without pain, fear,
 or trouble; and as regards their fellows, observing all the relations,
 natural and acquired; as son or father, or brother or citizen, or
 husband or wife, or neighbor or fellow-traveler, or prince or subject.
 Such we conceive to be the work of one who pursues philosophy. And next
 we must inquire how this may come about.
 
 2. We see, then, that the carpenter becomes a carpenter by learning
 something, and by learning something the pilot becomes a pilot. And here
 also is it not on this wise? Is it enough that we merely wish to become
 good and wise, or must we not also learn something? We inquire, then,
 what we have to learn?
 
 3. The philosophers say that, before all things, it is needful to learn
 that God is, and taketh thought for all things; and that nothing can be
 hid from Him, neither deeds, nor even thoughts or wishes. Thereafter, of
 what nature the Gods are. For whatever they are found to be, he who
 would please and serve them must strive, with all his might, to be like
 unto them. If the Divine is faithful, so must he be faithful; if free,
 so must he be free; if beneficent, so must he be beneficent; if
 high-minded, so must he be high-minded; so that thus emulating God, he
 shall both do and speak the things that follow therefrom.[1]
 
 4. Whence, then, shall we make a beginning? If you will consider this
 with me, I shall say, first, that you must attend to the sense of
 words.[2]
 
 So I do not now understand them?
 
 You do not.
 
 How, then, do I use them?
 
 As the unlettered use written words, or as cattle use appearances; for
 the use is one thing and understanding another. But if you think you
 understand, then take any word you will,[3] and let us try ourselves,
 whether we understand it. But it is hateful to be confuted, for a man
 now old, and one who, perhaps, hath served his three campaigns! And I
 too know this. For you have come to me now as one who lacketh nothing.
 And what could you suppose to be lacking to you? Wealth have you, and
 children, and it may be a wife, and many servants; Csar knows you, you
 have won many friends in Rome, you give every man his due, you reward
 with good him that doeth good to you, and with evil him that doeth evil.
 What is still lacking to you? If, now, I shall show you that you lack
 the greatest and most necessary things for happiness, and that to this
 day you have cared for everything rather than for what behooved you; and
 if I crown all and say that you know not what God is nor what man is,
 nor Good nor Evil;and what I say of other things is perhaps endurable,
 but if I say you know not your own self, how can you endure me, and bear
 the accusation, and abide here? Neverbut straightway you will go away
 in anger. And yet what evil have I done you? Unless the mirror doth evil
 to the ill-favored man, when it shows him to himself such as he is, and
 unless the physician is thought to affront the sick man when he may say
 to him: _Man, dost thou think thou ailest nothing? Thou hast a fever:
 fast to-day and drink water._ And none saith, _What an affront_. But if
 one shall say to a man: _Thy pursuits art inflamed, thine avoidances are
 mean, thy purposes are lawless, thy impulses accord not with nature,
 thine opinions are vain and lying_straightway he goeth forth and
 saith, _He affronted me_.
 
 5. We follow our business as in a great fair. Cattle and oxen are
 brought to be sold; and the greater part of the men come some to buy,
 some to sell; and few are they who come for the spectacle of the
 fair,how it comes to pass, and wherefore, and who are they who have
 established it, and to what end. And so it is here, too, in this
 assembly of life. Some, indeed, like cattle, concern themselves with
 nothing but fodder; even such as those that care for possessions and
 lands and servants and offices, for these are nothing more than fodder.
 But few are they who come to the fair for love of the spectacle, what
 the world is and by whom it is governed. By no one? And how is it
 possible that a state or a house cannot endure, no not for the shortest
 time, without a governor and overseer, but this so great and fair fabric
 should be guided thus orderly by chance and accident? There is, then,
 one who governs. But what is his nature? and how doth he govern? and we,
 that were made by him, what are we, and for what are we? or have we at
 least some intercourse and link with him, or have we none? Thus it is
 that these few are moved, and thenceforth study this alone, to learn
 about the fair, and to depart. What then? they are mocked by the
 multitude. And in the fair, too, the observers are mocked by the
 traders; and had the cattle any reflection they would mock all those who
 cared for anything else than fodder.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 TO THE LEARNER.
 
 
 1. Remember that pursuit declares the aim of attaining the thing
 pursued, and avoidance that of not falling into the thing shunned; and
 he who fails in his pursuit is unfortunate, and it is misfortune to fall
 into what he would avoid. If now you shun only those things in your
 power which are contrary to Nature, you shall never fall into what you
 would avoid. But if you shun disease or death or poverty, you shall have
 misfortune.
 
 2. Turn away, then, your avoidance from things not in our power, and
 set it upon things contrary to Nature which are in our power. And let
 pursuit for the present be utterly effaced; for if you are pursuing
 something that is not in our power, it must needs be that you miscarry,
 and of things that are, as many as you may rightly aim at, none are yet
 open to you. But use only desire and aversion, and that indeed lightly,
 and with reserve, and indifferently.
 
 3. No great thing cometh suddenly into being, for not even a bunch of
 grapes can, or a fig. If you say to me now:_ I desire a fig_, I answer
 that there is need of time: let it first of all flower, and then bring
 forth the fruit, and then ripen. When the fruit of a fig-tree is not
 perfected at once, and in a single hour, would you win the fruit of a
 mans mind thus quickly and easily? Even if I say to you, expect it not.
 
 4. To fulfill the promise of a mans nature is itself no common thing.
 For what is a man? _A living creature_, say you; _mortal, and endowed
 with Reason_. And from what are we set apart by Reason? _From the wild
 beasts._ And what others? _From sheep and the like._ Look to it, then,
 that thou do nothing like a wild beast, for if thou do, the man in thee
 perisheth, thou hast not fulfilled his promise. Look to it, that thou do
 nothing like a sheep, or thus too the man hath perished. _What, then,
 can we do as sheep?_ When we are gluttonous, sensual, reckless, filthy,
 thoughtless, to what are we then sunken? To sheep. What have we lost?
 Our faculty of Reason. And when we are contentious, and hurtful, and
 angry, and violent, to what are we sunken? To wild beasts. And for the
 rest some of us are great wild beasts, and some of us little and evil
 ones; whereby we may say, Let me at least be eaten by a lion.[1] But
 through all these things the promise of the mans nature has been
 ruined.
 
 5. For when is a complex proposition safe?[2] When it fulfills its
 promise. So that the validity of a complex proposition is when it is a
 complex of truths. And when is a disjunctive safe? When it fulfills its
 promise. And when are flutes, or a lyre, or a horse, or a dog? What
 marvel is it, then, if a man also is to be saved in the same way, and
 perish in the same way?
 
 6. But each thing is increased and saved by the corresponding worksthe
 carpenter by the practice of carpentry, the grammarian by the study of
 grammar; but if he use to write ungrammatically, it must needs be that
 his art shall be corrupted and destroyed. Thus, too, the works of
 reverence save the reverent man, and those of shamelessness destroy him.
 And works of faithfulness save the faithful man, and the contrary
 destroy him. And men of the contrary character are strengthened therein
 by contrary deeds; the irreverent by irreverence, the faithless by
 faithlessness, the reviler by reviling, the angry by anger, the
 avaricious by unfair giving and taking.
 
 7. Know, that not easily shall a conviction arise in a man unless he
 every day speak the same things and hear the same things, and at the
 same time apply them unto life.
 
 8. Every great power is perilous to beginners. Thou must bear such
 things according to thy strength. _But I must live according to Nature?_
 That is not for a sick man.[3] Lead thy life as a sick man for a while,
 so that thou mayest hereafter live it as a whole man. Fast, drink water,
 abstain for a while from pursuit of every kind, in order that thou
 mayest pursue as Reason bids. And if as Reason bids, then when thou
 shalt have aught of good in thee, thy pursuit shall be well. _Nay, but
 we would live as sages and do good to men._ What good? What wilt thou
 do? Hast thou done good to thyself? But thou wouldst exhort them? And
 hast thou exhorted thyself?[4] Thou wouldst do them goodthen do not
 chatter to them, but show them in thyself what manner of men philosophy
 can make. In thy eating do good to those that eat with thee, in thy
 drinking to those that drink, by yielding and giving place to all, and
 bearing with them. Thus do them good, and not by spitting thy bile upon
 them.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 THE CYNIC.
 
 
 1. One of his pupils, who seemed to be drawn towards the way of
 Cynicism, inquired of Epictetus what manner of man the Cynic ought to
 be, and what was the natural conception of the thing. And Epictetus
 said: Let us look into it at leisure. But so much I have now to say to
 you, that whosoever shall without God attempt so great a matter stirreth
 up the wrath of God against him, and desireth only to behave himself
 unseemly before the people. For in no well-ordered house doth one come
 in and say to himself: _I should be the steward of the house_, else,
 when the lord of the house shall have observed it, and seeth him
 insolently giving orders, he will drag him forth and chastise him. So it
 is also, in this great city of the universe, for here too there is a
 master of the house who ordereth each and all: Thou art the Sun; thy
 power is to travel round and to make the year and the seasons, and to
 increase and nourish fruits, and to stir the winds and still them, and
 temperately to warm the bodies of men. Go forth, run thy course, and
 minister thus to the greatest things and to the least. Thou art a calf;
 when a lion shall appear, do what befits thee, or it shall be worse for
 thee. Thou art a bull; come forth and fight, for this is thy part and
 pride, and this thou canst. Thou art able to lead the army against
 Ilion; be Agamemnon. Thou canst fight in single combat with Hector; be
 Achilles. But if Thersites came forth and pretended to the authority,
 then either he would not gain it, or, gaining it, he would have been
 shamed before many witnesses.
 
 2. And about this affair, do thou take thought upon it earnestly, for it
 is not such as it seemeth to thee. _I wear a rough cloak now, and I
 shall wear it then;[2] I sleep hard now, and I shall sleep so then. I
 will take to myself a wallet and staff, and I will begin to go about and
 beg, and to reprove every one I meet with; and if I shall see one that
 plucks out his hairs, I will censure him, or one that hath his hair
 curled, or that goes in purple raiment._ If thou conceivest the matter
 on this wise, far be it from theego not near it, it is not for thee.
 But if thou conceivest of it as it is, and holdest thyself not unworthy
 of it, then behold to how great an enterprise thou art putting forth
 thine hand.
 
 3. First, in things that concern thyself, thou must appear in nothing
 like unto what thou now doest. Thou must not accuse God nor man; thou
 must utterly give over pursuit, and avoid only those things that are in
 the power of thy will; anger is not meet for thee, nor resentment, nor
 envy, nor pity;[3] nor must a girl appear to thee fair, nor must
 reputation, nor a flat cake.[4] For it must be understood that other men
 shelter themselves by walls and houses and by darkness when they do such
 things, and many means of concealment have they. One shutteth the door,
 placeth some one before the chamber; _if any one should come, say, He is
 out, he is busy_. But in place of all these things it behooves the Cynic
 to shelter himself behind his own piety and reverence; but if he doth
 not, he shall be put to shame, naked under the sky. This is his house,
 this his door, this the guards of his chamber, this his darkness. For he
 must not seek to hide aught that he doeth, else he is gone, the Cynic
 hath perished, the man who lived under the open sky, the freeman. He
 hath begun to fear something from without, he hath begun to need
 concealment; nor can he find it when he would, for where shall he hide
 himself, and how? And if by chance this tutor, this public teacher,
 should be found in guilt, what things must he not suffer! And fearing
 these things, can he yet take heart with his whole soul to guide the
 rest of mankind? That can he never: it is impossible!
 
 4. First, then, thou must purify thy ruling faculty and this vocation
 of thine also, saying: Now it is my mind I must shape, as the carpenter
 shapes wood and the shoemaker leather; and the thing to be formed is a
 right use of appearances. But nothing to me is the body, and nothing to
 me the parts of it. _Death?_ Let it come when it will, either death of
 the whole or of a part. _Flee it!_ And whither? Can any man cast me out
 of the universe? He cannot; but whithersoever I may go there will be the
 sun, and the moon, and there the stars, and visions, and omens, and
 communion with the Gods.[5]
 
 5. And, furthermore, when he hath thus fashioned himself, he will not be
 content with these things, who is a Cynic indeed. But know that he is an
 herald from God to men, declaring to them the truth about good and evil
 things; that they have erred, and are seeking the reality of good and
 evil where it is not; and where it is, they do not consider; and he is a
 spy, like Diogenes, when he was led captive to Philip after the battle
 of Chronea.[6] For the Cynic is, in truth, a spy of the things that are
 friendly to men, and that are hostile; and having closely spied out all,
 he must come back and declare the truth. And he must neither be stricken
 with terror and report of enemies where none are; nor be in any
 otherwise confounded or troubled by the appearances.
 
 6. He must then be able, if so it chance, to go up impassioned, as on
 the tragic stage, and speak that word of Socrates, O men, whither are
 ye borne away? What do ye? Miserable as ye are! like blind men ye wander
 up and down. Ye have left the true road, and are going by a false; ye
 are seeking peace and happiness where they are not, and if another shall
 show you where they are, ye believe him not. Wherefore will ye seek it
 in outward things? _In the body?_ It is not thereand if ye believe me
 not, lo, Myro! lo, Ophellius.[7] _In possessions?_ It is not there, and
 if ye believe me not, lo, Crsus! lo, the wealthy of our own day, how
 full of mourning is their life! _In authority?_ It is not there, else
 should those be happy who have been twice or thrice consul; yet they are
 not. Whom shall we believe in this matter? You, who look but on these
 men from without, and are dazzled by the appearance, or the men
 themselves? And what say they? Hearken to them when they lament, when
 they groan, when by reason of those consulships, and their glory and
 renown, they hold their state the more full of misery and danger! _In
 royalty?_ It is not there; else were Nero happy and Sardanapalus; but
 not Agamemnon himself was happy, more splendid though he was than Nero
 or Sardanapalus; but while the rest are snoring what is he doing?
 
   He tore his rooted hair by handfuls out._Il._ x.
 
 And what saith himself? I am distraught, he saith, and I am in
 anguish; my heart leaps forth from my bosom.[_Il._ x.] Miserable man!
 which of thy concerns hath gone wrong with thee? Thy wealth? Nay. Thy
 body? Nay; but thou art rich in gold and bronze. What ails thee then?
 That part, whatever it be, with which we pursue, with which we avoid,
 with which we desire and dislike, thou hast neglected and corrupted. How
 hath it been neglected? He hath been ignorant of the true Good for which
 it was born, and of the Evil; and of what is his own, and what is alien
 to him. And when it goeth ill with something that is alien to him, he
 saith, _Woe is me, for the Greeks are in peril._ O unhappy mind of thee!
 of all things alone neglected and untended. _They will be slain by the
 Trojans and die!_ And if the Trojans slay them not, will they not still
 die? _Yea, but not all together._ What, then, doth it matter? for if it
 be an evil to die, it is alike evil to die together or to die one by
 one. Shall anything else happen to them than the parting of body and
 soul? _Nothing._ And when the Greeks have perished, is the door closed
 to thee? canst thou not also die? _I can._ Wherefore, then, dost thou
 lament: _Woe is me, a king, and bearing the scepter of Zeus_? There is
 no unfortunate king, as there is no unfortunate God. What, then, art
 thou? In very truth a shepherd; for thou lamentest even as shepherds do
 when a wolf hath snatched away one of the sheep; and sheep are they whom
 thou dost rule. And why art thou come hither? Was thy faculty of pursuit
 in any peril, or of avoidance, or thy desire or aversion? _Nay_, he
 saith, _but my brothers wife was carried away_. Was it not a great gain
 to be rid of an adulterous wife? _Shall we be, then, despised of the
 Trojans?_ Of the Trojan? Of what manner of men? of wise men or fools? If
 of wise men, why do ye make war with them? if of fools, why do ye heed
 them?[8]
 
 7. _In what, then, is the good, seeing that in these things it is not?
 Tell us, thou, my lord missionary and spy!_ It is there where ye deem it
 not, and where ye have no desire to seek it. For did ye desire, ye would
 have found it in yourselves, nor would ye wander to things without, nor
 pursue things alien, as if they were your own concerns. Turn to your own
 selves; understand the natural conceptions which ye possess. What kind
 of thing do ye take the Good to be? Peace? happiness? freedom? Come,
 then, do ye not naturally conceive it as great, as precious, and that
 cannot be harmed? What kind of material, then, will ye take to shape
 peace and freedom withalthat which is enslaved or in that which is
 free? _That which is free._ Have ye the flesh enslaved or free? _We know
 not._ Know ye not that it is the slave of fever, of gout, of ophthalmia,
 of dysentery, of tyranny, and fire, and steel, and everything that is
 mightier than itself? _Yea, it is enslaved._ How, then, can aught that
 is of the body be free? and how can that be great or precious which by
 nature is dead, mere earth or mud?
 
 8. What then? have ye nothing that is free? _It may be nothing._ And who
 can compel you to assent to an appearance that is false? _No man._ And
 who can compel you not to assent to an appearance that is true? _No
 man._ Here, then, ye see that there is in you something that is by
 nature free. But which of you, except he lay hold of some appearance of
 the profitable, or of the becoming, can either pursue or avoid, or
 desire or dislike, or adapt or intend anything? _No man._ In these
 things, too, then, ye have something that is unhindered and free. This,
 miserable men, must ye perfect; this have a care to, in this seek for
 the Good.
 
 9. _And how is it possible that one can live prosperously who hath
 nothing; a naked, homeless, hearthless, beggarly man, without servants,
 without a country?_ Lo, God hath sent you a man to show you in very deed
 that it is possible. Behold me, that I have neither country, nor house,
 nor possessions, nor servants; I sleep on the ground; nor is a wife
 mine, nor children, nor domicile, but only earth and heaven, and a
 single cloak. And what is lacking to me? do ever I grieve? do I fear? am
 I not free? When did any of you see me fail of my pursuit, or meet with
 what I had avoided? When did I blame God or man? When did I accuse any
 man? When did any of you see me of a sullen countenance? How do I meet
 those whom ye fear and marvel at? Do I not treat them as my slaves? Who
 that seeth me, but thinketh he beholdeth his king and his lord?
 
 10. So these are the accents of the Cynic, this his character, this his
 design. Not sobut it is his bag, and his staff, and his great jaws;
 and to devour all that is given to him, or store it up, or to reprove
 out of season every one that he may meet, or to show off his
 shoulder.[9]
 
 11. Dost thou see how thou art about to take in hand so great a matter?
 Take first a mirror, look upon thy shoulders, mark well thy loins and
 thighs. Thou art about to enter thy name for the Olympic games, O man;
 no cold and paltry contest. Nor canst thou then be merely overcome and
 then depart; but first thou must be shamed in the sight of all the
 world; and not alone of the Athenians, or Lacedmonians, or
 Nicopolitans. And then if thou hast too rashly entered upon the contest
 thou must be thrashed, and before being thrashed must suffer thirst and
 scorching heat, and swallow much dust.
 
 12. Consider more closely, know thyself, question thy genius,[10]
 attempt nothing without God; who, if He counsel thee, be sure that He
 wills thee either to be great or to be greatly plagued. For this very
 agreeable circumstance is linked with the calling of a Cynic; he must be
 flogged like an ass, and, being flogged, must love those who flog him,
 as though he were the father or brother of all mankind. Not so, but if
 one shall flog thee, stand in the midst and shriek out, _O Csar, what
 things do I suffer in the Emperors peace! Let us take him before the
 pro-consul._ But what is Csar to the Cynic? or what is a pro-consul? or
 what is any other than He that hath sent him hither, and whom he
 serveth, which is Zeus? Doth he call upon any other than God? Is he not
 persuaded, whatsoever things he may suffer, that he is being trained and
 exercised by God? Hercules, when he was exercised by Eurystheus, never
 deemed himself wretched; but fulfilled courageously all that was laid
 upon him. But he who shall cry out and bear it hard when he is being
 trained and exercised by Zeus, is he worthy to bear the scepter of
 Diogenes? Hear what Diogenes saith, when ill of a fever, to the
 bystanders: _Base souls, will ye not remain? To see the overthrow and
 combat of athletes, how great a way ye journey to Olympia; and have ye
 no will to see a combat between a fever and a man?_ And will such an one
 presently accuse God who hath sent him, as having used him illhe who
 was glorying in his lot, and held himself worthy to be a spectacle to
 the bystanders? For of what shall he accuse Him: that his life is
 seemly, that he manifests Gods will, that he showeth forth his virtue
 more brightly? Come, then; and what saith he about death, about pain?
 How did he compare his own happiness with that of the Great King? nay,
 he thought rather that there was no comparison. For where there are
 confusions, and griefs, and fears, and unattained pursuits, and
 avoidance in vain, and envy and rivalry, can the way to happiness lie
 there? But where rotten opinions are there must of necessity be all
 these things.
 
 13. And the young man having asked whether one that hath fallen ill
 shall obey, if a friend desire that he will go home with him and be
 tended: Where, he said, will you show me the friend of a Cynic? For he
 himself must be even such another, so as to be worthy to be reckoned his
 friend. A sharer in the scepter and the royalty must he be, and a worthy
 servant, if he will be worthy of his friendship, as Diogenes was of
 Antisthenes and Crates of Diogenes. Or seems it so to thee that
 whosoever shall come to him and bid him hail is his friend? and that he
 will think him worthy that a Cynic shall go to his house? Thus if it
 please thee to be a Cynic, bethink thee rather of such a thing as this,
 and cast about for a dainty dungheap whereon to have thy fever; and see
 that it look away from the north, so that thou be not chilled. But thou
 seemest to me to wish to retreat into somebodys house and spend thy
 time there, and be fed. What hast thou to do with undertaking so great a
 matter?
 
 14. _But marriage_, said he, _and the begetting of children,are these
 to be received by the Cynic among his chief purposes?_
 
 Give me, said Epictetus, a city of wise men, and perhaps no one will
 easily come to the Cynic way: for whose sake should he embrace it?
 However, if we do suppose such a thing, there is nothing to hinder his
 marrying and begetting children; for his wife will be even such another,
 and his father-in-law such another, and thus will his children be
 brought up. But things being as they now are, as it were in order of
 battle, must not the Cynic be given wholly and undistracted to the
 service of God, being able to go about among men, and not bound to
 private duties, nor entangled in ties which, if he transgress, he can no
 longer preserve the aspect of honesty and goodness; and if he obey them,
 he hath lost that of the missionary, the spy, the herald of the Gods?
 For see! he must needs observe a certain conduct towards his
 father-in-law, and he hath somewhat to render also to the rest of his
 wifes kin and to his wife herself. And for the rest, he is shut off
 from Cynicism by the care for sickness, or means of livelihood. For one
 thing alone, he must have a vessel for warming water for his little
 child, where he may wash it in the bath; and wool for his wife when she
 has been delivered, and oil, and a couch, and a drinking cupalready a
 number of utensilsand other affairs and distractions. Where shall I
 thenceforth find that king, whose business is the common weal?
 
   Warden of men, and with so many cares.
                                 _Il._ ii. 25.
 
 on whom it lies to oversee all men, the married, and parents, and who
 useth his wife well, and who ill, and who wrangles, and what household
 is well-ordered, and what not; going about as a physician, and feeling
 pulsesthou hast a fever, thou a headache, thou the gout; do thou
 fast, do thou eat, do thou avoid the bath, thou needest the knife, thou
 the cautery? Where is the place for leisure to one who is bound to
 private duties? Must he not provide raiment for his children? yea, and
 send them to the schoolmaster with their tablets and writing
 instruments? and have a bed ready for them, since a man cannot be a
 Cynic from the womb? Else were it better to cast them away at once than
 kill them in this way. See, now, to what we have brought our Cynichow
 we have taken away his kingship from him! _True, but Crates married._
 Thou speakest of a circumstance that arose from love, and adducest a
 wife who was another Crates.[11] But our inquiry is concerning common
 marriages, and how men may be undistracted; and thus inquiring, we do
 not find it, in this condition of the world, a purpose of chief concern
 for a Cynic.
 
 15. _How, then_, said he, _shall he still be preserving the community?_
 God help thee! Whether do they best serve mankind who fill their own
 place by bringing into the world two or three screaming children, or
 those who, as far they may, oversee all men, what they do, how they
 live, wherewith they concern themselves, and what duties they neglect?
 And were the Thebans more benefited by as many as left their little
 children behind, or by Epaminondas, who died childless? And did Priam,
 who begat fifty good-for-nothing sons, or Danaus, or olus,[12] better
 serve the community than Homer? Shall, then, the command of an army or
 the writing of poems withdraw a man from marriage and fatherhood, and he
 shall not be thought to have gained nothing for his childlessness, but
 the kingship of a Cynic shall be not worth what it costs? It may be we
 do not perceive his greatness, nor do we worthily conceive of the
 character of Diogenes; but we turn away our eyes to the present Cynics,
 watch-dogs of the dining-room,[13] who in nothing resemble those
 others, save perchance in breaking wind; but in no other thing. For
 else these things would not have moved us, nor should we have marveled
 if a Cynic will not marry nor beget children. Man! he hath begotten all
 mankind, he hath all men for his sons, all women for his daughters; so
 doth he visit all and care for all. Thinkest thou that he is a mere
 meddler and busybody in rebuking those whom he meets? As a father he
 doth it, as a brother, and as servant of the Universal Father, which is
 God.
 
 16. If it please thee, ask of me also whether he shall have to do with
 affairs of public polity? Fool! dost thou seek a greater polity than
 that in whose affairs he is already concerned? Will it be greater if he
 come forward among the Athenians to say something about ways or
 meanshe, whose part it is to discourse with all men, Athenians,
 Corinthians, Romans alike, not concerning means or ways, nor concerning
 peace or war, but about happiness and unhappiness, about good-fortune
 and ill-fortune, about slavery and freedom? And of a man that hath his
 part in so great a polity will you ask me if he shall attend to public
 affairs? Ask me also if he shall be a ruler; and again I shall say, Thou
 fool, what rule can be greater than his?
 
 17. And to such a man there is need also of a certain kind of body. For
 if he shall appear consumptive, meager, and pale, his witness hath not
 the same emphasis. Not only by showing forth the things of the spirit
 must he convince foolish men that it is possible, without the things
 that are admired of them, to be good and wise, but also in his body must
 he show that plain and simple and open-air living are not mischievous
 even to the body: Behold, even of this I am a witness, I and my body.
 So Diogenes was wont to do, for he went about radiant with health, and
 with his very body he turned many to good. But a Cynic that men pity
 seems to be a beggarall men turn away from him, all stumble at him.
 For he must not appear squalid; so that neither in this respect shall he
 scare men away; but his very austerity should be cleanly and pleasing.
 
 18. Much grace of body, then, must belong to the Cynic, and also
 quickness of mind, else he is a mere clot of slime and nothing else; for
 he must be ready and apt to meet all that may befall him. Thus when one
 said to Diogenes: _Thou art that Diogenes who thinkest there are no
 Gods_, he replied, _And how may that be, seeing I hold thee hateful to
 the Gods?_ And again, when Alexander stood beside him, as he was lying
 asleep, and said:
 
   Not all night must a man of counsel sleep,
 
 he answered, ere he was yet awake:
 
   Warden of men, and with so many cares.[14]
 
 19. But before all things must his ruling faculty be purer than the sun,
 else he must needs be a gambler and cheater, who, being himself
 entangled in some iniquity, will reprove others. For, see how the matter
 stands: to these kings and tyrants, their spearmen and their arms give
 the office of reproving men, and the power to punish transgressors, yea,
 though they themselves be evil; but to the Cynic, instead of arms and
 spearmen, his conscience giveth this power. When he knows that he has
 watched and labored for men, and lain down to sleep in purity, and sleep
 hath left him yet purer; and that his thoughts have been the thoughts of
 one dear to the Gods, of a servant, and a sharer in the rule of Zeus;
 and he hath had ever at hand that
 
   Lead me, O Zeus, and thou Destiny,[15]
 
 and,
 
   If thus it be pleasing to the Gods, so may it be
 
 wherefore, then, shall he not take heart to speak boldly to his
 brothers, to his children, in a word, to all his kin? For this reason,
 he that is in this state is no meddler or busybody, for when he
 overlooks human affairs he meddles not with foreign matters, but with
 his own affairs. Else, name the general a busybody when he overlooks his
 soldiers, and reviews them, and watches them, and punishes the
 disorderly. But if you have a flat cake under your cloak while you
 reprove others, I say, get hence rather into a corner, and eat what thou
 hast stolenwhat are other mens concerns to thee? For what art
 thouthe bull of the herd? or the queen bee? Show me the tokens of thy
 supremacy, such as nature hath given her. But if thou art a drone
 claiming sovereignty over the bees, thinkest thou not that thy
 fellow-citizens will overthrow thee, as bees do the drones?
 
 20. And truly the Cynic must be so long-suffering as that he shall seem
 to the multitude insensate and a stone. Him doth none revile, nor smite,
 nor insult; but his body hath he given to any man to use at will. For he
 remembers that the worse must needs be vanquished by the better,
 whereinsoever it is the worse; and the body is worse than the
 multitudethe weaker than the stronger. Never, then, doth he go down to
 any contest where it is possible for him to be vanquished, but he yields
 up all that is not his own, and contends for nothing that is subject to
 others. But where there is question of the will and the use of
 appearances, then you shall see how many eyes he hath, so that you may
 say that compared with him Argus was blind. Is his assent ever hasty; or
 his desire idle; or his pursuit in vain; or his avoidance unsuccessful;
 or his aim unfulfilled? doth he ever blame, or cringe, or envy? This is
 his great study and his design; but as regards all other things, he lies
 on his back and snores, for all is peace. There is no thief of his will,
 nor tyrant; but of his body? yea; and of his chattels? yea, and also of
 his authority and his honors. What, then, are these things to him? So
 when one may seek to make him afraid on account of them_Go hence_, he
 saith to him, _and find out little children; it is to these that masks
 are dreadful, but I know they are made of clay, and that inside them
 there is nothing._
 
 21. On such a matter art thou now meditating. Therefore, if it please
 thee, in Gods name delay it yet awhile, and see first what ability thou
 hast for it. For mark what Hector speaks to Andromache: _Go_, he saith,
 _rather into the house and weave_
 
                       For wars the care
   Of every man, and more than all of me.
                                 _Il._ vi. 490.
 
 Thus he knew where lay his own ability and her incapacity.
 
 
 END OF BOOK I.
 
 
 
 
 _BOOK II._
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 ON GENUINE AND BORROWED BELIEFS.
 
 
 1. The master-argument seems to start from propositions such as
 these:[1] There being a mutual contradiction among these three
 propositions(1) Every past event is necessarily true, and (2) An
 impossibility cannot follow a possibility, and (3) Things are possible
 which neither are nor will be true, Diodorus, perceiving this
 contradiction, made use of the force of the first two in order to prove
 that nothing is possible which neither is nor will be true. And, again,
 one will hold these two, (3) that a thing is possible which neither is
 nor will be true, and (2) that an impossibility cannot follow from a
 possibility; but by no means that every past thing is necessarily true,
 and thus those of the school of Cleanthes appear to think, whom
 Antipater strongly defended. But some hold the other two, (3) that a
 thing is possible that neither is nor will be true, and (1) that every
 past event is necessarily true; but maintain that an impossibility may
 follow from a possibility. But all three it is impossible to hold at
 once, because of their mutual contradiction.
 
 2. Now, if any one inquire of me, _And which of these dost thou hold?_
 I shall answer him that I do not know, but I have received this account,
 that Diodorus holds certain of them, and I think the followers of
 Panthoides and Cleanthes certain others, and those of Chrysippus yet
 others. _And thyself?_ Nay, it is no affair of mine to try my own
 thoughts, and to compare and estimate statements, and to form some
 opinion of my own upon the matter.[2] And thus I differ no whit from the
 grammarians. Who was Hectors father? _Priam._ And his brothers?
 _Alexander and Deiphobus._ And their mother, who was she? _Hecuba. That
 is the account I have received._ From whom? _From Homer; and I think
 Hellanicus has written of them, and maybe others too._ And I; what
 better have I to say about the master-argument? But if I am a vain man,
 and especially at a banquet, I shall amaze all the company by recounting
 those who have written on it;for Chrysippus wrote on it wonderfully in
 his first book On Possibilities; and Cleanthes wrote a separate
 treatise on it, and so did Archedemus. And Antipater wrote too, not only
 in his book On Possibilities, but also separately in those on the
 master-argument. Have you not read the work? No! Then read it. And what
 good will it do him to read it? He will become yet more of a babbler and
 a nuisance than he is now, for what else hath the reading of it done for
 you? What opinion have you formed for yourself on the matter? Nay, but
 you will tell us all about Helen, and Priam, and the island of Calypso,
 that never existed, nor ever will.
 
 3. And in Homer, indeed, it is no great matter if you have simply
 mastered the account, and formed no opinion of your own. But in ethics
 this is even much more often the case than in other matters. Tell me
 concerning good and evil things! Listen to him, then, with his
 
   Me to Ciconia brought the wind from Troy.
                                  _Od._ ix, 39.
 
 _Of things some are good, some evil, and some indifferent. Now the good
 things are the virtues, and those that have the nature of virtue, and
 the evil things the vices, and those that have the nature of vice; and
 the indifferent things are between these, as wealth, health, life,
 death, pleasure, affliction._ And how do you know this? Because
 Hellanicus affirms it in his history of the Egyptians; for as well say
 this as that Diogenes has it in his Ethics, or Chrysippus, or Cleanthes.
 But have you tested any of their sayings, and formed an opinion for
 yourself? Show me how you are wont to bear a storm at sea. Do you
 remember the difference between good and evil when the sail clatters,
 and some vexatious man comes to you as you are shrieking, and says
 
 Tell me, by the Gods, what you were lately saying, Is it any vice
 to be shipwrecked? Hath it anything of the nature of vice?
 
 Would you not lay hold of a stick and shake it in his face: _Let us
 alone, man; we are perishing, and you come to mock us!_ And do you
 remember the difference if you are accused of something and Csar sends
 for you? If one should come to you when you enter, pale and trembling,
 and should say, Why do you tremble, man? what is your business
 concerned with? Doth Csar there within dispense virtue and vice to
 those who go in to him? _Why_, you will say; _must you too mock me in my
 calamities?_
 
 Nevertheless, tell me, O Philosopher, why you trembleis it not
 merely death that you are in danger of, or imprisonment, or bodily
 suffering, or exile, or disgrace? What else? Is it any vice? or anything
 of the nature of vice?
 
 And you will reply somewhat to this effect: _Let me alone, man; my own
 evils are enough for me._
 
 And truly you say well, for your own evils are enough for you; which are
 meanness, cowardice, and your false pretenses when you sat in the school
 of philosophy. Why did you deck yourself in others glory? Why did you
 call yourself a Stoic?
 
 4. Watch yourselves thus in the things that ye do, and ye shall see of
 what school ye are. And the most of you will be found Epicureans, but
 some few Peripatetics,[4] and those but slack. For where is the proof
 that ye hold virtue equal to all other things, or indeed superior? Show
 me a Stoic, if ye have one. Where or how can ye? But persons that repeat
 the phrases of Stoicism, of these ye can show us any number. And do they
 repeat those of the Epicureans any worse? and are they not equally
 accurate in the Peripatetic? Who is, then, a Stoic? As we say that a
 statue is Pheidian which is wrought according to the art of Pheidias,
 show me a man that is wrought according to the opinions he utters! Show
 me one that is sick and yet prosperous, in peril and prosperous, dying
 and prosperous, in exile and prosperous, in evil repute and prosperous.
 Show him to me! by the Gods! fain would I see a Stoic! And have ye none
 that is fully wrought out; then show me at least one that is in hand to
 be wroughtone that even leaneth towards these things. Do me this
 favorgrudge not an old man a sight that I have never seen yet. Think
 ye that I would have you show me the Zeus of Pheidias or the Athenea
 work all ivory and gold? Nay; but let one show me a mans soul that
 longs to be like-minded with God, and to blame neither Gods nor men, and
 not to fail in any effort or avoidance, and not to be wrathful nor
 envious, nor jealous, butfor why should I make rounds to say it?that
 desires to become a God from a man, and in this body of ours, this
 corpse, is mindful of his fellowship with Zeus. Show me that man. But ye
 cannot! Why, then, will ye mock yourselves and cheat others? Why wrap
 yourselves in others garb, and go about, like thieves that steal
 clothes from the bath, with names and things that in nowise belong to
 you?
 
 5. And now I am your teacher and ye are being taught by me. And I have
 this aimto perfect you, that ye be unhindered, uncompelled,
 unembarrassed, free, prosperous, happy, looking unto God alone in all
 things great and small. And ye are here to learn these things, and to do
 them. And wherefore do ye not finish the work, if ye have indeed such an
 aim as behooves you, and if I, besides the aim, have such ability as
 behooves me? What is here lacking? When I see a carpenter, and the wood
 lying beside him, I look for some work. And now, here is the carpenter,
 here is the woodwhat is yet lacking? Is the thing such as cannot be
 taught? It can. Is it, then, not in our power? Yea, this alone of all
 things is. Wealth is not in our power, nor health, nor repute, nor any
 other thing, save only the right use of appearances. This alone is by
 nature unhindered; this alone is unembarrassed. Wherefore, then, will ye
 not make an end? Tell me the reason. For either the fault lies in me, or
 in you, or in the nature of the thing. But the thing itself is possible,
 and indeed the only thing that is in our power. It remains that I am to
 blame, or else ye are; or, to speak more truly, both of us. What will
 ye, then? Let us at length begin to entertain such a purpose among us,
 and let the past be past. Only let us make a beginning: trust in me, and
 ye shall see.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 THE GAME OF LIFE.
 
 
 1. This above all is the task of Natureto bind and harmonize together
 the force of the appearances of the Right and of the Useful.
 
 2. Things are indifferent, but the uses of them are not indifferent.
 How, then, shall one preserve at once both a steadfast and tranquil
 mind, and also carefulness of things, that he be not heedless or
 slovenly? If he take the example of dice players. The numbers are
 indifferent, the dice are indifferent. How can I tell what may be thrown
 up? But carefully and skillfully to make use of what is thrown, that is
 where my proper business begins. And this is the great task of life
 also, to discern things and divide them, and say, Outward things are
 not in my power; to will is in my power. Where shall I seek the Good,
 and where the Evil? Within mein all that is my own. But of all that
 is alien to thee call nothing good nor evil, nor profitable nor hurtful,
 nor any such term as these.
 
 3. What then? should we be careless of such things? In no wise. For
 this, again, is a vice in the Will, and thus contrary to Nature. But be
 at once careful, because the use of things is not indifferent, and
 steadfast and tranquil because the things themselves are. For where
 there is aught that concerns me, there none can hinder or compel me; and
 in those things where I am hindered or compelled the attainment is not
 in my power, and is neither good nor evil; but my use of the event is
 either evil or good, and this is in my power. And hard it is, indeed, to
 mingle and reconcile together the carefulness of one whom outward things
 affect, with the steadfastness of him who regards them not. But
 impossible, it is not; and if it is, it is impossible to be happy.
 
 4. Give me one man that cares how he shall do anythingthat thinks not
 of the gaining of the thing, but thinks of his own energy.
 
 5. Chrysippus, therefore, said wellAs long as future things are
 hidden from me, I hold always by whatever state is the most favorable
 for gaining the things that are according to Nature; for God Himself
 gave it to me to make such choice. But if I knew that it were now
 ordained for me to be sick, I would even move to it of myself. For the
 foot, too, if it had intelligence, would move of itself to be mired.
 
 6. For to what end, think you, are ears of corn produced? Is it not
 that they may become dry and parched? And the reason they are parched,
 is it not that they may be reaped? for it is not to exist for themselves
 alone that they come into the world. If, then, they had perception would
 it be proper for them to pray that they should never be reaped? since
 never to be reaped is for ears of corn a curse. So understand that for
 men it is a curse not to die, just as not to be ripened and not to be
 reaped. But we, since we are both the things to be reaped and are also
 conscious that we shall be reaped, have indignation thereat. For we know
 not what we are, nor have we studied what concerns humanity as those
 that have the care of horses study what concerns them. But Chrysantas,
 when just about to smite the enemy, forbore on hearing the trumpet
 sounding his recall; so much better did it seem to him to obey the
 commanders order than to do his own will. But of us not one will follow
 with docility the summons even of necessity, but weeping and groaning
 the things that we suffer, we suffer, calling them our doom.[1] What
 doom, man? If by doom you mean that which is doomed to happen to us,
 then we are doomed in all things. But if only our afflictions are to be
 called doom, then what affliction is it that that which has come into
 being should perish? But we perish by the sword, or the wheel, or the
 sea, or the tile of a roof, or a tyrant. What matters it by what road
 thou goest down into Hades? they are all equal. But if thou wilt hear
 the truth, the way the tyrant sends thee is the shortest. Never did a
 tyrant cut a mans throat in six months, but a fever will often be a
 year killing him. All these things are but noise, and a clatter of empty
 names.
 
 7. But let us do as in setting out on a voyage. What is it possible for
 me to do? Thisto choose the captain, crew, the day, the opportunity.
 Then a tempest has burst upon us; but what doth it concern me? I have
 left nothing undone that was mine to do; the problem is now anothers,
 to wit, the captains. But now the ship is sinking! and what have I to
 do? I do only what I am abledrown without terror and screaming and
 accusing of God, but knowing that that which has come into being must
 also perish. For I am no Immortal, but a man, a part of the sum of
 things as an hour is of the day. Like the hour, I must arrive, and, like
 the hour, pass away. What, then, can it matter to me how I pass
 awaywhether by drowning or by a fever? for pass I must, even by some
 such thing. Now, this is what you shall see done by skillful
 ball-players. None careth for the ball as it were a thing good or bad;
 but only about throwing it and catching it. In this, then, there is
 rule, in this art, quickness, judgment: so that I may fail of catching
 the ball, even if I spread out my lap, and another, if I throw it, may
 catch it. But if I am anxious and nervous as I catch and throw, what
 kind of play is this? how shall one be steady? how shall he observe the
 order of the game? One will call Throw, Do not throw, and another,
 You have thrown once. But this is strife and not play.
 
 8. Thus Socrates knew how to play ball. How? When he jested in the
 court of justice. Tell me, Anytus, he said, how say you that I
 believe there is no God? The Dmons, who are they, think you? Are they
 not sons of God, or a mixed nature between Gods and men? And when this
 was admittedWho, do you think, can hold that mules exist, but not
 asses?[2] And thus he played with the ball. And what was the ball that
 was there thrown about among them? Life, chains, exile, a draught of
 poison, to be torn from a wife, to leave children orphans. These were
 the things among them that they played withal; yet none the less did he
 play, and flung the ball with proper grace and measure. And so should we
 do also, having the carefulness of the most zealous players, and yet
 indifference, as were it merely about a ball.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 THINGS ARE WHAT THEY ARE.
 
 
 1. Each thing that allures the mind or offers an advantage or is loved
 by you, remember to speak of it as it is, from the smallest things
 upward. If you love an earthen jar, then think, _I love an earthen jar_,
 for so shall you not be troubled when it breaks. And when you kiss your
 little child, or wife, think, _I kiss a mortal_; and so shall you not be
 troubled when they die.
 
 2. When you are about to take in hand some action, bethink you what it
 is that you are about to do. If you go to the bath, represent to
 yourself all that takes place therethe squirting of water, the
 slapping, the scolding, the pilfering; and then shall you take the
 matter in hand more safely, saying straightway: _I desire to be bathed,
 and maintain my purpose according to Nature._ And even so with each and
 every action. For thus, if aught should occur to cross you in your
 bathing, this thought shall be straightway at hand: _But not this alone
 did I desire; but also to maintain my purpose according to Nature.
 And I shall not maintain it if I have indignation at what happens here._
 
 3. The first difference between the vulgar man[1] and the philosopher:
 The one saith, _Woe is me for my child, my brother, woe for my father_;
 but the other, if ever he shall be compelled to say, _Woe is me_, checks
 himself, and saith, _for myself_. For nothing that the Will willeth not
 can hinder or hurt the Will, but itself only can hurt itself. If then,
 indeed, we too incline to this, that when we are afflicted we accuse
 ourselves, and recollect that nothing else than Opinion can cause us any
 trouble or unsettlement, I swear by all the Gods we have advanced! But
 as it is, we have from the beginning traveled a different road. While we
 are still children, if haply we stumbled as we were gaping about, the
 nurse did not chide us, but beat the stone. For what had the stone done?
 Ought it to have moved out of the way for your childs folly? Again, if
 we find nothing to eat after coming from the bath, never doth the tutor
 check our desire, but he beats the cook. Man, we did not set thee to be
 a tutor of the cook, but of our childhim shall you train, him improve.
 And thus, even when full-grown, we appear as children. For a child in
 music is he who hath not learned music, and in letters, one who hath not
 learned letters, and in life, one undisciplined in philosophy.
 
 4. It is not things, but the opinions about the things, that trouble
 mankind. Thus Death is nothing terrible; if it were so, it would have
 appeared so to Socrates. But the opinion we have about Death, that it is
 terrible, _that_ it is wherein the terror lieth. When, therefore, we are
 hindered or troubled or grieved, never let us blame any other than
 ourselves; that is to say, our opinions. A man undisciplined in
 philosophy blames others in matters in which he fares ill; one who
 begins to be disciplined blames himself, one who is disciplined, neither
 others nor himself.
 
 5. Be not elated in mind at any superiority that is not of yourself. If
 your horse were elated and should say, _I am beautiful_, that would be
 tolerable. But when you are elated and say, _I have a beautiful horse_,
 know that it is at an excellence in your horse that you are elated.
 What, then, is your own? Thisto make use of the appearances. So that
 when you deal according to Nature in the use of appearances, then shall
 you be elated, for you will then be elated at an excellence that is your
 own.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 THREE STEPS TO PERFECTION.
 
 
 1. There are three divisions of Philosophy wherein a man must exercise
 himself who would be wise and good.[1]
 
 The first concerns his pursuit and avoidance, so that he may not fail of
 aught that he would attain, nor fall into aught that he would avoid.
 
 The second concerns his desires and aversions, and, generally, all that
 it becomes a man to be, so that he bear himself orderly and prudently
 and not heedlessly.
 
 The third is that which concerns security from delusion and hasty
 apprehension, and, generally, the assenting to appearances.
 
 Of these the chief and most urgent is that which hath to do with the
 passions,[2] for the passions arise in no other way than by our failing
 in endeavor to attain or to avoid something. This it is which brings in
 troubles and tumults and ill-luck and misfortune, that is the cause of
 griefs and lamentations and envies, that makes envious and jealous men;
 by which things we become unable even to hear the doctrines of reason.
 
 The second concerns that which is becoming to a man; for I must not be
 passionless,[3] like a statue, but maintain all relations natural and
 acquired, as a religious being, as a son, as a brother, as a father, as
 a citizen.
 
 The third is that which concerns men as soon as they are making advance
 in philosophy, which provides for the security of the two others; so
 that not even in dreams may any appearance that approacheth us pass
 untested, nor in wine, nor in ill-humors. This, a man may say, is beyond
 us. But the philosophers of this day, passing by the first and second
 parts of philosophy, occupy themselves in the third, caviling, and
 arguing by questions, and constructing hypotheses and fallacies. For,
 they say, when dealing with these subjects a man must guard himself from
 delusion. Who must? The wise and good man.
 
 2. And this security is all you lack, then; the rest you have wrought
 out already? You are not to be imposed upon by money? and if you see a
 fair girl you can hold out against the appearance? and if your neighbor
 inherits a legacy you are not envious? there is now, in short, nothing
 lacking to you except to confirm what you have? Wretch! these very
 things dost thou hear in fear and anxiety lest some one may despise
 thee, and inquiring what men say about thee. And if some one come and
 tell you that when it was discussed who was the best of the
 philosophers, one present said, _Such a one is the greatest
 philosopher_, your little soul will grow up from a fingers breadth to
 two cubits. And if another who was present said, _Nothing of the kind;
 it is not worth while to listen to him; for what does he know? he has
 made a beginning in philosophy and no more_, you are amazed, you grow
 pale, and straightway you cry out, _I will show him who I am, that I am
 a great philosopher_.
 
 Out of these very things it is seen what you are; why do you desire to
 show it by any others?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 THAT A MAN MAY BE BOTH BOLD AND FEARFUL.
 
 
 1. To some it may perchance seem a paradox, this axiom of the
 philosophers; yet let us make the best inquiry we can if it be true that
 it is possible to do all things at once with fearfulness and with
 boldness. For fearfulness seemeth in a manner contrary to boldness, and
 contraries can never co-exist. But that which to many seemeth a paradox
 in this matter seems to me to stand somehow thus: If we affirmed that
 both fearfulness and boldness could be used in the very same things,
 they would justly accuse us that we were reconciling what is
 irreconcilable. But now, what is there so strange in this saying? For if
 it is sound, what hath been so often both affirmed and demonstrated,
 that the essence of the Good is in the use of appearances, and even so
 of the Evil, and things uncontrollable by the Will have the nature
 neither of good nor of evil, what paradox do the philosophers affirm if
 they say that in things uncontrollable by the Will, then be boldness thy
 part, and in things subject to the Will, fearfulness. For if Evil lie in
 an evil Will, then in these things alone is it right to use fearfulness.
 And if things uncontrollable by the Will, and that are not in our power,
 are nothing to us, then in these things we should use boldness. And thus
 shall we be at one time both fearful and boldyea, and bold even
 through our fearfulness. For through being fearful in things that are
 veritably evil it comes that we shall be bold in those that are not so.
 
 2. But we, on the contrary, fall victims as deer do. When these are
 terrified and fly from the scares, whither do they turn and to what do
 they retreat as a refuge? To the nets: and thus they perish, confusing
 things to fear and things to be bold about. And thus do we also. Where
 do we employ fear? In things beyond our Will. And wherein do we act
 boldly, as were there nothing to dread? In things subject to the Will.
 To be beguiled, then, or to be rash, or to do some shameless act, or
 with base greed to pursue some objectthese things concern us no whit
 if we may only hit the mark in things beyond the Will. But where death
 is, or exile, or suffering, or evil repute, there we run away, there we
 are scared. Therefore, as it were to be looked for in those who are
 astray in the things of greatest moment, we work out our natural
 boldness into swaggering, abandonment, rashness, shamelessness; and our
 natural fearfulness and shamefastness into cowardice and meanness, full
 of terror and trouble. For if one should transfer his fearfulness to the
 realm of the Will, and the works thereof, straightway, together with the
 intention of fearing to do wrong, he shall have it in his power to avoid
 doing it; but if he use it in things out of our own power and beyond the
 Will, then striving to avoid things that are in others power, he shall
 of necessity be terrified and unsettled and troubled. For death is not
 fearful, nor pain, but the fear of pain or death. And thus we praise
 him[1] who said:
 
    Fear not to die, but fear a cowards death.
 
 3. It is right, then, that we should turn our boldness against death,
 and our fearfulness against the fear of death. But now we do the
 contrary: death we flee from, but as to the state of our opinion about
 death we are negligent, heedless, indifferent. These things Socrates did
 well to call bugbears. For as to children, through their inexperience,
 ugly masks appear terrible and fearful; so we are somewhat in the same
 way moved towards the affairs of life, for no other cause than as
 children are affected by these bugbears. For what is a child? Ignorance.
 What is a child? That which has never learned. For when he knows these
 things he is nowise inferior to us. What is death? A bugbear. Turn it
 round; examine it: see, it does not bite. Now or later that which is
 body must be parted from that which is spirit, as formerly it was
 parted. Why, then, hast thou indignation if it be now? for if it be not
 now, it will be later. And wherefore? That the cycle of the world may be
 fulfilled; for it hath need of a present and of a future and of a past.
 What is pain? A bugbear. Turn it about and examine it. This poor body is
 moved harshly, then again softly. If thou hast no advantage thereof, the
 door is open;[2] if thou hast, then bear it. For in all events it is
 right that the door should stand open, and so have we no distress.
 
 4. Shall I, then, exist no longer? Nay, thou shalt exist, but as
 something else, whereof the universe hath now need.[3] For neither didst
 thou choose thine own time to come into existence, but when the universe
 had need of thee.
 
 5. What, then, is the fruit of these opinions? That which ought to be
 the fairest and comeliest to those who have been truly
 taught,tranquillity, courage, and freedom. For concerning these
 things, the multitude are not to be believed which say that those only
 should be taught who are freemen, but the philosophers rather, which say
 that those only are free who have been taught. How is this? It is
 thusIs freedom anything else than the power to live as we choose?
 _Nothing else._ Do ye choose, then, to live in sin? _We do not choose
 it._ None, therefore, that fears or grieves or is anxious is free; but
 whosoever is released from griefs and fears and anxieties is by that
 very thing released from slavery. How, then, shall we still believe you,
 most excellent legislators, when ye say, We permit none to be taught,
 save freemen?[4] for the philosophers say, We permit none to be free
 save those who have been taughtthat is, God permits it not. _So, when
 a man turns round his slave before the Prtor,[5] has he done nothing?_
 He has done something. _And what?_ He has turned round his slave before
 the Prtor. _Nothing else at all?_ Yea, this toohe must pay for him
 the tax of the twentieth. _What then? has the man thus treated not
 gained his freedom?_ No more than he has gained tranquillity of mind.
 For thou, who art able to emancipate others, hast thou no master? is
 money not thy master, or lust, or a tyrant, or some friend of a tyrant?
 Why, then, dost thou tremble when thou art to meet with some affliction
 in this kind? And therefore I say oftentimes, be these things your
 study, be these things ever at your hand, wherein ye should be bold and
 wherein fearful; bold in things beyond the Will, fearful in things
 subject to the Will.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.[1]
 
 THE WISE MANS FEAR AND THE FOOLS.
 
 
 1. The appearances by which the mind of man is smitten with the first
 aspect of a thing as it approaches the soul, are not matters of the
 will, nor can we control them; but by a certain force of their own the
 objects which we have to comprehend are borne in upon us. But that
 ratification of them, which we name assent, whereby the appearances are
 comprehended and judged, these are voluntary, and are done by human
 choice. Wherefore at a sound from the heavens, or from the downfall of
 something, or some signal of danger, or anything else of this kind, it
 must needs be that the soul of the philosopher too shall be somewhat
 moved, and he shall shrink and grow pale; not through any opinion of
 evil that he has formed, but through certain rapid and unconsidered
 motions that forestall the office of the mind and reason. Soon, however,
 that philosopher doth not approve the appearances to be truly objects
 of terror to his soul, that is to say, he assents not to them nor
 ratifies them; but he rejects them, and casts them out; nor doth there
 seem to be in them anything that he should fear. But in this, say the
 philosophers, doth the wise man differ from the fool,that the fool
 thinks the appearances to be in truth even so harsh and rough as they
 seemed at their first shock upon the soul; and taking them, as at first,
 to be rightly dreaded, he thus ratifies and approves them by his assent.
 The philosopher, however, though for a short time his color and
 countenance have been changed, doth not then assent, but he retains in
 its steadfastness and vigor the opinion he ever had of these
 appearances, that they are in no wise to be feared, but affright only by
 a false show and empty threat.
 
 2. Such as is a dish of water, such is the soul; such as is the ray of
 light that falleth on the same, such are the appearances. When the water
 is moved, then the ray seemeth also to be moved; but it is not moved.
 And thus when a mans mind is darkened and dizzy, it is not doctrines
 and virtues that are confounded, but the spirit on which they are
 impressed. And if that is restored, so are they.[2]
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 APPEARANCES FALSE AND TRUE.
 
 
 1. Appearances exist for us in four ways. Either things appear even as
 they are; or having no existence, neither do they appear to have it; or
 they exist, and appear not; or they exist not, and yet appear. So, in
 all these cases, to hit the mark is the work of him who hath been taught
 in philosophy.
 
 2. But whatever it be that afflicts us, it is to that thing that the
 remedy is to be applied. If it is the sophisms of the Pyrrhonists and
 Academics[1] that afflict us, to them let us apply the remedy. If it is
 the delusiveness of things, whereby that appeareth to be good which is
 not so, to that let us seek for the remedy. If a habit afflicts us,
 against that must we endeavor to find some remedy. And what remedy is to
 be found against a habit? The contrary habit. Thou hearest the ignorant
 when they say, _The wretched man is dead; his father is perishing with
 grief for him, or his mother; he was cut off, yea, and untimely, and in
 a strange land_. Hearken, then, to the contrary words. Tear thyself away
 from such utterances. Against habit set the contrary habit. Against the
 words of the Sophists have the maxims of philosophers and the exercise
 and constant usage of them; against the delusiveness of things have
 clear natural conceptions ever burnished and ready.
 
 3. Whenever death may appear to be an evil, have ready the thought that
 it is right to avoid evils, and that death is unavoidable. For what
 shall I do? whither shall I flee from it? Let it be granted that I am no
 Sarpedon, son of Zeus, to speak in that lofty style: _I go either to do
 great deeds myself, or to give another the chance of doing them; though
 I myself fail I shall not grudge it to another to do nobly_.[2] Let it
 be granted that this is above us; still can we not at least rise to the
 height of that? And whither shall I flee from death? declare to me the
 place; declare to me the men among whom I shall go, to whom death comes
 never near; declare to me the charms against it. If I have none, what
 would ye have me do? I cannot escape deathshall I not then escape the
 fear of death? shall I die lamenting and trembling? In this is the
 source of suffering, to wish for something, and that it should not come
 to pass; and thence it is that when I am able to alter outward things at
 my desire, I do so, but when not, I am ready to tear out the eyes of him
 that hindereth me. For man is so made by nature that he will not bear to
 be deprived of the Good nor to fall into the Evil. And in the end, when
 I am neither able to alter outward things nor to tear out the eyes of
 him that hindereth me, I sit down and groan and rail on whomsoever I
 can, Zeus and the other Gods;for if they neglect me, what have I to do
 with them? _Yea, but thou wilt be an impious man._ And how shall I be
 worse off than I am now? Here is the whole matter: Remember that unless
 religion and profit meet in the same thing, religion cannot be saved in
 any man. Do not these things mightily convince of their truth?
 
 4. Let the Pyrrhonist and the Academic come and make their attackI,
 for my part, have no leisure for such discussions, nor am I able to
 argue in defense of general consent.[3] For if I had a suit about a
 little piece of land, would I not call in another to argue for me?
 Wherewith shall I be satisfied? With that which concerns the matter in
 hand. How perception takes place, whether by the whole man or by parts,
 perhaps I know not how to declare: both opinions perplex me. But that
 thou and I are not the same I know very clearly. _Whence know you this?_
 Never, when I wish to eat, do I carry the morsel to another mans mouth,
 but to my own. Never, when I wish to take a piece of bread, do I lay
 hold of a broom, but I always go to the bread, as to a mark. And ye who
 deny the truth of perception, what do ye other than I? Which of you,
 desiring to go to the bath, ever went into a mill? _What then? Ought we
 not, according to our abilities, to busy ourselves with the upholding
 of general consent, and raising defenses against all that opposeth the
 same?_ And who denies it? But let him do it that can, that hath leisure;
 but he that trembleth, and is troubled, and his heart is broken within
 him, let him spend his time on something different.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 HOW WE SHOULD THINK AS GODS OFFSPRING.
 
 
 1. If those things are true which are said by philosophers concerning
 the kinship of God and men, what else remains for men to do than after
 Socrates way, who never, when men inquired of him what was his native
 country, replied _Athens_ or _Corinth_, but _the universe_. For why wilt
 thou say thou art an Athenian, and not rather name thyself from that
 nook alone into which thy wretched body was cast at birth? Is it not
 plainly from the lordlier place, and that which contains not only that
 nook and all thy household, but also the whole land whence the race of
 thy ancestors has come down even to thee, that thou callest thyself
 Athenian or Corinthian? Whoso, therefore, hath watched the governance of
 the universe, and hath learned that the greatest and mightiest and
 amplest of all societies is that which is composed of mankind and of
 God; and that from Him have descended the seeds not only to my father
 alone, nor to my grandfather, but to all creatures that are conceived
 and born upon the earth (but especially to reasoning beings, since to
 these alone hath nature given it to have communion and intercourse with
 God, being linked with Him through Reason),wherefore should such a one
 not name himself a citizen of the universe? wherefore not a son of God?
 wherefore shall he fear anything that may come to pass among men? And
 shall kinship with Csar, or with some other of those that are mighty at
 Rome, be enough to let us live in safety and undespised and fearing
 nothing at all; but to have God for our maker and father and guardian,
 shall this not avail to deliver us from griefs and fears?
 
 _But I have no money_, saith one; _whence shall I have bread to eat?_
 
 2. Art thou not ashamed to be more cowardly and spiritless than fugitive
 slaves are? How do they leave their masters when they run away? in what
 estates do they put their trust? in what servants? After stealing a
 little to serve them for the first few days, do they not afterwards
 journey by land and sea, and make their living by one device after
 another? And when did ever any fugitive slave die of hunger? But thou
 tremblest and sleepest not of nights, for fear lest the necessaries of
 life fail thee. Wretched man! art thou thus blind? and seest not the
 road whither the want of necessaries leads a man? And whither leads it?
 To the same place that a fever doth, or a falling rockto death. Hast
 thou not often said this to thy friends? and often read aloud these
 things, and written them? and how often hast thou vaunted thyself that
 thou wert at peace about death? _Yea, but my dear ones shall also suffer
 hunger._ What then? Doth their hunger lead to any other place than
 thine? Do they not descend where thou descendest? Is there not one
 underworld for them and thee? Wilt thou not, then, be bold in all
 poverty and need, looking to that place whither the wealthiest of men,
 and the mightiest governors, yea, and even kings and tyrants, must go
 down; thou, it may be, an-hungered, and they bursting with indigestion
 and drunkenness?
 
 How seldom is it that a beggar is seen that is not an old man, and even
 of exceeding age? but freezing by night and day, and lying on the
 ground, and eating only what is barely necessary, they come near to
 being unable to die. Canst thou not transcribe writings? canst thou not
 teach children? or be some mans door-keeper?
 
 _But it is shameful to come to such a necessity!_
 
 Then first of all learn what things are shameful, and afterwards tell
 us thou art a philosopher. But at present suffer not even another man to
 call thee so.
 
 3. Is that shameful to thee which is not thine own doing, whereof thou
 art not the cause, which cometh to thee without thy will, like a
 headache or a fever? If thy parents were poor, or made others their
 heirs, or are alive and give thee nothing, are these things shameful to
 thee? Is this what thou hast learnt from the philosophers? Hast thou
 never heard that what is shameful is blamable; and that which is
 blamable ought to be blamed? But what man wilt thou blame for a work not
 his own, one that he himself never did! And didst thou make thy father
 such as he is? or was it in thy power to correct him?is it given thee
 to do this? What then? Oughtest thou to desire what is not given to
 thee? or to be ashamed if thou attain it not? Or hast thou been
 accustomed, in philosophy, to look to others, and to hope for nothing
 from thyself? Lament, therefore, and groan, and eat thy bread in fear,
 lest thou have nothing to eat on the morrow. Tremble for thy slaves,
 lest they steal, or run away, or die. Do thou live thus, now and ever,
 who hast approached to the name only of philosophy, and hast brought the
 precepts of it to shame, so far as in thee lies, showing them to be
 worthless and useless to those who adopt them; thou, who hast never
 striven to gain steadfastness, tranquillity, peace; that never waited
 upon any man for the sake of these things, but upon many for the sake of
 learning syllogisms; that never tested for thine own self any one of
 these appearances:_Am I able to bear it, or am I not able? What, then,
 remains for me to do?_ But, as though all went fairly and safely with
 thee, thou abidest in the final part of philosophy,[1] that which
 confirms beyond all changeand wherein wilt thou be confirmed? in
 cowardice, meanness, admiration of wealth, in vain pursuit, and vain
 efforts to avoid? These are the things thou dost meditate how to
 preserve unharmed.
 
 4. Shouldst thou not first have gained something from Reason, and then
 fortified this with safety? Whom sawest thou ever building a coping
 round about, and never a wall on which to place it? And what
 door-keeper is set on guard where there is no door? But thy study is
 how to prove propositionsand _what_ proposition? How the billows of
 false reasonings may sweep thee not awayand away from _what_? Show me
 first what thing thou art guarding, or measuring, or weighing; and
 afterwards the scales or the measuring-rod. Or how long wilt thou still
 be measuring the dust? Are not these the things it behooves thee to
 prove:what it is that makes men happy, what makes things proceed as we
 would have them, how one should blame no man accuse no man, and fit
 ones self to the ordering of the All? Yea, prove me these! _But I do
 so_, he saith. _See! I resolve you syllogisms._ Slave! this is the
 measuring-rodit is not the thing measured. Wherefore now you pay the
 penalty for philosophy neglected; you tremble, you lie awake at nights,
 you seek counsel on every hand, and if the counsels are not pleasing to
 all men you think they were ill-counseled.
 
 5. Then you fear hunger, as you suppose. But it is not hunger that you
 fearyou fear you will have no cook, nor nobody else to buy victuals
 for you, nor another to take off your boots, nor another to put them on,
 nor others to rub you down, nor others to follow you about, so that when
 you have stripped yourself in the bath, and stretched yourself out as if
 you were crucified, you may be rubbed to and fro, and then the rubber
 standing by may say, _Turn him round, give me his side, take hold of his
 head, let me have his shoulder_; and then when you leave the bath and go
 home you may shout, _Is no one bringing anything to eat?_ and then,
 _Take away the plates, and wipe them_. This is what you fear,lest you
 be not able to live like a sick man. But learn how those live that are
 in healthslaves, and laborers, and true philosophers; how Socrates
 lived, who moreover had a wife and children; how Diogenes lived; how
 Cleanthes that studied in the schools and drew his own water.[2] If you
 would have these things, they are everywhere to be had, and you will
 live boldly. Bold in what? In that wherein alone it is possible to be
 boldin that which is faithful, which cannot be hindered, which cannot
 be taken away. But why hast thou made thyself so worthless and useless
 that no one is willing to receive thee into his house or take care of
 thee? But if any utensil were thrown away, and it was sound and
 serviceable, every one that found it would pick it up and think it a
 gain; but thee no man would pick up, nor count anything but damage. So
 thou canst not so much as serve the purpose of a watch-dog, or a cock?
 Why, then, wilt thou still live, being such a man as thou art?
 
 6. Doth any good man fear lest the means of gaining food fail him? They
 fail not the blind, nor the lame; shall they fail a good man? To the
 good soldier there fails not one who gives him pay, nor to the laborer,
 nor to the shoemaker; and shall such a one fail to the good man? Is God,
 then, careless of His instruments, His servants, His witnesses, whom
 alone He useth to show forth to the untaught what He is, and that He
 governs all things well, and is not careless of human things? and that
 to a good man there is no evil, neither in life nor in death? _How,
 then, when He leaves them without food?_ How else is this than as when a
 good general gives me the signal for retreat? I obey, I follow, praising
 my leader and hymning his works. For I came when it pleased him, and
 when it pleases him I will go. In my lifetime also my work was to sing
 the praise of God, both alone to myself, and to single persons, and in
 presence of many. He doth not provide me with many things, nor with
 great abundance of goods; He will not have me live delicately. For
 neither did He provide so for Hercules, His own son, but another man
 reigned over Argos and Mycen, while he obeyed and labored and was
 disciplined. And Eurystheus was what he wasno king of Argos and
 Mycen, who was not king even of himself; and Hercules was lord and
 leader of all the earth and sea, for he purged them of lawlessness and
 wrong, and brought in righteousness and holiness; naked and alone did he
 this. And when Odysseus was shipwrecked and cast away, did his need
 humble him one whit or break his spirit? But how did he go out to the
 maidens, to beg for the necessaries of life, which it is held most
 shameful to seek from another?
 
   Even as a lion from his mountain home,
    So went Odysseus trusting in his valor.
                           _Odyssey_, vi. 130.
 
 Trusting in what? Not in fame, nor wealth, but in his own valorthat
 is, his opinions of the things that are and are not in our power.[3] For
 these alone it is that make men free and unhindered; that lift up the
 heads of the abject, and bid them look rich men and tyrants steadily in
 the face. And this was the gift of the philosopher; but thou wilt never
 go forth boldly, but trembling for thy fine raiment and silver dishes.
 Miserable man! hast thou indeed thus wasted all thy time till now?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 THE OPEN DOOR.
 
 
 1. For my part I think the old man should be sitting here, not to
 devise how ye may have no mean thoughts, nor speak no mean nor ignoble
 things about yourselves, but to watch that there arise not among us
 youths of such a mind, that when they have perceived their kinship with
 the Gods, and how the flesh and its possessions are laid upon us like
 bonds, and how many necessities for the management of life are by them
 brought upon us, they may desire to fling these things away for abhorred
 and intolerable burthens, and depart unto their kin. And this is what
 your master and teacherif, in sooth, ye had any suchshould have to
 contend with in you,that ye should come to him and say, _Epictetus, we
 can endure no longer being bound to this body, giving it food and drink,
 and resting it and cleansing it, and going about to court one man after
 another for its sake. Are not such things indifferent and nothing to us?
 And is not Death no evil? Are we not in some way kinsmen of God, and did
 we not come from Him? Let us depart to whence we came; let us be
 delivered at last from these bonds wherewith we are bound and burthened!
 Here are robbers, and thieves, and law courts, and those that are called
 tyrants, which through the body and its possessions seem as if they had
 some power over us. Let us show them that they have no power over any
 man!_ And to this it should be my part to say, My friends, wait upon
 God. When He Himself shall give the signal and release you from this
 service, then are ye released unto Him. But for the present, bear to
 dwell in this place, wherein He has set you. Short, indeed, is this time
 of your sojourn, and easy to bear for those that are so minded. For what
 tyrant or what thief is there any longer, or what court of law is
 terrible to one who thus makes nothing of the body and the possessions
 of it? Remain, then, and depart not without a reason. Some such part as
 this should the teacher have to play towards the well-natured among his
 disciples.
 
 2. How long, then, are such injunctions to be obeyed? So long as it is
 profitablethat is to say, so long as I can do what becomes and befits
 me. Then some men are choleric and fastidious, and say, I cannot sup
 with this man, to have to hear him every day telling how he fought in
 Mysia. _I told you, brother, how I went up the hillthen again I began
 to be besieged_.... But another saith, I prefer to have my supper, and
 listen to him prating as long as he likes. And do thou compare the gain
 on both sidesonly do naught in heaviness or affliction, or as
 supposing that thou art in evil case. For to this no man can compel
 thee. Doth it smoke in the chamber? if it is not very much I will stay,
 if too much, I will go out; for remember this always, and hold fast to
 it, that the door is open. _Thou shalt not live in Nicopolis._ I will
 not. _Nor in Athens._ I will not live in Athens. _Nor in Rome._ Neither
 in Rome. _Live in Gyara._[1] I will live in Gyara. But living in Gyara
 seemeth to me like a great smoke. I will depart, whither no man shall
 hinder me to dwellfor that dwelling stands ever open to all.
 
 3. Only do it not unreasonably, nor cowardly, nor make every common
 chance an excuse. For again, it is not Gods will, for He hath need of
 such an order of things, and of such a race upon the earth. But if He
 give the signal for retreat, as He did to Socrates, we must obey Him as
 our commander.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 KNOW THYSELF.
 
 
 1. If a man have any advantage over others, or thinks himself to have
 it when he hath it not, it cannot but be that if he is an untaught man
 he shall be puffed up by it. Thus the tyrant says, _I am he that is
 master of all_. And what can you give me? Can you set my pursuit free of
 all hindrance? How is it in you to do that? For have you the gift of
 never falling into what you shun? or never missing the mark of your
 desire? And whence have you it? Come, now, in a ship do you trust to
 yourself or to the captain? or in a chariot, to any one else than the
 driver?[1] And how will you do with regard to other acts? Even thus.
 Where, then, is your power? _All men minister to me._ And do I not
 minister to my plate, and I wash it and wipe it, and drive in a peg for
 my oil-flask? What then, are these things greater than I? Nay, but they
 supply certain of my needs, and for this reason I take care of them.
 Yea, and do I not minister to my ass? Do I not wash his feet and groom
 him? Know you not that every man ministers to himself? And he ministers
 to you also, even as he doth to the ass. For who treats you as a man?
 Show me one that doth. Who wisheth to be like unto you? who becomes your
 imitator, as men did of Socrates? _But I can cut off thy head._ You say
 well. I had forgotten that I must pay regard to you as to a fever or the
 cholera; and set up an altar to you, as there is in Rome an altar to
 Fever.
 
 2. What is it, then, whereby the multitude is troubled and terrified?
 The tyrant and his guards? NeverGod forbid it! It is not possible that
 that which is by nature free should be troubled by any other thing, or
 hindered, save by itself. But it is troubled by opinions of things. For
 when the tyrant saith to any one, _I will bind thy leg_, then he who
 setteth store by his leg saith, _Nay, have pity!_ but he that setteth
 store by his own Will, _If it seem more profitable to you, then bind
 it_.
 
 Dost thou not regard me?
 
 I do not regard you. I will show you that I am master. How can you be
 that? Me hath God set free; or think you that He would let His own Son
 be enslaved? You are lord of my dead bodytake that.
 
 So when thou comest near to me, thou wilt not do me service?
 
 Nay, but I will do it to myself; and if you will have me say that I do
 it to you also, I tell you that I do it as to my kitchen pot.
 
 3. This is no selfishness; for every living creature is so made that it
 doth all things for its own sake. For the sun doth all things for his
 own sake, and so, moreover, even Zeus himself. But when He will be
 Raingiver and Fruitgiver and Father of Gods and men, thou seest that He
 may not do these works and have these titles, but He be serviceable to
 the common good. And, on the whole, He hath so formed the nature of the
 reasoning creature that he may never win aught of his own good without
 he furnish something of service to the common good. Thus it is not to
 the excluding of the common good that a man do all things for himself.
 For is it to be expected that a man shall stand aloof from himself and
 his own interest? And where then would be that same and single principle
 which we observe in all things, their affection to themselves?
 
 4. So, then, when we act on strange and foolish opinions of things
 beyond the Will, as though they were good or evil, it is altogether
 impossible but we shall do service to tyrants. And would it were to the
 tyrants alone, and not to their lackeys also!
 
 5. But what hinders the man that hath distinguished these things to live
 easily and docile, looking calmly on all that is to be, and bearing
 calmly all that is past? Will you have me bear poverty? Come, and see
 what poverty is when it strikes one that knoweth how to play the part
 well. Will you have me rule? Give me power, then, and the pains of it.
 Banishment? Whithersoever I go, it shall be well with me for in this
 place it was well with me, not because of the place, but because of the
 opinions which I shall carry away with me. For these no man can deprive
 me of. Yea, these only are mine own, whereof I cannot be deprived, and
 they suffice for me as long as I have them, wherever I be, or whatever I
 do.
 
 6. But now is the time come to die.
 
 What say you? to die? Nay, make no tragedy of the business, but tell it
 as it is. Now is it time for my substance to be resolved again into the
 things wherefrom it came together. And what is dreadful in this? What of
 the things in the universe is about to perish? What new, or what
 unaccountable thing is about to come to pass? Is it for these things
 that a tyrant is feared? through these that the guards seem to bear
 swords so large and sharp? Tell that to others; but by me all these
 things have been examined; no man hath power on me. I have been set free
 by God, I know His commandments, henceforth no man can lead me captive.
 I have a liberator[2] such as I need, and judges such as I need. Are you
 not the master of my body? What is that to me? Of my property? What is
 that to me? Of exile or captivity? Again, I say, from all these things,
 and the poor body itself, I will depart when you will. Try your power,
 and you shall know how far it reaches.
 
 7. But the tyrant will bindwhat? The leg. He will take awaywhat? The
 head. What, then, can he not bind and not take away? The Will. And hence
 that precept of the ancientsKNOW THYSELF.
 
 8. Whom, then, can I still fear? The lackeys of the bed-chamber? For
 what that they can do? Shut me out? Let them shut me out, if they find
 me wishing to go in.
 
 Why, then, didst thou go to the doors?
 
 Because I hold it proper to join the play while the play lasts.
 
 How, then, shalt thou not be shut out?
 
 Because if I am not received, I do not wish to enter; but always that
 which happens is what I wish. For I hold what God wills above what I
 will. I cleave to Him as His servant and follower; my impulses are one
 with His, my pursuit is one with His; in a word, my will is one with
 His. There is no shutting out for menay, but for those who would force
 their way in. And wherefore do I not force my way? Because I know that
 no good thing is dealt out within to those that enter. But when I hear
 some one congratulated on being honored by Csar, I say, What hath
 fortune brought him? A government? Has it also, then, brought him such
 an opinion as he ought to have? A magistracy? Hath he also gained the
 power to be a good magistrate? Why will I still push myself forward? A
 man scatters figs and almonds abroad; children seize them, and fight
 among themselves; but not so men, for they hold it too trifling a
 matter. And if a man should scatter about oyster-shells, not even the
 children would seize them. Offices of government are dealt outchildren
 will look for them; money is givenchildren will look for it; military
 commands, consulshipslet children scramble for them. Let them be shut
 out and smitten, let them kiss the hands of the giver, of his slavesit
 is figs and almonds to me. What then? If thou miss them when he is
 flinging them about, let it not vex thee. If a fig fall into thy bosom,
 take and eat it, for so far even a fig is to be valued. But if I must
 stoop down for it, and throw down another man, or another throw me down,
 and I flatter those who enter in, then neither is a fig worth so much,
 nor is any other of the things that are not good, even those which the
 philosophers have persuaded me not to think good.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI.[1]
 
 HOW WE SHOULD BEAR OURSELVES TOWARDS EVIL MEN.
 
 
 1. If that which the philosophers say is truethat there is one
 principle in all men, as when I assent to something, the feeling that it
 is so; and when I dissent, the feeling that it is not so; yea, and when
 I withhold my judgment, the feeling that it is uncertain; and likewise,
 when I am moved towards anything, the feeling that it is for my profit,
 but it is impossible to judge one thing to be profitable and to pursue
 another, to judge one thing right and be moved towards anotherwhy have
 we indignation with the multitude? _They are robbers_, one saith, _and
 thieves_. And what is it to be robbers and thieves? It is to err
 concerning things good and evil. Shall we, then, have indignation with
 them, or shall we pity them? Nay, but show them the error, and you shall
 see how they will cease from their sins. But if they see it not, they
 have naught better than the appearance of the thing to them.
 
 2. _Should not, then, this robber, or this adulterer, be destroyed?_ By
 no means, but take it rather this way: _This man who errs and is
 deceived concerning things of greatest moment, who is blinded, not in
 the vision which distinguisheth black and white, but in the judgment
 which distinguisheth Good and Evilshould we not destroy him?_ And thus
 speaking, you shall know how inhuman is that which you say, and how like
 as if you said, _Shall we not destroy this blind man, this deaf man?_
 For if it is the greatest injury to be deprived of the greatest things,
 and the greatest thing in every man is a Will such as he ought to have,
 and one be deprived of this, why are you still indignant with him? Man,
 you should not be moved contrary to Nature by the evil deeds of other
 men. Pity him rather, be not inclined to offense and hatred, abandon the
 phrases of the multitude, like these cursed wretches. How have you
 suddenly become so wise and hard to please?
 
 3. Wherefore, then, have we indignation? Because we worship the things
 which they deprive us of. Do not worship fine raiment, and you shall not
 be wroth with the thief. Do not worship the beauty of a woman, and you
 shall not be wroth with the adulterer. Know that the thief and the
 adulterer have no part in that which is thine own, but in that which is
 foreign to thee, in that which is not in thy power. These things if thou
 dismiss, and count them for naught, with whom shalt thou still be wroth?
 But so long as thou dost value these things, be wroth with thyself
 rather than with others.
 
 4. Look now how it stands: You have fine raiment, your neighbor has not;
 you have a window, and wish to air your clothes at it. The neighbor
 knoweth not what is the true good of man, but thinks it is to have fine
 raiment, the same thing that you also think. Then shall he not come and
 take them away? Show a cake to greedy persons, and eat it up yourself
 alone, and will you have them not snatch at it? Nay, but provoke them
 not. Have no window, and do not air your clothes. I also had lately an
 iron lamp set beside the images of the Gods; hearing a noise at the
 door, I ran down, and found the lamp carried off. I reflected that the
 thiefs impulse was not unnatural. What then? _To-morrow_, I said, _thou
 wilt find an earthen lamp_.[2] For a man loses only what he has. _I have
 lost a garment._ For you had a garment. _I have a pain in my head._ Have
 you any pain in your horns? Why, then, have you indignation? For there
 is no loss and no suffering save only in those things which we possess.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII.
 
 THE VOYAGE OF LIFE.
 
 
 Even as in a sea voyage, when the ship is brought to anchor, and you go
 out to fetch in water, you make a by-work of gathering a few roots and
 shells by the way, but have need ever to keep your mind fixed on the
 ship, and constantly to look round, lest at any time the master of the
 ship call, and you must, if he call, cast away all those things, lest
 you be treated like the sheep that are bound and thrown into the hold:
 So it is with human life also. And if there be given wife and children
 instead of shells and roots, nothing shall hinder us to take them. But
 if the master call, run to the ship, forsaking all those things, and
 looking not behind. And if thou be in old age, go not far from the ship
 at any time, lest the master should call, and thou be not ready.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII.
 
 THE MARK OF EFFORT.
 
 
 1. Seek not to have things happen as you choose them, but rather choose
 them to happen as they do, and so shall you live prosperously.
 
 2. Disease is a hindrance of the body, not of the Will, unless the Will
 itself consent. Lameness is a hindrance of the leg, not of the Will. And
 this you may say on every occasion, for nothing can happen to you but
 you will find it a hindrance not of yourself but of some other thing.
 
 3. What, then, are the things that oppress us and perturb us? What else
 than opinions? He that goeth away and leaveth his familiars and
 companions and wonted places and habitswith what else is he oppressed
 than his opinions? Now, little children, if they cry because their nurse
 has left them for a while, straightway forget their sorrow when they are
 given a small cake. Wilt thou be likened unto a little child?
 
 Nay, by Zeus! for I would not be thus affected by a little cake,
 but by right opinions.
 
 And what are these?
 
 They are such as a man should study all day long to observethat he be
 not subject to the effects of anything that is alien to him, neither of
 friend, nor place, nor exercises; yea, not even of his own body, but to
 remember the Law, and have it ever before his eyes. And what is the
 divine Law? To hold fast that which is his own, and to claim nothing
 that is anothers; to use what is given him, and not to covet what is
 not given; to yield up easily and willingly what is taken away, giving
 thanks for the time that he has had it at his service. This door cry
 for the nurse and mamma; for what doth it matter to what or whom thou
 art subject, from what thy welfare hangs? Wherein art thou better than
 one who bewails himself for his mistress, if thou lament thy exercises
 and porticoes and comrades, and all such pastime? Another cometh,
 grieving because he shall no more drink of the water of Dirce. And is
 the Marcian water worse than that of Dirce?
 
 But I was used to the other.
 
 And to this also thou shalt be used; and when thou art so affected
 towards it, lament for it too, and try to make a verse like that of
 Euripides
 
   The baths of Nero and the Marcian stream[1]
 
 Behold how tragedies are made, when common chances happen to foolish
 men!
 
 4.But when shall I see Athens and the Acropolis again?
 
 Wretched man! doth not that satisfy thee which thou seest every day?
 Hast thou aught better or greater to see than the sun, the moon, the
 stars, the common earth, the sea? But if withal thou mark the way of Him
 that governeth the whole and bear Him about within thee, wilt thou still
 long for cut stones and a fine rock? And when thou shalt come to leave
 the sun itself and the moon, what wilt thou do? Sit down and cry, like
 the children? What, then, wert thou doing in the school? What didst thou
 hear, what didst thou learn? Why didst thou write thyself down a
 philosopher, when thou mightest have written the truth, as thus:_I
 made certain beginnings, and read Chrysippus, but did not so much as
 enter the door of a philosopher_? For how shouldst thou have aught in
 common with Socrates, who died as he died, who lived as he livedor
 with Diogenes? Dost thou think that any of these men lamented or was
 indignant because he should see such a man or such a woman no more? or
 because he should not dwell in Athens or in Corinth, but, as it might
 chance, in Susa or Ecbatana? When a man can leave the banquet or the
 game when he pleases, shall such a one grieve if he remains? Shall he
 not, as in a game, stay only so long as he is entertained? A man of this
 stamp would easily endure such a thing as perpetual exile or sentence of
 death.
 
 Wilt thou not now be weaned as children are, and take more solid food,
 nor cry any more after thy mother and nurse, wailing like an old woman?
 
 But if I quit them I shall grieve them.
 
 Thou grieve them? Never; but that shall grieve them which grieveth
 theeOpinion. What hast thou then to do? Cast away thy own bad opinion;
 and they, if they do well, will cast away theirs; if not, they are the
 causes of their own lamenting.
 
 5. Man, be mad at last, as the saying is, for peace, for freedom, for
 magnanimity. Lift up thy head as one delivered from slavery. Dare to
 look up to God and say: _Deal with me henceforth as thou wilt; I am of
 one mind with thee; I am thine. I reject nothing that seems good to
 thee; lead me whithersoever thou wilt, clothe me in what dress thou
 wilt. Wilt thou have me govern or live privately, or stay at home, or go
 into exile, or be a poor man or a rich? For all these conditions I will
 be thy advocate with menI show the nature of each of them, what it
 is._
 
 Nay, but sit in a corner and wait for thy mother to feed thee.[2]
 
 6. Who would Hercules have been if he had sat at home? He would have
 been Eurystheus, and not Hercules. And how many companions and friends
 had he in his journeying about the world? But nothing was dearer to him
 than God; and for this he was believed to be the son of God, yea, and
 was the son of God. And trusting in God, he went about purging away
 lawlessness and wrong. But thou art no Hercules, and canst not purge
 away evils not thine own? nor yet Theseus, who cleared Attica of evil
 things? Then clear away thine own. From thy breast, from thy mind cast
 out, instead of Procrustes and Sciron, grief, fear, covetousness, envy,
 malice, avarice, effeminacy, profligacy. And these things cannot
 otherwise be cast out than by looking to God only, being affected only
 by Him, and consecrated to His commands. But choosing anything else than
 this, thou wilt follow with groaning and lamentation whatever is
 stronger than thou, ever seeking prosperity in things outside thyself,
 and never able to attain it. For thou seekest it where it is not, and
 neglectest to seek it where it is.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV.
 
 FACULTIES.
 
 
 Remember at anything that shall befall thee to turn to thyself and seek
 what faculty thou hast for making use of it. If thou see a beautiful
 person, thou wilt find a faculty for thatnamely, Self-mastery. If toil
 is laid upon thee, thou wilt find the faculty of Perseverance. If thou
 art reviled, thou wilt find Patience. And making this thy wont, thou
 shalt not be carried away by the appearances.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV.
 
 RETURNS.
 
 
 Never in any case say, _I have lost_ such a thing, but _I have returned
 it_. Is thy child dead? it is returned. Is thy wife dead? she is
 returned. Art thou deprived of thy estate? is not this also returned?
 
 But he is wicked who deprives me of it!
 
 But what is that to thee, through whom the Giver demands his own? As
 long, therefore, as he grants it to thee, steward it like anothers
 property, as travelers use an inn.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI.
 
 THE PRICE OF TRANQUILLITY.
 
 
 1. If you would advance in philosophy you must abandon such thoughts as,
 _If I neglect my affairs I shall not have the means of living. If I do
 not correct my servant he will be good for nothing._ For it is better to
 die of hunger, having lived without grief and fear, than to live with a
 troubled spirit amid abundance. And it is better to have a bad servant
 than an afflicted mind.
 
 2. Make a beginning then in small matters. Is a little of your oil
 spilt, or a little wine stolen? Then say to yourself, _For so much peace
 is bought, this is the price of tranquillity_. For nothing can be gained
 without paying for it. And when you call your servant, bethink you that
 he may not hear, or, hearing, may not obey. For him, indeed, that is not
 well, but for you it is altogether well that he have not the power to
 trouble your mind.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII.
 
 A CHOICE.
 
 
 If thou wouldst advance, be content to let people think thee senseless
 and foolish as regards external things. Wish not ever to seem wise, and
 if ever thou shalt find thyself accounted to be somebody, then mistrust
 thyself. For know that it is not easy to make a choice that shall agree
 both with outward things and with Nature, but it must needs be that he
 who is careful of the one shall neglect the other.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII.
 
 THAT WHERE THE HEART IS THE BOND IS.
 
 
 1. Thou art a fool if thou desire wife and children and friends to live
 forever, for that is desiring things to be in thy power which are not in
 thy power, and things pertaining to others to be thine own. So also thou
 art a fool to desire that thy servant should never do anything amiss,
 for that is desiring evil not to be evil, but something else. But if
 thou desire never to fail in any pursuit, this thou canst do. This,
 therefore, practice to attainnamely, the attainable.
 
 2. The lord of each of us is he that hath power over the things that we
 desire or dislike, to give or to take them away. Whosoever, then, will
 be free, let him neither desire nor shun any of the things that are in
 others power; otherwise he must needs be enslaved.
 
 3. Wherefore Demetrius[1] said to Nero, _You threaten me with death,
 but Nature threatens you_. If I am taken up with my poor body, or my
 property, I have given myself over to slavery, for I immediately show of
 my own self with what I may be captured. As when a snake draws in his
 head, I say, _Strike at that part of him which he guards_. And know
 thou, that at the part thou desirest to guard, there thy master will
 fall upon thee. Remembering this, whom wilt thou still flatter or fear?
 
 4. Think that thou shouldst conduct thyself in life as at a feast. Is
 some dish brought to thee? Then put forth thyself in seemly fashion.
 Doth it pass thee by? Then hold it not back. Hath it not yet come? Then
 do not reach out for it at a distance, but wait till it is at thine
 hand. And thus doing with regard to children and wife and governments
 and wealth, thou wilt be a worthy guest at the table of the Gods. And if
 thou even pass over things that are offered to thee, and refuse to take
 of them, then thou wilt not only share the banquet, but also the
 dominion of the Gods. For so doing Diogenes and Heracleitus, and the
 like, both were, and were reported to be, rightly divine.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIX.
 
 THAT WE LAMENT NOT FROM WITHIN.
 
 
 When thou seest one lamenting in grief because his son is gone abroad,
 or because he hath lost his goods, look to it that thou be not carried
 away by the appearance to think that he hath truly fallen into
 misfortune, in outward things. But be the thought at hand, _It is not
 the thing itself that afflicts this mansince there are others whom it
 afflicts notbut the opinion he has about it_. And so far as speech, be
 not slow to fit thyself to his mood, and even if so it be to lament with
 him. But have a care that thou lament not also from within.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XX.
 
 THAT A MAN MAY ACT HIS PART BUT NOT CHOOSE IT.
 
 
 1. Remember that thou art an actor in a play, of such a part as it may
 please the director to assign thee; of a short part if he choose a short
 part; of a long one if he choose a long. And if he will have thee take
 the part of a poor man, or of a cripple, or a governor, or a private
 person, mayest thou act that part with grace! For thine it is to act
 well the allotted part, but to choose it is anothers.
 
 2. Say no more then, _How will it be with me?_ for however it be thou
 wilt settle it well, and the issue shall be fortunate. What would
 Hercules have been had he said, _How shall I contrive that a great lion
 may not appear to me, or a great boar, or a savage man?_ And what hast
 thou to do with that? if a great boar appear, thou wilt fight the
 greater fight; if evil men, thou wilt clear the earth of them. _But if I
 die thus?_ Thou wilt die a good man, in the accomplishing of a noble
 deed. For since we must by all means die, a man cannot be found but he
 will be doing somewhat, either tilling or digging or trading or
 governing, or having an indigestion or a diarrha. What wilt thou,
 then, that Death shall find thee doing? I, for my part, will choose some
 work, humane, beneficent, social, noble. But if I am not able to be
 found doing things of this greatness, then, at least, I will be doing
 that which none can hinder me to do, that which is given to me to
 donamely, correcting myself, bettering my faculty for making use of
 appearances, working out my peace, giving what is due in every
 obligation of life; and if I prosper so far, then entering upon the
 third topic of philosophy, which concerneth the security of judgments.
 
 3. If Death shall find me in the midst of these studies, it shall
 suffice me if I can lift up my hands to God and say, _The means which
 thou gavest me for the perceiving of thy government, and for the
 following of the same, have I not neglected: so far as in me lies, I
 have not dishonored thee. Behold how I have used my senses, and my
 natural conceptions. Have I ever blamed thee? was I ever offended at
 aught that happened, or did I desire it should happen otherwise? Did I
 ever desire to transgress my obligations? That thou didst beget me I
 thank thee for what thou gavest. I am content that I have used thy gifts
 so long. Take them again, and set them in what place thou wilt, for
 thine were all things, and thou gavest them me._
 
 4. Is it not enough to depart in this condition? and what life is better
 and fairer than one like this, and what end more happy?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXI.
 
 DISTINCTIONS.
 
 
 1. When a raven croaks you a bad omen, be not carried away by the
 appearance; but straightway distinguish with yourself and say, _None of
 these things bodes aught to myself, but either to this poor body or this
 wretched property of mine, or to my good repute, or to my children, or
 to my wife. But to me all omens are fortunate if I choose to have it so.
 For whatever of these things may come to pass, it lies with me to have
 it serve me._
 
 2. You may be always victorious if you will never enter into any contest
 but where the victory depends upon yourself.
 
 3. When you shall see a man honored above others, or mighty in power, or
 otherwise esteemed, look to it that thou deem him not blessed, being
 carried away by the appearance. For if the essence of the Good be in
 those things that are in our own power, then neither envy nor jealousy
 have any place, nor thou thyself shalt not desire to be commander or
 prince or consul, but to be free. And to this there is one roadscorn
 of the things that are not in our own power.
 
 4. Remember, it is not he that strikes or he that reviles that doth any
 man an injury, but the opinion about these things, that they are
 injurious. When, then, some one may provoke thee to wrath, know that it
 is thine own conception which hath provoked thee. Strive, therefore, at
 the outset not to be carried away by the appearance; for if thou once
 gain time and delay, thou wilt more easily master thyself.
 
 5. Death and exile, and all things that appear dreadful, let these be
 every day before thine eyes. But Death most of all; for so thou wilt
 neither despise nor too greatly desire any condition of life.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXII.
 
 THAT A MAN IS SUFFICIENT TO HIMSELF.
 
 
 1. If thou set thine heart upon philosophy, prepare straightway to be
 laughed at and mocked by many who will say, _Behold, he has suddenly
 come back to us a philosopher_; or, _How came you by that brow of
 scorn?_ But do thou cherish no scorn, but hold to those things that seem
 to thee the best, as one set by God in that place. Remember, too, that
 if thou abide in that way, those that first mocked thee, the same shall
 afterwards reverence thee; but if thou yield to them, thou shalt receive
 double mockery.
 
 2. If it shall ever happen to thee to be turned to outward things in the
 desire to please some person, know that thou hast lost thy way of life.
 Let it be enough for thee in all things to _be_ a philosopher. But if
 thou desire also to seem one, then seem so to thyself, for this thou
 canst.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIII.
 
 THAT EVERY MAN FULFILL HIS OWN TASK.
 
 
 1. Let such thoughts never afflict thee as, _I shall live unhonored,
 and never be anybody anywhere_. For if lack of honor be an evil, thou
 canst no more fall into evil through anothers doings than into vice. Is
 it, then, of thy own doing to be made a governor, or invited to feasts?
 By no means. How, then, is this to be unhonored? How shouldst thou
 _never be anybody anywhere_, whom it behooves to be somebody only in the
 things that are in thine own power, wherein it lies with thee to be of
 the greatest worth?
 
 2. _But I shall not be able to serve my friends._ How sayst thou? to
 serve them? They shall not have money from thee, nor shalt thou make
 them Roman citizens. Who, then, told thee that these were of the things
 that are in our power, and not alien to us? And who can give that which
 himself hath not?
 
 3. _Acquire, then_, they say, _that we may possess_. If I can acquire,
 and lose not piety, and faith, and magnanimity withal, show me the way,
 and I will do it. But if ye will have me lose the good things I possess,
 that ye may compass things that are not good at all, how unjust and
 unthinking are ye? But which will ye rather havemoney, or a faithful
 and pious friend? Then, rather take part with me to this end; and ask me
 not to do aught through which I must cast away those things.
 
 4. _But_, he saith, _I shall not do my part in serving my country_.
 Again, what is this service? Thy country shall not have porticos nor
 baths from thee, and what then? Neither hath she shoes from the smith,
 nor arms from the cobbler; but it is enough if every man fulfill his own
 task. And if thou hast made one other pious and faithful citizen for
 her, art thou, then, of no service? Wherefore, neither shalt thou be
 useless to thy country.
 
 5. _What place, then_, he saith, _can I hold in the State_? Whatever
 place thou canst, guarding still thy faith and piety. But if in wishing
 to serve her thou cast away these things, what wilt thou profit her
 then, when perfected in shamelessness and faithlessness?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIV.
 
 THE WORLDS PRICE FOR THE WORLDS WORTH.
 
 
 1. Is some one preferred before thee at a feast, or in salutation, or in
 being invited to give counsel? Then, if these things are good, it
 behooves thee rejoice that he hath gained them; but if evil, be not
 vexed that thou hast not gained them; but remember that if thou act not
 as other men to gain the things that are not in our own power, neither
 canst thou be held worthy of a like reward with them.
 
 2. For how is it possible for him who will not hang about other mens
 doors to have a like reward with him who doth so? or him who will not
 attend on them with him who doth attend? or him who will not flatter
 them with the flatterer? Thou art unjust, then, and insatiable, if thou
 desire to gain those things for nothing, without paying the price for
 which they are sold.
 
 3. But how much is a lettuce sold for? A penny, perchance. If any one,
 then, will spend a penny, he shall have lettuce; but thou, not spending,
 shalt not have. But think not thou art worse off than he; for as he has
 the lettuce, so thou the penny which thou wouldst not give.
 
 4. And likewise in this matter. Thou art not invited to some mans
 feast? That is, for thou gavest not to the host the price of the supper;
 and it is sold for flattery, it is sold for attendance. Pay, then, the
 price, if it will profit thee, for which the thing is sold. But if thou
 wilt not give the price, and wilt have the thing, greedy art thou and
 infatuated.
 
 5. Shalt thou have nothing, then, instead of the supper? Thou shalt have
 thisnot to have praised one whom thou hadst no mind to praise, and not
 to have endured the insolence of his door-keepers.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXV.
 
 AIMS OF NATURE.
 
 
 1. The will of Nature is to be learned from matters which do not concern
 ourselves.[1] Thus, when a boy may break the cup of another man, we are
 ready to say, _It is a common chance_. Know, then, that when thine own
 is broken, it behooves thee to be as though it were another mans. And
 apply this even to greater things. Has another mans child died, or his
 wife? who is there that will not say, _It is the lot of humanity_. But
 when his own may die, then straightway it is, _Alas, wretched that I
 am!_ But we should bethink ourselves what we felt on hearing of others
 in the same plight.
 
 2. As a mark is not set up to be missed, even so the nature of evil
 exists not in the universe.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVI.
 
 THE MINDS SECURITY.
 
 
 If any one should set your body at the mercy of every passer-by, you
 would be indignant. When, therefore, you set your own mind at the mercy
 of every chance, to be troubled and perturbed when any one may revile
 you, have you no shame of this?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVII.
 
 THAT A MAN SHOULD BE ONE MAN.
 
 
 1. In every work you will take in hand mark well what must go before and
 what must follow, and so proceed. For else you shall at first set out
 eagerly, as not regarding what is to follow; but in the end, if any
 difficulties have arisen, you will leave it off with shame.
 
 2. So you wish to conquer in the Olympic games? And I, too, by the Gods;
 and a fine thing it would be. But mark the prefaces and the
 consequences, and then set to work. You must go under discipline, eat by
 rule, abstain from dainties, exercise yourself at the appointed hour, in
 heat or cold, whether you will or no, drink nothing cold, nor wine at
 will; in a word, you must give yourself over to the trainer as to a
 physician. Then in the contest itself there is the digging race,[1] and
 you are like enough to dislocate your wrist, or turn your ankle, to
 swallow a great deal of dust, to be soundly drubbed, and after all these
 things to be defeated.
 
 3. If, having considered these things, you are still in the mind to
 enter for the contest, then do so. But without consideration you will
 turn from one thing to another like a child, who now plays the wrestler,
 now the gladiator, now sounds the trumpet, then declaims like an actor;
 and so you, too, will be first an athlete, then a gladiator, then an
 orator, then a philosopher, and nothing with your whole soul; but as an
 ape you will mimic everything you see, and be charmed with one thing
 after another. For you approached nothing with consideration nor
 regularity, but rashly, and with a cold desire.
 
 4. And thus some men, having seen a philosopher, and heard discourse
 like that of Euphrates[2] (yet who indeed can say that any discourse is
 like his?), desire that they also may become philosophers.
 
 5. But, O man! consider first what it is you are about to do, and then
 inquire of your own nature whether you can carry it out. Will you be a
 pentathlos,[3] or a wrestler? Then, scan your arms and thighs; try your
 loins. For different men are made for different ends.
 
 6. Think you, you can be a sage, and continue to eat and drink and be
 wrathful and take offense just as you were wont? Nay, but you must watch
 and labor, and withdraw yourself from your household, and be despised by
 any serving boy, and be ridiculed by your neighbors, and take the lower
 place everywhere, in honors, in authority, in courts of justice, in
 dealings of every kind.[4]
 
 7. Consider these thingswhether you are willing at such a price to
 gain peace, freedom, and an untroubled spirit. And if not, then attempt
 it not, nor, like a child, play now the philosopher, then the
 tax-gatherer, then the orator, then the Procurator of Csar. For these
 things agree not among themselves; and, good or bad, it behooves you to
 be one man. You should be perfecting either your own ruling faculty, or
 your outward well-being; spending your art either on the life within or
 the life without; that is to say, you must hold your place either among
 the sages or the vulgar.
 
 
 END OF BOOK II.
 
 
 
 
 _BOOK III._
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 OBLIGATIONS.
 
 
 1. Obligations are universally defined by the bonds of relation. Is such
 a man your father? Then it is implied that you are to take care of him,
 to give place to him in all things, to bear his rebukes, his
 chastisement. _But if he be a bad father?_ Were you then related by any
 law of Nature to a good father? Nay, but simply to a father. Your
 brother does you wrong. Then guard your own place towards him, nor
 scrutinize what he is doing, but what you may do to keep your will in
 accord with Nature. For none other shall hurt you, if yourself choose it
 not, but you shall be hurt then when you conceive yourself to be so.
 
 2. Thus shall you discover your obligations from the offices of a
 neighbor, a citizen, a general, if you will accustom yourself to watch
 the relationships.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 AGAINST EPICURUS.
 
 
 1. Even Epicurus is conscious that we are by nature social, but having
 once placed the Good in the husk,[1] he cannot thereafter speak anything
 but what agrees with this; for again he affirms, and rightly affirms,
 that nothing is to be admired or received that is separated from the
 nature of the Good. How, then, Epicurus, do you suspect that we are
 social, if Nature had given us no affection for our offspring?[2]
 Wherefore do you counsel the sage against bringing up children? Why do
 you fear lest he fall into sorrow by so doing? Doth he fall into sorrow
 for the mouse that lives in his house? What careth he if a little mouse
 complain to him at home. But he knows well that if a little child be
 born, it is no longer in our power not to love it and be anxious for it.
 
 2. Thus, too, he saith that no man of sense will take part in affairs
 of the state, for he knows what he who takes part in them must do; but
 what should hinder one to take part, if he may behave among men as in a
 swarm of flies? But Epicurus, knowing these things, dares to say that we
 should not rear up our children. But even a sheep will not desert its
 young, nor a wolf; and shall a man? _What! will you have us to be silly
 creatures, like the sheep?_ Yet they desert not their young. _Or savage,
 like wolves?_ Yet even they desert them not. Come, then, who would obey
 you if he saw his little child fall on the ground and cry? For my part,
 I suppose that had it been prophesied to your mother and your father
 that you would say these things, not even so would they have cast you
 out.
 
 3. _But how can it be said of these outward things_[3] _that they are
 according to Nature, or contrary to Nature?_ That is to speak as if we
 were solitary and disunited from others. For to the foot I shall say it
 is according to Nature that it be clean; but if you take it as a foot,
 and not as a solitary thing, it shall beseem it to go into the mud, and
 to tread on thorns, and perchance to be cut off, for the sake of the
 whole; otherwise it is no longer a foot.
 
 4. And some such thing we should suppose about ourselves also. What art
 thou? A man. Look at thyself as a solitary creature, and it is according
 to Nature to live to old age, to grow rich, to keep good health. But if
 thou look at thyself as a man, and as a part of a certain Whole, for the
 sake of that Whole it may become thee now to have sickness, now to sail
 the seas and run into peril, now to suffer need, and perchance to die
 before thy time.
 
 5. Why, then, dost thou bear it hard? Knowest thou not, that as the foot
 alone is not a foot, so thou alone art not a man? For what is a man? A
 part of a polity, first of that which is made up of Gods and men; then
 of that which is said to be next to the other, which is a small copy of
 the Universal Polity.
 
 6. _Then must I now be brought to trial, and now must another have a
 fever, and another sail the seas, another die, another be sentenced?_
 Yea, for with such a body, in the bounds of such a universe, in such a
 throng of inhabitants, it cannot be but that different things of this
 nature should fall on different persons. This is thy task, then, having
 come into the world, to speak what thou shouldst, and to order these
 things as it is fitting.
 
 7. Then some one saith, _I charge you with wrong-doing_. Much good may
 it do thee! I have done my partlook to it thyself if thou have done
 thine, for of this too there is some danger, lest it escape thee.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 AGAINST THE EPICUREANS AND ACADEMICS.
 
 
 1. Beliefs which are sound and manifestly true are of necessity used
 even by those who deny them. And perhaps a man might adduce this as the
 greatest possible proof of the manifest truth of anything, that those
 who deny it are compelled to make use of it. Thus, if a man should deny
 that there is anything universally true, it is clear that he is obliged
 to affirm the contrary, the negationthat there is nothing universally
 true. Slave! not even thisfor what is this but to say that if there is
 anything universal it is falsehood?
 
 2. Again, if one should come and say, _Know that nothing can be known,
 but all things are incapable of proof; or another, Believe me, and it
 shall profit thee, that no man ought to believe any man_; or again,
 another, _Learn from me, O man, that it is not possible to learn
 anything, and I tell thee this, and I will teach thee, if thou
 wilt_now wherein do such men differ from thosewhom shall I
 say?those who call themselves Academics? _Assent, O men, that no man
 can assent to aught; believe us that no man can believe any one._
 
 3. Thus Epicurus, when he would abolish the natural fellowship of men
 with one another, employeth the very thing that is being abolished. For
 what saith he? _Be not deceived, O men, nor misguided nor
 mistakenthere is no natural fellowship among reasoning beings, believe
 me; and those who speak otherwise deceive us with sophisms._ What is
 that to thee? let us be deceived! Will it be the worse for thee if all
 other men are persuaded that we have a natural fellowship with one
 another, and that we should in all ways maintain it? Naybut much the
 better and safer. Man, why dost thou take thought for us, and watch at
 night for our sakes? Why dost thou kindle thy lamp and rise early? why
 dost thou write so many books, lest any of us should be deceived about
 the Gods, in supposing that they cared for men? or lest any one should
 take the essence of the Good to be anything else than Pleasure? For if
 these things are so, then lie down and sleep, and live the life of a
 worm, wherefor thou hast judged thyself fit; eat and drink and cohabit
 and ease thyself and snore. What is it to thee how other men think
 concerning these matters, whether soundly or unsoundly? What hast thou
 to do with us? With sheep hast thou some concern, for that they serve us
 when they are shorn, and when they are milked, and at last when they
 have their throats cut. Were it not, then, to be desired, if men could
 be lulled and charmed to slumber by the Stoics, and give themselves to
 thee and the like of thee, to be shorn and milked? These things shouldst
 thou say to thy brother Epicureans; but shouldst thou not keep them
 hidden from other men, and seek in every way to persuade them above all
 things that we are by nature social, and that temperance is good; in
 order that everything may be kept for thee? Or should we preserve this
 fellowship with some and not with others? With whom, then, should we
 preserve it? With those who also preserve it towards us, or with those
 who transgress it? And who transgress it more than ye, who set forth
 such doctrines?
 
 4. What, then, was it that roused up Epicurus from his sleep, and
 compelled him to write the things he wrote? What else than Nature, the
 mightiest of all powers in humanity? Nature, that drags the man,
 reluctant and groaning, to her will. _For_, saith she, _since it seems
 to thee that there is no fellowship among men, write this down, and
 deliver it to others, and watch and wake for this, and be thyself by
 thine own deed the accuser of thine own opinions_. Shall we, then, say
 that Orestes was driven by the Furies and aroused from sleep, and did
 not crueller Furies and Avengers rouse this man as he slumbered, and
 suffered him not to rest, but compelled him, as madness and wine the
 priests of Cybele,[1] to proclaim his own evils? So mighty and
 invincible a thing is mans nature.
 
 5. For how can a vine be affected, and not in the manner of a vine, but
 of an olive? Or how, again, can an olive be affected not in the manner
 of an olive but of a vine? It is impossible, it cannot be conceived.
 Neither, then, is it possible for a man wholly to lose the affections of
 humanity, for even eunuchs cannot cut away for themselves the desires
 of men. And thus Epicurus has cut away all that belongs to a man as
 father of a family, and as citizen, and as friend; but the desires of
 humanity he hath not cut away, for he could not; no more than these
 pitiful Academics are able to cast away or to blind their own
 perceptions, although this is the thing that they have striven with all
 their zeal to do.
 
 6. How shameful is this! that a man having received from Nature measures
 and canons for the recognition of truth, should study not to add to them
 and perfect them where they are wanting, but the very contrary of this;
 if there be anything that may lead us to the knowledge of the truth,
 they strive to abolish and destroy it.
 
 7. What sayest thou, philosopher? religion and holiness, what dost thou
 take them for?[2]
 
 If thou wilt, I shall prove that they are good.
 
 So be it; prove it then, in order that our citizens may be converted and
 honor the Divinity, and be no longer neglectful of the greatest things.
 
 Now hast thou received the proofs?
 
 I have, and am thankful therefor.
 
 8.Now since thou art exceedingly well pleased with these things,
 hear the contrary: There are no Gods, or if there be, they have no care
 for men, nor have we any communion with them; and this religion and
 holiness, whereof the multitude babble, is the lying of impostors and
 sophists, or of legislators, by Zeus! for the frighting and restraining
 of evil-doers.
 
 Well said, philosopher! the citizens shall have much profit of thee!
 thou hast already brought back all our youths to the contempt of sacred
 things.
 
 What now? are these doctrines not pleasing to thee? Learn, then,
 that Righteousness is nothing, that Reverence is folly, that a father is
 nothing, a son nothing.
 
 Well said, philosopher! proceed, persuade the young, that we may
 multiply the number of those who believe and speak with thee. From these
 teachings have grown our well-governed States, from these did Sparta
 spring, and these beliefs, by his laws and discipline, did Lycurgus
 plant among his people:That slavery is no more base than honorable,
 nor to be free men more honorable than base. Through these opinions died
 those who fell at Thermopyl, and through what others did the Athenians
 forsake their city?[8]
 
 9. Then those who speak such things marry, and beget children, and take
 part in public affairs, and make themselves priests and augursof what?
 Of beings that do not exist! and they question the Pythian oracle that
 they may learn falsehoods; and they declare the oracles to others. O
 monstrous impudence and imposture!
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 ON SLAVERY.
 
 
 1. A certain man having inquired how one may make his meals in a manner
 pleasing to the Gods, If he do it uprightly, said Epictetus, and
 considerately, and equably, and temperately, and orderly, shall it not
 also be thus pleasing to the Gods? But when you ask for hot water, and
 the boy does not hear, or, hearing, brings it only luke-warm; or if he
 is not even to be found in the house, then is it not pleasing to the
 Gods if you refrain from indignation, and do not burst with passion?
 _How shall one endure such fellows?_ Wretch, wilt thou not bear with
 thine own brother, who is of the progeny of Zeus, like a son sprung of
 the same seed as thyself, and of the same heavenly descent, but thou
 must straightway make thyself a tyrant, for the place of command in
 which thou art set? Wilt thou not remember who thou art, and whom thou
 rulestthat they are kinsmen, brethren by nature, the progeny of Zeus?
 _But I have bought them, and they have not bought me!_ Seest thou, then,
 whither thou art lookingtowards the earth, towards the pit of
 perdition, towards these miserable laws of dead men? but towards the
 laws of the Gods thou dost not look.
 
 2. That which thou wouldst not suffer thyself, seek not to lay upon
 others. Thou wouldst not be a slavelook to it that others be not
 slaves to thee. For if thou endure to have slaves, it seems that thou
 thyself art first of all a slave. For virtue hath no communion with vice
 nor freedom with slavery.
 
 3. As one who is in health would not choose to be served by the sick,
 nor that those dwelling with him should be sick, so neither would one
 that is free bear to be served by slaves, or that those living with him
 should be slaves.[1]
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 TO THE ADMINISTRATOR OF THE FREE CITIES, WHO WAS AN EPICUREAN.
 
 
 1. The Administrator[1] having visited him (and this man was an
 Epicurean), It is proper, said Epictetus, that ignorant people like us
 should inquire of you that are philosophers (as men who come into a
 strange city make inquiry of the citizens and those familiar with the
 place) what is the chief thing in the world, to the end that, having
 learned it, we may go in search of it, and behold it, as men do with
 objects in the cities.
 
 2. Now, that there are three things with which man is concernedsoul,
 and body, and the outer worldscarce any one will deny. It remaineth,
 then, for men like ye to answer which is the chief of these things? What
 shall we declare to men? Is it the flesh? And was it for this that
 Maximus sent forth his son, and sailed with him through the tempest as
 far as Cassiope,[2] for somewhat that he should feel in the flesh?
 
 3. But the Epicurean denying this, and saying, _God forbid_, Epictetus
 said:
 
 Is it not fit, then, that we should be zealous about that, the chief
 thing?
 
 Of all things most fit.
 
 What, then, have we greater than the flesh?
 
 The soul, he said.
 
 And the good of the chief thing, is it greater than the good of the
 lower thing?
 
 The good of the chief thing is greater.
 
 And the good things of the soul, are they in the power of the Will, or
 beyond the Will?
 
 They are in the power of the Will.
 
 The pleasure of the soul, then, is within the power of the Will?
 
 He assented.
 
 And this pleasure itself, whence may it arise? From itself? But this is
 inconceivable; for we must suppose some original substance of the Good,
 whereof the soul doth make us sensible when we light upon it.
 
 This, too, he admitted.
 
 Wherein, then, are we sensible of this spiritual pleasure? for if it be
 in spiritual things, the nature of the Good is discovered. For the Good
 cannot be something different from the thing that justly delights us;
 nor, if the original thing be not good, can aught be good that proceeds
 from it; for, in order that the thing proceeding may be good, the
 original thing must be good also. But this ye would never say, if ye had
 your wits, for so ye would speak things that agree not with Epicurus and
 the rest of your opinions. It remains, then, that we are conscious in
 bodily things of this pleasure of the soul, and again, that these are
 the original things and the very substance of the Good.[3]
 
 4. Wherefore Maximus did foolishly if he made his voyage for the sake of
 anything else than the flesh; that is, than the chief thing. And any man
 doth foolishly who restraineth himself from others good, if he be a
 judge, and able to take them. But, if you please, let us regard this
 only, how it may be done secretly and safely, and so that none may know
 it. For neither does Epicurus himself declare stealing to be bad, but
 only to be caught stealing; and because it is impossible to be certain
 of no discovery, therefore he saith, _Ye shall not steal_. But I say
 that if we steal with skill and discretion, we shall not be caught. And,
 moreover, if we have powerful friends among men and women at Rome, and
 the Greeks are feeble, no one will dare to go thither on this score. Why
 do you refrain from your own good? This is foolishthis is absurd. But
 not even if you tell me you do refrain will I believe you. For, as it is
 impossible to assent to anything that appeareth to be a falsehood or to
 turn away from what appeareth to be true, even so it is impossible to
 withhold oneself from anything that appeareth to be good. But riches are
 a good, and, at all events, the most potent means of pleasure.
 Wherefore, then, not compass them? And why not corrupt our neighbors
 wife, if we may do it secretly? and also, if the husband talk nonsense
 about it, let us fling him out! If you will be a true and perfect
 philosopher, and obedient to your own doctrines, thus must you do; but
 if you do not, you differ no whit from us that are called Stoics. For
 truly we ourselves say one thing and do another; we speak fair and
 honest things, and do vile ones. But the opposite distemper will be
 thinea vile creed and honorable deeds.
 
 5. And you think, God help you! of a city of Epicureans? _I do not
 marry. Nor I; for it is not right to marry, nor beget children, nor take
 part in public affairs._ What will come to pass then? Whence shall we
 have citizens? who shall educate them? who shall be the overseer of
 youth?[4] who the director of gymnastics? and how shall the youth be
 trained up? as the Lacedmonians? or as the Athenians? Take me a youth,
 and bring him up after these doctrines of thine! Evil are they,
 subversive of States, mischievous to households, unbecoming to women.
 Abandon them, man! Thou dwellest in a chief city; it is thy part to
 rule, to judge righteously, to refrain from other mens goods; nor must
 any woman seem beautiful to thee save thine own wife, nor vessel of gold
 or silver. Seek for doctrines in harmony with these words, from which
 setting out thou mayest with gladness abandon things so potent to
 attract and overcome. But if beside the seduction of these things we
 have sought out some philosophy like this that pushes us towards them,
 and confirms us in them, what shall come of it?
 
 6. In the gravers work, which is the chief thing? the silver or the
 art? The substance of the hand is flesh, but the main things are the
 works of the hand. The obligations, therefore, are also threethose
 that concern us, firstly, in that we are; and secondly, as we are; and
 thirdly, the main things themselves. And thus in man, too, it is not
 meet to value the material, this flesh, but the main things. What are
 these? To take part in public affairs, to marry, to beget children, to
 fear God, to care for parents, and, in general, to pursue, to avoid, to
 desire, to dislike, as each of these things should be done, as Nature
 made us to do. And how made she us? To be free, generous, pious. For
 what other creature blushes? what other is capable of the sense of
 shame?
 
 7. And to these things let Pleasure be subject as a minister, a servant,
 that she may summon forth our ardor, and that she also may aid in works
 that are according to Nature.[5]
 
 8. But I am a wealthy man, and have no need of aught.
 
 Why, then, dost thou profess philosophy? Thy vessels of gold and vessels
 of silver are enough for thee; what need hast thou of doctrines?
 
 But I am also a judge of the Greeks!
 
 Dost thou know how to judgewho made thee know?
 
 Csar wrote me a commission.
 
 Let him write thee a commission to be a judge of music, and what help
 will it be to thee? And how didst thou become a judge? by kissing of
 what mans hand? Was it that of Symphorus or Numenius? Before whose
 bed-chamber didst thou sleep? To whom didst thou send gifts? Dost thou
 not perceive, then, that to be a judge is worth just as much as Numenius
 is worth?
 
 But I can cast into prison whom I will.
 
 As if he were a stone.
 
 But I can flog any man I will.
 
 As if he were an ass. This is no government of men. Rule us as reasoning
 beings; show us what is for our good, and we shall follow it; show us
 what is for our ill, and we shall turn away from it; make us emulators
 of thyself, as Socrates made his disciples. He, indeed, was one that
 governed men as men, who made them subject unto him in their pursuit and
 their avoidance, their desire and dislike. _Do this, do not this, or I
 will cast thee into prison._ This is not the rule of reasoning beings.
 But, _As Zeus hath ordered, so do thou act; but if thou dost not, thou
 shall suffer loss and hurt_. What hurt? _None other than thisnot to
 have done what it behooved thee to do. Thou shall lose faith, piety,
 decencylook for no greater injuries than these._
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 ON STATECRAFT.
 
 
 1. Not with the stones of Euba and Sparta let the structure of your
 city walls be variegated; but let the discipline and teaching that comes
 from Greece penetrate with order the minds of citizens and statesmen.
 For with the thoughts of men are cities well established, and not with
 wood and stone.
 
 2. If thou wouldst have a household well established, then follow the
 example of the Spartan Lycurgus. For even as he did not fence the city
 with walls, but fortified the inhabitants with virtue, and so preserved
 the city free for ever, thus do thou not surround thyself with a great
 court and set up lofty towers, but confirm the dwellers in the house
 with good-will, and faith, and friendliness, and no harmful thing shall
 enter; no, not if the whole army of evil were arrayed against it.
 
 3. Which of us will not admire Lycurgus, the Lacedmonian? For having
 lost an eye at the hands of one of the citizens, and having received the
 young man from the people that he should punish him as he would, he
 refrained from this; but having taught him and proved him to be a good
 man, he brought him into the theater. And when the Lacedmonians
 marveled, _I received this man from you_, he said, _insolent and
 violent; I give him back to you mild and civil_.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 ON FRIENDSHIP.
 
 
 1. Whereinsoever a man is zealous, this, it is fair to suppose, he
 loveth. Are men, then, zealous for evil things? Never.[1] Or, perchance,
 for things which do not concern them? Nor for them either. It
 remaineth, then, that they are zealous about good things only; and that
 if they are zealous about them, they also love them. Whosoever, then,
 hath understanding of good things, the same would know how to love. But
 he who is not able to distinguish good things from evil, and things that
 are neither from both, how could this man yet be capable of loving? To
 love, then, is a quality of the wise alone.
 
 2. _And how is this_, saith one, _for I am foolish, and none the less do
 I love my child_. By the Gods! I wonder, then, how you have begun by
 confessing yourself to be foolish. For wherein do you lack? Do you not
 use your senses? do you not judge of appearances? do you not bring to
 the body the nourishment it needeth, and the covering and habitation?
 Wherefore, then, confess yourself to be a fool? Because, forsooth, you
 are often perplexed by appearances, and troubled, and you are vanquished
 by their plausibility; and you take the same things to be now good, and
 now evil, and then indifferent; and, in a word, you grieve and fear and
 envy, and are troubled, and changedfor these things you confess
 yourself a fool.
 
 3. But do you never change in love? But is it wealth, and pleasure,
 and, in short, things, alone that you sometimes take to be good and
 sometimes evil? and do you not take the same men to be now good, now
 evil? and sometimes you are friendly disposed towards them, and
 sometimes hostile? and sometimes you praise them, and sometimes you
 blame?
 
 Yea, even so I do.
 
 What then? a man who hath been deceived about another, is he, think you,
 his friend?
 
 Assuredly not.
 
 And one who hath taken a friend out of a humor for change, hath he
 good-will towards him?
 
 Nor he either.
 
 And he who now reviles another, and afterwards reveres him?
 
 Nor he.
 
 What then? Sawest thou never the whelps of a dog, how they fawn and
 sport with each other, that you would say nothing can be more loving?
 But to know what friendship is, fling a piece of flesh among them, and
 thou shalt learn. And cast between thee and thy child a scrap of land,
 and thou shalt learn how the child will quickly wish to bury thee, and
 thou wilt pray that he may die. And then thou wilt say, _What a child
 have I nourished! this long time he is burying me!_ Throw a handsome
 girl between you, and the old man will love her, and the young too;[2]
 and if it be glory, or some risk to run, it will be on the same fashion.
 You will speak the words of the father of Admetus[3]:
 
   Day gladdens thee; thinkst thou it glads not me?
   Thou lovest light; thinkst thou I love the dark?
 
 Think you this man did not love his own child when it was little? nor
 was in agony if it had a fever? nor said many a time, _Would that I had
 the fever rather than he!_ Then when the trial cometh and is near at
 hand, lo, what words they utter! And Eteocles and Polyneices,[4] were
 they not children of the same mother and the same father? were they not
 brought up together, did they not live together, drink together, sleep
 together, and often kiss one another? So that any one who saw them, I
 think, would have laughed at the philosophers, for the things they say
 perversely about friendship. But when royalty, like a piece of flesh,
 hath fallen between them, hear what things they speak:
 
   _Pol._ Where wilt thou stand before the towers?
 
    _Et._ Wherefore seekest thou to know?
 
    _Pol._ There I too would stand and slay thee.
 
    _Et._ Thou hast spoken my desire.
 
 4. For universally, be not deceived, nothing is so dear to any creature
 as its own profit. Whatsoever may seem to hinder this, be it father or
 child or friend or lover, this he will hate and abuse and curse. For
 Nature hath never so made anything as to love aught but its own profit:
 this is father and brother and kin and country and God. When, then, the
 Gods appear to hinder us in this, we revile even them, and overthrow
 their images and burn their temples; as Alexander, when his friend died,
 commanded to burn the temples of Esculapius.
 
 5. Therefore, if a man place in the same thing both profit and holiness,
 and the beautiful and fatherland, and parents and friends, all these
 things shall be saved; but if he place profit in one thing, and friends
 and fatherland and kinsfolk, yea, and righteousness itself some other
 where, all these things shall perish, for profit shall outweigh them.
 For where the I and the Mine are, thither, of necessity, inclineth every
 living thing: if in the flesh, then the supremacy is there; if in the
 Will, it is there; if in outward things, it is there. If, then, mine I
 is where my Will is, thus only shall I be the friend I should be, or the
 son or the father. For my profit then will be to cherish faith and piety
 and forbearance and continence and helpfulness; and to guard the bonds
 of relation. But if I set Myself in one place and Virtue some
 otherwhere, then the word of Epicurus waxeth strong, which declareth
 that there is no Virtue, or, at least, that Virtue is but conceit.
 
 6. Through this ignorance did Athenians and Lacedmonians quarrel with
 each other, and Thebans with both of them, and the Great King with
 Hellas, and Macedonians with both of them, and even now Romans with
 Get; and through this yet earlier the wars of Ilion arose. Paris was
 the guest of Menelaus; and if any one had seen how friendly-minded
 towards each other they were, he would have disbelieved any one who said
 they were not friends. But a morsel was flung between thema fair
 woman, and about her there was war. And now when you see friends or
 brothers that seem to be of one mind, argue nothing from this concerning
 their friendship; nay, not if they swear it, not if they declare that
 they cannot be parted from each other. For in the ruling faculty of a
 worthless man there is no faith; it is unstable, unaccountable, victim
 of one appearance after another. But try them, not, as others do, if
 they were born of the same parents and nurtured together, and under the
 same tutor; but by this alone, wherein they place their profit, whether
 in outward things or in the will. If in outward things, call them no
 more friends than faithful or steadfast or bold or free; yea, nor even
 men, if you had sense. For that opinion hath nothing of humanity that
 makes men bite each other, and revile each other, and haunt the
 wildernesses, or the public places, like the mountains,[5] and in the
 courts of justice to show forth the character of thieves; nor that which
 makes men drunkards and adulterers and corruptors, nor whatever other
 ills men work against each other through this one and only opinion, that
 They and Theirs lie in matters beyond the Will. But if you hear, in
 sooth, that these men hold the Good to be there only where the Will is,
 where the right use of appearances is, then be not busy to inquire if
 they are father and son, or brothers, or have long time companied with
 each other as comrades; but, knowing this one thing alone, argue
 confidently that they are friends, even as they are faithful and
 upright. For where else is friendship than where faith is, where piety
 is, where there is an interchange of virtue, and none of other things
 than that?
 
 7. _But such a one hath shown kindness to me so long, and is he not my
 friend?_ Slave, whence knowest thou if he did not show thee kindness as
 he wipes his shoes or tends his beast? Whence knowest thou if, when thy
 use is at an end as a vessel, he will not cast thee away like a broken
 plate? _But she is my wife, and we have lived together so long?_ And how
 long lived Eriphyle with Amphiaraus, and was the mother, yea, of many
 children? But a necklace came between them.[6] But what is a necklace?
 It is the opinion men have concerning such things. That was the wild
 beast nature, that was the sundering of love, that which would not allow
 the woman to be a wife, or the mother a mother. And of you, whosoever
 hath longed either to be a friend himself or to win some other for a
 friend, let him cut out these opinions, let him hate them and drive them
 from his soul.
 
 8. And thus he will not revile himself, nor be at strife with himself,
 nor be variable, nor torment himself. And to another, if it be one like
 himself, he will be altogether as to himself, but with one unlike he
 will be forbearing and gentle and mild, ready to forgive him as an
 ignorant man, as one who is astray about the greatest things; but harsh
 to no man, being well assured of that dogma of Plato, that no soul is
 willingly deprived of the truth.
 
 9. But otherwise you may do all things whatsoever, even as friends are
 wont to do, and drink together, and dwell together, and voyage together,
 and be born from the same parents, for so are snakes; but friends they
 are not, nor are ye, so long as ye hold these accursed doctrines of wild
 beasts.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 TIME AND CHANGE.
 
 
 1. Let not anothers vice be thy evil. For thou wast not born to be
 abject with others, or unfortunate with others, but to prosper with
 them. But if any one is unfortunate, remember that it is of his own
 doing. For God hath made all men to be happy, and of good estate. For
 this end hath He granted means and occasions, giving some things to each
 man as his own concern, and some things as alien; and the things that
 are hindered and subject to compulsion and lost are not his own concern,
 and those that are unhindered are; and the substance of Good and of
 Evil, as it were worthy of Him that careth for us and doth protect us as
 a father, He hath placed among our own concerns.
 
 2.But I have parted from such a one, and he is grieved.
 
 For why did he deem things alien to be his own concern? Why, when he
 rejoiced to see thee, did he not reason that thou wert mortal, and apt
 to travel to another land? Therefore doth he pay the penalty of his own
 folly. But thou, for what cause or reason dost thou bewail thyself? Hast
 thou also given no thought to these things; but like silly women
 consorted with all that pleased thee as though thou shouldst consort
 with them forever, places and persons and pastimes? and now thou sittest
 weeping, because thou canst see the same persons and frequent the same
 places no longer. This, truly, is what thou art fit for, to be more
 wretched than crows and ravens that can fly whithersoever they please,
 and change their nests, and pass across the seas, nor ever lament nor
 yearn for what they have left.
 
 Yea, but they are thus because they are creatures without reason.
 
 To us, then, was Reason given by the Gods for our misfortune and misery?
 that we should be wretched and sorrowful forever? Let all men be
 immortal, forsooth, and no man migrate to another land, nor let us
 ourselves ever migrate, but remain rooted to one spot like plants; and
 if one of our companions go, let us sit down and weep, and if he return,
 dance and clap hands like children!
 
 3. Shall we not now at last wean ourselves, and remember what we heard
 from the philosophers? if, indeed, we did not listen to them as a
 wizards incantation. For they said that the universe is one Polity, and
 one is the substance out of which it is made, and there must, of
 necessity, be a certain cycle, and some things must give place to
 others, some dissolving away, and others coming into being, some abiding
 in one place, and others being in motion. But all things are full of
 love, first of the Gods, then of men, that are by nature made to have
 affection towards each other; and it must needs be that some dwell with
 each other, and some are separated, rejoicing in those who are with
 them, and not distressed for those who go away. And man, they said, is
 magnanimous by nature, and contemneth all things beyond the Will; and
 hath also this quality, not to be rooted to one spot, nor grown into the
 earth, but able to go from place to place, sometimes urged by divers
 needs, sometimes for the sake of what he shall see.
 
 4. And such was the case with Ulysses:
 
    The cities of many peoples and minds of men he
    knew._Od._ i. 3.
 
 And yet earlier with Hercules, who went about the whole earth
 
    All disorders of men and orderly rule to see,
                                      _Od._ xvii. 487,
 
 casting out and purging the one, and bringing in the other in its place.
 And how many friends, think you, had he in Thebes? how many in Argos?
 how many in Athens? and how many did he gain in his journeyings? And he
 took a wife, too, when it seemed to him due time, and begat children,
 and left them behind him, not with lamentations or regrets, nor leaving
 them as orphans; for he knew that no man is an orphan, but that there is
 an Eternal Father who careth continually for all. For not of report
 alone had he heard that Zeus is the Father of men, whom also he thought
 to be his own father, and called Him so, and all that he did, he did
 looking unto Him. And thus it was that he was able to live happily in
 every place.
 
 5. For never can happiness and the longing for what is not exist
 together. For Happiness must have all its will. It is like unto one that
 hath eaten and is filled; thirst will not sort with it, nor hunger. _But
 Ulysses longed for his wife, and lamented as he sat on the rock._[1] And
 do you, then, follow Homer and his stories in everything? Or if he did
 in truth lament, what else was he than an unfortunate man? And what good
 man is unfortunate? Verily, the Whole is ill-governed if Zeus taketh no
 care of his own citizens, that they like himself may be happy; but these
 things it is not lawful nor pious even to think of. But Ulysses, if
 indeed he lamented and complained, was not a good man. For what good man
 is there that knoweth not who he is? and who knoweth this who forgets
 that things which come into existence also perish, and that no two human
 beings dwell together forever? To aim, then, at things which are
 impossible is a contemptible and foolish thing; it is the part of a
 stranger and alien in Gods world who fights against God in the one way
 he canby his own opinions.
 
 6. _But my mother laments if she sees me not._ And wherefore hath she
 never learned these teachings? Yet, I say not that it is no concern of
 ours to prevent her grieving; but that we should not absolutely, and
 without exception, desire what is not our own. And the grief of another
 is anothers, and my grief is mine own. I will, therefore, absolutely
 end mine own grief, for this I can; and that of another according to my
 means, but this I will not attempt absolutely. For otherwise I shall be
 fighting with God. I shall be opposing and resisting Him in the
 government of the Whole; and of this strife against God, this obstinacy,
 not only my childrens children, but I myself, too, shall pay the
 penalty by day and night; for I shall leap from my bed at visions of the
 night, confounded, trembling at every news, having my peace at the mercy
 of letters of other persons. _A messenger hath come from Rome; God grant
 it be no evil_. But what evil can come upon thee there, where thou art
 not? _There is a message from Greece; God grant it be no evil._ And thus
 to thee every place may be a source of misfortune. Is it not enough for
 thee to be unfortunate where thou art, and not also across the sea, and
 by writings? Is this the security of thine affairs? _But what if my
 friends which are abroad die there?_ What else than that creatures
 destined to die have died? And how dost thou desire to live to old age,
 and never to see the death of any whom thou lovest? Knowest thou not
 that in a great length of time many and various things must chance; that
 a fever shall overthrow one, and a robber another, and a tyrant another?
 Such is our environment, such our companions; cold and heat, and
 improper ways of living, and journeyings, and voyagings, and winds, and
 various circumstances will destroy one man, and exile another, and cast
 another into an embassy, and another into a campaign. Sit down, then,
 terrified at all these things; grieve and fail, and be unfortunate;
 depend on others, and that not on one or two, but myriads upon myriads.
 
 7. Is this what you heard, is this what you learned from the
 philosophers? Know you not that our business here is a warfare? and one
 must watch, and one go out as a spy, and one must fight? All cannot be
 the same thing, nor would it be better if they were. But you neglect to
 do the bidding of the commander, and complain when he hath laid somewhat
 rougher than common upon you; and you mark not what, so far as in you
 lies, you are making the army to become, so that if all copy you, none
 will dig a trench, none will cast up a rampart, none will watch, none
 will run any risk, but each will appear worthless for warfare. Again, in
 a ship, if you go for a sailor, take up one place, and never budge from
 it; and if you are wanted to go aloft, refuse; or to run upon the prow,
 refuse; and what captain will have patience with you? Will he not cast
 you out like some useless thing, nothing else than a hindrance and bad
 example to the other sailors?
 
 8. And thus here also: the life of every man is a sort of warfare, and
 a long one, and full of divers chances. And it behooveth a man to play a
 soldiers part, and do all at the nod of his commander; yea, and if it
 be possible, to divine what he intendeth. For that commander is not such
 a one as this, neither in power nor in exaltation of character. You are
 set in a great office, and in no mean place, but are a Senator forever.
 Know you not that such a one can attend but little to his household, but
 he must be oftentimes abroad, ruling or being ruled, or fulfilling some
 office, or serving in the field, or judging? And will you, then, desire
 to be fixed and rooted like a plant in the same place? _For it is
 pleasant._ Who denies it? But so is a dainty pleasant, and a fair woman
 is pleasant. How otherwise are those wont to speak who make pleasure
 their end? See you not what kind of men they are whose words you utter?
 They are the words of Epicureans and profligates. And doing the works of
 these men, and holding their doctrines, wilt thou speak to us with the
 speech of Zeno and Socrates?
 
 9. Will you not fling away from you as far as you can these alien
 sentiments wherewith you adorn yourself, which beseem you not at all?
 What other desire have such men than to sleep their fill unhindered, and
 when they have risen, to yawn for languor, and wash their face, and
 write and read whatever pleaseth them; then have some trivial talk, and
 be praised by their friends, whatever they say; then go forth to walk
 about, and having done this a little, go to the baths; then eat; then
 retire to restsuch a rest as is the wont of such men, and why need we
 say what, for it is easily guessed? Come, tell me, then, thine own way
 of life, such as thou desirest, O thou votary of the truth, and of
 Socrates and Diogenes! What wilt thou do in Athens? these very things,
 or others? Why, then, dost declare thyself a Stoic? Are not they sorely
 punished which falsely pretend to be Roman citizens; and should those go
 free who falsely pretend to so great and reverend a calling and name? or
 let this indeed be impossible; but this is the law, divine and mighty,
 and not to be escaped, that layeth the greatest punishments on the
 greatest sinners. For what saith this law? He who pretendeth to things
 that are not his own, let him be a cheat and braggart; he that is
 disobedient to the divine government, let him be an abject, a slave, let
 him grieve and envy and pity[2]in a word, let him be misfortunate, and
 mourn.
 
 10.And now will you have me attend upon such a one, and hang about
 his doors?
 
 If Reason demand it, for the sake of country, of kinsmen, of mankind,
 wherefore shouldst thou not go? Thou art not ashamed to go to the doors
 of a cobbler when thou art in want of shoes, nor to those of a gardener
 for lettuces; and why to those of a rich man when thou art in need of
 some like thing?
 
 Yea, but I have no awe of the cobbler.
 
 Then have none of the rich.
 
 Nor will I flatter the gardener.
 
 And do not flatter the rich.
 
 How, then, shall I gain what I want?
 
 Did I say to thee, _Go, for the sake of gaining it_; or did I not only
 say, _Go, that thou mayest do what it beseems thee to do_.
 
 And why, then, should I yet go?
 
 That thou mayest have gone; that thou mayest have played the part of a
 citizen, of a brother, of a friend. And, for the rest, remember that the
 shoemaker, the vegetable-seller, to whom thou didst go, hath nothing
 great or exalted to give, even though he sell it dear. Thy aim was
 lettuces; they are worth an obol, they are not worth a talent. And so it
 is here. Is the matter worth going to the rich mans door for? So be it;
 I will go. Is it worth speaking to him about? So be it; I will speak.
 But must I also kiss his hand, and fawn upon him with praise? Out upon
 it! that is a talents worth. It is no profit to me, nor to the State,
 nor to my friends, that they should lose a good citizen and friend.
 
 11.How, then, shall I become of an affectionate disposition?
 
 In having a generous and happy one. For Reason doth never decree that a
 man must be abject, or lament, or depend on another, or blame God or
 man. And thus be thou affectionate, as one who will keep this faith.
 But if through this affection, or what happens to be so called by thee,
 thou art like to prove a miserable slave, then it shall not profit thee
 to be affectionate. And what hinders us to love as though we loved a
 mortal, or one who may depart to other lands? Did Socrates not love his
 children? Yea, but as a free man; as one who remembered that he must
 first love the Gods. And, therefore, he never did transgress anything
 that it becomes a good man to observe, neither in his defense, nor in
 fixing his punishment, nor beforetime when he was of the Council, nor
 when he was serving in the field. But we are well supplied with every
 excuse for baseness; some through children, some through mothers, some
 through brothers. But it behooveth no man to be unhappy through any
 person, but happy through all, and most of all through God, which hath
 framed us to that end.
 
 12. And, for the rest, in all things which are delightful to thee, set
 before thyself the appearances that oppose them. What harm is it, while
 kissing thy child, to whisper, _To-morrow thou shalt die_; and likewise
 with thy friend, _To-morrow thou shall depart, either thou or I, and we
 shall see each other no more_?
 
 But these are words of ill-omen.
 
 And so are some incantations, but in that they are useful I regard not
 this; only let them be of use. But dost thou call anything of ill-omen,
 save only that which betokeneth some evil? Cowardice is a word of
 ill-omen, and baseness and grief and mourning and shamelessness, these
 words are of ill-omen. And not even them must we dread to speak, if so
 we may defend ourselves against the things. But wilt thou say that any
 word is of ill-omen that betokeneth some natural thing? Say that it is
 of ill-omen to speak of the reaping of ears of corn, for it betokeneth
 the destruction of the earsbut not of the universe. Say that the
 falling of the leaves is of ill-omen, and the dried fig coming in the
 place of the green, and raisins in the place of grapes. For all these
 things are changes from the former estate to another; no destruction,
 but a certain appointed order and disposition. Here is parting for
 foreign lands, and a little change. Here is deatha greater change, not
 from that which now is to that which is not, but to that which is not
 now.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 ON SOLITUDE.
 
 
 1. Solitude is the state of one who is helpless. For he who is alone is
 not therefore solitary; even as he who is in a great company is not
 therefore not solitary. When, therefore, we have lost a brother or a son
 or a friend on whom we were wont to rest, we say that we are left
 solitary, and oftentimes we say it in Rome, with such a crowd meeting us
 and so many dwelling about us, and, it may be, having a multitude of
 slaves. For the solitary man, in his conception, meaneth to be thought
 helpless, and laid open to those who wish him harm. Therefore when we
 are on a journey we then, above all, say that we are solitary when we
 are fallen among thieves; for that which taketh away solitude is not the
 sight of a man, but of a faithful and pious and serviceable man. For if
 to be solitary it sufficeth to be alone, then say that Zeus is solitary
 in the conflagration,[1] and bewails himself. _Woe is me! I have neither
 Hera nor Athene nor Apollo_, nor, in short, either brother or son or
 descendant or kinsman. And so some say he doth when alone in the
 conflagration. For they comprehend not the life of a man who is alone,
 setting out from a certain natural principle, that we are by nature
 social, and inclined to love each other, and pleased to be in the
 company of other men. But none the less is it needful that one find the
 means to this also, to be able to suffice to himself, and to be his own
 companion. For as Zeus is his own companion, and is content with
 himself, and considereth his own government, what it is, and is occupied
 in designs worthy of himself; thus should we be able to converse with
 ourselves, and feel no need of others, nor want means to pass the time;
 but to observe the divine government, and the relation of ourselves with
 other things; to consider how we stood formerly towards the events that
 befall us, and how we stand now; what things they are that still afflict
 us; how these, too, may be healed, how removed; and if aught should need
 perfecting, to perfect it according to the reason of the case.
 
 2. Ye see now how that Csar seemeth to have given us a great peace;
 how there are no longer wars nor battles nor bands of robbers nor of
 pirates, but a man may travel at every season, and sail from east to
 west. But can he give us peace from fever? or from shipwreck? or from
 fire? or earthquake? or lightning? ay, or from love? _He cannot._ Or
 from grief? _He cannot._ Or from envy? _He cannot._ Briefly, then, he
 cannot secure us from any of such things. But the word of the
 philosophers doth promise us peace even from these things. And what
 saith it? _If ye will hearken unto me, O men, wheresoever ye be,
 whatsoever ye do, ye shall not grieve, ye shall not be wroth, ye shall
 not be compelled or hindered, but ye shall live untroubled and free from
 every ill._ Whosoever hath this peace, which Csar never proclaimed (for
 how could he proclaim it?), but which God proclaimed through His word,
 shall he not suffice to himself when he may be alone? for he beholdeth
 and considereth, _Now can no evil happen to me; for me there is no
 robber, no earthquake; all things are full of peace, full of calm; for
 me no way, no city, no assembly, no neighbor, no associate hath any
 hurt_. He is supplied by one, whose part that is, with food, by another
 with raiment, by another with senses, by another with natural
 conceptions. And when it may be that the necessary things are no longer
 supplied, that is the signal for retreat: the door is opened, and God
 saith to thee, _Depart_.
 
 Whither?
 
 To nothing dreadful, but to the place from whence thou camestto things
 friendly and akin to thee, to the elements of Being. Whatever in thee
 was fire shall go to fire; of earth, to earth; of air, to air; of water,
 to water;[2] no Hades, nor Acheron, nor Coeytus, nor Phlegethon, but all
 things are full of Gods and Powers.[3] Whoso hath these things to think
 on, and seeth the sun and the moon and the stars, and rejoiceth in the
 earth and the sea, he is no more solitary than he is helpless.
 
 What, then, if one come and find me alone and slay me?
 
 Fool! not thee, but thy wretched body.
 
 3. Thou art a little soul bearing up a corpse.
 
 4. What solitude, then, is there any longer, what lack? Why do we make
 ourselves worse than children, which, when they are left alone, what do
 they?they take shells and sand and build up somewhat, and then throw
 it down, and again build up something else, and so they never lack
 pastime. And shall I, if ye sail away from me, sit down and weep for
 that I am left alone and solitary? Shall I have no shells nor sand? But
 children do these things through their folly, and we through our wisdom
 are made unhappy.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 AGAINST THE CONTENTIOUS AND REVENGEFUL.
 
 
 1. To suppose that we shall become contemptible in the eyes of others,
 unless in some way we inflict an injury on those who first showed
 hostility to us, is the character of most ignoble and thoughtless men.
 For thus we say, that a man is to be despised according to his inability
 to do hurt; but much rather is he to be despised according to his
 inability to do good.
 
 2. The wise and good man neither strives with any himself, nor in the
 measure of his power will he allow another to strive. And in this, as in
 all other things, the life of Socrates is set before us as an example;
 who did not only himself fly all contention, but also forbade it to
 others. See in Xenophons _Symposium_ how many quarrels he ended; and,
 again, how he bore with Thrasymachus, and how with Polus and with
 Callicles; and how he endured his wife, and how his son, which opposed
 him with sophistical arguments. For he remembered very well that no man
 can command the ruling faculty of another.
 
 3. How, then, is there yet any place for contention in one so minded?
 For what event can amaze him? what appear strange to him? Doth he not
 look for even worse and more grievous things at the hands of evil men
 than do befall him? Doth he not count everything for gain which is short
 of the extreme of injury? Hath such a one reviled thee? Much thanks to
 him that he did not strike thee. _But he did also strike me._ Much
 thanks that he did not wound thee. _But he did also wound me._ Much
 thanks that he did not slay thee. For when did he learn, or from whom,
 that he was a tame animal, and affectionate to others, and that to the
 wrongdoer the wrong-doing itself is a heavy injury? For since he hath not
 learned these things, nor believes them, wherefore should he not follow
 that which appears to be his advantage? Thy neighbor hath flung stones!
 Hast thou, then, sinned in aught? But he has broken things in the house?
 And art thou a household vessel? Naybut a Will.
 
 4. What, then, hath been given thee for this occasion? To a wolf it were
 given to biteto fling more stones. But if thou seek what is becoming
 for a man, look into thy stores, see what faculties thou hast come here
 furnished withal. Hast thou the nature of a wild beast? the temper of
 revenge?
 
 5. When is a horse in wretched case? When he is bereaved of his natural
 faculties; not when he cannot crow, but when he cannot run. When is a
 dog? Not when he cannot fly, but when he cannot track. Is not a man,
 then, also thus wretched, not when he cannot strangle lions or embrace
 statues[1]for to this he came endowed with no faculties by Naturebut
 when he hath lost his honesty, his faithfulness? Surely we should meet
 together and lament over such a man; so great are the evils into which
 he hath fallen. Not, indeed, that we should lament for his birth, or for
 his death, but in that while yet living he hath suffered the loss of his
 own true possessions. I speak not of his paternal inheritance, not of
 his land, or his house, or his inn, or his slaves (for not one of these
 things is the true possession of a man, but all are alien, servile,
 subject, given now to some, now to others, by those that can command
 them); but of his human qualities, the stamps of his spirit wherewith he
 came into the world. Even such we seek for also on coins, and if we find
 them we approve the coins, and if not, we cast them away. What is the
 stamp of this sestertius? _The stamp of Trajan._ Then give it me. _The
 stamp of Nero._[2] Fling it awayit will not pass, it is bad. And so
 here too. What is the stamp of his mind? He is gentle, social,
 forbearing, affectionate. Come, then, I receive him, I admit him to
 citizenship, I receive him as a neighbor, a fellow-traveler. See to it
 only that he have not Neros stamp. Is he wrathful, revengeful,
 complaining? Doth he, when it may seem good to him, break the heads of
 all who stand in his way? Why, then, didst thou say he was a man? Shall
 everything be judged by the bare form? If so, then say that a wax apple
 is a real apple, and that it has the smell and taste of an apple. But
 the outward shape doth not suffice, nor are eyes and nose enough to make
 a man, but he is a man only if he have a mans mind. Here is one that
 will not hear reason, that will not submit when he is confutedhe is an
 ass. In another, reverence hath diedhe is worthless, anything rather
 than a man. This one seeketh whom he may meet and kick or biteso that
 he is not even a sheep or an ass, but some kind of savage beast.
 
 6. But this is the nature of every creature, to pursue the Good and fly
 the Evil; and to hold every man an enemy and a plotter for our woe, were
 it even a brother, or son, or father, who takes away from us the one, or
 brings us into the other. For nothing is nearer or dearer to us than the
 Good. It remains, therefore, if outward things be good and evil, that a
 father is no longer the friend of his sons, nor the brother of his
 brother, but every place is full of enemies and plotters and slanderers.
 But if the only Good is that the Will should be as it ought to be, and
 the only Evil as it ought not, where is there then any place for strife,
 for reviling? For about what things shall we strive? about those that
 are nothing to us? and with whom? with the ignorant, the unhappy, with
 men who are deceived concerning the greatest things?
 
 7. Remembering these things, Socrates managed his own household,
 enduring a most shrewish wife and an undutiful son. For these doctrines
 make love in a household, and concord in a State, peace among nations,
 and gratitude towards God, with boldness in every place, as of one who
 hath to do with things alien to him, and of no estimation. And we are
 the men to write and read these things, and to applaud them when they
 are delivered to us, but to the belief of them we have not even come
 near. And therefore that saying concerning the Lacedmonians,
 
   Lions at home, but in Ephesus foxes,[3]
 
 will fit us toolions in the school and foxes without.
 
 
 END OF BOOK III.
 
 
 
 
 _BOOK IV._
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 OF RELIGION.
 
 
 1. Of religion towards the Gods, know that the chief element is to have
 right opinions concerning them, as existing and governing the whole in
 fair order and justice; and then to set thyself to obey them, and to
 yield to them in each event, and submit to it willingly, as accomplished
 under the highest counsels. For so shalt thou never blame the Gods, nor
 accuse them, as being neglectful of thee.
 
 2. But this may come to pass in no other way than by placing Good and
 Evil in the things that are in our own power, and withdrawing them from
 those that are not; for if thou take any of these things to be good or
 evil, then when thou shalt miss thy desire, or fall into what thou
 desirest not, it is altogether necessary that thou blame and hate those
 who caused thee to do so.
 
 3. For every living thing was so framed by Nature as to flee and turn
 from things, and the causes of things, that appear hurtful, and to
 follow and admire things, and the causes of things, that appear
 serviceable. For it is impossible that one who thinketh himself harmed
 should delight in that seemeth to harm him, even as he cannot delight in
 the very harm itself.
 
 4. And thus it comes that a father is reviled by his son when he will
 not give him of the things that appear to be good. And this it was that
 set Polyneices and Eteocles at war with each otherthe opinion, namely,
 that royalty is a good. And through this the Gods are railed on by the
 husbandman and the sailor, by the merchant, and men who lose their wives
 or children. For where advantage is, there also is religion. Thus he who
 is careful to pursue and avoid as he ought, is careful, at the same
 time, of religion.
 
 5. But it is fitting also that every man should pour libations and offer
 sacrifices and first-fruits after the customs of his fathers, purely,
 and not languidly nor negligently, nor, indeed, scantily, nor yet beyond
 his means.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 OF PROVIDENCE.
 
 
 1. Concerning the Gods, there are some who say that a Divine Being does
 not exist; and others, that it exists indeed, but is idle and uncaring,
 and hath no forethought for anything; and a third class say that there
 is such a Being, and he taketh forethought also, but only in respect of
 great and heavenly things, but of nothing that is on the earth; and a
 fourth class, that he taketh thought of things both in heaven and earth,
 but only in general, and not of each thing severally. And there is a
 fifth class, whereof are Odysseus and Socrates, who say, _Nor can I move
 without thy knowledge_.[1]
 
 2. Before all things, then, it is necessary to investigate each of these
 opinions, whether it be justly affirmed or no. For if there be no Gods,
 how can the following of the Gods be an end? And if there are Gods, but
 such as take no care for anything, then also how can the following of
 them be truly an end? And how, again, if the Gods both exist and take
 care for things, yet if there be no communication from them to men, yea,
 by Zeus, and even to mine own self? The wise and good man, having
 investigated all these things, will submit his own mind to Him that
 governeth the Whole, even as good citizens to the laws of their State.
 
 3. But a certain man having inquired how one could be persuaded that
 every one of his actions is observed by God, Doth it not appear to you,
 said Epictetus, that all things are united in One?
 
 It doth so appear.
 
 What then? Think you not that a sympathy exists between heavenly and
 earthly things?
 
 I do think it.
 
 For how else do plants, as if at the command of God, when He bids them,
 flower in due season? and shoot forth when He bids them shoot, and bear
 fruit when He bids them bear? and ripen when He bids them ripen? and
 again they drop their fruit when He bids them drop it, and shed their
 leaves when He bids them shed them? and how else at His bidding do they
 fold themselves together, and remain motionless and at rest? And how
 else at the waxing and waning of the moon, and the approach and
 withdrawal of the sun, do we behold such a change and reversal in
 earthly things? But are the plants and our bodies so bound up in the
 whole, and have sympathy with it, and are our spirits not much more so?
 And our souls being thus bound up and in touch with God, seeing, indeed,
 that they are portions and fragments of Him, shall not every movement of
 them, inasmuch as it is something inward and akin to God, be perceived
 by Him? But you are able to meditate upon the divine government, and
 upon all divine and all human affairs, and to be affected at the same
 time in the senses and in the intellect by ten thousand things, and at
 the same time to assent to some and dissent to others, or suspend your
 judgment; and you preserve in your mind so many impressions of so many
 and various things, and being affected by them, you strike upon ideas
 similar to earlier impressions, and you retain many different arts, and
 memories of ten thousand things; and shall not God have the power to
 overlook all things, and be present with all, and have a certain
 communication with all? But is the sun able to illuminate so great a
 part of the All, and to leave so little without light,that part,
 namely, which is filled with the shadow of the earthand shall He who
 made the sun, and guideth it in its spherea small part of Him beside
 the Wholeshall He not be capable of perceiving all things?
 
 4. _But I_, saith the man, _cannot take heed of all these things at
 once_. And who said you could do this? that you had equal powers with
 God? But, nevertheless, He hath placed at every mans side a Guardian,
 the Genius of each man,[2] who is charged to watch over him, a Genius
 that cannot sleep, nor be deceived. To what greater and more watchful
 guardian could He have committed us? So, when ye have shut the doors,
 and made darkness in the house, remember never to say that ye are alone;
 for ye are not alone, but God is there, and your Genius is there; and
 what need have these of light to mark what ye are doing? To this God it
 were fitting also that ye should swear an oath, as soldiers do to Csar.
 But those indeed who receive pay swear to prefer the safety of Csar
 before all things; but ye, receiving so many and great things, will ye
 not swear? or swearing, will ye not abide by it? And what shall ye
 swear? Never to disobey, never to accuse, never to blame aught that He
 hath given, never unwillingly to do or suffer any necessary thing. Is
 this oath like unto that other? The soldiers swear to esteem no other
 man before Csar; ye to esteem yourselves above all.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 OF PROVIDENCE.
 
 
 1. Marvel not if the other animals have all things that are needful for
 the body without preparation, not alone food and drink, but sleeping
 places also, and they have no need of shoes, nor bedding, nor raiment,
 while all these things must needs be added to us. For these creatures
 exist not for themselves, but for service; it were not expedient that
 they had been made with need of such additions. For, look you, what a
 task it were for us to take thought, not for ourselves alone, but also
 for the sheep and the asses, how they should be clad, how shod, how they
 should eat, how they should drink! But as soldiers are ready for their
 commands, shod, and clothed, and accoutred, and it would be a grievous
 thing if each captain of a thousand must go round and shoe or clothe
 his thousand; so also hath Nature formed the animals that are made for
 service, ready equipped, and needing no further care. And thus one
 little child with a rod will drive the sheep.
 
 2. But now we, neglecting to be grateful, for that we need not attend to
 the animals equally with ourselves, do accuse God for our own lack. And
 yet, by Zeus and all the Gods, there is no one thing in the frame of
 Nature but would give, at least to a reverent and grateful spirit,
 enough for the perceiving of the Providence of God. And to speak of no
 great things now, consider this alone, how milk is produced from grass,
 and cheese from milk, and wool from skins. Who is he that hath made
 these things or planned them? _No one_, sayest thou? O monstrous
 impudence and dullness!
 
 3. Well, then, let the large works of Nature pass, and let us look only
 at her by-works. Is there aught more useless than the hairs on the chin?
 What then? hath she not made such use even of these, that nothing could
 be comelier? hath she not by them distinguished male from female? Doth
 not the nature of every man cry aloud even at a distance, _I am a man,
 thus shalt thou approach me, thus speak to me, look for nothing else;
 behold the tokens!_ And again in women, as Nature hath mingled something
 of softness in the voice, so she hath taken away the hairs. _Nay_, will
 you say? _but every creature should have been left undistinguished, and
 each of us should proclaim_, _I am a man_? But how beautiful is not
 the token, and becoming, and reverend? how much more beautiful than the
 cocks comb? how much more becoming than the lions mane? Wherefore it
 behooveth us to preserve Gods tokens, nor to fling them away, nor to
 confound, as far as in us lies, the things that distinguish the sexes.
 
 4. Are these the only works of Providence in us?but what may suffice
 to rightly praise and tell them? For had we understanding thereof, would
 any other thing better beseem us, either in company or alone, than to
 hymn the Divine Being, and laud Him and rehearse His gracious deeds?
 Should we not, as we dig or plow or eat, sing this hymn to God, _Great
 is God, who hath given us such instruments whereby we shall till the
 earth; great is God, who hath given us hands, and swallowing, and the
 belly; who maketh us to grow without our knowledge, and to breathe while
 we sleep_. These things it were fitting that every man should sing, and
 to chant the greatest and divinest hymns for this, that He hath given us
 the power to observe and consider His works and a Way wherein to
 walk.[1] What then? since the most of you have become blind, should
 there not be one to fill this place, and in the name of all to sing this
 hymn to God? For what else can I do, an old man and lame, than sing
 hymns to God? If I were a nightingale I would do after the nature of a
 nightingale; if a swan, after that of a swan. But now I am a reasoning
 creature, and it behooves me to sing the praise of God: this is my task,
 and this I do, nor, as long as it is granted me, will I ever abandon
 this post. And you, too, I summon to join me in the same song.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 GOD IN MAN.
 
 
 1. God is beneficial. But the Good is also beneficial. It is likely,
 then, that where the essence of God is, there also should be the essence
 of the Good. And what is the essence of God? Flesh? God forbid. A
 property in land? God forbid. Fame? God forbid. Mind, Intelligence,
 Right Reason? Even so. Here, then, once for all, seek the essence of the
 Good. For surely you will in no wise seek it in a plant? _Nay._ Or in
 any unreasoning creature? _Nay._ If, then, it is sought in a reasoning
 creature, wherefore continue to seek it anywhere else than in the
 difference between reasoning and unreasoning creatures?
 
 2. The plants have not so much as the use of appearances, therefore we
 speak not of the Good in their regard. The Good, then, needs the power
 of using appearances. And this alone? Nay; for if so, say then that Good
 and Happiness and Unhappiness are with the lower animals too. But this
 you will not say, and you are right; for though they possessed the use
 of appearances in the highest degree, yet the observing and considering
 of this use they do not possess, and naturally so, for they exist to
 serve others, nor have any supreme object in themselves.[1] For the ass
 was not made for any supreme object in himself? Nay, but he was made
 able to bear, because we had need of a back; and, by Zeus, we had need
 moreover that he should walk; wherefore he received also the power to
 use appearances, else had he not been able to walk. And thereupon the
 matter stopped. For had he also received the observing and considering
 of the use of appearances, it is clear that in reason he could no longer
 have been subject to us, nor have served those needs of ours, but he had
 been our equal and our like.
 
 3. For use is one thing, and observation and study is another. God had
 need of the other animals to use appearances, but of us to observe and
 study appearances. Wherefore it is enough for them to eat and drink, and
 rest and breed, and do whatever else each of them performs, but to us,
 to whom the faculty of observing and studying hath also been given,
 these things are not enough; but unless we act after a certain manner
 and ordinance, and conformably to the nature and constitution of man, we
 shall never attain the end of our being. For where the constitution is
 different, different there also is the task and the end. When,
 therefore, the constitution is one for use alone, then the use, of
 whatever kind it be, is enough; but where there is also observing and
 studying of the use, then, unless the due employment of this faculty be
 added, the end shall never be gained. What then? God hath constituted
 every other animal, one to be eaten, another to serve for tilling the
 land, another to yield cheese, another to some kindred use; for which
 things what need is there of the observing and studying of appearances,
 and the ability to make distinctions in them? But man he hath brought in
 to be a spectator of God and of His works, and not a spectator alone,
 but an interpreter of them. Wherefore it is shameful for a man to begin
 and to end where creatures do that are without Reason; but rather should
 he begin when they begin, and end where Nature ends in ourselves. But
 she ends in contemplation, in observing and studying, in a manner of
 life that is in harmony with Nature. See to it, then, that ye die not
 without having been spectators of these things.
 
 4. Seek, then, the essence of the Good there, where if it be not, thou
 wilt not say that the Good is in any other thing.
 
 5. But what? are not those creatures also works of God? Surely; yet not
 supreme objects, yet not parts of the Gods. But thou art a supreme
 object, thou art a piece of God, thou hast in thee something that is a
 portion of Him. Why, then, art thou ignorant of thy high ancestry? Why
 knowest thou not whence thou camest? Wilt thou not remember, in thine
 eating, who it is that eats, and whom thou dost nourish? in cohabiting,
 who it is that cohabits? in converse, in exercise, in argument, knowest
 thou not that thou art nourishing a God, exercising a God? Unhappy man!
 thou bearest about with thee a God, and knowest it not! Thinkest thou I
 speak of some God of gold and silver, and external to thee? Nay, but in
 thyself thou dost bear Him, and seest not that thou defilest Him with
 thine impure thoughts and filthy deeds. In the presence even of an image
 of God thou hadst not dared to do one of those things which thou dost.
 But in the presence of God Himself within thee, who seeth and heareth
 all things, thou art not ashamed of the things thou dost both desire and
 do, O thou unwitting of thine own nature, and subject to the wrath of
 God?
 
 6. Why, then, do we fear in sending forth a young man from the school
 into some of the business of life, lest he should do wrong in anything,
 and be luxurious or profligate, and lest a wrapping of rags degrade him,
 or fine raiment uplift him? Such a one knoweth not his own God, nor with
 whom he is setting out. But can we have patience with him, saying,
 _Would that I had you with me!_[2] And hast thou not God with thee
 there? or having Him, dost thou seek for any other? or will He speak
 other things to thee than even these?
 
 7. But wert thou a statue of Pheidias, an Athena or Zeus, then wert
 thou mindful both of thyself and of the artist; and if thou hadst any
 consciousness, thou wouldst strive to do nothing unworthy of thy maker
 nor of thyself, nor ever to appear in any unseemly guise. But now that
 Zeus hath made thee, thou carest therefore nothing what kind of creature
 thou showest thyself for? And yet, is the one Artist like the other
 artist, or the one work like the other work? And what kind of work is
 that which hath in itself the faculties that were manifest in the making
 of it? Do not artists work in stone or brass or gold or ivory? and the
 Athena of Pheidias, when she hath once stretched out her hand and
 received upon it the figure of Victory, standeth thus for all time? But
 the works of God have motion and breathing, and the use of appearances
 and the judgment of them. Wilt thou dishonor such a Maker, whose work
 thou art? Nay, for not only did He make thee, but to thee alone did He
 trust and commit thyself. Wilt thou not remember this too, or wilt thou
 dishonor thy charge? But if God had committed some orphan child to thee,
 wouldst thou have neglected it? Now He hath given thee to thyself, and
 saith, _I had none more worthy of trust than thee; keep this man such as
 he was made by naturereverent, faithful, high, unterrified, unshaken
 of passions, untroubled_. And thou wilt not.
 
 8. But they may say: _Whence doth this fellow bring us that eye of scorn
 and solemn looks?_ I have it not yet as I should, For I am yet unbold in
 those things which I have learned and assented to; I yet fear my
 weakness. But let me be bold in them, and then ye shall see such a look,
 such a guise, as behooveth me to wear. Then shall I show you the statue
 when it is perfected and polished. What look ye for?an eye of scorn?
 God forbid! For doth the Zeus in Olympia look scornfully?nay, but his
 glance is steadfast, as becometh him who will say,
 
    None trusts in vain my irrevocable word._Il._ i. 526.
 
 Such will I show myself to youfaithful, reverent, generous,
 untroubled. _Not also, then, deathless, ageless, deceaseless?_ Nay, but
 dying as God, sickening as a God. These I have, these I can; but other
 things I neither have nor can. I will show you the thews of a
 philosopher. And what are these? A pursuit that never fails, an
 avoidance that never miscarries, seemly desire, studious resolve,
 cautious assent.[3] These shall ye see.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 OF DIVINATION.
 
 
 1. When thou goest to inquire of an oracle, remember that what the event
 will be thou knowest not, for this is the thing thou art come to learn
 from the seer; but of what nature it is (if haply thou art a
 philosopher), thou knewest already in coming. For if it be any of those
 things that are not in our own power, it follows of necessity that it
 can be neither good nor evil.
 
 2. Bring, therefore, to the seer neither pursuit nor avoidance, nor go
 before him with trembling, but well knowing that all events are
 indifferent and nothing to thee. For whatever it may be, it shall lie
 with thee to use it nobly; and this no man can prevent. Go, then, with a
 good courage to the Gods as to counselors; and for the rest, when
 anything hath been counseled thee, remember of whom thou hast taken
 counsel, and whom thou wilt be slighting if thou art not obedient.
 
 3. Therefore, as Socrates would have it, go to the oracle for those
 matters only where thy whole inquiry bendeth solely towards the event,
 and where there are no means either from reason or any other art for
 knowing beforehand what is to happen. Thus, when it may be needful to
 share some peril with thy friend or thy country, inquire of no oracle
 whether thou shouldst do the thing. For if the seer should declare that
 the sacrifices are inauspicious, this signifies clearly either death, or
 the loss of some limb, or banishment; yet doth Reason decree that even
 so thou must stand by thy friend, and share thy countrys danger.
 
 4. Mark, therefore, that greater seer, the Pythian, who cast out of his
 temple one that, when his friend was being murdered, did not help
 him.[2]
 
 
 END OF BOOK IV
 
 
 
 
 _BOOK V._
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 THE BEHAVIOUR OF A PHILOSOPHER.
 
 
 1. Ordain for thyself forthwith a certain form and type of conduct,
 which thou shalt maintain both alone and, when it may chance, among men.
 
 2. And for the most part keep silence, or speak only what is necessary,
 and in few words. But when occasion may call thee to speak, then speak,
 but sparingly, and not about any subject at hap-hazard, nor about
 gladiators, nor horse races, nor athletes, nor things to eat and drink,
 which are talked of everywhere; but, above all, not about men, as
 blaming or praising or comparing them.
 
 If, then, thou art able, let thy discourse draw that of the company
 towards what is seemly and good. But if thou find thyself apart among
 men of another sort, keep silence.
 
 3. Laugh not much, nor at many things, nor unrestrainedly.
 
 4. Refuse altogether, if thou canst, to take an oath; if thou canst not,
 then as the circumstances allow.[1]
 
 5. Shun banquets given by strangers and by the vulgar. But if any
 occasion bring thee to them, give strictest heed, lest thou fall
 unawares into the ways of the vulgar. For know that if thy companion be
 corrupt, he who hath conversation with him must needs be corrupted also,
 even if himself should chance to be pure.
 
 6. Hath any of you the art of a lute-player when he takes the lute in
 his hand, so as at once when he hath touched the strings to know which
 are out of tune, and then to tune the instrument?such a gift as
 Socrates had, who in every company could lead those that were with him
 to his own topic? Whence should you have it? but ye must needs be
 carried about hither and thither by the vulgar. And wherefore, then, are
 they stronger than ye? For that they speak their sorry stuff from
 belief; but ye, your fine talk from the lips out. Wherefore it is flat
 and dead; and sickening it is to hear your exhortations and this
 wretched virtue of yours, which is prated of in every quarter. And thus
 the vulgar conquer you. For everywhere belief is mighty, belief is
 invincible. Until then the right opinions are hardened in you; and until
 ye shall have gained a certain strength for your safety, I counsel you
 to mingle cautiously with the vulgar, else every day, like wax in the
 sun, shall whatever hath been written in you in the school be melted
 away.
 
 7. In things that concern the body accept only so far as the bare
 needas in food, drink, clothing, habitation, servants. But all that
 makes for glory or luxury thou must utterly proscribe.
 
 8. Concerning intercourse of the sexes, it is right to be pure before
 marriage, to the best of thy power. But, using it, let a man have to do
 only with what is lawful. Yet be not grievous to those who use such
 pleasures, nor censorious; nor be often putting thyself forward as not
 using them.
 
 9. If one shall bear thee word that such a one hath spoken evil of thee,
 then do not defend thyself against his accusations, but make answer: _He
 little knew my other vices, or he had not mentioned only these_.
 
 10. There is no necessity to go often to the arena, but if occasion
 should take thee there, do not appear ardent on any mans side but thine
 own; that is to say, choose that only to happen which does happen, and
 that the conqueror may be simply he who wins; for so shalt thou not be
 thwarted. But from shouting and laughing at this or that, or violent
 gesticulation, thou must utterly abstain. And when thou art gone away,
 converse little on the things that have passed, so far as they make not
 for thine own correction. For from that it would appear that admiration
 of the spectacle had overcome thee.
 
 11. Go not freely nor indiscriminately to recitations.[2] But if thou
 go, then preserve (yet without being grievous to others) thy gravity and
 calmness.
 
 12. When thou art about to meet any one, especially one of those that
 are thought high in rank, set before thy mind what Socrates or Zeno had
 done in such a case. And so thou wilt not fail to deal as it behooves
 thee with the occasion.
 
 13. When thou goest to any of those that are great in power, set before
 thy mind the case that thou wilt not find him at home, that thou wilt be
 shut out, that the doors may be slammed in thy face, that he will take
 no notice of thee. And if even with these things it behooves thee to go,
 then go, and bear all that happens; and never say to thyself_It was
 not worth this_. For that is the part of the foolish, and of those that
 are offended at outward things.
 
 14. In company, be it far from thee to dwell much and over-measure on
 thine own deeds and dangers. For to dwell on thine own dangers is
 pleasant indeed to thee, but not equally pleasant for others is it to
 hear of the things that have chanced to thee.
 
 15. Be it far from thee to move laughter. For that habit is a slippery
 descent into vulgarity;[3] and it is always enough to relax thy
 neighbors respect for thee.
 
 16. And it is dangerous to approach to vicious conversation. Therefore,
 when anything of the kind may arise, rebuke, if there is opportunity,
 him who approaches thereto. But if not, then at least by silence and
 blushing and grave looks, let it be plain that his talk is disagreeable
 to thee.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 ON HABIT.
 
 
 1. Every skill and faculty is maintained and increased by the
 corresponding acts; as, the faculty of walking by walking, of running by
 running. If you will read aloud well, then do it constantly; if you will
 write, then write. But when you have not read aloud for thirty days
 together, but done something else, you shall see the result. Thus, if
 you have lain down for ten days, then rise up and endeavor to walk a
 good distance, and you shall see how your legs are enfeebled. In
 general, then, if you would make yourself skilled in anything, then do
 it; and if you would refrain from anything, then do it not, but use
 yourself to do rather some other thing instead of it.
 
 2. And thus it is in spiritual things also. When thou art wrathful, know
 that not this single evil hath happened to thee, but that thou hast
 increased the aptness to it, and, as it were, poured oil upon the fire.
 When thou art overcome in passion, think not that this defeat is all;
 but thou hast nourished thine incontinence, and increased it. For it is
 impossible but that aptitudes and faculties should spring up where they
 were not before, or spread and grow mightier, by the corresponding acts.
 And thus, surely, do also, as the philosopher says, the infirmities of
 the soul grow up. For when thou hast once been covetous of money, if
 Reason, which leadeth to a sense of the vice, be called to aid, then
 both the desire is set at rest, and our ruling faculty is
 re-established, as it was in the beginning. But if thou bring no remedy
 to aid, then shall the soul return no more to the first estate; but when
 next excited by the corresponding appearance, shall be kindled to desire
 even more quickly than before. And when this is continually happening,
 the soul becomes callous in the end, and through its infirmity the love
 of money is strengthened. For he that hath had a fever, when the illness
 hath left him, is not what he was before his fever, unless he have been
 entirely healed. And somewhat on this wise also it happens in the
 affection of the soul: certain traces and scars are left in it, the
 which if a man do not wholly eradicate, when he hath been again scoured
 on the same place, it shall make no longer scars, but sores.
 
 3. Wouldst thou, then, be no longer of a wrathful temper? Then do not
 nourish the aptness to it, give it nothing that will increase it, be
 tranquil from the outset, and number the days when thou hast not been
 wrathful. _I have not been wrathful now for one, nor for two, nor for
 three days_; but if thou have saved thirty days, then sacrifice to God.
 For the aptness is at first enfeebled, and then destroyed. _To-day I was
 not vexed, nor to-morrow, nor for two or three months together; but I
 was heedful when anything happened to move me thus._ Know that thou art
 in good case. To-day, when I saw a fair woman, I did not say to myself,
 _Would that one could possess her_; nor, _Happy is her husband_, for he
 who saith this saith also, _Happy is her paramour_; nor do I picture to
 my mind what should follow. But I stroke my head, and say, _Well done,
 Epictetus! you have solved a fine sophism, finer by far than the master
 sophism_. But if she were also willing and consenting, and sent to me,
 and if she also laid hold of me, and drew near to me, and I should yet
 restrain myself and conquer, this were indeed then a sophism above the
 Liar, above the Quiescent. Verily, for this a mans spirit may rightly
 swell, and not for propounding the master sophism.[1]
 
 4. How, then, may this come to pass? Resolve at last to seek thine own
 commendation, to appear fair in the eyes of God; desire to become pure
 with thine own pure self, and with God. Then when thou shalt fall in
 with any appearance such as we have spoken of, what saith Plato? _Go to
 the purifying sacrifices, go and pray in the temples of the
 protecting Gods_.[2] It shall even suffice if thou seek the company of
 good and wise men, and try thyself by one of them, whether he be one of
 the living or of the dead.
 
 5. By opposing these remedies thou shalt conquer the appearance, nor be
 led captive by it. But at the outset, be not swept away by the vehemence
 of it; but say, _Await me a little, thou appearance; let me see what
 thou art, and with what thou hast to do; let me approve thee_. And then
 permit it not to lead thee forward, and to picture to thee what should
 follow, else it shall take possession of thee, and carry thee
 whithersoever it will. But rather bring in against it some other fair
 and noble appearance, and therewithal cast out this vile one. And if
 thou use to exercise thyself in this way, thou shalt see what shoulders
 and nerves and sinews thou wilt have! But now we have only wordiness,
 and nothing more.
 
 6. This is the true athlete,[3] he who exerciseth himself against such
 appearances. Hold, unhappy man! be not swept away. Great is the contest,
 divine the task, for kingship, for freedom, for prosperity, for
 tranquillity. Be mindful of God, call Him to be thy helper and defender,
 as men at sea call upon the Dioscuri in a storm.[4] For what greater
 tempest is there than that which proceedeth from appearances, that
 mightily overcome and expel the Reason? Yea, a storm itself, what is it
 but an appearance? For, take away only the dread of death, and bring as
 many thunderings and lightnings as thou wilt, and thou shalt see what
 fair weather and calm there will be in the ruling faculty. But if having
 been once defeated, thou shalt say, _The next time I will conquer_; and
 then the same thing over again, be sure that in the end thou wilt be
 brought to such a sorry and feeble state that henceforth thou wilt not
 so much as know that thou art sinning; but thou wilt begin to make
 excuses for the thing, and then confirm that saying of Hesiod to be
 true:
 
   With ills unending strives the putter off.
                              _Works and Days_, 411.
 
 7. What then? can a man make this resolve, and so stand up faultless? He
 cannot; but this much he canto be ever straining towards
 faultlessness. For happy it were if, by never relaxing this industrious
 heed, we shall rid ourselves of at least a few of our faults. But now,
 when thou sayest, _From to-morrow I shall be heedful_, know that this is
 what thou art saying:_To-day I shall be shameless, importunate,
 abject; it shall be in others power to afflict me; to-day I shall be
 wrathful, envious_. Lo, to how many vices dost thou give place! But if
 aught be well to-morrow, how much better to-day? if to-morrow suit, how
 much better to-day? Yea, and for this, too, that thou mayest have the
 power to-morrow, and not again put it off till the third day.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 ON DISPUTATION.
 
 
 1. What things a man must have learned in order to be able to reason
 well have been accurately defined by our philosophers; but in the
 fitting use of them we are wholly unexercised. Give any one of us whom
 ye please some ignorant man for a disputant, and he shall find no way to
 deal with him; but if, when he hath moved him a little, the man answer
 beside the purpose, he is no longer able to manage him, but either he
 will revile him, or mock him, and say, _He is an ignorant fellow;
 nothing can be done with him_.
 
 2. But a guide, when he hath found one straying from the way, leads him
 into the proper road, and does not mock him or revile him, and then go
 away. And do thou show such a man the truth, and thou shalt see that he
 will follow it. But so long as thou dost not show it, mock him not, but
 be sensible rather of thine own incapacity.
 
 3. But what? this business of instruction is not very safe at present,
 and least of all in Rome; for he who pursues it will of course feel
 constrained not to do it in a corner, but he must go to some man of
 consular rank, it may be, or some rich man, and inquire of him: Sir, can
 you tell me to whom you have committed the care of your horses?
 _Surely._ Was it, then, to any chance-comer and one inexperienced about
 horses? _By no means._ Well, then, to whom are your gold and silver
 vessels and raiment entrusted? _Neither are these committed to any
 chance person._ And your body, have you already sought out one to whom
 to commit the care of it? _How not?_ And that also one who is
 experienced in training and medicine? _Assuredly._ Whether, now, are
 these the best things you have, or do you possess aught that is better
 than all of them? _What thing do you mean?_ That, by Zeus, which useth
 all these, and approveth each of them and taketh counsel? _Is it the
 soul, then, that you mean?_ You have conceived me rightly; it is even
 this. _Truly I hold that I possess in this something much better than
 everything else._ Can you then declare to us in what manner you have
 taken thought for your soul? for it is not likely that a wise man like
 yourself, and one of repute in the State, would overlook the best think
 you possess, and use no diligence or design about it, but leave it
 neglected and perishing? _Surely not._ But do you provide for it
 yourself? and have you learned the way from another, or discovered it
 yourself?
 
 4. And then at last there is danger lest he say first, _Good sir, what
 is this to you? who are you?_ and then, if you persist in troubling him,
 that he may lift up his hands and smite you. Once I too was an admirer
 of this method until I fell into these difficulties.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 THAT WE SHOULD BE SLOW IN ACCEPTING PLEASURE.
 
 
 1. When thou hast received the appearance of some pleasure, then, as in
 other things, guard thyself lest thou be carried away by it, but delay
 with thyself a little, and let the thing await thee for a while. Then
 bethink thyself of the two periods of time, one when thou shalt be
 enjoying the pleasure, the other, when, having enjoyed it, thou shalt
 afterwards repent of it and reproach thyself. And set on the other side
 how thou shalt rejoice and commend thyself if thou abstain.
 
 2. But if it seem reasonable to thee to do the thing, beware lest thou
 have been conquered by the flattery and the sweetness and the allurement
 of it. But set on the other side how much better were the consciousness
 of having won that victory.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 THAT WE SHOULD BE OPEN IN OUR DEALINGS.
 
 
 In doing aught which thou hast clearly discerned as right to do, seek
 never to avoid being seen in the doing of it, even though the multitude
 should be destined to form some wrong opinion concerning it. For if thou
 dost not right, avoid the deed itself. But if rightly, why fear those
 who will wrongly rebuke thee?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 THAT HALF TRUE MAY BE ALL FALSE.
 
 
 As the sayings, _It is day_, _It is night_, are wholly justifiable if
 viewed disjunctively, but not if viewed together, even so at a feast, to
 pick out the largest portion for ones self may be justifiable, if we
 look to the needs of the body alone, but is unjustifiable if viewed as
 it concerns the preservation of the proper community in the feast.
 Therefore, in eating with another person, remember not to look only at
 the value for the body of the things that are set before thee, but to
 preserve also the reverence due to the giver of the feast.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 THAT EACH MAN PLAY HIS OWN PART.
 
 
 1. If thou hast assumed a part beyond thy power to play, then thou hast
 both come to shame in that, and missed one thou couldst have well
 performed.
 
 2. And some one having inquired, _How then, shall each of us perceive
 what character he befits?_ Whence, said Epictetus, doth the bull alone,
 when the lion approacheth, discover his own capacity, and advance to
 defend the whole herd? It is clear that with the capacity is ever joined
 the perception of the same, and thus, whoever of us may possess a like
 capacity will not be ignorant of it. But a bull is not made in a moment,
 nor is a man of generous spirit; but we must have preparation and
 winter-training,[1] and not lightly rush upon things that do not concern
 us.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 THAT WE SHOULD BE CAREFUL OF THE SOUL AS OF THE BODY.
 
 
 In going about, you are careful not to step upon a nail or to twist your
 foot. Care thus also lest you injure your ruling faculty. And if we
 observe this in each thing we do, we shall the more safely undertake it.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 THE MEASURE OF GAIN.
 
 
 The measure of gain for each man is the body, as the foot is for the
 shoe. Take your stand on this, and you shall preserve the measure. But
 if you transgress it, you must thenceforth be borne, as it were, down a
 steep. And so it is with the shoe, for if you will go beyond the measure
 of the foot, the shoe will be first gilded, then dyed purple, then
 embroidered. For that which hath once transgressed its measure hath no
 longer any limit.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 THE WORTH OF WOMEN.
 
 
 From the age of fourteen years women are flattered and worshiped by
 men. Seeing thus that there is nothing else for them but to serve the
 pleasure of men, they begin to beautify themselves, and to place all
 their hopes in this. It were well, then, that they should perceive
 themselves to be prized for nothing else than modesty and decorum.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI.
 
 A DULL NATURE.
 
 
 It betokens a dull nature to be greatly occupied in matters that concern
 the body, as to be much concerned about exercising ones self, or
 eating, or drinking, or other bodily acts. But these things should be
 done by the way, and all attention be given to the mind.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII.
 
 OF ADORNMENT OF THE PERSON.
 
 
 1. A certain young man, a rhetorician, having come to Epictetus with his
 hair dressed in an unusually elaborate way, and his other attire much
 adorned, Tell me, said Epictetus, think you not that some dogs are
 beautiful, and some horses, and so of the other animals?
 
 I do think it, said he.
 
 And men tooare not some beautiful and some ill-favored?
 
 How otherwise?
 
 Whether, then, do we call each of these beautiful for the same reasons
 and in the same kind, or each for something proper to itself? And you
 shall see the matter thus: Inasmuch as we observe a dog to be formed by
 nature for one end, and a horse for another, and, let us say, a
 nightingale for another, we may in general say, not unreasonably, that
 each of them is then beautiful when it is excellent according to its own
 nature; but since the nature of each is different, different also, it
 seems to me, is the manner of being beautiful in each. Is it not so?
 
 He acknowledged that it was.
 
 Therefore, that which maketh a dog beautiful maketh a horse ill-favored;
 and that which maketh a horse beautiful, a dog ill-favored; if, indeed,
 their natures are different?
 
 So it seems.
 
 And that which maketh a beautiful Pancratiast,[1] the same maketh a
 wrestler not good, and a runner utterly laughable? And he who is
 beautiful for the Pentathlon is very bad for wrestling?
 
 It is so, he said.
 
 What is it, then, that makes a man beautiful? Is it not that which, in
 its kind, makes also a dog or a horse beautiful?
 
 It is that, he answered.
 
 What, then, makes a dog beautiful? The presence of the virtue of a dog.
 And a horse? The presence of the virtue of a horse. And what, then, a
 man? Is it not also the presence of the virtue of a man? And, O youth,
 if thou wouldst be beautiful, do thou labor to perfect this, the virtue
 of a human being. But what is it? Look whom you praise when you praise
 any without affectionis it the righteous or the unrighteous?
 
 The righteous.
 
 Is it the temperate or the profligate?
 
 The temperate.
 
 Is it the continent or the incontinent?
 
 The continent.
 
 Then making yourself such a one as you praise, you will know that you
 are making yourself beautiful; but so long as you neglect these things,
 though you sought out every device to appear beautiful, you must of
 necessity be ugly.
 
 2. For thou art not flesh and hair, but a Will: if thou keep this
 beautiful, then wilt thou be beautiful. But so far I dare not tell thee
 that thou art ugly, for I think thou wilt more easily bear to hear
 anything else than this. But see what Socrates saith to Alcibiades, the
 most beautiful and blooming of men: _Endeavor, then, to be beautiful_;
 and what saith he? _Curl thy locks, and pluck out the hairs of thy
 legs?_ God forbid. But _Set thy Will in order, cast out evil doctrines_.
 
 And how then shall we deal with the body?
 
 As nature made it. Another hath cared for this; commit it to Him.
 
 But what? Shall the body then be uncleansed?
 
 God forbid. But that which thou art and wast made by Nature, cleanse
 this; let a man be clean as a man, a woman as a woman, a child as a
 child.
 
 3. For we ought not even by the aspect of the body to scare away the
 multitude from philosophy; but by his body, as in all other things, a
 philosopher should show himself cheerful, and free from troubles.
 _Behold, friends, how I have nothing and need nothing; behold how I am
 homeless and landless, and an exile_, if so it chance, _and hearthless,
 and yet I live more free from troubles than all the lordly and the rich.
 But look on my body, too; ye see that it is not the worse for my hard
 life._ But if one saith this to me, having the countenance and garb of a
 condemned criminal, what God shall persuade me to approach to philosophy
 which makes such men as this? God forbid! I would not, were it even to
 become a sage.
 
 4. I, indeed, by the Gods, had rather a young man in his first movement
 towards philosophy came to me with his hair curled than disheveled and
 foul. For a certain impression of the beautiful is to be seen in him,
 and an aim at what is becoming; and to the thing wherein it seemeth to
 him to lie, there he applies his art. Thenceforth it only needs to show
 him its true place, and to say, _Young man, thou seekest the beautiful,
 and thou dost well. Know, then, that it flourishes there where thy
 Reason is; there seek it where are thy likes and dislikes, thy pursuits
 and avoidances, for this is what thou hast in thyself of choice and
 precious, but the body is by nature mud. Why dost thou spend thy labor
 upon it in vain? for that the body is naught, Time shall certainly teach
 thee, though it teach thee nothing else._ But if one come to me foul and
 filthy, and a mustache down to the knees, what have I to say to him?
 with what image or likeness can I draw him on? For with what that is
 like unto Beauty hath he ever busied himself, so as I may set him on
 another course, and say, _Not here is Beauty, but there_? Will you have
 me tell him, _Beauty consists not in being befouled, but in the Reason_?
 For doth he even seek Beauty? hath he any impression of it in his mind?
 Go, and reason with a hog, that he shall not roll himself in the mud.
 
 5. Behold a youth worthy of lovebehold an old man worthy to love, and
 to be loved in return; to whom one may commit his sons, his daughters,
 to be taught; to whom young men may come, if it please youthat he may
 deliver lectures to them on a dunghill! God forbid. Every extravagance
 arises from something in human nature, but this is near to being one
 that is not human.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII.
 
 WHY WE SHOULD BEAR WITH WRONG.
 
 
 When some one may do you an injury, or speak ill of you, remember that
 he either does it or speaks it believing that it is right and meet for
 him to do so. It is not possible, then, that he can follow the thing
 that appears to you, but the thing that appears to him. Wherefore, if it
 appear evil to him, it is he that is injured, being deceived. For also
 if any one should take a true consequence to be false, it is not the
 consequence that is injured, but he which is deceived. Setting out,
 then, from these opinions, you will bear a gentle mind towards any man
 who may revile you. For, say on each occasion, _So it appeared to him_.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV.
 
 THAT EVERYTHING HATH TWO HANDLES.
 
 
 Every matter hath two handlesby the one it may be carried; by the
 other, not. If thy brother do thee wrong, take not this thing by the
 handle, _He wrongs me_; for that is the handle whereby it may not be
 carried. But take it rather by the handle, _He is my brother, nourished
 with me_; and thou wilt take it by a handle whereby it may be carried.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV.
 
 ON CERTAIN FALSE CONCLUSIONS.
 
 
 There is no true conclusion in these reasonings: _I am richer than thou,
 therefore I am better_: _I am more eloquent than thou, therefore I am
 better_. But the conclusions are rather these: _I am richer than thou,
 therefore my wealth is better_: _I am more eloquent than thou, therefore
 my speech is better_. But thou art not wealth, and thou art not speech.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI.
 
 PERCEPTION AND JUDGMENT.
 
 
 1. Doth a man bathe himself quickly? Then, say not, _Wrongly_, but
 _Quickly_. Doth he drink much wine? Then say not, _Wrongly_, but _Much_.
 For whence do you know if it were ill done till you have understood his
 opinion?
 
 2. Thus it shall not befall you to assent to any other things than
 those whereof you are truly and directly sensible.[1]
 
 3. What is the cause of assenting to anything? The appearance that it is
 so. But if it appear to be not so, it is impossible to assent to it.
 Wherefore? For that this is the nature of the mind, to receive the true
 with favor, the false with disfavor, and the uncertain with
 indifference. The proof of this? Be sure, if you can, at this moment,
 that it is night. You cannot. Cease to be sure that it is day. You
 cannot. Be sure that the stars are odd in number, or that they are even.
 You cannot. When, therefore, any man shall assent to what is false, know
 that he had no will to consent to falsehood; for, as saith Plato, no
 soul is willingly deprived of the truth, but the false appeared to it to
 be true. Come, then, what have we in actions corresponding to this true
 and false? The seemly and the unseemly, the profitable and the
 unprofitable, that which concerns me and that which doth not concern me,
 and such like. Can any man think that a certain thing is for his profit,
 and not elect to do it? He cannot. How, then, is it with her who saith
 
   And will I know the evils I shall do,
    But wrath is lord of all my purposes?
                               _Medea_, 1079.
 
 For, did she hold this very thing, to gratify her wrath and avenge
 herself on her husband more profitable than to spare her children? Even
 so: but she was deceived. Show her clearly that she was deceived, and
 she will not do it; but so long as you show it not, what else hath she
 to follow than the thing as it appears to her? Nothing. Wherefore, then,
 have you indignation with her, that the unhappy wretch has gone astray
 concerning the greatest things, and has become a viper instead of a
 human being? If anything, will you not rather pity, as we pity the blind
 and the lame, those that are blinded and lamed in the chiefest of their
 faculties?
 
 4. So that all these great and dreadful deeds have this same origin
 in the appearance of the thing?
 
 The same, and no other. The _Iliad_ is nought but appearance, and the
 use of appearances. The thing that appeared to Paris was the carrying
 off of the wife of Menelaus; the thing that appeared to Helen was to
 accompany him. Had it, then, appeared to Menelaus to be sensible that it
 was a gain to be deprived of such a wife, what would have happened? Not
 only had there been no _Iliad_, but no _Odyssey_ neither.
 
 On such a little thing do such great ones hang?
 
 But what talk is this of great things? Wars and seditions and
 destructions of many men, and overthrow of cities? And what is there of
 great in these? Nothing. For what is there of greatness in the deaths
 of many oxen and sheep, and the burning or overthrow of many nests of
 swallows or storks?
 
 But are these things like unto those?
 
 They are most like. The bodies of men are destroyed, and the bodies of
 oxen and of sheep. The dwellings of men are burned, and the nests of
 storks. What is there great, what is there awful in this? Or show me
 wherein differeth the dwelling of a man, as a dwelling, from the nest of
 a stork, save that the one buildeth his little houses of planks and
 tiles and bricks, and the other of sticks and mud?
 
 Are a stork and a man, then, alike?
 
 What say you? In body they are most like.
 
 Doth a man, then, differ in no respect from a stork?
 
 God forbid; but in these matters there is no difference.
 
 Wherein, then, doth he differ?
 
 Seek, and you shall find that in another thing there is a difference.
 Look if it be not in the observing and studying of what he doth; look if
 it be not in his social instinct, in his faith, his reverence, his
 steadfastness, his understanding. Where, then, is the great Good or Evil
 for man? There, where the difference is. If this be saved, and abide, as
 it were, in a fortress, and reverence be not depraved, nor faith, nor
 understanding, then is the man also saved. But if one of these things
 perish, or be taken by storm, then doth the man also perish. And in this
 it is that great actions are done. It was a mighty downfall, they say,
 for Paris, when the Greeks came, and when they sacked Troy, and when his
 brothers perished. Not so: for through anothers act can no man
 fallthat was the sacking of the storks nests. But the downfall was
 then when he lost reverence and faith, when he betrayed hospitality and
 violated decorum. When was the fall of Achilles? When Patroclus died?
 God forbid; but when he was wrathful, when he bewept the loss of his
 girl, when he forgot that he was there not to win mistresses but to make
 war. These, for men, are downfall and storming and overthrow, when right
 opinions are demolished or depraved.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII.
 
 THAT THE PHILOSOPHER SHALL EXHIBIT TO THE VULGAR DEEDS, NOT WORDS.
 
 
 1. Thou shalt never proclaim thyself a philosopher, nor speak much
 among the vulgar of the philosophic maxims; but do the things that
 follow from the maxims. For example, do not discourse at a feast upon
 how one ought to eat, but eat as one ought. For remember that even so
 Socrates everywhere banished ostentation, so that men used to come to
 him desiring that he would recommend them to teachers of philosophy, and
 he brought them away and did so, so well did he bear to be overlooked.
 
 2. And if among the vulgar discourse should arise concerning some maxim
 of thy philosophy, do thou, for the most part, keep silence, for there
 is great risk that thou straightway vomit up what thou hast not
 digested. And when some one shall say to thee, _Thou knowest naught_,
 and it bites thee not, then know that thou hast begun the work.
 
 3. And as sheep do not bring their food to the shepherds to show how
 much they have eaten, but digesting inwardly their provender, bear
 outwardly wool and milk, even so do not thou, for the most part, display
 the maxims before the vulgar, but rather the works which follow from
 them when they are digested.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII.
 
 ASCESIS.
 
 
 When you have adapted the body to a frugal way of living, do not
 flatter yourself on that, nor if you drink only water, say, on every
 opportunity, _I drink only water_. And if you desire at any time to
 inure yourself to labor and endurance, do it to yourself and not unto
 the world. And do not embrace the statues; but some time when you are
 exceedingly thirsty take a mouthful of cold water, and spit it out, and
 say nothing about it.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIX.
 
 TOKENS.
 
 
 1. The position and token of the vulgar: he looks never to himself for
 benefit or hurt, but always to outward things. The position and
 character of the philosopher: he looks for benefit or hurt only to
 himself.
 
 2. The tokens of one that is making advance: he blames none, he praises
 none, he accuses none, he complains of none; he speaks never of himself,
 as being somewhat, or as knowing aught. When he is thwarted or hindered
 in aught, he accuseth himself. If one should praise him, he laughs at
 him in his sleeve; if one should blame him, he makes no defense. He goes
 about like the sick and feeble, fearing to move the parts that are
 settling together before they have taken hold. He hath taken out of
 himself all pursuit, and hath turned all avoidance to things in our
 power which are contrary to nature. Toward all things he will keep his
 inclination slack. If he is thought foolish or unlearned, he regardeth
 it not. In a word, he watches himself as he would a treacherous enemy.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XX.
 
 THAT THE LOGICAL ART IS NECESSARY.
 
 
 1. Since Reason is that by which all other things are organized and
 perfected,[1] it is meet that itself should not remain unorganized. But
 by what shall it be organized? For it is clear that this must be either
 by itself or by some other thing. But this must be Reason; or something
 else which is greater than Reason, which is impossible.
 
 2. Yea, one may say, but it is more pressing to cure our vices, and
 the like.
 
 You desire, then, to hear something of these things? Hear then; but if
 you shall say to me, _I know not if you are reasoning truly or falsely?_
 or if I utter something ambiguous, and you shall bid me distinguish,
 shall I lose patience with you and tell you, _It is more pressing to
 cure our vices than chop logic_?
 
 3. For this reason I think the logical are set at the beginning of our
 study, even as before the measuring of corn we set the examination of
 the measure. For unless we shall first establish what is a modius[2] and
 what is a balance, how shall we be able to measure or weigh anything?
 
 4. In this case, then, if you have not understood and accurately
 investigated the criterion of all other things, and that through which
 they are understood, shall we be able to investigate and understand
 anything else? and how could we? _Yea, but a modius is a wooden thing,
 and barren._ But it measures corn. _And logic is also barren._ As
 regards this, indeed, we shall see. But even if one should grant this,
 it sufficeth that logic is that which distinguishes and investigates
 other things, and, as one may say, measures and weighs them. Who saith
 these things? is it Chrysippus alone and Zeno and Cleanthes? but doth
 not Antisthenes[3] say it? And who wrote that the investigation of terms
 is the beginning of education?was it not Socrates? and of whom doth
 Xenophon write that he began with the investigation of terms, what each
 of them signified?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXI.
 
 GRAMMARIAN OR SAGE.
 
 
 When some one may exalt himself in that he is able to understand and
 expound the works of Chrysippus, say then to thyself: If Chrysippus had
 not written obscurely, this man would have had nothing whereon to exalt
 himself. But I, what do I desire? Is it not to learn to understand
 Nature and to follow her? I inquire, then, who can expound Nature to me,
 and hearing that Chrysippus can, I betake myself to him. But I do not
 understand his writings, therefore I seek an expounder for them. And so
 far there is nothing exalted. But when I have found the expounder, it
 remaineth for me to put in practice what he declares to me, and in this
 alone is there anything exalted. But if I shall admire the bare
 exposition, what else have I made of myself than a grammarian instead of
 a philosopher, save, indeed, that the exposition is of Chrysippus and
 not of Homer? When, therefore, one may ask me to lecture on the
 philosophy of Chrysippus, I shall rather blush when I am not able to
 show forth works of a like nature and in harmony with the words.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXII.
 
 ACCOMPLISHMENTS.
 
 
 1. The clearer be the characters in which a book is writ, the more
 pleasantly and conveniently shall any man read it. Thus also a man shall
 listen more conveniently to any discourse if it be conveyed in
 well-ordered and graceful words. Be it not said, then, that there is no
 faculty of expression, for this is the thought of a man both impious and
 cowardly[1]impious, for he holds in disesteem the gracious gifts of
 God, as if he would take away the serviceable faculty of seeing, or of
 hearing, or indeed this of speaking. Did God give the eyes for nothing?
 And was it for nothing that He mingled in them a spirit of such might
 and cunning as to reach a long way off and receive the impression of
 visible formsa messenger so swift and faithful? Was it for nothing
 that He gave the intervening air such efficacy, and made it elastic, so
 that being, in a manner, strained,[2] our vision should traverse it? Was
 it for nothing that He made Light, without which there were no benefit
 of any other thing?
 
 2. Man, be not unthankful for these things, nor yet unmindful of better
 things. For seeing and hearing, and, by Zeus, for life itself, and the
 things that work together to maintain it, for dried fruits, for wine,
 for oil, do thou give thanks to God. But remember that He hath given
 thee another thing which is better than all thesethat, namely, which
 uses them, which approves them, which taketh account of the worth of
 each. For what is that which declareth concerning all these faculties
 how much each of them is worth? Is it the faculty itself? Heard you
 ever the faculty of vision tell aught concerning itself? or that of
 hearing? or wheat, or barley, or a horse, or a dog? Nay, but as
 ministers and slaves are they appointed, to serve the faculty which
 makes use of appearances. And if you would learn how much any of them is
 worth, of whom will you inquire? who shall give answer? How then shall
 any other faculty be greater than this, which both useth the others as
 its servants, and the same approveth each of them and declareth
 concerning them? For which of them knoweth what itself is, and what it
 is worth? Which of them knoweth when it behooves to make use of it, and
 when not? What is that which openeth and closeth the eyes, turning them
 away from things which they should not behold, and guiding them towards
 other things? Is it the faculty of vision? Nay, but the faculty of the
 Will. What is that which closeth and openeth the ears?that in
 obedience to which they become busy and curious, or again, unmoved by
 what they hear? Is it the faculty of hearing? It is no other than that
 of the Will.
 
 3. Being then so great a faculty, and set over all the rest, let it come
 to us and tell us that the best of existing things is the flesh! Not
 even if the flesh itself affirmed that it was the best, would any man
 have patience with it. Now what is it, Epicurus, which declares this
 doctrine, that the flesh is best, which wrote concerning the _End of
 Being_, and on _Laws of Nature_, and on the _Canon of Truth_?which let
 thy beard grow? which wrote, when dying, that it was spending its last
 day and a happy one?[3] Is it the flesh or the Will? Wilt thou affirm,
 then, that thou hast aught better than the Will? Nay, but art thou not
 madso blind, in truth, and deaf as thou art?
 
 4. What then? Shall any man contemn the other faculties? God forbid!
 Doth any man say that there is no use or eminence in the faculty of
 eloquence? God forbidthat were senseless, impious, thankless towards
 God. But to each thing its true worth. For there is a certain use in an
 ass, but not so much as in an ox; and in a dog, but not so much as in a
 slave; and in a slave, but not so much as in a citizen; and in citizens,
 but not so much as in governors. Yet not because other things are better
 is the use which anything affords to be contemned. There is a certain
 worth in the faculty of eloquence, but not so much as in the Will. When,
 then, I speak thus, let no man deem that I would have you neglect the
 power of eloquence, for I would not have you neglect your eyes, or ears,
 or hands, or feet, or raiment, or shoes. But if one ask me which is,
 then, the best of existing things, what shall I say? The faculty of
 eloquence I cannot say, but that of the Will, when it is made right. For
 this is that which useth the other, and all the other faculties, both
 small and great. When this is set right, a man that was not good becomes
 good; when it is not right, the man becomes evil. This is that whereby
 we fail or prosperwhereby we blame others, or approve them; the
 neglect of which is the misery, and the care of it the happiness, of
 mankind.
 
 5. But to take away the faculty of eloquence, and to say that there is
 in truth no such faculty, is not only the part of a thankless man toward
 Him who hath given it, but also of a cowardly. For such a one seemeth to
 me to fear lest if there be any faculty of this kind we shall not be
 able to despise it. Such are they also which say that there is no
 difference between beauty and ugliness. Then were a man to be affected
 in like manner on seeing Thersites and Achilles, or on seeing Helen and
 any common woman?[4] Truly, a thought of fools and boors, and of men who
 know not the nature of each thing, but fear lest, if one perceive the
 difference, he shall be straightway swept away and overpowered by it.
 But the great thing is thisto leave to each the faculty that it hath,
 and so leaving it to scan the worth of the faculty, and to learn what is
 the greatest of existing things; and everywhere to pursue this, and be
 zealous about this, making all other things accessory to this, albeit,
 according to our powers, not neglecting even these. For of the eyes also
 must we take care, yet not as of the best thing; yet of these, too, by
 the very exercise of the best thing; since that shall in no other wise
 subsist according to Nature save by wise dealing in these matters, and
 preferring certain things to others.
 
 6. But what is done in the world? As if a man journeying to his own
 country should pass by an excellent inn, and the inn being agreeable to
 him, should stay, and abide in it. Man, thou hast forgotten thy purpose;
 thy journeying was not to this, but through this. _But this is
 pleasant._ And how many other inns are pleasant, and how many meadows?
 yet merely for passing through. But thy business is this, to arrive in
 thy native country, to remove the fears of thy kinsfolk, to do, thyself,
 the duties of a citizen, to marry, to beget children, to fill the
 customary offices. For thou art not come into this world to choose out
 its pleasanter places, but to dwell in those where thou wast born, and
 whereof thou wast appointed to be a citizen. And so in some wise it is
 with this matter. Since, by the aid of speech and such like deliverance,
 we must come to our aim, and purify the Will, and order aright the
 faculty which makes use of appearances; and it is necessary that this
 deliverance of the doctrines come to pass by a certain use of speech,
 and with a certain art and trenchancy of expression, there are some
 which are taken captive by these things themselves, and abide in
 themone in the gift of speech, one in syllogisms, one in sophisms, one
 in some such another of these inns, and there they linger and molder
 away, as though they were fallen among the Sirens.
 
 7. Man, thy business was to make thyself fit to use the appearances that
 encounter thee according to Nature, not missing what thou pursuest, nor
 falling into what thou wouldst avoid, never failing of good fortune, nor
 overtaken of ill fortune, free, unhindered, uncompelled, agreeing with
 the governance of Zeus, obedient unto the same, and well-pleased
 therein; blaming none, charging none, able of thy whole soul to utter
 these lines:
 
   Lead me, O Zeus, and thou, Destiny!
 
 Then, having this for thy business, if some little matter of eloquence
 please thee, or certain speculations, wilt thou stay and abide in them,
 and elect to settle in them, forgetting all that is at home? and wilt
 thou say, _These things are admirable_? Who saith they are not
 admirable? but for passing through, like inns. What should hinder one
 that spoke like Demosthenes to be unfortunate? or one that could resolve
 syllogisms like Chrysippus to be miserable, to grieve, to envy; in a
 word, to be troubled and unhappy? Nothing. Thou seest now that all these
 things are but inns, and of no worth; but our business was another
 thing. When I say these things to certain persons, they think I am
 rejecting all care about language or speculation. But I do not reject
 this; I reject the endless occupation with them, the putting our hopes
 in them. If a man by this teaching injureth those who hear him, reckon
 me also among those who do this injury. For I cannot, in order to please
 you, see that one thing is best and chief of all, and say that another
 is.[5]
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIII.
 
 CONSTANCY.
 
 
 Abide in the precepts as in laws which it were impious to transgress.
 And whatsoever any man may say of thee, regard it not; for neither is
 this anything of thine own.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIV.
 
 HOW LONG?
 
 
 1. How long wilt thou delay to hold thyself worthy of the best things,
 and to transgress in nothing the decrees of Reason? Thou hast received
 the maxims by which it behooves thee to live; and dost thou live by
 them? What teacher dost thou still look for to whom to hand over the
 task of thy correction? Thou art no longer a boy, but already a man full
 grown. If, then, thou art neglectful and sluggish, and ever making
 resolve after resolve, and fixing one day after another on which thou
 wilt begin to attend to thyself, thou wilt forget that thou art making
 no advance, but wilt go on as one of the vulgar sort, both living and
 dying.
 
 2. Now, at last, therefore hold thyself worthy to live as a man of full
 age and one who is pressing forward, and let everything that appeareth
 the best be to thee as an inviolable law. And if any toil or pleasure or
 reputation or the loss of it be laid upon thee, remember that now is the
 contest, here already are the Olympian games, and there is no deferring
 them any longer, and that in a single day and in a single trial ground
 is to be lost or gained.
 
 3. It was thus that Socrates made himself what he was, in all things
 that befell him having regard to no other thing than Reason. But thou,
 albeit thou be yet no Socrates, yet as one that would be Socrates, so it
 behooveth thee to live.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXV.
 
 PARTS OF PHILOSOPHY.
 
 
 1. The first and most necessary point in philosophy is the use of the
 precepts, for example, not to lie. The second is the proof of these, as,
 Whence it comes that it is wrong to lie? The third is that which giveth
 confirmation and coherence to the others, such as, Whence it comes that
 this is proof? for what is proof? what is consequence? what is
 contradiction? what is truth? what is falsehood?
 
 2. Thus the third point is necessary through the second, and the second
 through the first. But the most necessary of all, and that when we
 should rest, is the first, But we do the contrary. For we linger on the
 third point, and spend all our zeal on that, while of the first we are
 utterly neglectful, and thus we are liars; but the explanation of how it
 is shown to be wrong to lie we have ever ready to hand.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVI.
 
 MEMORABILIA.
 
 
 Hold in readiness for every need, these
 
    Lead me, O Zeus, and thou, Destiny, whithersoever ye
    have appointed me to go, and may I follow fearlessly. But
    if in an evil mind I be unwilling, still must I follow.
 
    That man is wise among us, and hath understanding of
    things divine, who hath nobly agreed with Necessity.
 
 But the third also
 
    O Crito, if so it seem good to the Gods so let it be.
    Anytus and Meletus are able to kill me indeed, but to
    harm me, never.[1]
 
 
 THE END.
 
 
 
 
 NOTES.
 
 
 CLEANTHES HYMN TO ZEUS.
 
    [1] Professor Mahaffy, in his _Greek Life and Thought_, quotes
    the full text of this noble Hymn, which, he thinks, would
    alone redeem the Hellenistic age, as it stands before us, from
    the charge of mere artificiality and pedantry.
 
    [2]    . This is Zellers reading,
     but not Professor Mahaffys, who has  .
 
 
 NOTES.
 
 
 BOOK I.
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 1. Enter by the door (_cf._ S. John, x. 1). The parallelisms in
 thought and expression between Epictetus and the New Testament have
 often been noticed, and the reader will discover many others, to which I
 have not thought it necessary to draw attention.
 
 2. Conceit: , _Einbildung_.
 
 3. To be elated: . One might translate, to be puffed up,
 except that that expression is only used in a bad sense, and one may be
 elated in anything that is truly of the nature of the good. The Stoics
 distinguished between , joy, and , pleasure; not rejecting or
 despising the former.
 
 
 Chapter II.
 
 1.     ,     . A fundamental distinction
 in the Epictetean system, which he sometimes expresses by the phrases,
   and   things that are our own and things that
 belong to others; or   and  things that are our proper
 concern, and things that are alien to us.
 
 2. On the Mons Palatinus in Rome there stood a temple to Fever. Upton
 quotes from Gruter, p. xcvii., an interesting inscription to this
 divinity: Febri. Div. Febri. Sanct. Febri. Magn. Camilla. Amata. Pro.
 Filio. Male. Affecto. P.
 
 
 Chapter III.
 
 1. There is excellent MS. authority for this reading of the passage,
 which, however, is not Schweighusers. The latter reads: Be content
 with them, and pray to the Gods.
 
 2. Steward of the winds. A quotation from Homer, _Od._ x. 21.
 
 
 Chapter IV.
 
 1. Through not being dazzled, etc.     .
 
 
 Chapter VI.
 
 1. Note that in this passage God and the Gods and the Divine are
 all synonymous terms.
 
 2. Or of names.
 
 3. Some texts add such as Good or Evil.
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 1. Apparently a proverb, which maybe paralleled in its present
 application by Luthers Pecca fortiter.
 
 2. A complex or conjunctive proposition is one which contains several
 assertions so united as to form a single statement which will be false
 if any one of its parts is false_e.g._, Brutus was the lover and
 destroyer both of Csar and of his country. The disjunctive is when
 alternative propositions are made, as Pleasure is either good or bad,
 or neither good nor bad.
 
 3. I have followed Lord Shaftesburys explanation of this passage, which
 the other commentators have given up as corrupt. It seems clear that
 whether the passage can stand exactly in the form in which we have it,
 or not, Lord Shaftesburys rendering represents what Epictetus
 originally conveyed.
 
 4. According to the usual reading, a scornful exclamation_Thou_
 exhort them! I have followed the reading recommended by Schw. in his
 notes, although he does not adopt it in his text.
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 1. The founder of the Cynic school was Antisthenes, who taught in the
 gymnasium named the Cynosarges, at Athens; whence the name of his
 school. Zeller takes this striking chapter to exhibit Epictetuss
 philosophisches Ideal, the Cynic being the wahrer Philosoph, or
 perfect Stoic. (Phil. d. Gr. iii. S. 752.) This view seems to me no more
 true than that the missionary or monk is to be considered the ideal
 Christian. Epictetus takes pains to make it clear that the Cynic is a
 Stoic with a special and separate vocation, which all Stoics are by no
 means called upon to take up. Like Thoreau, that modern Stoic, when he
 went to live at Walden, the Cynic tries the extreme of abnegation in
 order to demonstrate practically that man has resources within himself
 which make him equal to any fate that circumstances can inflict.
 
 2. , a coarse garment especially affected by the Cynics, as
 also by the early Christian ascetics.
 
 3. Nor pity. Upton, in a note on _Diss._ i. 18. 3. (Schw.), refers to
 various passages in Epictetus where pity and envy are mentioned together
 as though they were related emotions, and aptly quotes Virgil (_Georg._
 ii. 499):
 
   Aut doluit miserans inopem, aut invidit habenti.
 
 It will be clear to any careful reader that when Epictetus asserts that
 certain emotions or acts are unworthy of a man, he constantly means the
 man to be understood as his highest spiritual faculty, his deepest
 sense of reason, his soul. That we are not to pity or grieve means that
 that side of us which is related to the divine and eternal is not to be
 affected by emotions produced by calamities in mere outward and material
 things. St. Augustine corroborates this view in an interesting passage
 bearing on the Stoic doctrine of pity (_De Civ. Dei._ ix. 5; _Schw._ iv.
 132):
 
 Misericordiam Cicero non dubitavit appellare virtutem, quam Stoicos
 inter vitia numerare non pudet, qui tamen, ut docuit liber Epicteti
 nobilissimi Stoici ex decretis Zenonis et Chrysippi, qui hujus sect
 primas partes habuerunt, hujuscemodi passiones in animum Sapientis
 admittunt, quem vitiis omnibus liberam esse volunt. Unde fit consequens,
 ut hc ipsa non putent vitia, quando Sapienti sic accidunt, ut contra
 virtutem mentis rationemque nihil possunt.
 
 The particular utterances of Epictetus here alluded to by St. Augustine
 must have been contained in some of the lost books of the
 _Dissertations_, as nothing like them is to be found explicitly in those
 which survive, although the latter afford us abundant means for deducing
 the conclusion which St. Augustine confirms.
 
 4. This cake seems to form a ridiculous anti-climax. But it appears to
 have been a vexed question in antiquity whether an ascetic philosopher
 might indulge in this particular luxury (). Upton quotes Lucian
 and Diogenes Laertius for instances of this question being propounded,
 and an affirmative answer given (in one instance by the Cynic,
 Diogenes). The youth in the text is being addressed as a novice who must
 not use the freedom of an adept.
 
 5. Upton quotes from Cymbeline:
 
   Hath Britain all the sun that shines? Day, night,
   Art they not, but in Britain? Prythee, think,
   Theres living out of Britain!
 
 But Epictetus means more than this in his allusion to sun and
 stars.See Preface, xxiv. This passage would lead us to suppose that
 Epictetus believed in a personal existence continued for some time after
 death. In the end, however, even sun and stars shall vanish.See ii.
 13, 4.
 
 6. Being arrested by Philips people, and asked if he were a spy,
 Diogenes replied, Certainly I am, O Philip; a spy of thine ill-counsel
 and folly, who for no necessity canst set thy life and kingdom on the
 chances of an hour.
 
 7. According to Uptons conjecture, these were gladiators famous for
 bodily strength; and also, one would suspect, for some remarkable
 calamity.
 
 8. This highly crude view of the Trojan war might have been refuted out
 of the mouth of Epictetus himself. Evil-doers are not to be allowed
 their way because they are unable to hurt our souls, but the hurt may be
 in the cowardice or sloth that will not punish them.
 
 9. By wearing his cloak half falling off, in negligent fashion. Nothing
 is finer or more characteristic in Epictetus than his angry scorn of the
 pseudo-Stoics of his day.
 
 10.   . The allusion evidently is to the genius or
 divine spirit by which Socrates felt himself guided.
 
 11. Crates was a disciple of Diogenes. His wife was named Hipparchia.
 Upton quotes Menander (_apud Diog. L._), Thou wilt walk about with me
 in a cloak as once did his wife with Crates the Cynic.
 
 12. Danaus, father of the fifty Danaid. olus is mentioned in _Od._ x.
 as having six sons and six daughters.
 
 13.  . _Il._ xxi. 69.
 
 14. That is, he capped the quotation by quoting the following line
 (_Il._ ii. 24, 25). Not a very striking intellectual effort; but
 Epictetus evidently considered it a meritorious thing to know Homer well
 enough to quote him in ones sleep, and he was right.
 
 15. From a poem of Cleanthes.
 
 
 BOOK II.
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 1. According to the view of James Harris, in a long and valuable note
 communicated to Upton, the master-argument was so called from the
 supreme importance of the issues with which it dealt. On these issues
 different leaders of the Stoics took different sides, Diodorus holding
 both future and past things to be _necessary_, Cleanthes both
 _contingent_, and Chrysippus past things to be necessary and future
 contingent. Any two of the three propositions mentioned in the text
 exclude the third. For modern philosophy the distinction between the
 possible and the certain in the phenomenal world has, of course, no real
 existence; the possible being simply that of which we do not know
 whether it will come to pass or not.
 
 2. Of course Epictetus here speaks ironically; all this is just what it
 _is_ the business of a thinker to do.
 
 3. Epictetus, I suppose, means to complain that the current phrases of
 philosophy are dealt out in glib answer to great ethical questions, just
 as Homer might be quoted for an event in the life of Odysseus, by
 persons who in neither case think of gaining that vital conviction which
 only the strenuous exercise of ones own reason can produce. A little
 later he represents Hellanicus, the historian, as quoted on the
 distinction between good and evil, who never treated that subject. If it
 is to be a mere question of _authority_, one _name_ is as good as
 another, since none is any use at all.
 
 Indifferent, be it observed, is _morally_ indifferentthat which has
 in _itself_ no bearing on our moral state. See Chap. II. 2.
 
 4. The followers of Aristotle called themselves Peripatetics.
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 1. The word in the Greek is , literally _circumstances_, but
 the word is evidently used in a bad sense, as equivalent to afflictions.
 Doom is likewise etymologically a neutral word, but one which has
 received an evil meaning.
 
 2. Socratess faith in his genius or Dmon was well known. In this
 passage from his _Apologia_ (which Epictetus gives from a bad text), it
 is doubtless the manner only that conveyed the idea of mockery. Neither
 Socrates nor any one else ever had better evidence of Gods existence
 than His voice in our conscience.
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 1. Briefly, the three divisions seem to be Action, Character, and
 Judgment. The last is to be approached through training in logic, in the
 penetration of fallacies, etc., by which means a man is to arrive at
 such an inward and vital conviction of the truth that he can never for a
 moment be taken off his guard by the delusion of Appearance.
 
 2. Passions, passionless,  , .See Index of Philosophic
 Terms.
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 1. Euripides.Musonius Rufus, the teacher of Epictetus, is reported to
 have said, Take the chance of dying nobly when thou canst, lest after a
 little death indeed come to thee, but a noble death no more.
 
 2. This phrase of the open door occurs frequently in Epictetus,
 usually when, as here, he is telling the average non-philosophic man
 that it is unmanly to complain of a life which he can at any time
 relinquish. The philosopher has no need of such exhortation, for he does
 not complain, and as for death, is content to wait Gods time. But the
 Stoics taught that the arrival of this time might be indicated by some
 disaster or affliction which rendered a natural and wholesome life
 impossible. Self-destruction was in such cases permissible, and is
 recorded to have been adopted by several leaders of the Stoics,
 generally when old age had begun to render them a burden to their
 friends.
 
 3. _Nay, thou shalt exist_, etc.This is the sense given by Zellers
 punctuation. Schweighusers text would be rendered, Thou shalt not
 exist, but something else will, etc. Upton changes the text (on his own
 authority) by transposing an . Thou shalt exist, but as something
 else, whereof the universe has now no need.
 
 4. This does not appear to have been the law in Epictetuss time, for he
 himself was educated while a slave. But it was a common provision in
 antique states.
 
 5. The ceremony in manumitting a slave.
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 1. Chap. VI. i. is a passage from the lost Fifth Book of the
 Discourses, preserved for us in a rather obscure Latin translation by
 Aulus Gellius. During a storm at sea, a certain Stoic on board was
 observed by him to look pale and anxious, though not indeed showing the
 signs of panic exhibited by the other passengers. Questioned afterwards
 by Gellius on this apparent feebleness in his professed faith, the Stoic
 produced the Fifth Book of Epictetus, and read this passage.
 
 2. The third Earl of Shaftesbury, an enthusiastic student of Epictetus,
 had this dish of water and ray of light engraved, and placed, with the
 inscription,  All is Opinionas an emblem at the front
 of his _Characteristics_. The passage, though interesting, is obscure.
 At one time the appearances, , are compared to the ray of
 light; at another, the doctrines (literally arts, _i. e._, arts of
 life taught by philosophy) and virtues. Probably the explanation is to
 be found in the view of the Stoics that at birth the human soul is a
 _tabula rasa_, or blank sheet; all our knowledge coming from without;
 that is, from the appearances which surround us. Moral and philosophic
 convictions are thus, like all other mental states, the result of
 external impressions.
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 1. The school of Plato was continued at Athens under the title of the
 Academy. In its later days it produced little except logical puzzles.
 
 2. Friend, if indeed, escaping from this war, we were destined
 thereafter to an ageless and deathless life, then neither would I fight
 in the van nor set thee in the press of glorious battle. But now, since
 death in a thousand kinds stands everywhere against us, which no man
 shall fly from nor elude, we go; either we shall give glory to another,
 or he to us.Sarpedons speech, _Iliad_, xii. 322-8.
 
 3. General consent.The well-known philosophic doctrine, that what all
 men unite in believing must be true, which has so often been made the
 basis of arguments against Skepticism in various forms.
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 1. See chap. IV. i.
 
 2. He drew water by night for his gardens, and studied philosophy in the
 day._Diog. Laert._ [Upton.]
 
 3. A most characteristic feature of the whole Stoic school was its
 treatment of ancient mythology and legend. These things were closely and
 earnestly studied, with a constant view to the deeper meanings that
 underlay the vesture of fable, an attitude which contrasts very
 favorably with Platos banishment of the poets from his Republic for
 teaching false notions about the Gods.
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 1. Gyara, an island in the gean, used as a penal settlement.
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 1. _The captain ... the driver_literally, to him who has knowledge
 (of the given art).
 
 2. Liberator. The person appointed by law to carry out the
 ceremony of the manumission of slaves.
 
 
 CHAPTER XI.
 
 1. This chapter seems to me to contain a truth expressed so baldly and
 crudely as to appear a falsehood. The readers mind will be fixed upon
 the truth or falsehood according as he is or is not capable of reading
 Epictetus with understanding.
 
 2. This earthen lamp was sold, according to Lucian, at the death of
 Epictetus for 3,000 drachm (about 120)._Adv. Indoct._ 13.
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII.
 
 1. Parodying a verse of Euripides on the stream of Dirce in Botia.
 The Marcian aqueduct brought water to Rome.
 
 2. I adopt Uptons conjecture for the inexplicable   .
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII.
 
 1. An eminent Cynic (also mentioned by Seneca and Tacitus).
 
 
 CHAPTER XXV.
 
 1. This is the reading of one of the Christian Paraphrases. The other
 versions add the words   after    , giving
 the sense from things in which we do not differ from each other. It is
 no uncommon thing for all the versions of Epictetus to unite in a
 manifestly corrupt reading, and though in this case the received text is
 not an impossible one, I have thought myself justified in following the
 variant of the Paraphrase.
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVII.
 
 1. There is an allusion to this curious feature of the Olympic contests
 in the Fourth Idyll of Theocritus. Casaubon (_Lect. Theocr._ ad Idyll.
 4) quoted by Schweighuser, in his note on this passage (_Diss._ III.
 xv. 4), shows from Festus Pompeius that there was a statue in the
 Capitol of a youth bearing a spade after the manner of the Olympic
 combatants.
 
 2. Euphrates, a Stoic philosopher, and contemporary of Epictetus. He was
 tutor of Pliny, the younger.
 
 3. The pentathlos contended in five athletic exercisesviz., running,
 leaping, throwing the quoit, throwing the javelin, wrestling.
 
 4. Much of this must refer to the period of probation or discipleship,
 for Epictetus is clear that the ordinary Stoic (who had not embraced the
 special mission of Cynicism) was not required to forsake his family, or
 his affairs, or his duties as a citizen, nor even justified in doing so.
 
 
 BOOK III.
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 1. The husk is, of course, the body. If it is maintained that Nature has
 made the ease of this our only proper pursuit, of course the altruistic,
 or social instincts have to be rejected and denied.
 
 2. The text is here almost certainly corrupt. It runs  
  ,        . All
 the MSS. agree in , for which Schweighuser desires to read
 , and Wolf,  . Salmasius declares emphatically
 for      , and this, with a slight
 alteration suggested to me by an eminent living scholar, is the reading
 I have adopted: Let us suppose that Epictetus said    
 .., and that this was written in the short lines common in Greek
 MSS.:
 
   
   
   
 
 The second line, beginning with the same letter as the third, might
 easily be dropped by a transcriber, and the next transcriber would
 certainly change the resulting  to . The existing
 reading might give the sense, How are we, then, suspicious of those (if
 any there be) to whom Nature has given no affection for their
 offspring?
 
 3. Outward thingssuch as making provision for ones family, serving
 the State, etc.,actions which are not directly concerned with our
 spiritual good.
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 1. Phrygia, the birthplace of Epictetus, was one of the great centers
 of the wild and fearful cult of Cybele, whose priests gashed and
 mutilated themselves in the excitement of the orgie.
 
 2. Philosophy is brought upon the scene, speaking first through the
 mouth of a Stoic, afterwards through that of an Epicurean, and the
 practical results of each system are exhibited.
 
 3. The Athenians, rather than submit to Xerxes, abandoned their city to
 be plundered, and took to their fleet, the victory at Salamis rewarding
 their resolve.
 
 Those who died at Thermopyl were the three hundred Spartans under
 Leonidas, who held the pass against the Persian host till all were
 slain. Often as their heroism has been celebrated, perhaps nothing more
 worthy of their valor has been written than the truly laconic epitaph
 composed for them by Simonides:
 
   Stranger, the Spartans bade us die:
    Go, tell them, thou, that here we lie.
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 1. The sense of human dignity was strong in Epictetus, and he would
 have it practically observed in mens relations with each other. Compare
 Ch. v. 7. Zeller must have overlooked these Fragments of Epictetus when
 he asserted (p. 301) that no Stoic philosopher had ever condemned
 slavery. So far as we know, however, this is the only condemnation of
 that institution ever uttered by any Pagan thinker. The usual Stoic view
 was laid down by Chrysippus, who defined the slave very much as Carlyle
 does, as a perpetuus mercenariusa man hired for life, from whom
 work was to be required, a just return for it being accorded (_operam
 exegendam, justa prbenda_). This utterance of Epictetus, as of one
 who knew slavery from within, and certainly was not inclined to
 exaggerate its discomforts, is noteworthy enough.
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 1. Administrator, ; in Latin, _Corrector_a State officer of
 whom inscriptions, etc., make frequent mention, but of whose functions
 not much appears to be known beyond what the present chapter of
 Epictetus reveals.
 
 2. Cassiope was a port of Epirus, not far from Nicopolis, where
 Epictetus taught. Schw. conjectures that Maximus was sending his son to
 study philosophy at Nicopolis under Epictetus.
 
 3. For a correct view of these matters will reduce every movement of
 preference and avoidance to health of body and tranquillity of soul; for
 this is the perfection of a happy life.Epicurus, _Diog. Laert._ x.
 128. Epictetuss analysis of the Epicurean theory amounts to this, that
 the pleasure of the soul is the chief good, but that it is only felt
 through the body and its conditions.
 
 4. _The overseer of youth._An officer in certain Greek cities. See
 Mahaffys _Greek Life and Thought_, ch. xvii., on the organization of
 the _ephebi_.
 
 5. _Aid in works that are according to Nature._The Greek is 
    . There is some difference of opinion among
 commentators as to the meaning of . Wolf translates, hold the
 chief place in natural works. Upton, Schw., and Long render it by keep
 us constant, sustain us, in such works. I do not see why we should
 not take the word in its plainest sensethat pleasure should _act
 together with other forces_ in leading us to do well.
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 1. _Zealous for evil things._Epictetus must mean things which they
 know to be evilevil things _as_ evil. It was a Socratic doctrine which
 we find again alluded to in this chapter, that no evil is ever willingly
 or wittingly done.
 
 2. A favorite theme of later Greek and of Roman comedy was the rivalship
 in love of a father and a son.
 
 3. Admetus, husband of Alcestis, being told by an oracle that his wife
 must die if no one offered himself in her stead, thought to lay the
 obligation on his father, as being an old man with but few more years to
 live. The first verse quoted is from the _Alcestis_ of Euripides; the
 second is not found in any extant version of that play.
 
 4. Eteocles and Polyneices, sons of dipus, quarreled with each other
 about the inheritance of their fathers kingdom. Eteocles having gained
 possession of it, Polyneices brought up the famous seven kings, his
 allies, against Thebes, and fell in battle there by his brothers hand,
 whom he also killed. The verses quoted are from the _Phniss_ of
 Euripides.
 
 5. Schweighuser interprets this passage to mean that these men occupy
 the public places as wild beasts do the mountains, to prey on others. If
 we might read    for   , we should get a less obscure
 sense, haunt the wildernessI should say the public placeslike wild
 beasts. The passage is clearly corrupt somewhere.
 
 6. Polyneices bribed Eriphyle with the gift of this necklace to persuade
 her unwilling husband to march with him against Thebes where he died.
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 1. The allusion is to _Odyssey_, v. 82-4. But he was sitting on the
 beach and weeping, where he was wont; and tormented his spirit with
 tears and groanings and woes, and wept as he gazed over the barren sea.
 
 2. _Let him pity._See Bk. I., ch. viii., _note_ 3.
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 1. _The conflagration._See Preface for an account of the Stoic
 Doctrine of the _Weltverbrennung_.
 
 2. Long suggests that the words translated air to air might be equally
 well rendered spirit to spirit (   ), thus
 finding a place for the soul in this enumeration of the elements of man.
 But this metaphysical division of mans nature into a spiritual part and
 a material part would have been wholly contrary to Stoic teaching, which
 admitted no existence that was not material. As a matter of fact, if any
 of the terms in this enumeration is to be understood as meaning soul or
 spirit, it will be fire rather than air.
 
 3. Gods and Powers.  .
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 1. _To strangle lions or embrace statues._Hercules did the former, and
 ostentatious philosophers sometimes did the latter in winter-time, by
 way of showing their power of endurance.
 
 2. _The stamp of Nero._I believe there is no other record than this of
 any rejection of Neros coins, and those which have come down to us are
 of perfectly good quality. He was declared a public enemy by the Senate,
 and possibly it was decreed at the same time that his coins should be
 withdrawn from circulation. Dion, quoted by Wise (_apud_ Schweighuser),
 reports that this was done in the case of Caligula, after the death of
 that tyrant.
 
 3. _Lions at home, but in Ephesus foxes._A proverb about the
 Spartans, who were defeated in Asia, notes the Scholiast on Aristoph.
 Pac., 1188-90.
 
 
 BOOK IV.
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 1. _Nor can I move without thy knowledge._From Homer, _Il._ x. 279,
 280, Odysseus to Athene.
 
 2. _The Genius of each man._  .
 
 Chapter III.
 
 1. _A way wherein to walk._Literally, the power of using a way. It
 seems to me likely that this term, way, here signifies the Stoic
 philosophy, just as in the early Church it was used to signify
 Christianity (_e. g._, _Acts_ xxii. 4, and xix. 9, 23).
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 1. _Nor have any object in themselves._Readers of Lotze will be
 reminded of the term Frsichseinheit, used by him to denote the
 self-centered quality of true Being. The Greek here is  
 , , being the word used in Bk. I. viii. 13, and
 Bk. III. v. 5, for the leading objects or obligations of man.
 
 2. _Would that I had you with me!_In Longs translation the pronoun
 _you_ is explained to mean God. I can see no reason for this
 interpretation. The words are, I think, supposed to be uttered by a
 disciple to his master: they are such as Epictetus may have heard from
 many of his own disciples as they left him to take their part in the
 world of action.
 
 3. _Cautious assent__i. e._, caution in allowing oneself to entertain
 the impressions of appearances.
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 1. The strong and growing yearning for some direct, personal revelation
 of God, some supernatural manifestation of His existence and care for
 men, is noted by Zeller as a special trait of Hellenistic times. Such a
 revelation must have been longed for by many as the only satisfying
 answer to the destructive logic of the Pyrrhonists, and mens minds were
 also of course led that way by the insistence of the Stoic thinkers upon
 the communion of the individual with God, as the most important of all
 possible relations. Hence the growth of many wild and orgiastic cults at
 this epochall based on the state of ecstasy connected with their rites,
 which was ascribed to supernatural influence. With the Stoics this
 movement took the comparatively sober shape of attention to the
 established system of oracular divination. Zeller, however, shows that
 some Stoics were disposed to rationalize the revelations of the oracles
 by supposing a certain sympathy between the mind of the seer and the
 future events which led to the unconscious selection of means of
 divination which would exhibit the proper signs.(Z. 339, 340.)
 Epictetus evidently thought more of Gods revelation in the conscience
 than any other.
 
 2. The story is told by Simplicius in his commentary on this chapter.
 Two friends, journeying together to inquire of the oracle at Delphi,
 were set upon by robbers; one of them resisted, and was murdered, the
 other either fled or made no effort on his companions behalf. Arriving
 at the temple of Apollo, he was greeted with the following deliverance
 of the oracle:
 
   Thou sawst thy friend all undefended die
   Foul with that sin, from Phbus temple fly.
 
 
 BOOK V.
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 1. Simplicius explains that the oath was to be refused, because to call
 God to witness in any merely personal and earthly interest implies a
 want of reverence towards Him; but that if there were a question of
 pledging ones faith on behalf of friends, or parents, or country, it
 was not improper to add the confirmation of an oath.
 
 2. Upton quotes allusions to these recitations from Juvenal, Martial,
 and Pliny. Authors would read their own works and invite crowds of
 flatterers to attend. Epict. _Diss._ iii. 23. (Schweighuser) is a
 scornful diatribe against the pretentious people who held forth on these
 occasions, and the people who assembled to hear and applaud them. He
 contrasts with fashionable reciters and lecturers his own master, Rufus.
 Rufus was wont to say, _I speak to no purpose, if ye have time to
 praise me_. And, verily, he spoke in such a way that every man who sat
 there thought that some one had accused him to Rufus, he so handled all
 that was going on, he so set before each mans eyes his faults.
 
 3. Into vulgarity .
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 1. The sophism, or puzzle, called the Liar, ran thus:A liar says he
 lies: if it is true, he is no liar; and if he lies, he is speaking
 truth. The Quiescent ( ) was an invention attributed by Cicero
 to Chrysippus (Acad. ii. 29). When asked of a gradually-increasing
 number of things to say when they ceased to be few and became many, he
 was wont to cease replying, or be quiescent, shortly before the limit
 was reacheda device which we have some difficulty in regarding as a
 fair example of Chrysippuss contributions to the science of logic. For
 the master sophism see Bk. II. chap. i., _note_ 1.
 
 2. Plato, _Laws_, ix.:When any of such opinions visit thee, go to the
 purifying sacrifices, go and pray in the temples of the protecting Gods,
 go to the society of men whom thou hast heard of as good; and now hear
 from others, now say for thine own part, that it behooves every man to
 hold in regard the things that are honorable and righteous. But from the
 company of evil men, fly without a look behind. And if in doing these
 things thy disease give ground, well; but if not, hold death the better
 choice, and depart from life.
 
 3. _The true athlete._Literally, ascetic, ; _i. e._, practicer.
 
 4. The Dioscuri, or Twins, Castor and Pollux, were the patron deities
 of sailors.
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 1. _If viewed disjunctively._That is, if we say, It is day, or, It is
 night. This is a difficult chapter, and full of corruptions. The feast
 alluded to is, doubtless, the feast of life, where the Gods are the
 hosts.
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 1. _Winter training._Such as the Roman troops underwent when in
 winter-quarters. They were accustomed to exercise themselves with arms
 of double the normal weight, and prepare themselves by marching,
 running, leaping, etc., for active service.
 
 
 CHAPTER XII.
 
 1. The Pancratium was a contest in which boxing and wrestling were both
 allowable. For the Pentathlon, see Bk. II. chap, xvii., _note_ 3.
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI.
 
 1. This means, apparently, that the judgment has no right to do more
 than endorse the deliverances of the perceptive faculty. If a man
 commits any error, he does it under the conviction that it is in some
 way for his profit or satisfaction; that is, that there is something of
 the nature of the Good in it. He may be mistaken in this; but so long as
 he does not know where Good and Evil really lie, he can do no other than
 he does. The true course, then, for the philosopher is not to condemn
 him for his actions, but to show him the fundamental error from which
 they proceed. The expression, assent, , is that used by
 Epictetus in II. vi., etc., where he speaks of the mind as being imposed
 on, or taken captive, by the outward shows of things.
 
 
 CHAPTER XX.
 
 1. The Greek is        
 .  means, literally, to fashion with joints, hence
 constitute organically, with interdependence of parts. Long translates
 analyze.
 
 2. _Modius._A measure of about two gallons.
 
 3. Antisthenes, about 400 B. C., founder of the Cynic school, which was
 established by him in the gymnasium called the Cynosarges (hence the
 name). As a Cynic, his authority would, of course, be respected by the
 hearers of Epictetus. This investigation of terms, or names, is, indeed,
 the beginning of philosophy and the guide to truth in any sphere, but
 perhaps not every one is competent to undertake it. There must be a real
 and not merely a formal appreciation of the contents of each term. A
 primrose is one thing to Peter Bell and another to Wordsworth. The term,
 let us say, Duty, is one thing to a Herbert Spencer and another to a
 Kant.
 
 
 CHAPTER XXII.
 
 1. My friends, fly all culture, is an injunction reported of Epicurus
 (_Diog. L._ x. 6). However, neglect of form in literary style was a
 characteristic of philosophic writers of the Hellenistic period, which
 was by no means confined to the Epicureans.
 
 2. This passage is corrupt. I follow the reading adopted by
 Schweighuser (after Wolf); but it may be noted that Schweighusers
 translation follows another reading than that which he adopts in his
 text, viz. (being moved), instead of  (being
 strained). The original, in all versions, is , which makes no
 sense at all.See Preface, xxiii.
 
 3. The writings enumerated are, of course, works of Epicurus. When
 dying, he wrote in a letter to a friend (_Diog. L._ x. 22) that he was
 spending a happy day, and his last.
 
 4. Stoic  was anything but insensibility. Chrysippus held that
 many things in the Kosmos were created for their beauty
 alone._Zeller_, 171.
 
 5. There is another short chapter on the arts of ratiocination and
 expression (I. viii. _Schw._), which glances at the subject from a
 somewhat different point of view from that taken in the chapter which I
 have given. There Epictetus dwells chiefly on the danger that weak
 spirits should lose themselves in the fascination of these arts: For,
 in general, in every faculty acquired by the uninstructed and feeble
 there is danger lest they be elated and puffed up through it. For how
 could one contrive to persuade a young man who excels in such things
 that he must not be an appendage to them, but make them an appendage to
 him?
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVI.
 
 1. The first of these quotations is from the Stoic Cleanthes, the
 second from a lost play of Euripides; in the third Epictetus has joined
 together two sayings of Socrates, one from the _Crito_ and one from the
 _Apologia_. Anytus and Meletus were the principal accusers of Socrates
 in the trial which ended in his sentence to death.
 
 
 NOTES ON PRINCIPAL PHILOSOPHIC TERMS USED BY EPICTETUS.
 
 
    [I give under this head only those terms the exact force
    of which may not be apparent to the reader in a mere
    translation.]
 
    .Pious, reverent, modest. The substantive is
      , the German Ehrfurcht (_Wilhelm Meister_,
      _Wanderjahre_, Bk. II. ch. ii.), a virtue in high regard
      with Epictetus, who generally mentions it in connection
      with that of faithfulness, . In Wordsworths
      poem, My heart leaps up when I behold a rainbow in the
      sky, the natural piety which he prays may abide with
      him in his old age seems to be just that moral
      sensitiveness or  which passes into reverence and
      worship in the presence of certain things, and into shame
      and dread in that of others.
 
    .Peacethat is, peace from passion, . 
      was any affection of the mind causing joy or grief. As it
      appears from Bk. II. iii. I.,  is not, in
      Epictetus, the state of absolute freedom from these
      passions, but that of being able to master them so that
      they shall not overwhelm the inner man.
 
    .That which _organizes_, constitutes
      organically, forms into a system. From , a joint.
      The word analyze, by which Long translates ,
      seems to me wanting in the formative sense expressed by
      the original.
 
    .An opinion, that which seems () true;
      generally in the special sense of a philosophic dogma.
 
    .To prosper; literally, to flow freely, ,
      prosperity. A common Stoic phrase for a happy life.
 
    .Religion, piety. _to feel awe_ or
      _fear_ before God and man, especially when about to do
      something disgraceful (_Liddell and Scott_); to worship,
      respect, reverence.
 
     ().The Ruling Facultythat in a man which
      chooses, determines, takes cognizance of good and evil,
      and sways the inferior faculties (, powers) to
      its will. Lotze notes this _hegemonic_ quality in the
      human soul as that which distinguishes it from the bundle
      of sensations into which the Association Philosophy would
      resolve it.
 
    .To admire, be dazzled with admiration by, to
      worship, to be taken up with a thing so as to lose the
      power of cool judgment. A frequent word in Epictetus, the
      sense of which is precisely rendered in Hor. _Sat._ I, 4,
      28, Hunc capit argenti splendor, _stupet_ Albius re.
 
    .One of the vulgar, an unlettered person; in
      Epictetus, one uninstructed in philosophy. Originally the
      word meant one who remained in private life, not filling
      any public office, or taking part in State affairs. A man
      might be an , or layman, with respect to any
      branch of science or art.
 
      .The good and wise manliterally,
      beautiful and good. A standing phrase to denote the
      perfection of human character.  is a word sometimes
      difficult to render. Curtius connects it etymologically
      with Sanscrit, _kalyas_; Gothic, _hails_=healthy.
 
    .Conceitdefined by Cicero as
      Opinatiointellectual self-sufficiency, the supposing
      ones self to know something when one does not. The
      first business of a philosopher, says Epictetus, is to
      cast away , for it is impossible that one can begin
      to learn the things that he thinks he knows (_Diss._ II.
      xvii. 1.) He is not, in short, to be wise in his own
      conceit.
 
    , , , .Pursuit, avoidance,
      desire, aversion. According to Simplicius (Comment.
      _Ench._ i.),  and  were used by the Stoics
      to express the counterparts in outward action of the
      mental affections,  and , and were regarded as
      consequent upon the latter.
 
    .The Will; but as used in Epictetus, this
      word implies much more than the mere faculty of volition.
      Literally, it means a choosing of one thing before
      another; in Epictetus, the power of deliberately
      resolving or purposing, the exercise of the reflective
      faculty being implied. It is hardly to be distinguished
      from  , _q. v._
 
    .Natural Conceptions. See Preface, xxviii.,
      xxix. The primary truths of Lord Herbert of Cherbury.
 
    .To assent to or acquiesce in anything,
      to ratify by the judgment the emotions produced by
      external things or events, such as the sense of dread, or
      pleasure, or reprobation, which they arouse in us. To be
      on ones guard against the hasty yielding of this assent
      is one of Epictetuss main injunctions to the aspirant in
      philosophy.
 
    .To be troubled; -, tranquillity.
       is primarily to stir up, confuse, throw into
      disorder.
 
    .An appearance; with the Stoics, any mental
      impression as received by the perceptive faculty before
      the Reason has pronounced upon it, a bare perception.
 
 
 
 
 INDEX OF REFERENCES.
 
 
    [The references in the right-hand column are to the
    books, chapters, and verses of the _Dissertations_, to
    the chapters of the _Encheiridion_, and to the
    _Fragments_, in Schweighusers edition of Epictetus.]
 
 
   BOOK I.
 
   Chap. I. 1            _Frag._ III.
   Chap. I. 2-5          _Diss._ II. xi. 1-25.
   Chap. II.             _Diss._ I. xxii. 1-16.
   Chap. III.            _Diss._ I. i. 1-17.
   Chap. IV. 1           _Diss._ III. iii. 1-4.
   Chap. IV. 2           _Diss._ I. xxix. 1-4 to 
   Chap. IV. 3           _Diss._ I. xxv. 1-6.
   Chap. V.              _Ench._ I.
   Chap. VI.             _Diss._ II. xiv.
   Chap. VII. 1, 2       _Ench._ II.
   Chap. VII. 3          _Diss._ I. xv. 7, 8.
   Chap. VII. 4-6        _Diss._ II. ix. 1-12.
   Chap. VII. 7          _Frag._ LXXII.
   Chap. VII. 8          _Diss._ III. xiii. 20-23.
   Chap. VIII.           _Diss._ III. xxii.
 
 
   BOOK II.
 
   Chap. I.              _Diss._ II. xix.
   Chap. II. 1           _Frag._ LXIX.
   Chap. II. 2, 3        _Diss._ II. v. 1-9.
   Chap. II. 4           _Diss._ II. xvi. 15.
   Chap. II. 5, 6        _Diss._ II. vi. 9-19.
   Chap. II. 7, 8        _Diss._ II. v. 10-20.
   Chap. III. 1, 2       _Ench._ III., IV.
   Chap. III. 3          _Diss._ III. xix.
   Chap. III. 4, 5       _Ench._ V., VI.
   Chap. IV. 1, 2        _Diss._ III. ii. 1-10.
   Chap. V. 1-3          _Diss._ II. i. 1-20.
   Chap. V. 4            _Diss._ III. xxiv. 94.
   Chap. V. 5            _Diss._ II. i. 21-29.
   Chap. VI. 1           _Frag._ CLXXX.
   Chap. VI. 2           _Diss._ III. iii. 20-22.
   Chap. VII. 1-4        _Diss._ I. xxvii.
   Chap. VIII. 1         _Diss._ I. ix. 1-8.
   Chap. VIII. 2-6       _Diss._ III. xxvi. 1-36.
   Chap. IX. 1           _Diss._ I. ix. 10-18.
   Chap. IX. 2           _Diss._ I. xxv. 14-20.
   Chap. IX. 3           _Diss._ I. xxix. 29.
   Chap. X. 1-4          _Diss._ I. xix. 1-17.
   Chap. X. 5-6          _Diss._ IV. vii. 12-18.
   Chap. X. 7            _Diss._ I. xviii. 17.
   Chap. X. 8            _Diss._ IV. vii. 19-24.
   Chap. XI.             _Diss._ I. xviii. 1-16.
   Chap. XII.            _Ench._ VII.
   Chap. XIII. 1, 2      _Ench._ VIII.-IX.
   Chap. XIII. 3-6       _Diss._ II. xvi. 24-47.
   Chap. XIV.            _Ench._ X.
   Chap. XV.             _Ench._ XI.
   Chap. XVI.            _Ench._ XII.
   Chap. XVII.           _Ench._ XIII.
   Chap. XVIII. 1, 2     _Ench._ XIV.
   Chap. XVIII.    3     _Diss._ I. xxv. 22-25.
   Chap. XVIII.    4     _Ench._ XV.
   Chap. XIX.            _Ench._ XVI.
   Chap. XX. 1           _Ench._ XVII.
   Chap. XX. 2           _Diss._ IV. x. 9-17.
   Chap. XXI.            _Ench._ XVIII.-XXI.
   Chap. XXII.           _Ench._ XXII.-XXIII.
   Chap. XXIII.          _Ench._ XXIV.
   Chap. XXIV.           _Ench._ XXV.
   Chap. XXV.            _Ench._ XXVI., XXVII.
   Chap. XXVI.           _Ench._ XXVIII.
   Chap. XXVII.          _Ench._ XXIX.
 
 
   BOOK III.
 
   Chap. I.              _Ench._ XXX.
   Chap. II. 1, 2        _Diss._ I. xxiii.
   Chap. II. 3-7         _Diss._ II. v. 24-30.
   Chap. III. 1-9        _Diss._ II. xx. 1-27.
   Chap. IV. 1           _Diss._ I. xiii.
   Chap. IV. 2, 3        _Frag._ XLIII., XLIV.
   Chap. V.              _Diss._ III. vii.
   Chap. VI. 1           _Frag._ LXXXII.
   Chap. VI. 2           _Frag._ XLV.
   Chap. VI. 3           _Frag._ LXVII.
   Chap. VII.            _Diss._ II. xxii.
   Chap. VIII. 1-10      _Diss._ III. xxiv. 1-49.
   Chap. VIII. 11        _Diss._ III. xxiv. 58-63.
   Chap. VIII. 12        _Diss._ III. xxiv. 88-93.
   Chap. IX. 1, 2        _Diss._ III. xiii. 1-17.
   Chap. IX. 3           _Frag._ CLXXVI.
   Chap. IX. 4           _Diss._ III. xiii. 18, 19.
   Chap. X. 1            _Frag._ LXX.
   Chap. X. 2            _Diss._ IV. v. 1-4.
   Chap. X. 3-5          _Diss._ IV. v. 8-21.
   Chap. X. 6            _Diss._ IV. v. 30-32.
   Chap. X. 7            _Diss._ IV. v.  { 33 to .
                                         { 35-37.
 
   BOOK IV.
 
   Chap. I.              _Ench._ XXXI.
   Chap. II. 1, 2        _Diss._ I. xii. 1-7.
   Chap. II. 3, 4        _Diss._ I. xiv. 1-17.
   Chap. III.            _Diss._ I. xvi.
   Chap. IV. 1, 2        _Diss._ II. viii. 1-8.
   Chap. IV. 3           _Diss._ I. vi. 13 from 22.
   Chap. IV. 4-8         _Diss._ II. viii. 9-29.
   Chap. V.              _Ench._ XXXII.
 
 
   BOOK V.
 
   Chap. I. 1-5          _Ench._ XXXIII. 1-6,
   Chap. I. 6            _Diss._ III. xvi. 5-9.
   Chap. I. 7-16         _Ench._ XXXIII. 7-16.
   Chap. II. 1-4         _Diss._ II., xviii. 1-21 to 
   Chap. II. 5, 6        _Diss._ II. xviii. 23-32.
   Chap. II. 7           _Diss._ IV. xii. 19-21.
   Chap. III. 1, 2       _Diss._ II. xii. 1-4.
   Chap. III. 3, 4       _Diss._ II. xii. 17-25.
   Chap. IV.             _Ench._ XXXIV.
   Chap. V.              _Ench._ XXXV.
   Chap. VI.             _Ench._ XXXVI.
   Chap. VII. 1          _Ench._ XXXVII.
   Chap. VII. 2          _Diss._ I. ii. 30-32.
   Chap. VIII.           _Ench._ XXXVIII.
   Chap. IX.             _Ench._ XXXIX.
   Chap. X.              _Ench._ XL.
   Chap. XI.             _Ench._ XLI.
   Chap. XII. 1          _Diss._ III. i. 1-9.
   Chap. XII. 2          _Diss._ III. i. 40-44.
   Chap. XII. 3, 4       _Diss._ IV. xi. 22-29.
   Chap. XII. 5          _Diss._ IV. xi. 35, 36.
   Chap. XIII.           _Ench._ XLII.
   Chap. XIV.            _Ench._ XLIII.
   Chap. XV.             _Ench._ XLIV.
   Chap. XVI. 1, 2       _Ench._ XLV.
   Chap. XVI. 3          _Diss._ 1. xxviii. 1-9.
   Chap. XVI. 4          _Diss._ 1. xxviii. 11-25
   Chap. XVII.           _Ench._ XLVI.
   Chap. XVIII.          _Ench._ XLVII.
   Chap. XIX.            _Ench._ XLVIII.
   Chap. XX. 1           _Diss._ I. xvii. 1, 2.
   Chap. XX. 2-4         _Diss._ I. xvii. 4-12.
   Chap. XXI.            _Ench._ XLIX.
   Chap. XXII. 1, 2      _Diss._ II. xxiii. 1-10.
   Chap. XXII. 3-7       _Diss._ II. xxiii. 20-47.
   Chap. XXIII.          _Ench._ L.
   Chap. XXIV.           _Ench._ LI.
   Chap. XXV.            _Ench._ LII.
   Chap. XXVI.           _Ench._ LIII.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Colin Bell, Turgut Dincer, Brett Fishburne and
 the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
 http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
   THE TEACHING OF EPICTETUS:
   BEING THE 'ENCHEIRIDION
   OF EPICTETUS,' WITH SELECTIONS
   FROM THE DISSERTATIONS'
   AND 'FRAGMENTS.'
 
 
   The name Epictetus is pronounced _ep''ik-ti'tus--e_ as in
   _get_, first _i_ as in _habit_, second _i_ as in
   _police_, _u_ as in _but_.
 
 
   TRANSLATED FROM THE GREEK,
   WITH INTRODUCTION AND NOTES, BY
   T. W. ROLLESTON.
 
   NEW YORK
   HOME BOOK COMPANY,
   45 VESEY STREET.
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION.
 
 
 But for the zeal and ability of one disciple we should not now possess
 any trustworthy account of the teaching of Epictetus. For, like not a
 few other sages, he wrote nothing--his teaching was purely oral,
 delivered, in the form of lectures or discourses, to the students who
 came to him to receive their education in philosophy. One of these
 students was Flavius Arrianus, afterwards Senator and Consul of Rome,
 named by Lucian "one among the first of Roman men," and known to us
 chiefly as author of the best history of Alexander the Great which was
 produced in antiquity. That history is still extant, but posterity owes
 Arrian still more abundant thanks for the copious notes of the teaching
 of Epictetus which he took down from his master's lips in Nicopolis.
 This record he afterwards published in eight books (whereof only four
 now remain), entitled the _Dissertations of Epictetus_; and out of these
 he drew the materials for compiling the little work, the _Encheiridion_,
 or Manual, of Epictetus, by which this philosopher has hitherto been
 most generally known.[1]
 
 It is clear that the _Dissertations_ were not regarded by Arrian as a
 satisfactory representation of the teaching of his master; that he
 published them, indeed, with much reluctance, and only when it appeared
 that unless he did so, certain imperfect versions of his records would
 be established as the sole sources of authoritative information about
 Epictetus. These circumstances are explained in a dedicatory letter to
 his friend Lucius Gellius, prefixed to the edition of the
 _Dissertations_ which Arrian finally resolved to issue. I here translate
 this document in full:--
 
    "Arrian to Lucius Gellius, hail.
 
    "I did not write [in literary form and composition,
    [Greek: syngraphein]] the words of Epictetus in the
    manner in which a man might write such things. Neither
    have I put them forth among men, since, as I say, I did
    not even write them. But whatever I heard him speak,
    those things I endeavored to set down in his very words,
    so to preserve to myself for future times a memorial of
    his thought and unstudied speech. Naturally, therefore,
    they are such things as one man might say to another on
    the occasion of the moment, not such as he would put
    together with the idea of finding readers long
    afterwards. Such they are, and I know not how without my
    will or knowledge they fell among men. But to me it is no
    great matter if I shall appear unequal to composing such a
    work, and to Epictetus none at all if any one shall
    despise his discourse; for when he spoke it, it was
    evident that he had but one aim--to stir the minds of his
    hearers towards the best things. And if, indeed, the
    words here written should do the same, then they will do,
    I think, that which the words of sages ought to do. But
    if not, yet let those who read them know this, that when
    he himself spoke them, it was impossible for the hearer
    to avoid feeling whatever Epictetus desired he should
    feel. But if his words, when they are merely words, have
    not this effect, perhaps it is that I am in fault,
    perhaps it could not have been otherwise. Farewell!"
 
 The style of the _Dissertations_, as they have reached us, answers very
 well to the above account of their origin and purpose. They contain much
 that the world should be as little willing to neglect as anything that
 Greek philosophy has left us; but they contain also many repetitions,
 redundancies, incoherencies; and are absolutely devoid of any sort of
 order or system in their arrangement. Each chapter has generally
 something of a central theme, but beyond this all is chaos. The same
 theme will be dwelt on again and again in almost the same phrases;
 utterances of majestic wisdom are imbedded in pages of tedious argument,
 and any grouping of the chapters according to a progressive sequence of
 ideas will be looked for in vain.
 
 Under these conditions it was evident that the teaching of Epictetus
 could never win half the influence which its essential qualities fitted
 it to exercise. And accordingly, as another and better vehicle for this
 influence, Arrian compiled and condensed from the _Dissertations_ the
 small handbook of the Stoic philosophy known as the _Encheiridion of
 Epictetus_. This little work has made Epictetus known to very many whom
 the _Dissertations_ would never have reached. It had the
 distinction--unparalleled in the case of any other Pagan writing, if we
 except the doubtful _Sententiae_ of Xystus--of being adopted as a
 religious work in the early Christian Church. Two paraphrases of
 it--still extant--one of which was specially designed for the use of
 monastic bodies, were produced about the sixth century A. D., in which
 very few changes were made in the text, beyond the alteration of Pagan
 names and allusions to Scriptural ones.
 
 About the same time it was made the subject of an elaborate and lengthy
 commentary by a Pagan writer, Simplicius, wherein chapter after chapter
 is dissected, discussed, and explained. It was elegantly rendered into
 Latin by the well-known scholar of the Renaissance, Angelo Politian, who
 dedicated his translation to Lorenzo de' Medici. Down to the present
 day, as numerous translations testify, it has remained the most usual
 means of access to the thought of Epictetus.
 
 But inestimable as the _Encheiridion_ is, he who knows it alone has
 gained nothing like all that Epictetus has to give. It is a compendium;
 and although much more stirring and forcible than is usual with such
 works, it cannot give us the wealth of interesting allusion, reflection,
 humor, the bursts of eloquence, the abrupt and biting style, the vivid
 revelations of personal feeling, which marked the teaching of Epictetus
 in the form in which he delivered it. It seems, therefore, that to make
 him as accessible as he can be to those for whom such things have any
 value or interest, it were necessary to produce from the _Encheiridion_
 and the _Dissertations_ a third work, which should have the advantages
 of each. This is what I have endeavored to do in the present work. In it
 the whole of the _Encheiridion_ is given, and the divisions of
 subject-matter into which the _Encheiridion_ falls have been observed by
 the division of my translation into five Books, corresponding with the
 natural divisions of the _Encheiridion_--Book I., treating of the first
 principles of the Stoic philosophy; Book II., dealing with the general
 application of these principles to life; Book III., with man's relations
 to his fellow-man; Book IV., with his relations to God; Book V.,
 containing, besides a couple of concluding chapters, chiefly practical
 counsels of behavior on various particular occasions, and _obiter dicta_
 on the use of the faculties. Such is the scheme of arrangement suggested
 by the _Encheiridion_; and I have filled it in by setting among the
 chapters of the _Encheiridion_ chapters or passages from the
 _Dissertations_, selected for their relevancy to the matter in hand. In
 fact, I have reversed the process by which the _Encheiridion_ came into
 being. It was condensed out of the _Dissertations_: I have expanded it
 again by drawing into it a large quantity of material from the original
 work, and subjecting the new matter thus gained to the system and order
 of sequence which I found to prevail in the _Encheiridion_. The passages
 or chapters taken from the _Dissertations_ are those which seemed to me
 most characteristic of the philosophy or the personality of Epictetus,
 and I have made it my aim to omit nothing which is essential to a full
 and clear understanding of the message he had to deliver to his
 generation. Of course there is plenty of room for differences of opinion
 as to the manner in which this conception has been here carried out; but
 I hope that the present attempt may do something to win a larger
 audience for his teaching than former editions could, in the nature of
 the case, obtain. If this hope should prove to be well founded, I shall
 expect, some day, to give the present English version a counterpart in a
 Greek text arranged on the same lines.
 
 I may add here that the reader will find an Index at the end of this
 volume, in which every paragraph is referred to its original source in
 the _Dissertations_, _Encheiridion_, or _Fragments_--the references
 applying to Schweighaeuser's standard edition of Epictetus.[2]
 
 As regards the style of my translation, I hope the tinge of archaism I
 have given it will be felt to suit the matter. I could think of no idiom
 so varied, so flexible even down to its use of various grammatical
 forms, so well suited alike to colloquy, or argument, or satire, or
 impassioned eloquence, as Elizabethan English.
 
 So much to make the plan of the present work understood; and the reader
 may perhaps wish that I would now leave him to the study of it. But
 there is much in Epictetus the significance of which will not appear to
 any one who is unacquainted with the general system of Stoic philosophy
 which formed the basis of Epictetus's ethical teaching. And I hope that
 the reader will prefer to have such information as is necessary given
 him in the form of a general introduction rather than in that of a
 multitude of notes.
 
 The founder of the Stoic philosophy was Zeno, a native of Cyprus, who
 taught in Athens, about 300 B. C., in that frescoed arcade, or Stoa,
 which gave its name to his school. His birthplace is worth noting, for
 Zeno lived at the beginning of that epoch, himself one of the first
 products of it, in which the influence of the East became strongly
 apparent in Greek thought; the period called Hellenistic in
 contradistinction to the purely Hellenic period which ended in the
 conquests of the Macedonians. In many ways the conditions of life in the
 Hellenistic period formed the most favorable _milieu_ possible for the
 development of Greek thought upon the only lines which, after Aristotle,
 it could fruitfully pursue; and this not in spite of, but even because
 of, the great degradation of political and social life from which all
 Hellendom then suffered. What the democratic polities were like, on
 which was laid the problem of confronting Philip of Macedon, we may
 conjecture from the history of the best known and assuredly not the
 worst of them, Athens. And the best type of Athenian whose rise to power
 was favored by the conditions of this time and place was Demosthenes:
 Demosthenes, the grand historical warning to all peoples against
 committing their destinies to professional orators; the statesman whose
 doubtless real veneration for his country and her past served only to
 make him a more mischievous counselor in her present difficulties; whose
 splendid power as a wielder of words was scarcely more signal than his
 incapacity and cowardice when he was called upon to match those words
 with deeds. Athens, entangling the Thebans in an alliance against
 Macedon, and then leaving them to face Alexander alone; deifying
 Demetrius the Besieger for driving out a Macedonian garrison, and
 allotting him the Parthenon itself to be his lodging and the scene of
 his unspeakable profligacies; murdering Phocion, the one man who dared
 to bring sincerity and virtue to her service--Athens was a type of the
 Greek States of this epoch: too unprincipled for democratic government,
 too contentious for despotism, too vain to submit to foreign rule, too
 lacking in valor, purpose, union, to resist it with effect.
 
 Whatever the causes of the change may have been, the conditions of
 public life in this Hellenistic period were certainly very different
 from those which prevailed, albeit with decadence, before that vast
 breaking up of boundaries and destruction of political systems involved
 in the Macedonian conquests. The successful and inspiring conflict with
 Persia waged by the Hellenic States had for a time made all Greek hearts
 to beat with one aspiration, and had brought to the front a race of
 leaders who were capable of subduing the Greek democracies to their own
 steadfast and statesmanlike purposes. Public life was then not only a
 possible but even the most natural career for a man of talent and
 probity. The small size of the Greek States gave almost every such man
 an opportunity of action, and so keen and universal was the interest in
 politics that it threatened to lead Greek philosophy into a region in
 which philosophy is very apt to lose its vitalizing connection with
 human consciousness and experience, and to stiffen into barren
 speculation. In a word, man, as an individual, began to be too much lost
 sight of in the consideration of man as a citizen; his uses, his duties,
 the whole worth and significance of his life, came to be estimated too
 exclusively by his relations to the visible society about him. It was
 when the great Stoic Chrysippus found himself obliged to stand aloof
 from all participation in politics--"For if I counsel honorably I shall
 offend the citizens, and if basely, the Gods"--that such men as he were
 led to ask themselves: Is there then any sphere of human endeavor out of
 the reach of the tyranny of circumstance? If I cannot be a citizen, what
 am I worth then simply as a man? If I can be nothing to my fellows, what
 can I be to God? To a state of things, then, which, speaking broadly,
 made public life impossible to honest men, we owe the noblest ethical
 system of antiquity; to the enforced concentration of thought upon the
 individual we owe a certain note of universality till then absent from
 Hellenic thought.
 
 But stoicism was not the only product of the speculation of this period.
 Side by side with it there started into being two other systems of
 philosophy, the necessity for combating which was doubtless of immense
 service to its development. These were Epicureanism and Pyrrhonism; and
 as the reader will find Epictetus much concerned with each of them, it
 may be desirable that I should give some brief account of their cardinal
 doctrines.
 
 Epicurus was an Athenian. After some residence in Lesbos and Lampsacus,
 he began to teach in his native city about the year 306 B. C. His ethical
 views, which are all that concern us here, were of a distinctly
 unelevating nature. Pleasure, [Greek: hedone], was pronounced to be for
 each man the end and aim of his being, and the only rational motive of
 action. This, however, was not the pleasure of the voluptuary--its
 highest forms, according to Epicurus, were gained in [Greek: ataraxia]
 and [Greek: aponia]--that is, a cheerful and unanxious temperament, with
 leisure for contemplation, ends not attainable by the criminal who lives
 in constant fear of detection, or the luxurious liver in whom satiety
 produces disgust and weariness.
 
 Certain bodily conditions were, however, regarded as objects in
 themselves, and partaking of the nature of the absolutely good; and all
 entanglement in human relationships was discountenanced for the
 disturbance and distress which such relationships were liable to cause.
 These doctrines were put in practice by their teacher in inuring himself
 to a hermit-like simplicity and abstemiousness of life; and his life was
 philosophically consistent with his doctrines, for it is clear that the
 end of Pleasure will be most surely gained by him who has fewest wants
 to gratify. But though the lives of Epicurus and his immediate followers
 were exceptionally sober and strict, the total effect of his doctrine
 could not but have been evil. They were purely egoistic in this
 tendency--they centered each man's activity and interest upon himself
 alone, they bade him take no thought for any other earthly or heavenly
 thing, and taught him that this ideal of indifference was realized in
 its full perfection by the Gods, who dwelt apart in divine repose while
 blind necessity had its way with human destiny.
 
 Pyrrho of Elis, a rather earlier teacher than Zeno or Epicurus, who
 is said to have studied philosophy under Indian Gymnosophists and
 Chaldean Magi, was the originator in European thought of a great and
 permanent philosophic movement. His school was inspired by the _Geist
 der stets verneint_, and the term Skeptic was first devised to describe
 its attitude. Its strength is in a discovery which inevitably takes
 place when men begin to reflect upon their own mental operations--the
 discovery, namely, that, given a perceiving mind and a perceived object,
 it is always possible for the former, if it has the power of
 introspection, to doubt whether it has received a really true and
 faithful impression of the latter. How can we be assured that external
 objects are as we perceive them? How can we even be assured that there
 is any principle of constancy in their relations to our consciousness?
 The senses often delude us; we are convinced, in dreams, of the reality
 of appearances which, nevertheless, have no reality---why may not all
 perception be a delusion? Why may not even our sense of the validity of
 inference and of the truth of the axioms of geometry be a pure
 hallucination? With these searching questions the Skeptic cut at the
 root of all belief, and the problems which they raise have dominated
 philosophy down to the present day. Nor in two thousand years has any
 logical answer to them ever been found. Lotze, the last thinker of
 really first-rate powers that the world has seen, practically abandons
 all inquiry into theories of perception, and starts with the
 _assumption_ that we are living in a kosmos, not a chaos; that the
 order, coherence, reason in things to which consciousness testifies, are
 realities. In antiquity, I may add, the profound problems raised by
 Pyrrhonism do not seem to have been very profoundly apprehended either
 by the Pyrrhonists or their opponents. The latter had nothing better to
 appeal to than that notoriously feeble resource, the _argumentum ad
 hominem_. If the Pyrrhonist distrusted the evidence of his senses, they
 asked, why did he avoid walking over precipices or into the sea, or eat
 bread instead of earth, or in any way make choice of means for ends? The
 Pyrrhonist's answer was equally superficial. It anticipated the famous
 formula of Bishop Butler. Probability, argued they, was the guide of
 life--having observed certain results to follow from certain
 antecedents, the prudent man will shape his course in life accordingly,
 although, as a matter of theory and speculation, he may refuse to
 believe in the constancy of nature. This answer involves a clear
 inconsistency. It involves even a greater assumption than that which the
 Pyrrhonist refused to make as to the credibility of his perceptions--the
 assumption of the credibility of his recollections. To the
 thorough-going Skeptic there is no such thing as past experience--he is,
 as it were, new-born at each instant of his life.
 
 Such, in outline, were the systems against which the Stoic philosophy
 had to make good its position in the ancient world. From the first there
 seems to have been no doubt of its ability to do so, although,
 unhappily, the records which have been preserved of the teaching of its
 earliest days are few and obscure. The writings of Zeno, the founder of
 Stoicism, and of Chrysippus, his immediate successor in the leadership
 of the school, have utterly perished, while of Cleanthes, the third of
 the early Stoic teachers, very little remains beyond the profound and
 majestic Hymn to Zeus, of which I have given a translation in this work.
 The complete loss of the hundreds of treatises produced by Chrysippus is
 especially to be regretted, as he appears to have taken the main part in
 giving shape and system to the Stoic philosophy. "Had Chrysippus not
 been, the Stoa had not been," was a proverbial saying which testifies to
 his fame. However, from the accounts of ancient philosophers in Diogenes
 Laeertius, from Plutarch, Seneca, Cicero, and a few other authorities, we
 can learn pretty clearly what the framework of the Stoic system had
 grown to be long before Epictetus began to study it.
 
 In antiquity, a philosophic system was expected to have something to
 say for itself on three different branches of study--Logic, Physics
 (which included cosmogony and theology), and Ethics. We think of the
 Stoics chiefly in connection with the last-named of these subjects, but
 they were no less eminent in the others, and Chrysippus, in particular,
 was held to have done so much for the science of logic that a saying was
 current--"If there were dialectic among the Gods, it must be the
 dialectic of Chrysippus." Of the Stoic contributions to this science,
 scarcely any record remains.
 
 Of their physical system, however, much is known, and the reader of
 Epictetus needs to be acquainted with its general features. These were
 borrowed from an earlier thinker, Heracleitus, whose central doctrine
 was that the universe was an eternal flux and transition; everything was
 in a state of becoming, _ein Werdendes_. At the beginning of things, so
 far as they can be said to have any beginning, is the Deity in his
 purest manifestation, which, be it observed, is a strictly material one,
 a sublimated and ethereal fire, [Greek: aitherodes pyr]. In this fire
 dwelt the divine creative thought and impulse. The first step in that
 process of differentiation in which development consists is the
 production of vapor, which condensed into water. Two elementary forces
 play their part in these operations--a movement towards within, and a
 movement towards without, the one a densifying, the other an expanding
 and straining force ([Greek: tonos]). The former gives us solidity in
 matter, the other the qualities and energies of matter. Thus, by various
 degrees of density, we get earth, water, atmospheric air, and from air,
 the common element of earthly fire; and these elements in their various
 combinations, with their various attributes and powers, gradually
 produce the successive stages of organic life. Though all these proceed
 from the substance of the Divine Being, the Stoics recognized, in the
 derived substance which make up the universe as we have it now, various
 degrees of purity, of affinity to their original source. Man's body, for
 instance, with its passions and affections, lies comparatively far from
 the divine; but his soul is a veritable ray of the primitive fire, _Deus
 in corpore humano hospitans_. The popular mythology of the day was
 entirely rejected by the Stoics, although, as Professor Mahaffy points
 out, they never attempted to "discredit orthodoxy," but, on the
 contrary, used its myths and ceremonies with the utmost reverence as
 vehicles of profound religious truths. But they certainly believed in
 intelligences above man, yet below the one Supreme Being; thus the stars
 and the lightning (the reader will observe the allusions in the Hymn of
 Cleanthes) are in some sense divinities, by virtue of the supposed
 purity of their fiery essence.
 
 Thus from the one primitive divine element the Kosmos, with all its
 hierarchy of being, is evolved. But in the Stoic system [Greek: panta
 rhei],[3] there is no continuance in any one condition. As in the normal
 life of all earthly creatures there comes a certain climax or turning
 point, after which the forces of decay gain slowly but surely on those
 of growth and resistance, so also runs the history of the universe which
 includes them all. One by one the steps by which it was formed shall be
 retraced, and the derived substances which compose it consumed and
 re-absorbed by that from which they sprang. From matter in its grossest
 form to its purest, from earth and stone and water to the highest
 intelligence in men and daemons and Gods, nothing shall escape this doom
 of dissolution; everything shall yield up its separate existence, until
 at last the indestructible element of that primeval fire is again the
 sole being that remains, and Zeus is "alone in the conflagration,"
 self-contemplating in the solitudes of thought. But this is not the end.
 There is no end. The plastic impulse again resumes its sway, and soon
 another cycle of world-development and world-destruction begins to run
 its course. In the language of Seneca, "When that fatal day, that
 necessity of the times, shall have arrived, and it seems good to God to
 make an end of old things and ordain the better, then shall the ancient
 order be revoked and every creature be generated anew, and a race
 ignorant of guilt be given to the earth."
 
 This was the general physical system on which all Stoics were agreed,
 although there were differences of opinion upon minor points; such as
 how far these successive cycles resembled each other? some asserting
 that they did so in the minutest detail, others only in their larger
 features. It was a system, for all its superstitions, not without
 grandeur and truth. At bottom it expressed a sense of that phenomenon of
 ebb and flow, systole and diastole, the action and counteraction of
 balanced forces, which is perhaps the profoundest law of life.
 
 Two questions arise in connection with the Stoic cosmogony, which we
 must briefly discuss before proceeding farther. Are we justified in
 terming their view of the universe a materialistic one? and what was
 their doctrine of the destinies of the human soul? Now it is certainly
 the usual practice among writers on philosophy to reckon the Stoics as
 materialists, and it is unquestionably true that they denied the
 possibility of any existence which was not corporeal. Strong as they are
 on the supremacy of the human soul over the human body, sharp as is the
 line with which they divide these elements, yet the distinction is a
 moral, not a metaphysical one--each is an actual material substance. But
 we shall be seriously mistaken, nevertheless, if we place them in the
 same class with the scientific materialists of the present day.
 According to the latter, Thought is no necessary moment in the universe,
 but merely a product of certain accidental combinations of matter, a
 product which, when these are dissolved, must disappear from existence,
 without leaving a trace of its presence behind. Again, according to most
 modern opponents of the materialistic view, Thought has an independent
 and immortal being--it existed before matter was, and would continue to
 exist if all matter were annihilated. The Stoic view differed from each
 of these modern theories. It held Thought and Matter to be eternal,
 inseparable, and, indeed, strictly identical. Being in its primitive and
 purest form was fire, a corporeal substance, but one exhibiting
 consciousness, purpose, will.
 
 As to the question of the Stoic view of the immortality of the human
 soul, it does not seem to me to deserve so much discussion as it has
 received from some commentators. It is obvious that the soul must, in
 the end, share the lot of all other existences, and be resolved into the
 Divine Being which was its source. The only question that can arise is
 whether this resolution takes place at the moment of death, or whether
 the sense of personal identity persists for a certain period beyond that
 event; and this question, which Epictetus appears to have been wise
 enough to leave an open one, is philosophically of very little
 importance. The soul is immortal, the individual perishes; this is the
 conclusion of Stoicism, and if we know this, there is little else it can
 much concern us to know.
 
 The reader who desires to gain a thorough knowledge of Hellenistic
 philosophy, and of the social and political conditions in which it
 throve, will find what he seeks in two works to which I have to express
 my large indebtedness. One is Zeller's _Philosophie der Griechen_
 (_Epikureer_, _Stoiker u. Skeptiker_),[4] a monument of German research
 and erudition, in which vast masses of original material for the study
 of this most interesting, but neglected, epoch of the development of
 European intellect have been brought together, and interpreted with more
 than German lucidity and method. The other is Professor Mahaffy's recent
 volume, _Greek Life and Thought_, a study of the Hellenistic period in
 various aspects, which the scholar will not read without profit, nor the
 lay-reader without pleasure.
 
 We turn now to that department of the Stoic philosophy with which the
 reader of Epictetus is most concerned--its Ethics.
 
 The ethical question resolves itself into a search for the supreme
 object of human endeavor, the _Summum Bonum_, the absolute and essential
 good. This, for the Stoic, embodied itself in the formula, "to live
 according to Nature." But what is Nature? The will of God, as revealed
 in the heart and conscience of those who seek to know it, and
 interpreted through the observation in a reverent and faithful spirit of
 the facts of life.
 
 Going into the subject more precisely we find certain criteria of moral
 truth established, [Greek: prolepseis], as they were called, that is,
 primitive, original conceptions, or, as I have rendered them in my
 translation, "natural conceptions," dogmas by which all moral questions
 can be tried. If we inquire into the source of these [Greek:
 prolepseis], we shall find ourselves mistaken in our disposition to
 think that the Stoics regarded them as innate ideas. Innate they are
 not, for the Stoics held the soul at birth to be a _tabula rasa_, or
 blank page, which only experience could fill with character and meaning.
 But as Seneca says in his inquiry, "Quomodo ad nos prima boni honestique
 notitia pervenerit,"[5] although Nature alone could not teach us these
 things, could not equip us with the knowledge of them before we entered
 upon life, yet the "seeds" of this knowledge she does give us; the soul
 of every man has implanted in it a certain aptness or, indeed, necessity
 to deduce certain universal truths from such observation and experience
 as are common to all mankind; and these truths, the [Greek: prolepseis],
 though not strictly innate, have thus an inevitableness and dogmatic
 force not possessed by those which one man may reach and another miss in
 the exercise of the ordinary faculties, by argument, study, and so
 forth. By these natural conceptions the existence and character of God,
 and the general decrees of the moral law, are considered to be affirmed.
 If we inquire further how the Stoic explained the fact that some of
 these so-called inevitable and universal conclusions are denied in all
 sincerity by men like Epicurus, who were neither bad nor mad, we strike
 upon the difficulty which confronts all systems that aim at setting up
 any absolute body of truth, expressible in human language, in place of
 that partial, progressive, and infinitely varied revelation of God's
 mind and purpose to which the uncolored facts of the world's religious
 history seem to testify.
 
 The natural conceptions, as I have said, contain the primary doctrines
 of ethics. None of these are more important for the Stoic than that
 which declares essential Good to lie in the active, not the passive side
 of man; in the will, not in the flesh, nor in anything else which the
 will is unable to control. But a certain relative and conditional
 goodness may lie in matters which are yet of no moment to the spiritual
 man, to that part of him which seeks the essential good. And we must
 note that when Epictetus speaks of certain things as good or bad or
 indifferent, he is generally speaking of them in their relation to the
 spiritual man, and in the most absolute and unconditional sense. No evil
 can happen to the essential part of man, to that side of him which is
 related to the eternal and divine, without his own will. Hence the death
 of a beloved friend, or child, or wife, is no evil; and if it be no
 evil, we are forbidden to grieve for it, or, in the most usual phrase
 with Epictetus, we are not to be troubled or confounded by it, [Greek:
 tarassesthai]. But if this utterance should shock our natural feelings,
 it will do something which assuredly Epictetus never meant it to do. It
 is the soul of man which these events cannot injure, and it is the soul
 which is forbidden to think itself injured by them. Such love of the
 individual as may be embraced in the larger love of the All, of
 God--such grief for bereavements and calamities as does not overwhelm
 the inner man (ii. 19) in a "wave of mortal tumult," and dull his vital
 sense of the great moral ends which he was born to pursue, is repeatedly
 and explicitly admitted by Epictetus. Thus, in iii. 2, we have him
 arguing against Epicurus that there are certain natural sympathies
 between man and his kind, and even convicting Epicurus himself of a
 secret belief in these sympathies. Epicurus had dissuaded his followers
 from marriage, and the bringing-up of children, on account of the grief
 and anxiety which such relations necessarily entail. Not so the
 Stoics--they pressed their disciples to enter into the ordinary earthly
 relationships of husband, or wife, or citizen, and this without
 pretending to have found any means of averting the natural consequences
 which Epicurus dreaded, although they did profess to have discovered
 something in man which made him equal to the endurance of them. Again,
 although the condition of [Greek: apatheia], of inward peace, of
 freedom from passions, is again and again represented by Epictetus as
 the mark of the perfect sage, we are told that this [Greek: apatheia]
 is something quite different from "apathy"--a man is not to be
 emotionless "like a statue." And a third passage confirming this view is
 to be found in Book I., ch. xi. (Schweighaeuser), where the conduct of a
 man who was so afflicted by the illness of his little daughter that he
 ran away from the house, and would hear news of her only through
 messages, is condemned, not for the affection and anxiety it proved, but
 for its utter unreasonableness. "Would you," asks Epictetus, "have her
 mother and her nurse and her pedagogue, who all love her too, also run
 away from her, and leave her to die in the hands of persons who neither
 love nor care for her at all?" There is a grief which is really a
 self-indulgence, a barren, absorbing, paralyzing grief, which, to the
 soul possessed by it, makes every other thing in heaven and earth seem
 strange and cold and trivial. From such grief alone Epictetus would
 deliver us, and I think he would have accepted Mr. Aubrey de Vere's
 noble sonnet on _Sorrow_ as a thoroughly fit poetic statement of Stoic
 doctrine on this subject:--
 
   "Count each affliction, whether light or grave,
   God's messenger sent down to thee; do thou
   With courtesy receive him; rise and bow;
   And, ere his shadow pass thy threshold, crave
   Permission first his heavenly feet to lave;
   Then lay before him all thou hast, allow
   No cloud of passion to usurp thy brow,
   Or mar thy hospitality; no wave
   Of mortal tumult to obliterate
   The soul's marmoreal calmness: Grief should be
   Like joy, majestic, equable, sedate,
   Confirming, cleansing, raising, making free,
   Strong to consume small troubles; to commend
   Great thoughts, grave thoughts, thoughts lasting to the end."
 
 But the grief that shall do this is a grief that must be _felt_. And
 Epictetus assuredly never meant to offer the Stoic philosophy as a mere
 stupefying anodyne. Make the man a Stoic, and something yet remains to
 do--to make the Stoic a man. One of these purposes was not more the
 concern of Epictetus than the other. And he pursued both of them with a
 strength, sincerity, and sanity of thought, with a power of nourishing
 the heroic fiber in humanity, which, to my mind, make him the very chief
 of Pagan moralists.
 
 It is no purpose of mine to fill this preface with information which the
 reader can gain without doubt or difficulty from the author whom it
 introduces, and therefore I shall leave him to discover for himself what
 the positive ethical teaching of Epictetus was like. Nor is it,
 unhappily, possible to say much upon another subject on which Epictetus
 gives us little or no information--his own life and circumstances.
 Arrian wrote a biography of him, but it is now entirely lost, and the
 biographical details which have been collected from Simplicius, Suidas,
 Aulus Gellius, and others are very scanty. He was born at Hierapolis, in
 Phrygia, and became, how is unknown, a slave of Epaphroditus, a freedman
 and favorite of Nero, who is recorded to have treated him with great
 cruelty. One day, it is said, Epaphroditus began twisting his leg for
 amusement. Epictetus said, "If you go on you will break my leg."
 Epaphroditus persisted, the leg was broken, and Epictetus, with
 unruffled serenity, only said, "Did I not tell you that you would break
 my leg?" This circumstance is adduced by Celsus in his famous
 controversy with Origen as an instance of Pagan fortitude equal to
 anything which Christian martyrology had to show;[6] but it is probably
 a mere myth which grew up to account for the fact mentioned by
 Simplicius and Suidas that Epictetus was feeble in body and lame from an
 early age.
 
 Epaphroditus was probably a very bad master, and as a favorite and
 intimate of Nero's must have been a bad man; but we have to thank him
 for the fact that Epictetus, while yet a slave, was sent to attend the
 philosophic lectures of Musonius Rufus, an eminent Stoic of Rome, whom
 both Epictetus and Marcus Aurelius mention with great respect. The
 system of philosophic training had been at this time long organized.
 There were masters of repute everywhere, who delivered their instruction
 in regular courses, received a fixed payment for the same, and under
 whom crowds of young men assembled from far and near to study science
 and ethics--to receive, in short, what corresponded to a university
 education in those days. The curious circumstance that a slave like
 Epictetus could participate in advantages of this kind is generally
 explained as the result of a fashionable whim which possessed Roman
 nobles at this time for having philosophers and men of culture among
 their slaves. Professor Mahaffy, in his _Greek Life and Thought_ (p.
 132), commenting on the summons of the two philosophers, Anaxarchus and
 Callisthenes, to console Alexander after his murder of Cleitus,
 observes, that it was probably usual to call in philosophers to minister
 professionally in cases of affliction. From this, to making a
 philosopher a regular adjunct to a large household, even as the baron of
 later times kept a fool, the step is not great. But Epaphroditus, one
 thinks, must have had frequent reason to rue the choice he made in
 Epictetus, if he expected his domestic philosopher to excuse his
 misdeeds as Anaxarchus did those of Alexander on the occasion above
 mentioned.
 
 In the year 94 A. D. the emperor Domitian issued a decree expelling all
 philosophers from Rome--an easily explainable proceeding on his part if
 there were any large number of them who, in the words of Epictetus, were
 able "to look tyrants steadily in the face." Epictetus must have by this
 time obtained his freedom and set up for himself as a professor of
 philosophy, for we find him, in consequence of this decree, betaking
 himself to Nicopolis, a city of Epirus. Here he lived and taught to a
 venerable age, and here he delivered the discourses which Arrian has
 reported for us. He lived with great simplicity, and is said to have had
 no servant or other inmate of his house until he hired a nurse for an
 infant which was about to be exposed, according to the practice of those
 days when it was desired to check the inconvenient growth of a family,
 and which Epictetus rescued and brought up. The date of his death is
 unknown.
 
 And now, reader, I will take my leave of you with Arrian's farewell
 salutation to Lucius Gellius, which, literally translated, is _Be
 strong_. If you need it, I know no teacher better able to make or keep
 you so than Epictetus. At any rate, to give him a fair chance of doing
 what it is in him to do for English-speaking men and women is something
 I have regarded as a sort of duty, a discharge of obligation for his
 infinite service to myself; which done to the utmost of my powers, the
 fewest forewords are the best.
 
 
   T. W. R.
 
 
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 
     [Footnote 1: _The Encheiridion of Epictetus_, Translated into
     English by T. W. Rolleston. Kegan Paul, Trench, & Co., 1881.]
 
     [Footnote 2: Epicteti Dissertationum ab Arriano Digestarum Libri IV.
     et ex Deperditis Sermonibus Fragmenta. Post Io. Uptoni aliorumque
     curas, denuo ad Codicum M Storum fidem recensuit, Latina Versione,
     Adnotationibus, Indicibus illustravit Johannes Schweighaeuser,
     Lipsiae. MDCCXCIX.
 
     Epicteti Manuale et Cebetis Tabula Graece et Latine. Schw.
     MDCCXCVIII.
 
     There are two excellent English translations of the whole extant
     works of Epictetus--one by Mrs. Carter, published in the last
     century, the other by the late George Long, M. A. (Bohn Series), to
     both of which, but especially the latter, I desire to record my
     great obligations.]
 
     [Footnote 3: [Greek: panta rhei], all flows--the cardinal doctrine
     of the Heracleitean philosophy.]
 
     [Footnote 4: An English translation of this work has lately
     appeared.]
 
     [Footnote 5: Ep. 120. 4. ff.]
 
     [Footnote 6: Gregory Nazianzen, commenting on this narrative,
     remarks that it only shows how manfully _unavoidable_ sufferings may
     be borne.]
 
 
 
 
 CLEANTHES' HYMN TO ZEUS.[1]
 
 
    Most glorious of the Immortals, many named, Almighty
      forever.
 
    Zeus, ruler of nature, that governest all things with
      law,
 
    Hail! for lawful it is that all mortals should address
      Thee.
 
    For we are Thy offspring, taking the image only of Thy
      voice,[2] as many mortal things as live and move upon the
      earth.
 
    Therefore will I hymn Thee, and sing Thy might forever.
 
    For Thee doth all this universe that circles round the
      earth obey, moving whithersoever Thou leadest, and is
      gladly swayed by Thee.
 
    Such a minister hast Thou in Thine invincible hands;--the
      two-edged, blazing, imperishable thunderbolt.
 
    For under its stroke all Nature shuddereth, and by it
      Thou guidest aright the Universal Reason, that roams
      through all things, mingling itself with the greater and
      the lesser lights, till it have grown so great, and
      become supreme king over all.
 
    Nor is aught done on the earth without Thee, O God, nor
      in the divine sphere of the heavens, nor in the sea,
 
    Save the works that evil men do in their folly--
 
    Yea, but Thou knowest even to find a place for
      superfluous things, and to order that which is
      disorderly, and things not dear to men are dear to Thee.
 
    Thus dost Thou harmonize into One all good and evil
      things, that there should be one everlasting Reason of
      them all.
 
    And this the evil among mortal men avoid and heed not;
      wretched, ever desiring to possess the good, yet they nor
      see nor hear the universal Law of God, which obeying with
      all their heart, their life would be well.
 
    But they rush graceless each to his own aim,
 
    Some cherishing lust for fame, the nurse of evil strife,
 
    Some bent on monstrous gain,
 
    Some turned to folly and the sweet works of the flesh,
 
    Hastening, indeed, to bring the very contrary of these
      things to pass.
 
    But Thou, O Zeus, the All-giver, Dweller in the darkness
      of cloud, Lord of thunder, save Thou men from their
      unhappy folly,
 
    Which do Thou, O Father, scatter from their souls; and
      give them to discover the wisdom, in whose assurance Thou
      governest all things with justice;
 
    So that being honored, they may pay Thee honor,
 
    Hymning Thy works continually, as it beseems a mortal
      man.
 
    Since there can be no greater glory for men or Gods than
      this,
 
    Duly to praise forever the Universal Law.
 
 
    NOTE:
 
    The bracketed numerals in the text refer throughout to the Notes at
    the end of the volume; each chapter having, where notes are necessary,
    its own chapter of Notes.
 
 
 
 
 THE TEACHING OF EPICTETUS.
 
 
 
 
 _BOOK I._
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 THE BEGINNING OF PHILOSOPHY.
 
 
 1. Wouldst thou be good, then first believe that thou art evil.
 
 2. The beginning of philosophy, at least with those who lay hold of it
 as they ought and enter by the door,[1] is the consciousness of their
 own feebleness and incapacity in respect of necessary things.
 
 3. For we come into the world having by nature no idea of a right-angled
 triangle, or a quarter-tone, or a semi-tone, but by a certain tradition
 of art we learn each of these things. And thus those who know them not,
 do not suppose that they know them. But good and evil, and nobleness and
 baseness, and the seemly and the unseemly, and happiness and
 misfortune, and what is our concern and what is not, and what ought to
 be done and what not--who hath come into the world without an implanted
 notion of these things? Thus we all use these terms, and endeavor to fit
 our natural conceptions to every several thing. _He did well, rightly,
 not rightly, he failed, he succeeded, he is unrighteous, he is
 righteous_--which of us spareth to use terms like these? Which of us
 will defer the use of them till he hath learned them, even as ignorant
 men do not use terms of geometry or music? But this is the reason of it:
 we come into the world already, as it were, taught by Nature some things
 in this kind, and setting out from these things we have added thereto
 our own conceit.[2] _For how_, saith one, _do I not know what is noble
 and what is base_? Have I not the notion of it? Truly. _And do I not
 apply it to things severally?_ You do apply it. _Do I not, then, apply
 it rightly?_ But here lies the whole question, and here conceit entereth
 in. For setting out from things confessed by all, they go on by a false
 application to that which is disputed. For if, in addition to those
 things, they had gained also this power of application, what would then
 hinder them to be perfect? But now since you think that you apply
 rightly the natural conceptions to things severally, tell me, whence
 have you this assurance?
 
 ----"Because it seems so to me."
 
 But to another it seems otherwise--and he, too, doth he think his
 application right or not?
 
 ----"He doth think it."
 
 Can ye, then, both be rightly applying the conceptions in matters
 wherein your opinions contradict each other?
 
 ----"We cannot."
 
 Have you, then, aught better to show for your application, or aught
 above this, that it seemeth so to you? But what else doth a madman do
 than those things that to him seem right? And doth this rule suffice for
 him?
 
 ----"It doth not suffice."
 
 Come, then, to that which is above seeming. What is this?
 
 4. Behold, the beginning of philosophy is the observation of how men
 contradict each other, and the search whence cometh this contradiction,
 and the censure and mistrust of bare opinion. And it is an inquiry into
 that which seems, whether it rightly seems; and the discovery of a
 certain rule, even as we have found a balance for weights, and a plumb
 line for straight and crooked. This is the beginning of philosophy. Are
 all things right to all to whom they seem so? But how can contradictory
 things be right?
 
 ----"Nay, then, not all things, but those that seem to us right."
 
 And why to you more than the Syrians, or to the Egyptians? Why more
 than to me or to any other man? Not at all more. Seeming, then, doth not
 for every man answer to Being; for neither in weights or measures doth
 the bare appearance content us, but for each case we have discovered
 some rule. And here, then, is there no rule above seeming? And how could
 it be that there were no evidence or discovery of things the most
 necessary for men? There is, then, a rule. And wherefore do we not seek
 it, and find it, and, having found it, henceforth use it without
 transgression, and not so much as stretch forth a finger without it? For
 this it is, I think, that when it is discovered cureth of their madness
 those that mismeasure all things by seeming alone; so that henceforth,
 setting out from things known and investigated, we may use an organized
 body of natural conceptions in all our several dealings.
 
 5. What is the subject about which we are inquiring? Pleasure? Submit it
 to the rule, cast it into the scales. Now the Good must be a thing of
 such sort that we ought to trust in it? _Truly._ And we ought to have
 faith in it? _We ought._ And ought we to trust in anything which is
 unstable? _Nay._ And hath pleasure any stability? _It hath not._ Take
 it, then, and fling it out of the scales, and set it far away from the
 place of the Good. But if you are dim of sight, and one balance doth not
 suffice, then take another. Is it right to be elated in what is good?
 _Yea._ And is it right to be elated then in the presence of a pleasure?
 See to it that thou say not it is right; or I shall not hold thee worthy
 even of the balance.[3] Thus are things judged and weighed, when the
 rules are held in readiness. And the aim of philosophy is this, to
 examine and establish the rules. And to use them when they are known is
 the task of a wise and good man.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 ON THE NATURAL CONCEPTIONS.
 
 
 1. The natural conceptions are common to all men, and one cannot
 contradict another. For which of us but affirms that the Good is
 profitable, and that we should choose it, and in all circumstances
 follow and pursue it? Which of us but affirms that uprightness is
 honorable and becoming? Where, then, doth the contradiction arise?
 Concerning the application of the natural conceptions to things
 severally. When one saith, _He did well, he is a worthy man_, and
 another, _Nay, but he did foolishly_, then there is a contradiction
 among men, one with another. And there is the same contradiction among
 the Jews and the Syrians and the Egyptians and the Romans; not whether
 that which is righteous should be preferred to all things and in all
 cases pursued, but whether this be righteous or unrighteous, to eat the
 flesh of swine. And ye can discover the same contradiction in the matter
 of Achilles and Agamemnon. For call them before us: What sayest thou,
 Agamemnon, Should not that which is right and fair come to pass?
 
 ----"That should it."
 
 And what sayest thou, Achilles, Doth it not please thee that what is
 fair and right should be done?
 
 ----"Of all things this doth most please me."
 
 Then make application of your natural conceptions. Whence arose this
 dispute? The one saith: _I am not bound to deliver up Chryseis to her
 father._ And the other saith: _Thou art bound._ Assuredly one of them
 must ill apply the conception of duty. And again the one saith:
 _Therefore if I should deliver up Chryseis, it is meet that I take his
 prize from one of you._ And the other: _Wouldst thou, then, take from me
 my beloved?_ He saith: _Yea, even thine._ And _shall I alone, and I
 alone, have nothing_? And thus ariseth the contradiction.
 
 2. What is it, then, to be educated? It is to learn to apply the natural
 conceptions to each thing severally according to nature; and further, to
 discern that of things that exist some are in our own power[1] and the
 rest are not in our own power. And things that are in our own power are
 the will, and all the works of the will. And things that are not in our
 own power are the body, and the parts of the body, and possessions and
 parents and brethren and children and country and, in a word, our
 associates. Where now shall we place the Good? To what objects shall we
 apply it? To those which are in our own power? Then is health not good,
 and whole limbs and life? and are not children and parents and country?
 And who will bear with you if you say this? Let us, then, transfer it to
 these things. Now, can one be happy who is injured, and has missed
 gaining what is good? He cannot. And can such a one bear himself towards
 his fellows as he ought? How is it possible that he should? For I have
 it of nature that I must seek my own profit. If it profits me to own a
 piece of land, it profits me to take it from my neighbor. If it profits
 me to have a garment, it profits me to steal it from the bath. And hence
 wars, seditions, tyrannies, conspiracies. And how shall I be able to
 maintain a right mind towards God? for if I suffer injury and
 misfortune, it cannot be but He neglects me. And what have I to do with
 Him if He cannot help me? And, again, what have I to do with Him if He
 is willing to let me continue in the evils in which I am? Henceforth I
 begin to hate Him. Why, then, do we build temples and set up statues to
 Zeus as we do to powers of evil, such as Fever?[2] And how is He now
 the Saviour and the Raingiver and the Fruitgiver? And verily, all this
 follows, if we place anywhere in external things the nature and being of
 the Good.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 THE MASTER-FACULTY.
 
 
 1. Of all our faculties ye shall find but one that can contemplate
 itself, or, therefore, approve or disapprove itself. How far hath
 grammar the power of contemplation? Only so far as to judge concerning
 letters. And music? Only so far as to judge concerning melodies. Doth
 any of them, then, contemplate itself? Not one. But when you have need
 to write to your friend, grammar will tell you how to write; but whether
 to write or not, grammar will not tell. And so with the musical art in
 the case of melodies; but whether it is now meet or not to sing or to
 play, music will not tell. What, then, will tell it? That faculty which
 both contemplates itself and all other things. And what is this? It is
 the faculty of Reason; for we have received none other which can
 consider itself--what it is, and what it can, and what it is worth--and
 all the other faculties as well. For what else is it that tells us that
 a golden thing is beautiful, since itself doth not? Clearly it is the
 faculty which makes use of appearances. What else is it that judges of
 music and grammar, and the other faculties, and proves their uses, and
 shows the fit occasions? None else than this.
 
 2. Thus the Gods, as it was fit they should, place that only in our
 power which is the mightiest and master thing, the right use of
 appearances; but other things are not in our power. Was it that they did
 not wish it? I indeed think that had they been able they had made over
 to us those things also; but this they could in no way do. For being on
 the earth, and bound up with this flesh and with these associates, how
 was it possible that as regards these we should not be hindered by
 external things? But what saith Zeus? "Epictetus, if it were possible, I
 would have made both this thy little body and thy little property free
 and unhampered. But forget not now that this is but finely tempered
 clay, and nothing of thine own. And since I could not do this, I have
 given thee a part of ourselves, this power of desiring and disliking,
 and pursuing, avoiding, and rejecting, and, in brief, the use of
 appearances. Have a care, then, of this, hold this only for thine own,
 and thou shalt never be hindered or hampered, thou shalt not lament,
 thou shalt not blame, thou shalt never flatter any man." What then? Do
 these seem trifling matters? _God forbid._ Are you, then, not content
 with them? _At least I pray the Gods I may be._[1]
 
 3. But now having one thing in our power to care for, and to cleave to,
 we rather choose to be careful of many things, and to bind ourselves to
 many things, even to the flesh, and to possessions, and to brother and
 friend, and child and slave. And being thus bound to many things, they
 lie heavy on us and drag us down. So, if the weather be not fair for
 sailing, we sit down distraught and are ever peering forth to see how
 stands the wind. _It is north._ And what is that to us? _When will the
 west wind blow?_ When it shall seem good to it, friend; or to AEolus. For
 it was not thee, but AEolus whom God made "steward of the winds."[2] What
 then? It is right to devise how we may perfect the things that are our
 own, and to use the others as their nature is. And what, then, is their
 nature? As it may please God.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 THE NATURE OF THE GOOD.
 
 
 1. The subject for the good and wise man is his own master-faculty, as
 the body is for the physician and the trainer, and the soil is the
 subject for the husbandman. And the work of the good and wise man is to
 use appearances according to Nature. For it is the nature of every soul
 to consent to what is good and to reject what is evil, and to hold back
 about what is uncertain; and thus to be moved to pursue the good and to
 avoid the evil, and neither way towards what is neither good nor evil.
 For as it is not lawful for the money-changer or the seller of herbs to
 reject Caesar's coin, but if one present it, then, whether he will or no,
 he must give up what is sold for it, so it is also with the soul. When
 the Good appears, straightway the soul is moved towards it, and from the
 Evil. And never doth the soul reject any clear appearance of the good,
 no more than Caesar's coin. On this hangeth every movement both of God
 and man.
 
 2. The nature and essence of the Good is in a certain disposition of the
 Will; likewise that of the Evil. What, then, are outward things? Matter
 for the Will, about which being occupied it shall attain its own good or
 evil. How shall it attain the Good? Through not being dazzled with
 admiration of what it works on.[1] For our opinions of this, when right,
 make the will right, and when wrong make it evil. This law hath God
 established, and saith, "If thou wouldst have aught of good, have it
 from thyself."
 
 3. If these things are true (and if we are not fools or hypocrites),
 that Good, for man, lies in the Will, and likewise Evil, and all other
 things are nothing to us, why are we still troubled? why do we fear? The
 things for which we have been zealous are in no other man's power; and
 for the things that are in others' power we are not concerned. What
 difficulty have we now? _But direct me_, sayest thou. And why shall I
 direct thee? hath not God directed thee? hath He not given thee that
 which is thine own unhindered and unhampered, and hindered and hampered
 that which is not thine own? And what direction, what word of command
 didst thou receive from Him when thou camest thence? "Hold fast
 everything which is thine own--covet not that which is alien to thee.
 And faithfulness is thine, and reverence is thine: who, then, can rob
 thee of these things? Who can hinder thee to use them, if not thyself?
 But thyself can do it, and how? When thou art zealous about things not
 thine own, and hast cast away the things that are." With such counsels
 and commands from Zeus, what wilt thou still from me? Am I greater than
 he? am I more worthy of thy faith? But if thou hold to these things, of
 what others hast thou need? _But perchance these are none of his
 commands?_ Then bring forward the natural conceptions, bring the proofs
 of the philosophers, bring the things thou hast often heard, bring the
 things that thyself hast spoken, bring what thou hast read, bring what
 thou hast pondered.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 THE PROMISE OF PHILOSOPHY.
 
 
 1. Of things that exist, some are in our own power, some are not in our
 own power. Of things that are in our own power are our opinions,
 impulses, pursuits, avoidances, and, in brief, all that is of our own
 doing. Of things that are not in our own power are the body,
 possessions, reputation, authority, and, in brief, all that is not of
 our own doing. And the things that are in our own power are in their
 nature free, not liable to hindrance or embarrassment, while the things
 that are not in our own power are strengthless, servile, subject, alien.
 
 2. Remember, then, if you hold things by their nature subject to be
 free, and things alien to be your proper concern, you will be hampered,
 you will lament, you will be troubled, you will blame Gods and men. But
 if you hold that only to be your own which is so, and the alien for what
 it is, alien, then none shall ever compel you, none shall hinder you,
 you will blame no one, accuse no one, you will not do the least thing
 unwillingly, none shall harm you, you shall have no foe, for you shall
 suffer no injury.
 
 3. Aiming, then, at things so high, remember that it is no moderate
 passion wherewith you must attempt them, but some things you must
 utterly renounce, and put some, for the present, aside. For if, let us
 say, you aim also at this, to rule and to gather riches, then you are
 like, through aiming at the chief things also, to miss these lower ends;
 and shall most assuredly miss those others, through which alone freedom
 and happiness are won. Straightway, then, practice saying to every harsh
 appearance--_Thou art an Appearance and not at all the thing thou
 appearest to be_. Then examine it, and prove it by the rules you have,
 but first and above all by this, whether it concern something that is in
 our own power, or something that is not in our own power. And if the
 latter, then be the thought at hand: _It is nothing to Me._
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 THE WAY OF PHILOSOPHY.
 
 
 1. A certain Roman having entered with his son and listened to one
 lecture, "This," said Epictetus, "is the manner of teaching;" and he was
 silent. But when the other prayed him to continue, he spake as
 follows:--
 
 Every art is wearisome, in the learning of it, to the untaught and
 unskilled. Yet things that are made by the arts immediately declare
 their use, and for what they were made, and in most of them is something
 attractive and pleasing. And thus when a shoemaker is learning his trade
 it is no pleasure to stand by and observe him, but the shoe is useful,
 and moreover not unpleasing to behold. And the learning of a carpenter's
 trade is very grievous to an untaught person who happens to be present,
 but the work done declares the need of the art. But far more is this
 seen in music, for if you are by where one is learning, it will appear
 the most painful of all instructions; but that which is produced by the
 musical art is sweet and delightful to hear, even to those who are
 untaught in it. And here we conceive the work of one who studies
 philosophy to be some such thing, that he must fit his desire to all
 events, so that nothing may come to pass against our will, nor may aught
 fail to come to pass that we wish for. Whence it results to those who so
 order it, that they never fail to obtain what they would, nor to avoid
 what they would not, living, as regards themselves, without pain, fear,
 or trouble; and as regards their fellows, observing all the relations,
 natural and acquired; as son or father, or brother or citizen, or
 husband or wife, or neighbor or fellow-traveler, or prince or subject.
 Such we conceive to be the work of one who pursues philosophy. And next
 we must inquire how this may come about.
 
 2. We see, then, that the carpenter becomes a carpenter by learning
 something, and by learning something the pilot becomes a pilot. And here
 also is it not on this wise? Is it enough that we merely wish to become
 good and wise, or must we not also learn something? We inquire, then,
 what we have to learn?
 
 3. The philosophers say that, before all things, it is needful to learn
 that God is, and taketh thought for all things; and that nothing can be
 hid from Him, neither deeds, nor even thoughts or wishes. Thereafter, of
 what nature the Gods are. For whatever they are found to be, he who
 would please and serve them must strive, with all his might, to be like
 unto them. If the Divine is faithful, so must he be faithful; if free,
 so must he be free; if beneficent, so must he be beneficent; if
 high-minded, so must he be high-minded; so that thus emulating God, he
 shall both do and speak the things that follow therefrom.[1]
 
 4. Whence, then, shall we make a beginning? If you will consider this
 with me, I shall say, first, that you must attend to the sense of
 words.[2]
 
 ----"So I do not now understand them?"
 
 You do not.
 
 ----"How, then, do I use them?"
 
 As the unlettered use written words, or as cattle use appearances; for
 the use is one thing and understanding another. But if you think you
 understand, then take any word you will,[3] and let us try ourselves,
 whether we understand it. But it is hateful to be confuted, for a man
 now old, and one who, perhaps, hath served his three campaigns! And I
 too know this. For you have come to me now as one who lacketh nothing.
 And what could you suppose to be lacking to you? Wealth have you, and
 children, and it may be a wife, and many servants; Caesar knows you, you
 have won many friends in Rome, you give every man his due, you reward
 with good him that doeth good to you, and with evil him that doeth evil.
 What is still lacking to you? If, now, I shall show you that you lack
 the greatest and most necessary things for happiness, and that to this
 day you have cared for everything rather than for what behooved you; and
 if I crown all and say that you know not what God is nor what man is,
 nor Good nor Evil;--and what I say of other things is perhaps endurable,
 but if I say you know not your own self, how can you endure me, and bear
 the accusation, and abide here? Never--but straightway you will go away
 in anger. And yet what evil have I done you? Unless the mirror doth evil
 to the ill-favored man, when it shows him to himself such as he is, and
 unless the physician is thought to affront the sick man when he may say
 to him: _Man, dost thou think thou ailest nothing? Thou hast a fever:
 fast to-day and drink water._ And none saith, _What an affront_. But if
 one shall say to a man: _Thy pursuits art inflamed, thine avoidances are
 mean, thy purposes are lawless, thy impulses accord not with nature,
 thine opinions are vain and lying_--straightway he goeth forth and
 saith, _He affronted me_.
 
 5. We follow our business as in a great fair. Cattle and oxen are
 brought to be sold; and the greater part of the men come some to buy,
 some to sell; and few are they who come for the spectacle of the
 fair,--how it comes to pass, and wherefore, and who are they who have
 established it, and to what end. And so it is here, too, in this
 assembly of life. Some, indeed, like cattle, concern themselves with
 nothing but fodder; even such as those that care for possessions and
 lands and servants and offices, for these are nothing more than fodder.
 But few are they who come to the fair for love of the spectacle, what
 the world is and by whom it is governed. By no one? And how is it
 possible that a state or a house cannot endure, no not for the shortest
 time, without a governor and overseer, but this so great and fair fabric
 should be guided thus orderly by chance and accident? There is, then,
 one who governs. But what is his nature? and how doth he govern? and we,
 that were made by him, what are we, and for what are we? or have we at
 least some intercourse and link with him, or have we none? Thus it is
 that these few are moved, and thenceforth study this alone, to learn
 about the fair, and to depart. What then? they are mocked by the
 multitude. And in the fair, too, the observers are mocked by the
 traders; and had the cattle any reflection they would mock all those who
 cared for anything else than fodder.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 TO THE LEARNER.
 
 
 1. Remember that pursuit declares the aim of attaining the thing
 pursued, and avoidance that of not falling into the thing shunned; and
 he who fails in his pursuit is unfortunate, and it is misfortune to fall
 into what he would avoid. If now you shun only those things in your
 power which are contrary to Nature, you shall never fall into what you
 would avoid. But if you shun disease or death or poverty, you shall have
 misfortune.
 
 2. Turn away, then, your avoidance from things not in our power, and
 set it upon things contrary to Nature which are in our power. And let
 pursuit for the present be utterly effaced; for if you are pursuing
 something that is not in our power, it must needs be that you miscarry,
 and of things that are, as many as you may rightly aim at, none are yet
 open to you. But use only desire and aversion, and that indeed lightly,
 and with reserve, and indifferently.
 
 3. No great thing cometh suddenly into being, for not even a bunch of
 grapes can, or a fig. If you say to me now:_ I desire a fig_, I answer
 that there is need of time: let it first of all flower, and then bring
 forth the fruit, and then ripen. When the fruit of a fig-tree is not
 perfected at once, and in a single hour, would you win the fruit of a
 man's mind thus quickly and easily? Even if I say to you, expect it not.
 
 4. To fulfill the promise of a man's nature is itself no common thing.
 For what is a man? _A living creature_, say you; _mortal, and endowed
 with Reason_. And from what are we set apart by Reason? _From the wild
 beasts._ And what others? _From sheep and the like._ Look to it, then,
 that thou do nothing like a wild beast, for if thou do, the man in thee
 perisheth, thou hast not fulfilled his promise. Look to it, that thou do
 nothing like a sheep, or thus too the man hath perished. _What, then,
 can we do as sheep?_ When we are gluttonous, sensual, reckless, filthy,
 thoughtless, to what are we then sunken? To sheep. What have we lost?
 Our faculty of Reason. And when we are contentious, and hurtful, and
 angry, and violent, to what are we sunken? To wild beasts. And for the
 rest some of us are great wild beasts, and some of us little and evil
 ones; whereby we may say, "Let me at least be eaten by a lion."[1] But
 through all these things the promise of the man's nature has been
 ruined.
 
 5. For when is a complex proposition safe?[2] When it fulfills its
 promise. So that the validity of a complex proposition is when it is a
 complex of truths. And when is a disjunctive safe? When it fulfills its
 promise. And when are flutes, or a lyre, or a horse, or a dog? What
 marvel is it, then, if a man also is to be saved in the same way, and
 perish in the same way?
 
 6. But each thing is increased and saved by the corresponding works--the
 carpenter by the practice of carpentry, the grammarian by the study of
 grammar; but if he use to write ungrammatically, it must needs be that
 his art shall be corrupted and destroyed. Thus, too, the works of
 reverence save the reverent man, and those of shamelessness destroy him.
 And works of faithfulness save the faithful man, and the contrary
 destroy him. And men of the contrary character are strengthened therein
 by contrary deeds; the irreverent by irreverence, the faithless by
 faithlessness, the reviler by reviling, the angry by anger, the
 avaricious by unfair giving and taking.
 
 7. Know, that not easily shall a conviction arise in a man unless he
 every day speak the same things and hear the same things, and at the
 same time apply them unto life.
 
 8. Every great power is perilous to beginners. Thou must bear such
 things according to thy strength. _But I must live according to Nature?_
 That is not for a sick man.[3] Lead thy life as a sick man for a while,
 so that thou mayest hereafter live it as a whole man. Fast, drink water,
 abstain for a while from pursuit of every kind, in order that thou
 mayest pursue as Reason bids. And if as Reason bids, then when thou
 shalt have aught of good in thee, thy pursuit shall be well. _Nay, but
 we would live as sages and do good to men._ What good? What wilt thou
 do? Hast thou done good to thyself? But thou wouldst exhort them? And
 hast thou exhorted thyself?[4] Thou wouldst do them good--then do not
 chatter to them, but show them in thyself what manner of men philosophy
 can make. In thy eating do good to those that eat with thee, in thy
 drinking to those that drink, by yielding and giving place to all, and
 bearing with them. Thus do them good, and not by spitting thy bile upon
 them.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 THE CYNIC.
 
 
 1. One of his pupils, who seemed to be drawn towards the way of
 Cynicism, inquired of Epictetus what manner of man the Cynic ought to
 be, and what was the natural conception of the thing. And Epictetus
 said: Let us look into it at leisure. But so much I have now to say to
 you, that whosoever shall without God attempt so great a matter stirreth
 up the wrath of God against him, and desireth only to behave himself
 unseemly before the people. For in no well-ordered house doth one come
 in and say to himself: _I should be the steward of the house_, else,
 when the lord of the house shall have observed it, and seeth him
 insolently giving orders, he will drag him forth and chastise him. So it
 is also, in this great city of the universe, for here too there is a
 master of the house who ordereth each and all: Thou art the Sun; thy
 power is to travel round and to make the year and the seasons, and to
 increase and nourish fruits, and to stir the winds and still them, and
 temperately to warm the bodies of men. Go forth, run thy course, and
 minister thus to the greatest things and to the least. Thou art a calf;
 when a lion shall appear, do what befits thee, or it shall be worse for
 thee. Thou art a bull; come forth and fight, for this is thy part and
 pride, and this thou canst. Thou art able to lead the army against
 Ilion; be Agamemnon. Thou canst fight in single combat with Hector; be
 Achilles. But if Thersites came forth and pretended to the authority,
 then either he would not gain it, or, gaining it, he would have been
 shamed before many witnesses.
 
 2. And about this affair, do thou take thought upon it earnestly, for it
 is not such as it seemeth to thee. _I wear a rough cloak now, and I
 shall wear it then;[2] I sleep hard now, and I shall sleep so then. I
 will take to myself a wallet and staff, and I will begin to go about and
 beg, and to reprove every one I meet with; and if I shall see one that
 plucks out his hairs, I will censure him, or one that hath his hair
 curled, or that goes in purple raiment._ If thou conceivest the matter
 on this wise, far be it from thee--go not near it, it is not for thee.
 But if thou conceivest of it as it is, and holdest thyself not unworthy
 of it, then behold to how great an enterprise thou art putting forth
 thine hand.
 
 3. First, in things that concern thyself, thou must appear in nothing
 like unto what thou now doest. Thou must not accuse God nor man; thou
 must utterly give over pursuit, and avoid only those things that are in
 the power of thy will; anger is not meet for thee, nor resentment, nor
 envy, nor pity;[3] nor must a girl appear to thee fair, nor must
 reputation, nor a flat cake.[4] For it must be understood that other men
 shelter themselves by walls and houses and by darkness when they do such
 things, and many means of concealment have they. One shutteth the door,
 placeth some one before the chamber; _if any one should come, say, He is
 out, he is busy_. But in place of all these things it behooves the Cynic
 to shelter himself behind his own piety and reverence; but if he doth
 not, he shall be put to shame, naked under the sky. This is his house,
 this his door, this the guards of his chamber, this his darkness. For he
 must not seek to hide aught that he doeth, else he is gone, the Cynic
 hath perished, the man who lived under the open sky, the freeman. He
 hath begun to fear something from without, he hath begun to need
 concealment; nor can he find it when he would, for where shall he hide
 himself, and how? And if by chance this tutor, this public teacher,
 should be found in guilt, what things must he not suffer! And fearing
 these things, can he yet take heart with his whole soul to guide the
 rest of mankind? That can he never: it is impossible!
 
 4. First, then, thou must purify thy ruling faculty and this vocation
 of thine also, saying: Now it is my mind I must shape, as the carpenter
 shapes wood and the shoemaker leather; and the thing to be formed is a
 right use of appearances. But nothing to me is the body, and nothing to
 me the parts of it. _Death?_ Let it come when it will, either death of
 the whole or of a part. _Flee it!_ And whither? Can any man cast me out
 of the universe? He cannot; but whithersoever I may go there will be the
 sun, and the moon, and there the stars, and visions, and omens, and
 communion with the Gods.[5]
 
 5. And, furthermore, when he hath thus fashioned himself, he will not be
 content with these things, who is a Cynic indeed. But know that he is an
 herald from God to men, declaring to them the truth about good and evil
 things; that they have erred, and are seeking the reality of good and
 evil where it is not; and where it is, they do not consider; and he is a
 spy, like Diogenes, when he was led captive to Philip after the battle
 of Chaeronea.[6] For the Cynic is, in truth, a spy of the things that are
 friendly to men, and that are hostile; and having closely spied out all,
 he must come back and declare the truth. And he must neither be stricken
 with terror and report of enemies where none are; nor be in any
 otherwise confounded or troubled by the appearances.
 
 6. He must then be able, if so it chance, to go up impassioned, as on
 the tragic stage, and speak that word of Socrates, "O men, whither are
 ye borne away? What do ye? Miserable as ye are! like blind men ye
 wander up and down. Ye have left the true road, and are going by a
 false; ye are seeking peace and happiness where they are not, and if
 another shall show you where they are, ye believe him not. Wherefore
 will ye seek it in outward things? _In the body?_ It is not there--and
 if ye believe me not, lo, Myro! lo, Ophellius.[7] _In possessions?_ It
 is not there, and if ye believe me not, lo, Croesus! lo, the wealthy
 of our own day, how full of mourning is their life! _In authority?_ It
 is not there, else should those be happy who have been twice or thrice
 consul; yet they are not. Whom shall we believe in this matter? You, who
 look but on these men from without, and are dazzled by the appearance,
 or the men themselves? And what say they? Hearken to them when they
 lament, when they groan, when by reason of those consulships, and their
 glory and renown, they hold their state the more full of misery and
 danger! _In royalty?_ It is not there; else were Nero happy and
 Sardanapalus; but not Agamemnon himself was happy, more splendid though
 he was than Nero or Sardanapalus; but while the rest are snoring what is
 he doing?
 
   "He tore his rooted hair by handfuls out."--_Il._ x.
 
 And what saith himself? "I am distraught," he saith, "and I am in
 anguish; my heart leaps forth from my bosom."--[_Il._ x.] Miserable man!
 which of thy concerns hath gone wrong with thee? Thy wealth? Nay. Thy
 body? Nay; but thou art rich in gold and bronze. What ails thee then?
 That part, whatever it be, with which we pursue, with which we avoid,
 with which we desire and dislike, thou hast neglected and corrupted. How
 hath it been neglected? He hath been ignorant of the true Good for which
 it was born, and of the Evil; and of what is his own, and what is alien
 to him. And when it goeth ill with something that is alien to him, he
 saith, _Woe is me, for the Greeks are in peril._ O unhappy mind of thee!
 of all things alone neglected and untended. _They will be slain by the
 Trojans and die!_ And if the Trojans slay them not, will they not still
 die? _Yea, but not all together._ What, then, doth it matter? for if it
 be an evil to die, it is alike evil to die together or to die one by
 one. Shall anything else happen to them than the parting of body and
 soul? _Nothing._ And when the Greeks have perished, is the door closed
 to thee? canst thou not also die? _I can._ Wherefore, then, dost thou
 lament: _Woe is me, a king, and bearing the scepter of Zeus_? There is
 no unfortunate king, as there is no unfortunate God. What, then, art
 thou? In very truth a shepherd; for thou lamentest even as shepherds do
 when a wolf hath snatched away one of the sheep; and sheep are they whom
 thou dost rule. And why art thou come hither? Was thy faculty of pursuit
 in any peril, or of avoidance, or thy desire or aversion? _Nay_, he
 saith, _but my brother's wife was carried away_. Was it not a great gain
 to be rid of an adulterous wife? _Shall we be, then, despised of the
 Trojans?_ Of the Trojan? Of what manner of men? of wise men or fools? If
 of wise men, why do ye make war with them? if of fools, why do ye heed
 them?[8]
 
 7. _In what, then, is the good, seeing that in these things it is not?
 Tell us, thou, my lord missionary and spy!_ It is there where ye deem it
 not, and where ye have no desire to seek it. For did ye desire, ye would
 have found it in yourselves, nor would ye wander to things without, nor
 pursue things alien, as if they were your own concerns. Turn to your own
 selves; understand the natural conceptions which ye possess. What kind
 of thing do ye take the Good to be? Peace? happiness? freedom? Come,
 then, do ye not naturally conceive it as great, as precious, and that
 cannot be harmed? What kind of material, then, will ye take to shape
 peace and freedom withal--that which is enslaved or in that which is
 free? _That which is free._ Have ye the flesh enslaved or free? _We know
 not._ Know ye not that it is the slave of fever, of gout, of ophthalmia,
 of dysentery, of tyranny, and fire, and steel, and everything that is
 mightier than itself? _Yea, it is enslaved._ How, then, can aught that
 is of the body be free? and how can that be great or precious which by
 nature is dead, mere earth or mud?
 
 8. What then? have ye nothing that is free? _It may be nothing._ And who
 can compel you to assent to an appearance that is false? _No man._ And
 who can compel you not to assent to an appearance that is true? _No
 man._ Here, then, ye see that there is in you something that is by
 nature free. But which of you, except he lay hold of some appearance of
 the profitable, or of the becoming, can either pursue or avoid, or
 desire or dislike, or adapt or intend anything? _No man._ In these
 things, too, then, ye have something that is unhindered and free. This,
 miserable men, must ye perfect; this have a care to, in this seek for
 the Good.
 
 9. _And how is it possible that one can live prosperously who hath
 nothing; a naked, homeless, hearthless, beggarly man, without servants,
 without a country?_ Lo, God hath sent you a man to show you in very deed
 that it is possible. Behold me, that I have neither country, nor house,
 nor possessions, nor servants; I sleep on the ground; nor is a wife
 mine, nor children, nor domicile, but only earth and heaven, and a
 single cloak. And what is lacking to me? do ever I grieve? do I fear? am
 I not free? When did any of you see me fail of my pursuit, or meet with
 what I had avoided? When did I blame God or man? When did I accuse any
 man? When did any of you see me of a sullen countenance? How do I meet
 those whom ye fear and marvel at? Do I not treat them as my slaves? Who
 that seeth me, but thinketh he beholdeth his king and his lord?
 
 10. So these are the accents of the Cynic, this his character, this his
 design. Not so--but it is his bag, and his staff, and his great jaws;
 and to devour all that is given to him, or store it up, or to reprove
 out of season every one that he may meet, or to show off his
 shoulder.[9]
 
 11. Dost thou see how thou art about to take in hand so great a matter?
 Take first a mirror, look upon thy shoulders, mark well thy loins and
 thighs. Thou art about to enter thy name for the Olympic games, O man;
 no cold and paltry contest. Nor canst thou then be merely overcome and
 then depart; but first thou must be shamed in the sight of all the
 world; and not alone of the Athenians, or Lacedaemonians, or
 Nicopolitans. And then if thou hast too rashly entered upon the contest
 thou must be thrashed, and before being thrashed must suffer thirst and
 scorching heat, and swallow much dust.
 
 12. Consider more closely, know thyself, question thy genius,[10]
 attempt nothing without God; who, if He counsel thee, be sure that He
 wills thee either to be great or to be greatly plagued. For this very
 agreeable circumstance is linked with the calling of a Cynic; he must be
 flogged like an ass, and, being flogged, must love those who flog him,
 as though he were the father or brother of all mankind. Not so, but if
 one shall flog thee, stand in the midst and shriek out, _O Caesar, what
 things do I suffer in the Emperor's peace! Let us take him before the
 pro-consul._ But what is Caesar to the Cynic? or what is a pro-consul? or
 what is any other than He that hath sent him hither, and whom he
 serveth, which is Zeus? Doth he call upon any other than God? Is he not
 persuaded, whatsoever things he may suffer, that he is being trained and
 exercised by God? Hercules, when he was exercised by Eurystheus, never
 deemed himself wretched; but fulfilled courageously all that was laid
 upon him. But he who shall cry out and bear it hard when he is being
 trained and exercised by Zeus, is he worthy to bear the scepter of
 Diogenes? Hear what Diogenes saith, when ill of a fever, to the
 bystanders: _Base souls, will ye not remain? To see the overthrow and
 combat of athletes, how great a way ye journey to Olympia; and have ye
 no will to see a combat between a fever and a man?_ And will such an one
 presently accuse God who hath sent him, as having used him ill--he who
 was glorying in his lot, and held himself worthy to be a spectacle to
 the bystanders? For of what shall he accuse Him: that his life is
 seemly, that he manifests God's will, that he showeth forth his virtue
 more brightly? Come, then; and what saith he about death, about pain?
 How did he compare his own happiness with that of the Great King? nay,
 he thought rather that there was no comparison. For where there are
 confusions, and griefs, and fears, and unattained pursuits, and
 avoidance in vain, and envy and rivalry, can the way to happiness lie
 there? But where rotten opinions are there must of necessity be all
 these things.
 
 13. And the young man having asked whether one that hath fallen ill
 shall obey, if a friend desire that he will go home with him and be
 tended: Where, he said, will you show me the friend of a Cynic? For he
 himself must be even such another, so as to be worthy to be reckoned his
 friend. A sharer in the scepter and the royalty must he be, and a worthy
 servant, if he will be worthy of his friendship, as Diogenes was of
 Antisthenes and Crates of Diogenes. Or seems it so to thee that
 whosoever shall come to him and bid him hail is his friend? and that he
 will think him worthy that a Cynic shall go to his house? Thus if it
 please thee to be a Cynic, bethink thee rather of such a thing as this,
 and cast about for a dainty dungheap whereon to have thy fever; and see
 that it look away from the north, so that thou be not chilled. But thou
 seemest to me to wish to retreat into somebody's house and spend thy
 time there, and be fed. What hast thou to do with undertaking so great a
 matter?
 
 14. _But marriage_, said he, _and the begetting of children,--are these
 to be received by the Cynic among his chief purposes?_
 
 Give me, said Epictetus, a city of wise men, and perhaps no one will
 easily come to the Cynic way: for whose sake should he embrace it?
 However, if we do suppose such a thing, there is nothing to hinder his
 marrying and begetting children; for his wife will be even such another,
 and his father-in-law such another, and thus will his children be
 brought up. But things being as they now are, as it were in order of
 battle, must not the Cynic be given wholly and undistracted to the
 service of God, being able to go about among men, and not bound to
 private duties, nor entangled in ties which, if he transgress, he can no
 longer preserve the aspect of honesty and goodness; and if he obey them,
 he hath lost that of the missionary, the spy, the herald of the Gods?
 For see! he must needs observe a certain conduct towards his
 father-in-law, and he hath somewhat to render also to the rest of his
 wife's kin and to his wife herself. And for the rest, he is shut off
 from Cynicism by the care for sickness, or means of livelihood. For one
 thing alone, he must have a vessel for warming water for his little
 child, where he may wash it in the bath; and wool for his wife when she
 has been delivered, and oil, and a couch, and a drinking cup--already a
 number of utensils--and other affairs and distractions. Where shall I
 thenceforth find that king, whose business is the common weal?
 
   "Warden of men, and with so many cares."
                                 _Il._ ii. 25.
 
 on whom it lies to oversee all men, the married, and parents, and who
 useth his wife well, and who ill, and who wrangles, and what household
 is well-ordered, and what not; going about as a physician, and feeling
 pulses--"thou hast a fever, thou a headache, thou the gout; do thou
 fast, do thou eat, do thou avoid the bath, thou needest the knife, thou
 the cautery?" Where is the place for leisure to one who is bound to
 private duties? Must he not provide raiment for his children? yea, and
 send them to the schoolmaster with their tablets and writing
 instruments? and have a bed ready for them, since a man cannot be a
 Cynic from the womb? Else were it better to cast them away at once than
 kill them in this way. See, now, to what we have brought our Cynic--how
 we have taken away his kingship from him! _True, but Crates married._
 Thou speakest of a circumstance that arose from love, and adducest a
 wife who was another Crates.[11] But our inquiry is concerning common
 marriages, and how men may be undistracted; and thus inquiring, we do
 not find it, in this condition of the world, a purpose of chief concern
 for a Cynic.
 
 15. _How, then_, said he, _shall he still be preserving the community?_
 God help thee! Whether do they best serve mankind who fill their own
 place by bringing into the world two or three screaming children, or
 those who, as far they may, oversee all men, what they do, how they
 live, wherewith they concern themselves, and what duties they neglect?
 And were the Thebans more benefited by as many as left their little
 children behind, or by Epaminondas, who died childless? And did Priam,
 who begat fifty good-for-nothing sons, or Danaus, or AEolus,[12] better
 serve the community than Homer? Shall, then, the command of an army or
 the writing of poems withdraw a man from marriage and fatherhood, and he
 shall not be thought to have gained nothing for his childlessness, but
 the kingship of a Cynic shall be not worth what it costs? It may be we
 do not perceive his greatness, nor do we worthily conceive of the
 character of Diogenes; but we turn away our eyes to the present Cynics,
 "watch-dogs of the dining-room,"[13] who in nothing resemble those
 others, save perchance in breaking wind; but in no other thing. For
 else these things would not have moved us, nor should we have marveled
 if a Cynic will not marry nor beget children. Man! he hath begotten all
 mankind, he hath all men for his sons, all women for his daughters; so
 doth he visit all and care for all. Thinkest thou that he is a mere
 meddler and busybody in rebuking those whom he meets? As a father he
 doth it, as a brother, and as servant of the Universal Father, which is
 God.
 
 16. If it please thee, ask of me also whether he shall have to do with
 affairs of public polity? Fool! dost thou seek a greater polity than
 that in whose affairs he is already concerned? Will it be greater if he
 come forward among the Athenians to say something about ways or
 means--he, whose part it is to discourse with all men, Athenians,
 Corinthians, Romans alike, not concerning means or ways, nor concerning
 peace or war, but about happiness and unhappiness, about good-fortune
 and ill-fortune, about slavery and freedom? And of a man that hath his
 part in so great a polity will you ask me if he shall attend to public
 affairs? Ask me also if he shall be a ruler; and again I shall say, Thou
 fool, what rule can be greater than his?
 
 17. And to such a man there is need also of a certain kind of body. For
 if he shall appear consumptive, meager, and pale, his witness hath not
 the same emphasis. Not only by showing forth the things of the spirit
 must he convince foolish men that it is possible, without the things
 that are admired of them, to be good and wise, but also in his body must
 he show that plain and simple and open-air living are not mischievous
 even to the body: "Behold, even of this I am a witness, I and my body."
 So Diogenes was wont to do, for he went about radiant with health, and
 with his very body he turned many to good. But a Cynic that men pity
 seems to be a beggar--all men turn away from him, all stumble at him.
 For he must not appear squalid; so that neither in this respect shall he
 scare men away; but his very austerity should be cleanly and pleasing.
 
 18. Much grace of body, then, must belong to the Cynic, and also
 quickness of mind, else he is a mere clot of slime and nothing else; for
 he must be ready and apt to meet all that may befall him. Thus when one
 said to Diogenes: _Thou art that Diogenes who thinkest there are no
 Gods_, he replied, _And how may that be, seeing I hold thee hateful to
 the Gods?_ And again, when Alexander stood beside him, as he was lying
 asleep, and said:
 
   "Not all night must a man of counsel sleep,"
 
 he answered, ere he was yet awake:
 
   "Warden of men, and with so many cares."[14]
 
 19. But before all things must his ruling faculty be purer than the sun,
 else he must needs be a gambler and cheater, who, being himself
 entangled in some iniquity, will reprove others. For, see how the matter
 stands: to these kings and tyrants, their spearmen and their arms give
 the office of reproving men, and the power to punish transgressors, yea,
 though they themselves be evil; but to the Cynic, instead of arms and
 spearmen, his conscience giveth this power. When he knows that he has
 watched and labored for men, and lain down to sleep in purity, and sleep
 hath left him yet purer; and that his thoughts have been the thoughts of
 one dear to the Gods, of a servant, and a sharer in the rule of Zeus;
 and he hath had ever at hand that
 
   "Lead me, O Zeus, and thou Destiny,"[15]
 
 and,
 
   "If thus it be pleasing to the Gods, so may it be"--
 
 wherefore, then, shall he not take heart to speak boldly to his
 brothers, to his children, in a word, to all his kin? For this reason,
 he that is in this state is no meddler or busybody, for when he
 overlooks human affairs he meddles not with foreign matters, but with
 his own affairs. Else, name the general a busybody when he overlooks his
 soldiers, and reviews them, and watches them, and punishes the
 disorderly. But if you have a flat cake under your cloak while you
 reprove others, I say, get hence rather into a corner, and eat what thou
 hast stolen--what are other men's concerns to thee? For what art
 thou--the bull of the herd? or the queen bee? Show me the tokens of thy
 supremacy, such as nature hath given her. But if thou art a drone
 claiming sovereignty over the bees, thinkest thou not that thy
 fellow-citizens will overthrow thee, as bees do the drones?
 
 20. And truly the Cynic must be so long-suffering as that he shall seem
 to the multitude insensate and a stone. Him doth none revile, nor smite,
 nor insult; but his body hath he given to any man to use at will. For he
 remembers that the worse must needs be vanquished by the better,
 whereinsoever it is the worse; and the body is worse than the
 multitude--the weaker than the stronger. Never, then, doth he go down to
 any contest where it is possible for him to be vanquished, but he yields
 up all that is not his own, and contends for nothing that is subject to
 others. But where there is question of the will and the use of
 appearances, then you shall see how many eyes he hath, so that you may
 say that compared with him Argus was blind. Is his assent ever hasty; or
 his desire idle; or his pursuit in vain; or his avoidance unsuccessful;
 or his aim unfulfilled? doth he ever blame, or cringe, or envy? This is
 his great study and his design; but as regards all other things, he lies
 on his back and snores, for all is peace. There is no thief of his will,
 nor tyrant; but of his body? yea; and of his chattels? yea, and also of
 his authority and his honors. What, then, are these things to him? So
 when one may seek to make him afraid on account of them--_Go hence_, he
 saith to him, _and find out little children; it is to these that masks
 are dreadful, but I know they are made of clay, and that inside them
 there is nothing._
 
 21. On such a matter art thou now meditating. Therefore, if it please
 thee, in God's name delay it yet awhile, and see first what ability thou
 hast for it. For mark what Hector speaks to Andromache: _Go_, he saith,
 _rather into the house and weave_--
 
                       "For war's the care
   Of every man, and more than all of me."
                                 --_Il._ vi. 490.
 
 Thus he knew where lay his own ability and her incapacity.
 
 END OF BOOK I.
 
 
 
 
 _BOOK II._
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 ON GENUINE AND BORROWED BELIEFS.
 
 
 1. The master-argument seems to start from propositions such as
 these:[1] There being a mutual contradiction among these three
 propositions--(1) "Every past event is necessarily true," and (2) "An
 impossibility cannot follow a possibility," and (3) "Things are possible
 which neither are nor will be true," Diodorus, perceiving this
 contradiction, made use of the force of the first two in order to prove
 that nothing is possible which neither is nor will be true. And, again,
 one will hold these two, (3) that a thing is possible which neither is
 nor will be true, and (2) that an impossibility cannot follow from a
 possibility; but by no means that every past thing is necessarily true,
 and thus those of the school of Cleanthes appear to think, whom
 Antipater strongly defended. But some hold the other two, (3) that a
 thing is possible that neither is nor will be true, and (1) that every
 past event is necessarily true; but maintain that an impossibility may
 follow from a possibility. But all three it is impossible to hold at
 once, because of their mutual contradiction.
 
 2. Now, if any one inquire of me, _And which of these dost thou hold?_
 I shall answer him that I do not know, but I have received this account,
 that Diodorus holds certain of them, and I think the followers of
 Panthoides and Cleanthes certain others, and those of Chrysippus yet
 others. _And thyself?_ Nay, it is no affair of mine to try my own
 thoughts, and to compare and estimate statements, and to form some
 opinion of my own upon the matter.[2] And thus I differ no whit from the
 grammarians. Who was Hector's father? _Priam._ And his brothers?
 _Alexander and Deiphobus._ And their mother, who was she? _Hecuba. That
 is the account I have received._ From whom? _From Homer; and I think
 Hellanicus has written of them, and maybe others too._ And I; what
 better have I to say about the master-argument? But if I am a vain man,
 and especially at a banquet, I shall amaze all the company by recounting
 those who have written on it;--for Chrysippus wrote on it wonderfully in
 his first book "On Possibilities;" and Cleanthes wrote a separate
 treatise on it, and so did Archedemus. And Antipater wrote too, not only
 in his book "On Possibilities," but also separately in those on the
 master-argument. Have you not read the work? No! Then read it. And what
 good will it do him to read it? He will become yet more of a babbler and
 a nuisance than he is now, for what else hath the reading of it done for
 you? What opinion have you formed for yourself on the matter? Nay, but
 you will tell us all about Helen, and Priam, and the island of Calypso,
 that never existed, nor ever will.
 
 3. And in Homer, indeed, it is no great matter if you have simply
 mastered the account, and formed no opinion of your own. But in ethics
 this is even much more often the case than in other matters. Tell me
 concerning good and evil things! Listen to him, then, with his--
 
   "Me to Ciconia brought the wind from Troy."
                                  --_Od._ ix, 39.
 
 _Of things some are good, some evil, and some indifferent. Now the good
 things are the virtues, and those that have the nature of virtue, and
 the evil things the vices, and those that have the nature of vice; and
 the indifferent things are between these, as wealth, health, life,
 death, pleasure, affliction._ And how do you know this? Because
 Hellanicus affirms it in his history of the Egyptians; for as well say
 this as that Diogenes has it in his Ethics, or Chrysippus, or Cleanthes.
 But have you tested any of their sayings, and formed an opinion for
 yourself? Show me how you are wont to bear a storm at sea. Do you
 remember the difference between good and evil when the sail clatters,
 and some vexatious man comes to you as you are shrieking, and says--
 
 ----"Tell me, by the Gods, what you were lately saying, Is it any vice
 to be shipwrecked? Hath it anything of the nature of vice?"
 
 Would you not lay hold of a stick and shake it in his face: _Let us
 alone, man; we are perishing, and you come to mock us!_ And do you
 remember the difference if you are accused of something and Caesar sends
 for you? If one should come to you when you enter, pale and trembling,
 and should say, Why do you tremble, man? what is your business
 concerned with? Doth Caesar there within dispense virtue and vice to
 those who go in to him? _Why_, you will say; _must you too mock me in my
 calamities?_
 
 ----"Nevertheless, tell me, O Philosopher, why you tremble--is it not
 merely death that you are in danger of, or imprisonment, or bodily
 suffering, or exile, or disgrace? What else? Is it any vice? or anything
 of the nature of vice?"
 
 And you will reply somewhat to this effect: _Let me alone, man; my own
 evils are enough for me._
 
 And truly you say well, for your own evils are enough for you; which are
 meanness, cowardice, and your false pretenses when you sat in the school
 of philosophy. Why did you deck yourself in others' glory? Why did you
 call yourself a Stoic?
 
 4. Watch yourselves thus in the things that ye do, and ye shall see of
 what school ye are. And the most of you will be found Epicureans, but
 some few Peripatetics,[4] and those but slack. For where is the proof
 that ye hold virtue equal to all other things, or indeed superior? Show
 me a Stoic, if ye have one. Where or how can ye? But persons that repeat
 the phrases of Stoicism, of these ye can show us any number. And do they
 repeat those of the Epicureans any worse? and are they not equally
 accurate in the Peripatetic? Who is, then, a Stoic? As we say that a
 statue is Pheidian which is wrought according to the art of Pheidias,
 show me a man that is wrought according to the opinions he utters! Show
 me one that is sick and yet prosperous, in peril and prosperous, dying
 and prosperous, in exile and prosperous, in evil repute and prosperous.
 Show him to me! by the Gods! fain would I see a Stoic! And have ye none
 that is fully wrought out; then show me at least one that is in hand to
 be wrought--one that even leaneth towards these things. Do me this
 favor--grudge not an old man a sight that I have never seen yet. Think
 ye that I would have you show me the Zeus of Pheidias or the Athene--a
 work all ivory and gold? Nay; but let one show me a man's soul that
 longs to be like-minded with God, and to blame neither Gods nor men, and
 not to fail in any effort or avoidance, and not to be wrathful nor
 envious, nor jealous, but--for why should I make rounds to say it?--that
 desires to become a God from a man, and in this body of ours, this
 corpse, is mindful of his fellowship with Zeus. Show me that man. But ye
 cannot! Why, then, will ye mock yourselves and cheat others? Why wrap
 yourselves in others' garb, and go about, like thieves that steal
 clothes from the bath, with names and things that in nowise belong to
 you?
 
 5. And now I am your teacher and ye are being taught by me. And I have
 this aim--to perfect you, that ye be unhindered, uncompelled,
 unembarrassed, free, prosperous, happy, looking unto God alone in all
 things great and small. And ye are here to learn these things, and to do
 them. And wherefore do ye not finish the work, if ye have indeed such an
 aim as behooves you, and if I, besides the aim, have such ability as
 behooves me? What is here lacking? When I see a carpenter, and the wood
 lying beside him, I look for some work. And now, here is the carpenter,
 here is the wood--what is yet lacking? Is the thing such as cannot be
 taught? It can. Is it, then, not in our power? Yea, this alone of all
 things is. Wealth is not in our power, nor health, nor repute, nor any
 other thing, save only the right use of appearances. This alone is by
 nature unhindered; this alone is unembarrassed. Wherefore, then, will ye
 not make an end? Tell me the reason. For either the fault lies in me, or
 in you, or in the nature of the thing. But the thing itself is possible,
 and indeed the only thing that is in our power. It remains that I am to
 blame, or else ye are; or, to speak more truly, both of us. What will
 ye, then? Let us at length begin to entertain such a purpose among us,
 and let the past be past. Only let us make a beginning: trust in me, and
 ye shall see.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 THE GAME OF LIFE.
 
 
 1. This above all is the task of Nature--to bind and harmonize together
 the force of the appearances of the Right and of the Useful.
 
 2. Things are indifferent, but the uses of them are not indifferent.
 How, then, shall one preserve at once both a steadfast and tranquil
 mind, and also carefulness of things, that he be not heedless or
 slovenly? If he take the example of dice players. The numbers are
 indifferent, the dice are indifferent. How can I tell what may be thrown
 up? But carefully and skillfully to make use of what is thrown, that is
 where my proper business begins. And this is the great task of life
 also, to discern things and divide them, and say, "Outward things are
 not in my power; to will is in my power. Where shall I seek the Good,
 and where the Evil? Within me--in all that is my own." But of all that
 is alien to thee call nothing good nor evil, nor profitable nor hurtful,
 nor any such term as these.
 
 3. What then? should we be careless of such things? In no wise. For
 this, again, is a vice in the Will, and thus contrary to Nature. But be
 at once careful, because the use of things is not indifferent, and
 steadfast and tranquil because the things themselves are. For where
 there is aught that concerns me, there none can hinder or compel me; and
 in those things where I am hindered or compelled the attainment is not
 in my power, and is neither good nor evil; but my use of the event is
 either evil or good, and this is in my power. And hard it is, indeed, to
 mingle and reconcile together the carefulness of one whom outward things
 affect, with the steadfastness of him who regards them not. But
 impossible, it is not; and if it is, it is impossible to be happy.
 
 4. Give me one man that cares how he shall do anything--that thinks not
 of the gaining of the thing, but thinks of his own energy.
 
 5. Chrysippus, therefore, said well--As long as future things are
 hidden from me, I hold always by whatever state is the most favorable
 for gaining the things that are according to Nature; for God Himself
 gave it to me to make such choice. But if I knew that it were now
 ordained for me to be sick, I would even move to it of myself. For the
 foot, too, if it had intelligence, would move of itself to be mired.
 
 6. For to what end, think you, are ears of corn produced? Is it not
 that they may become dry and parched? And the reason they are parched,
 is it not that they may be reaped? for it is not to exist for themselves
 alone that they come into the world. If, then, they had perception would
 it be proper for them to pray that they should never be reaped? since
 never to be reaped is for ears of corn a curse. So understand that for
 men it is a curse not to die, just as not to be ripened and not to be
 reaped. But we, since we are both the things to be reaped and are also
 conscious that we shall be reaped, have indignation thereat. For we know
 not what we are, nor have we studied what concerns humanity as those
 that have the care of horses study what concerns them. But Chrysantas,
 when just about to smite the enemy, forbore on hearing the trumpet
 sounding his recall; so much better did it seem to him to obey the
 commander's order than to do his own will. But of us not one will follow
 with docility the summons even of necessity, but weeping and groaning
 the things that we suffer, we suffer, calling them our doom.[1] What
 doom, man? If by doom you mean that which is doomed to happen to us,
 then we are doomed in all things. But if only our afflictions are to be
 called doom, then what affliction is it that that which has come into
 being should perish? But we perish by the sword, or the wheel, or the
 sea, or the tile of a roof, or a tyrant. What matters it by what road
 thou goest down into Hades? they are all equal. But if thou wilt hear
 the truth, the way the tyrant sends thee is the shortest. Never did a
 tyrant cut a man's throat in six months, but a fever will often be a
 year killing him. All these things are but noise, and a clatter of empty
 names.
 
 7. But let us do as in setting out on a voyage. What is it possible for
 me to do? This--to choose the captain, crew, the day, the opportunity.
 Then a tempest has burst upon us; but what doth it concern me? I have
 left nothing undone that was mine to do; the problem is now another's,
 to wit, the captain's. But now the ship is sinking! and what have I to
 do? I do only what I am able--drown without terror and screaming and
 accusing of God, but knowing that that which has come into being must
 also perish. For I am no Immortal, but a man, a part of the sum of
 things as an hour is of the day. Like the hour, I must arrive, and, like
 the hour, pass away. What, then, can it matter to me how I pass
 away--whether by drowning or by a fever? for pass I must, even by some
 such thing. Now, this is what you shall see done by skillful
 ball-players. None careth for the ball as it were a thing good or bad;
 but only about throwing it and catching it. In this, then, there is
 rule, in this art, quickness, judgment: so that I may fail of catching
 the ball, even if I spread out my lap, and another, if I throw it, may
 catch it. But if I am anxious and nervous as I catch and throw, what
 kind of play is this? how shall one be steady? how shall he observe the
 order of the game? One will call "Throw," "Do not throw," and another,
 "You have thrown once." But this is strife and not play.
 
 8. Thus Socrates knew how to play ball. How? When he jested in the
 court of justice. "Tell me, Anytus," he said, "how say you that I
 believe there is no God? The Daemons, who are they, think you? Are they
 not sons of God, or a mixed nature between Gods and men?" And when this
 was admitted--"Who, do you think, can hold that mules exist, but not
 asses?"[2] And thus he played with the ball. And what was the ball that
 was there thrown about among them? Life, chains, exile, a draught of
 poison, to be torn from a wife, to leave children orphans. These were
 the things among them that they played withal; yet none the less did he
 play, and flung the ball with proper grace and measure. And so should we
 do also, having the carefulness of the most zealous players, and yet
 indifference, as were it merely about a ball.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 THINGS ARE WHAT THEY ARE.
 
 
 1. Each thing that allures the mind or offers an advantage or is loved
 by you, remember to speak of it as it is, from the smallest things
 upward. If you love an earthen jar, then think, _I love an earthen jar_,
 for so shall you not be troubled when it breaks. And when you kiss your
 little child, or wife, think, _I kiss a mortal_; and so shall you not be
 troubled when they die.
 
 2. When you are about to take in hand some action, bethink you what it
 is that you are about to do. If you go to the bath, represent to
 yourself all that takes place there--the squirting of water, the
 slapping, the scolding, the pilfering; and then shall you take the
 matter in hand more safely, saying straightway: _I desire to be bathed,
 and maintain my purpose according to Nature._ And even so with each and
 every action. For thus, if aught should occur to cross you in your
 bathing, this thought shall be straightway at hand: _But not this alone
 did I desire; but also to maintain my purpose according to Nature.
 And I shall not maintain it if I have indignation at what happens here._
 
 3. The first difference between the vulgar man[1] and the philosopher:
 The one saith, _Woe is me for my child, my brother, woe for my father_;
 but the other, if ever he shall be compelled to say, _Woe is me_, checks
 himself, and saith, _for myself_. For nothing that the Will willeth not
 can hinder or hurt the Will, but itself only can hurt itself. If then,
 indeed, we too incline to this, that when we are afflicted we accuse
 ourselves, and recollect that nothing else than Opinion can cause us any
 trouble or unsettlement, I swear by all the Gods we have advanced! But
 as it is, we have from the beginning traveled a different road. While we
 are still children, if haply we stumbled as we were gaping about, the
 nurse did not chide us, but beat the stone. For what had the stone done?
 Ought it to have moved out of the way for your child's folly? Again, if
 we find nothing to eat after coming from the bath, never doth the tutor
 check our desire, but he beats the cook. Man, we did not set thee to be
 a tutor of the cook, but of our child--him shall you train, him improve.
 And thus, even when full-grown, we appear as children. For a child in
 music is he who hath not learned music, and in letters, one who hath not
 learned letters, and in life, one undisciplined in philosophy.
 
 4. It is not things, but the opinions about the things, that trouble
 mankind. Thus Death is nothing terrible; if it were so, it would have
 appeared so to Socrates. But the opinion we have about Death, that it is
 terrible, _that_ it is wherein the terror lieth. When, therefore, we are
 hindered or troubled or grieved, never let us blame any other than
 ourselves; that is to say, our opinions. A man undisciplined in
 philosophy blames others in matters in which he fares ill; one who
 begins to be disciplined blames himself, one who is disciplined, neither
 others nor himself.
 
 5. Be not elated in mind at any superiority that is not of yourself. If
 your horse were elated and should say, _I am beautiful_, that would be
 tolerable. But when you are elated and say, _I have a beautiful horse_,
 know that it is at an excellence in your horse that you are elated.
 What, then, is your own? This--to make use of the appearances. So that
 when you deal according to Nature in the use of appearances, then shall
 you be elated, for you will then be elated at an excellence that is your
 own.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 THREE STEPS TO PERFECTION.
 
 
 1. There are three divisions of Philosophy wherein a man must exercise
 himself who would be wise and good.[1]
 
 The first concerns his pursuit and avoidance, so that he may not fail of
 aught that he would attain, nor fall into aught that he would avoid.
 
 The second concerns his desires and aversions, and, generally, all that
 it becomes a man to be, so that he bear himself orderly and prudently
 and not heedlessly.
 
 The third is that which concerns security from delusion and hasty
 apprehension, and, generally, the assenting to appearances.
 
 Of these the chief and most urgent is that which hath to do with the
 passions,[2] for the passions arise in no other way than by our failing
 in endeavor to attain or to avoid something. This it is which brings in
 troubles and tumults and ill-luck and misfortune, that is the cause of
 griefs and lamentations and envies, that makes envious and jealous men;
 by which things we become unable even to hear the doctrines of reason.
 
 The second concerns that which is becoming to a man; for I must not be
 passionless,[3] like a statue, but maintain all relations natural and
 acquired, as a religious being, as a son, as a brother, as a father, as
 a citizen.
 
 The third is that which concerns men as soon as they are making advance
 in philosophy, which provides for the security of the two others; so
 that not even in dreams may any appearance that approacheth us pass
 untested, nor in wine, nor in ill-humors. This, a man may say, is beyond
 us. But the philosophers of this day, passing by the first and second
 parts of philosophy, occupy themselves in the third, caviling, and
 arguing by questions, and constructing hypotheses and fallacies. For,
 they say, when dealing with these subjects a man must guard himself from
 delusion. Who must? The wise and good man.
 
 2. And this security is all you lack, then; the rest you have wrought
 out already? You are not to be imposed upon by money? and if you see a
 fair girl you can hold out against the appearance? and if your neighbor
 inherits a legacy you are not envious? there is now, in short, nothing
 lacking to you except to confirm what you have? Wretch! these very
 things dost thou hear in fear and anxiety lest some one may despise
 thee, and inquiring what men say about thee. And if some one come and
 tell you that when it was discussed who was the best of the
 philosophers, one present said, _Such a one is the greatest
 philosopher_, your little soul will grow up from a finger's breadth to
 two cubits. And if another who was present said, _Nothing of the kind;
 it is not worth while to listen to him; for what does he know? he has
 made a beginning in philosophy and no more_, you are amazed, you grow
 pale, and straightway you cry out, _I will show him who I am, that I am
 a great philosopher_.
 
 Out of these very things it is seen what you are; why do you desire to
 show it by any others?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 THAT A MAN MAY BE BOTH BOLD AND FEARFUL.
 
 
 1. To some it may perchance seem a paradox, this axiom of the
 philosophers; yet let us make the best inquiry we can if it be true that
 it is possible to do all things at once with fearfulness and with
 boldness. For fearfulness seemeth in a manner contrary to boldness, and
 contraries can never co-exist. But that which to many seemeth a paradox
 in this matter seems to me to stand somehow thus: If we affirmed that
 both fearfulness and boldness could be used in the very same things,
 they would justly accuse us that we were reconciling what is
 irreconcilable. But now, what is there so strange in this saying? For if
 it is sound, what hath been so often both affirmed and demonstrated,
 that the essence of the Good is in the use of appearances, and even so
 of the Evil, and things uncontrollable by the Will have the nature
 neither of good nor of evil, what paradox do the philosophers affirm if
 they say that in things uncontrollable by the Will, then be boldness thy
 part, and in things subject to the Will, fearfulness. For if Evil lie in
 an evil Will, then in these things alone is it right to use fearfulness.
 And if things uncontrollable by the Will, and that are not in our power,
 are nothing to us, then in these things we should use boldness. And thus
 shall we be at one time both fearful and bold--yea, and bold even
 through our fearfulness. For through being fearful in things that are
 veritably evil it comes that we shall be bold in those that are not so.
 
 2. But we, on the contrary, fall victims as deer do. When these are
 terrified and fly from the scares, whither do they turn and to what do
 they retreat as a refuge? To the nets: and thus they perish, confusing
 things to fear and things to be bold about. And thus do we also. Where
 do we employ fear? In things beyond our Will. And wherein do we act
 boldly, as were there nothing to dread? In things subject to the Will.
 To be beguiled, then, or to be rash, or to do some shameless act, or
 with base greed to pursue some object--these things concern us no whit
 if we may only hit the mark in things beyond the Will. But where death
 is, or exile, or suffering, or evil repute, there we run away, there we
 are scared. Therefore, as it were to be looked for in those who are
 astray in the things of greatest moment, we work out our natural
 boldness into swaggering, abandonment, rashness, shamelessness; and our
 natural fearfulness and shamefastness into cowardice and meanness, full
 of terror and trouble. For if one should transfer his fearfulness to the
 realm of the Will, and the works thereof, straightway, together with the
 intention of fearing to do wrong, he shall have it in his power to avoid
 doing it; but if he use it in things out of our own power and beyond the
 Will, then striving to avoid things that are in others' power, he shall
 of necessity be terrified and unsettled and troubled. For death is not
 fearful, nor pain, but the fear of pain or death. And thus we praise
 him[1] who said:
 
    "Fear not to die, but fear a coward's death."
 
 3. It is right, then, that we should turn our boldness against death,
 and our fearfulness against the fear of death. But now we do the
 contrary: death we flee from, but as to the state of our opinion about
 death we are negligent, heedless, indifferent. These things Socrates did
 well to call bugbears. For as to children, through their inexperience,
 ugly masks appear terrible and fearful; so we are somewhat in the same
 way moved towards the affairs of life, for no other cause than as
 children are affected by these bugbears. For what is a child? Ignorance.
 What is a child? That which has never learned. For when he knows these
 things he is nowise inferior to us. What is death? A bugbear. Turn it
 round; examine it: see, it does not bite. Now or later that which is
 body must be parted from that which is spirit, as formerly it was
 parted. Why, then, hast thou indignation if it be now? for if it be not
 now, it will be later. And wherefore? That the cycle of the world may be
 fulfilled; for it hath need of a present and of a future and of a past.
 What is pain? A bugbear. Turn it about and examine it. This poor body is
 moved harshly, then again softly. If thou hast no advantage thereof, the
 door is open;[2] if thou hast, then bear it. For in all events it is
 right that the door should stand open, and so have we no distress.
 
 4. Shall I, then, exist no longer? Nay, thou shalt exist, but as
 something else, whereof the universe hath now need.[3] For neither didst
 thou choose thine own time to come into existence, but when the universe
 had need of thee.
 
 5. What, then, is the fruit of these opinions? That which ought to be
 the fairest and comeliest to those who have been truly
 taught,--tranquillity, courage, and freedom. For concerning these
 things, the multitude are not to be believed which say that those only
 should be taught who are freemen, but the philosophers rather, which say
 that those only are free who have been taught. How is this? It is
 thus--Is freedom anything else than the power to live as we choose?
 _Nothing else._ Do ye choose, then, to live in sin? _We do not choose
 it._ None, therefore, that fears or grieves or is anxious is free; but
 whosoever is released from griefs and fears and anxieties is by that
 very thing released from slavery. How, then, shall we still believe you,
 most excellent legislators, when ye say, "We permit none to be taught,
 save freemen?"[4] for the philosophers say, "We permit none to be free
 save those who have been taught"--that is, God permits it not. _So, when
 a man turns round his slave before the Praetor,[5] has he done nothing?_
 He has done something. _And what?_ He has turned round his slave before
 the Praetor. _Nothing else at all?_ Yea, this too--he must pay for him
 the tax of the twentieth. _What then? has the man thus treated not
 gained his freedom?_ No more than he has gained tranquillity of mind.
 For thou, who art able to emancipate others, hast thou no master? is
 money not thy master, or lust, or a tyrant, or some friend of a tyrant?
 Why, then, dost thou tremble when thou art to meet with some affliction
 in this kind? And therefore I say oftentimes, be these things your
 study, be these things ever at your hand, wherein ye should be bold and
 wherein fearful; bold in things beyond the Will, fearful in things
 subject to the Will.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.[1]
 
 THE WISE MAN'S FEAR AND THE FOOL'S.
 
 
 1. The appearances by which the mind of man is smitten with the first
 aspect of a thing as it approaches the soul, are not matters of the
 will, nor can we control them; but by a certain force of their own the
 objects which we have to comprehend are borne in upon us. But that
 ratification of them, which we name assent, whereby the appearances are
 comprehended and judged, these are voluntary, and are done by human
 choice. Wherefore at a sound from the heavens, or from the downfall of
 something, or some signal of danger, or anything else of this kind, it
 must needs be that the soul of the philosopher too shall be somewhat
 moved, and he shall shrink and grow pale; not through any opinion of
 evil that he has formed, but through certain rapid and unconsidered
 motions that forestall the office of the mind and reason. Soon, however,
 that philosopher doth not approve the appearances to be truly objects
 of terror to his soul, that is to say, he assents not to them nor
 ratifies them; but he rejects them, and casts them out; nor doth there
 seem to be in them anything that he should fear. But in this, say the
 philosophers, doth the wise man differ from the fool,--that the fool
 thinks the appearances to be in truth even so harsh and rough as they
 seemed at their first shock upon the soul; and taking them, as at first,
 to be rightly dreaded, he thus ratifies and approves them by his assent.
 The philosopher, however, though for a short time his color and
 countenance have been changed, doth not then assent, but he retains in
 its steadfastness and vigor the opinion he ever had of these
 appearances, that they are in no wise to be feared, but affright only by
 a false show and empty threat.
 
 2. Such as is a dish of water, such is the soul; such as is the ray of
 light that falleth on the same, such are the appearances. When the water
 is moved, then the ray seemeth also to be moved; but it is not moved.
 And thus when a man's mind is darkened and dizzy, it is not doctrines
 and virtues that are confounded, but the spirit on which they are
 impressed. And if that is restored, so are they.[2]
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 APPEARANCES FALSE AND TRUE.
 
 
 1. Appearances exist for us in four ways. Either things appear even as
 they are; or having no existence, neither do they appear to have it; or
 they exist, and appear not; or they exist not, and yet appear. So, in
 all these cases, to hit the mark is the work of him who hath been taught
 in philosophy.
 
 2. But whatever it be that afflicts us, it is to that thing that the
 remedy is to be applied. If it is the sophisms of the Pyrrhonists and
 Academics[1] that afflict us, to them let us apply the remedy. If it is
 the delusiveness of things, whereby that appeareth to be good which is
 not so, to that let us seek for the remedy. If a habit afflicts us,
 against that must we endeavor to find some remedy. And what remedy is to
 be found against a habit? The contrary habit. Thou hearest the ignorant
 when they say, _The wretched man is dead; his father is perishing with
 grief for him, or his mother; he was cut off, yea, and untimely, and in
 a strange land_. Hearken, then, to the contrary words. Tear thyself away
 from such utterances. Against habit set the contrary habit. Against the
 words of the Sophists have the maxims of philosophers and the exercise
 and constant usage of them; against the delusiveness of things have
 clear natural conceptions ever burnished and ready.
 
 3. Whenever death may appear to be an evil, have ready the thought that
 it is right to avoid evils, and that death is unavoidable. For what
 shall I do? whither shall I flee from it? Let it be granted that I am no
 Sarpedon, son of Zeus, to speak in that lofty style: _I go either to do
 great deeds myself, or to give another the chance of doing them; though
 I myself fail I shall not grudge it to another to do nobly_.[2] Let it
 be granted that this is above us; still can we not at least rise to the
 height of that? And whither shall I flee from death? declare to me the
 place; declare to me the men among whom I shall go, to whom death comes
 never near; declare to me the charms against it. If I have none, what
 would ye have me do? I cannot escape death--shall I not then escape the
 fear of death? shall I die lamenting and trembling? In this is the
 source of suffering, to wish for something, and that it should not come
 to pass; and thence it is that when I am able to alter outward things at
 my desire, I do so, but when not, I am ready to tear out the eyes of him
 that hindereth me. For man is so made by nature that he will not bear to
 be deprived of the Good nor to fall into the Evil. And in the end, when
 I am neither able to alter outward things nor to tear out the eyes of
 him that hindereth me, I sit down and groan and rail on whomsoever I
 can, Zeus and the other Gods;--for if they neglect me, what have I to do
 with them? _Yea, but thou wilt be an impious man._ And how shall I be
 worse off than I am now? Here is the whole matter: Remember that unless
 religion and profit meet in the same thing, religion cannot be saved in
 any man. Do not these things mightily convince of their truth?
 
 4. Let the Pyrrhonist and the Academic come and make their attack--I,
 for my part, have no leisure for such discussions, nor am I able to
 argue in defense of general consent.[3] For if I had a suit about a
 little piece of land, would I not call in another to argue for me?
 Wherewith shall I be satisfied? With that which concerns the matter in
 hand. How perception takes place, whether by the whole man or by parts,
 perhaps I know not how to declare: both opinions perplex me. But that
 thou and I are not the same I know very clearly. _Whence know you this?_
 Never, when I wish to eat, do I carry the morsel to another man's mouth,
 but to my own. Never, when I wish to take a piece of bread, do I lay
 hold of a broom, but I always go to the bread, as to a mark. And ye who
 deny the truth of perception, what do ye other than I? Which of you,
 desiring to go to the bath, ever went into a mill? _What then? Ought we
 not, according to our abilities, to busy ourselves with the upholding
 of general consent, and raising defenses against all that opposeth the
 same?_ And who denies it? But let him do it that can, that hath leisure;
 but he that trembleth, and is troubled, and his heart is broken within
 him, let him spend his time on something different.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 HOW WE SHOULD THINK AS GOD'S OFFSPRING.
 
 
 1. If those things are true which are said by philosophers concerning
 the kinship of God and men, what else remains for men to do than after
 Socrates' way, who never, when men inquired of him what was his native
 country, replied _Athens_ or _Corinth_, but _the universe_. For why wilt
 thou say thou art an Athenian, and not rather name thyself from that
 nook alone into which thy wretched body was cast at birth? Is it not
 plainly from the lordlier place, and that which contains not only that
 nook and all thy household, but also the whole land whence the race of
 thy ancestors has come down even to thee, that thou callest thyself
 Athenian or Corinthian? Whoso, therefore, hath watched the governance of
 the universe, and hath learned that the greatest and mightiest and
 amplest of all societies is that which is composed of mankind and of
 God; and that from Him have descended the seeds not only to my father
 alone, nor to my grandfather, but to all creatures that are conceived
 and born upon the earth (but especially to reasoning beings, since to
 these alone hath nature given it to have communion and intercourse with
 God, being linked with Him through Reason),--wherefore should such a one
 not name himself a citizen of the universe? wherefore not a son of God?
 wherefore shall he fear anything that may come to pass among men? And
 shall kinship with Caesar, or with some other of those that are mighty at
 Rome, be enough to let us live in safety and undespised and fearing
 nothing at all; but to have God for our maker and father and guardian,
 shall this not avail to deliver us from griefs and fears?
 
 _But I have no money_, saith one; _whence shall I have bread to eat?_
 
 2. Art thou not ashamed to be more cowardly and spiritless than fugitive
 slaves are? How do they leave their masters when they run away? in what
 estates do they put their trust? in what servants? After stealing a
 little to serve them for the first few days, do they not afterwards
 journey by land and sea, and make their living by one device after
 another? And when did ever any fugitive slave die of hunger? But thou
 tremblest and sleepest not of nights, for fear lest the necessaries of
 life fail thee. Wretched man! art thou thus blind? and seest not the
 road whither the want of necessaries leads a man? And whither leads it?
 To the same place that a fever doth, or a falling rock--to death. Hast
 thou not often said this to thy friends? and often read aloud these
 things, and written them? and how often hast thou vaunted thyself that
 thou wert at peace about death? _Yea, but my dear ones shall also suffer
 hunger._ What then? Doth their hunger lead to any other place than
 thine? Do they not descend where thou descendest? Is there not one
 underworld for them and thee? Wilt thou not, then, be bold in all
 poverty and need, looking to that place whither the wealthiest of men,
 and the mightiest governors, yea, and even kings and tyrants, must go
 down; thou, it may be, an-hungered, and they bursting with indigestion
 and drunkenness?
 
 How seldom is it that a beggar is seen that is not an old man, and even
 of exceeding age? but freezing by night and day, and lying on the
 ground, and eating only what is barely necessary, they come near to
 being unable to die. Canst thou not transcribe writings? canst thou not
 teach children? or be some man's door-keeper?
 
 _But it is shameful to come to such a necessity!_
 
 Then first of all learn what things are shameful, and afterwards tell
 us thou art a philosopher. But at present suffer not even another man to
 call thee so.
 
 3. Is that shameful to thee which is not thine own doing, whereof thou
 art not the cause, which cometh to thee without thy will, like a
 headache or a fever? If thy parents were poor, or made others their
 heirs, or are alive and give thee nothing, are these things shameful to
 thee? Is this what thou hast learnt from the philosophers? Hast thou
 never heard that what is shameful is blamable; and that which is
 blamable ought to be blamed? But what man wilt thou blame for a work not
 his own, one that he himself never did! And didst thou make thy father
 such as he is? or was it in thy power to correct him?--is it given thee
 to do this? What then? Oughtest thou to desire what is not given to
 thee? or to be ashamed if thou attain it not? Or hast thou been
 accustomed, in philosophy, to look to others, and to hope for nothing
 from thyself? Lament, therefore, and groan, and eat thy bread in fear,
 lest thou have nothing to eat on the morrow. Tremble for thy slaves,
 lest they steal, or run away, or die. Do thou live thus, now and ever,
 who hast approached to the name only of philosophy, and hast brought the
 precepts of it to shame, so far as in thee lies, showing them to be
 worthless and useless to those who adopt them; thou, who hast never
 striven to gain steadfastness, tranquillity, peace; that never waited
 upon any man for the sake of these things, but upon many for the sake of
 learning syllogisms; that never tested for thine own self any one of
 these appearances:--_Am I able to bear it, or am I not able? What, then,
 remains for me to do?_ But, as though all went fairly and safely with
 thee, thou abidest in the final part of philosophy,[1] that which
 confirms beyond all change--and wherein wilt thou be confirmed? in
 cowardice, meanness, admiration of wealth, in vain pursuit, and vain
 efforts to avoid? These are the things thou dost meditate how to
 preserve unharmed.
 
 4. Shouldst thou not first have gained something from Reason, and then
 fortified this with safety? Whom sawest thou ever building a coping
 round about, and never a wall on which to place it? And what
 door-keeper is set on guard where there is no door? But thy study is
 how to prove propositions--and _what_ proposition? How the billows of
 false reasonings may sweep thee not away--and away from _what_? Show me
 first what thing thou art guarding, or measuring, or weighing; and
 afterwards the scales or the measuring-rod. Or how long wilt thou still
 be measuring the dust? Are not these the things it behooves thee to
 prove:--what it is that makes men happy, what makes things proceed as we
 would have them, how one should blame no man accuse no man, and fit
 one's self to the ordering of the All? Yea, prove me these! _But I do
 so_, he saith. _See! I resolve you syllogisms._ Slave! this is the
 measuring-rod--it is not the thing measured. Wherefore now you pay the
 penalty for philosophy neglected; you tremble, you lie awake at nights,
 you seek counsel on every hand, and if the counsels are not pleasing to
 all men you think they were ill-counseled.
 
 5. Then you fear hunger, as you suppose. But it is not hunger that you
 fear--you fear you will have no cook, nor nobody else to buy victuals
 for you, nor another to take off your boots, nor another to put them on,
 nor others to rub you down, nor others to follow you about, so that when
 you have stripped yourself in the bath, and stretched yourself out as if
 you were crucified, you may be rubbed to and fro, and then the rubber
 standing by may say, _Turn him round, give me his side, take hold of his
 head, let me have his shoulder_; and then when you leave the bath and go
 home you may shout, _Is no one bringing anything to eat?_ and then,
 _Take away the plates, and wipe them_. This is what you fear,--lest you
 be not able to live like a sick man. But learn how those live that are
 in health--slaves, and laborers, and true philosophers; how Socrates
 lived, who moreover had a wife and children; how Diogenes lived; how
 Cleanthes that studied in the schools and drew his own water.[2] If you
 would have these things, they are everywhere to be had, and you will
 live boldly. Bold in what? In that wherein alone it is possible to be
 bold--in that which is faithful, which cannot be hindered, which cannot
 be taken away. But why hast thou made thyself so worthless and useless
 that no one is willing to receive thee into his house or take care of
 thee? But if any utensil were thrown away, and it was sound and
 serviceable, every one that found it would pick it up and think it a
 gain; but thee no man would pick up, nor count anything but damage. So
 thou canst not so much as serve the purpose of a watch-dog, or a cock?
 Why, then, wilt thou still live, being such a man as thou art?
 
 6. Doth any good man fear lest the means of gaining food fail him? They
 fail not the blind, nor the lame; shall they fail a good man? To the
 good soldier there fails not one who gives him pay, nor to the laborer,
 nor to the shoemaker; and shall such a one fail to the good man? Is God,
 then, careless of His instruments, His servants, His witnesses, whom
 alone He useth to show forth to the untaught what He is, and that He
 governs all things well, and is not careless of human things? and that
 to a good man there is no evil, neither in life nor in death? _How,
 then, when He leaves them without food?_ How else is this than as when a
 good general gives me the signal for retreat? I obey, I follow, praising
 my leader and hymning his works. For I came when it pleased him, and
 when it pleases him I will go. In my lifetime also my work was to sing
 the praise of God, both alone to myself, and to single persons, and in
 presence of many. He doth not provide me with many things, nor with
 great abundance of goods; He will not have me live delicately. For
 neither did He provide so for Hercules, His own son, but another man
 reigned over Argos and Mycenae, while he obeyed and labored and was
 disciplined. And Eurystheus was what he was--no king of Argos and
 Mycenae, who was not king even of himself; and Hercules was lord and
 leader of all the earth and sea, for he purged them of lawlessness and
 wrong, and brought in righteousness and holiness; naked and alone did he
 this. And when Odysseus was shipwrecked and cast away, did his need
 humble him one whit or break his spirit? But how did he go out to the
 maidens, to beg for the necessaries of life, which it is held most
 shameful to seek from another?
 
   "Even as a lion from his mountain home,
    So went Odysseus trusting in his valor."
                           --_Odyssey_, vi. 130.
 
 Trusting in what? Not in fame, nor wealth, but in his own valor--that
 is, his opinions of the things that are and are not in our power.[3] For
 these alone it is that make men free and unhindered; that lift up the
 heads of the abject, and bid them look rich men and tyrants steadily in
 the face. And this was the gift of the philosopher; but thou wilt never
 go forth boldly, but trembling for thy fine raiment and silver dishes.
 Miserable man! hast thou indeed thus wasted all thy time till now?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 THE OPEN DOOR.
 
 
 1. For my part I think the old man should be sitting here, not to
 devise how ye may have no mean thoughts, nor speak no mean nor ignoble
 things about yourselves, but to watch that there arise not among us
 youths of such a mind, that when they have perceived their kinship with
 the Gods, and how the flesh and its possessions are laid upon us like
 bonds, and how many necessities for the management of life are by them
 brought upon us, they may desire to fling these things away for abhorred
 and intolerable burthens, and depart unto their kin. And this is what
 your master and teacher--if, in sooth, ye had any such--should have to
 contend with in you,--that ye should come to him and say, _Epictetus, we
 can endure no longer being bound to this body, giving it food and drink,
 and resting it and cleansing it, and going about to court one man after
 another for its sake. Are not such things indifferent and nothing to us?
 And is not Death no evil? Are we not in some way kinsmen of God, and did
 we not come from Him? Let us depart to whence we came; let us be
 delivered at last from these bonds wherewith we are bound and burthened!
 Here are robbers, and thieves, and law courts, and those that are called
 tyrants, which through the body and its possessions seem as if they had
 some power over us. Let us show them that they have no power over any
 man!_ And to this it should be my part to say, "My friends, wait upon
 God. When He Himself shall give the signal and release you from this
 service, then are ye released unto Him. But for the present, bear to
 dwell in this place, wherein He has set you. Short, indeed, is this time
 of your sojourn, and easy to bear for those that are so minded. For what
 tyrant or what thief is there any longer, or what court of law is
 terrible to one who thus makes nothing of the body and the possessions
 of it? Remain, then, and depart not without a reason." Some such part as
 this should the teacher have to play towards the well-natured among his
 disciples.
 
 2. How long, then, are such injunctions to be obeyed? So long as it is
 profitable--that is to say, so long as I can do what becomes and befits
 me. Then some men are choleric and fastidious, and say, "I cannot sup
 with this man, to have to hear him every day telling how he fought in
 Mysia." _I told you, brother, how I went up the hill--then again I began
 to be besieged_.... But another saith, "I prefer to have my supper, and
 listen to him prating as long as he likes." And do thou compare the gain
 on both sides--only do naught in heaviness or affliction, or as
 supposing that thou art in evil case. For to this no man can compel
 thee. Doth it smoke in the chamber? if it is not very much I will stay,
 if too much, I will go out; for remember this always, and hold fast to
 it, that the door is open. _Thou shalt not live in Nicopolis._ I will
 not. _Nor in Athens._ I will not live in Athens. _Nor in Rome._ Neither
 in Rome. _Live in Gyara._[1] I will live in Gyara. But living in Gyara
 seemeth to me like a great smoke. I will depart, whither no man shall
 hinder me to dwell--for that dwelling stands ever open to all.
 
 3. Only do it not unreasonably, nor cowardly, nor make every common
 chance an excuse. For again, it is not God's will, for He hath need of
 such an order of things, and of such a race upon the earth. But if He
 give the signal for retreat, as He did to Socrates, we must obey Him as
 our commander.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 KNOW THYSELF.
 
 
 1. If a man have any advantage over others, or thinks himself to have
 it when he hath it not, it cannot but be that if he is an untaught man
 he shall be puffed up by it. Thus the tyrant says, _I am he that is
 master of all_. And what can you give me? Can you set my pursuit free of
 all hindrance? How is it in you to do that? For have you the gift of
 never falling into what you shun? or never missing the mark of your
 desire? And whence have you it? Come, now, in a ship do you trust to
 yourself or to the captain? or in a chariot, to any one else than the
 driver?[1] And how will you do with regard to other acts? Even thus.
 Where, then, is your power? _All men minister to me._ And do I not
 minister to my plate, and I wash it and wipe it, and drive in a peg for
 my oil-flask? What then, are these things greater than I? Nay, but they
 supply certain of my needs, and for this reason I take care of them.
 Yea, and do I not minister to my ass? Do I not wash his feet and groom
 him? Know you not that every man ministers to himself? And he ministers
 to you also, even as he doth to the ass. For who treats you as a man?
 Show me one that doth. Who wisheth to be like unto you? who becomes your
 imitator, as men did of Socrates? _But I can cut off thy head._ You say
 well. I had forgotten that I must pay regard to you as to a fever or the
 cholera; and set up an altar to you, as there is in Rome an altar to
 Fever.
 
 2. What is it, then, whereby the multitude is troubled and terrified?
 The tyrant and his guards? Never--God forbid it! It is not possible that
 that which is by nature free should be troubled by any other thing, or
 hindered, save by itself. But it is troubled by opinions of things. For
 when the tyrant saith to any one, _I will bind thy leg_, then he who
 setteth store by his leg saith, _Nay, have pity!_ but he that setteth
 store by his own Will, _If it seem more profitable to you, then bind
 it_.
 
 ----"Dost thou not regard me?"
 
 I do not regard you. I will show you that I am master. How can you be
 that? Me hath God set free; or think you that He would let His own Son
 be enslaved? You are lord of my dead body--take that.
 
 ----"So when thou comest near to me, thou wilt not do me service?"
 
 Nay, but I will do it to myself; and if you will have me say that I do
 it to you also, I tell you that I do it as to my kitchen pot.
 
 3. This is no selfishness; for every living creature is so made that it
 doth all things for its own sake. For the sun doth all things for his
 own sake, and so, moreover, even Zeus himself. But when He will be
 Raingiver and Fruitgiver and Father of Gods and men, thou seest that He
 may not do these works and have these titles, but He be serviceable to
 the common good. And, on the whole, He hath so formed the nature of the
 reasoning creature that he may never win aught of his own good without
 he furnish something of service to the common good. Thus it is not to
 the excluding of the common good that a man do all things for himself.
 For is it to be expected that a man shall stand aloof from himself and
 his own interest? And where then would be that same and single principle
 which we observe in all things, their affection to themselves?
 
 4. So, then, when we act on strange and foolish opinions of things
 beyond the Will, as though they were good or evil, it is altogether
 impossible but we shall do service to tyrants. And would it were to the
 tyrants alone, and not to their lackeys also!
 
 5. But what hinders the man that hath distinguished these things to live
 easily and docile, looking calmly on all that is to be, and bearing
 calmly all that is past? Will you have me bear poverty? Come, and see
 what poverty is when it strikes one that knoweth how to play the part
 well. Will you have me rule? Give me power, then, and the pains of it.
 Banishment? Whithersoever I go, it shall be well with me for in this
 place it was well with me, not because of the place, but because of the
 opinions which I shall carry away with me. For these no man can deprive
 me of. Yea, these only are mine own, whereof I cannot be deprived, and
 they suffice for me as long as I have them, wherever I be, or whatever I
 do.
 
 6. ----"But now is the time come to die."
 
 What say you? to die? Nay, make no tragedy of the business, but tell it
 as it is. Now is it time for my substance to be resolved again into the
 things wherefrom it came together. And what is dreadful in this? What of
 the things in the universe is about to perish? What new, or what
 unaccountable thing is about to come to pass? Is it for these things
 that a tyrant is feared? through these that the guards seem to bear
 swords so large and sharp? Tell that to others; but by me all these
 things have been examined; no man hath power on me. I have been set free
 by God, I know His commandments, henceforth no man can lead me captive.
 I have a liberator[2] such as I need, and judges such as I need. Are you
 not the master of my body? What is that to me? Of my property? What is
 that to me? Of exile or captivity? Again, I say, from all these things,
 and the poor body itself, I will depart when you will. Try your power,
 and you shall know how far it reaches.
 
 7. But the tyrant will bind--what? The leg. He will take away--what? The
 head. What, then, can he not bind and not take away? The Will. And hence
 that precept of the ancients--KNOW THYSELF.
 
 8. Whom, then, can I still fear? The lackeys of the bed-chamber? For
 what that they can do? Shut me out? Let them shut me out, if they find
 me wishing to go in.
 
 ----"Why, then, didst thou go to the doors?"
 
 Because I hold it proper to join the play while the play lasts.
 
 ----"How, then, shalt thou not be shut out?"
 
 Because if I am not received, I do not wish to enter; but always that
 which happens is what I wish. For I hold what God wills above what I
 will. I cleave to Him as His servant and follower; my impulses are one
 with His, my pursuit is one with His; in a word, my will is one with
 His. There is no shutting out for me--nay, but for those who would force
 their way in. And wherefore do I not force my way? Because I know that
 no good thing is dealt out within to those that enter. But when I hear
 some one congratulated on being honored by Caesar, I say, What hath
 fortune brought him? A government? Has it also, then, brought him such
 an opinion as he ought to have? A magistracy? Hath he also gained the
 power to be a good magistrate? Why will I still push myself forward? A
 man scatters figs and almonds abroad; children seize them, and fight
 among themselves; but not so men, for they hold it too trifling a
 matter. And if a man should scatter about oyster-shells, not even the
 children would seize them. Offices of government are dealt out--children
 will look for them; money is given--children will look for it; military
 commands, consulships--let children scramble for them. Let them be shut
 out and smitten, let them kiss the hands of the giver, of his slaves--it
 is figs and almonds to me. What then? If thou miss them when he is
 flinging them about, let it not vex thee. If a fig fall into thy bosom,
 take and eat it, for so far even a fig is to be valued. But if I must
 stoop down for it, and throw down another man, or another throw me down,
 and I flatter those who enter in, then neither is a fig worth so much,
 nor is any other of the things that are not good, even those which the
 philosophers have persuaded me not to think good.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI.[1]
 
 HOW WE SHOULD BEAR OURSELVES TOWARDS EVIL MEN.
 
 
 1. If that which the philosophers say is true--that there is one
 principle in all men, as when I assent to something, the feeling that it
 is so; and when I dissent, the feeling that it is not so; yea, and when
 I withhold my judgment, the feeling that it is uncertain; and likewise,
 when I am moved towards anything, the feeling that it is for my profit,
 but it is impossible to judge one thing to be profitable and to pursue
 another, to judge one thing right and be moved towards another--why have
 we indignation with the multitude? _They are robbers_, one saith, _and
 thieves_. And what is it to be robbers and thieves? It is to err
 concerning things good and evil. Shall we, then, have indignation with
 them, or shall we pity them? Nay, but show them the error, and you shall
 see how they will cease from their sins. But if they see it not, they
 have naught better than the appearance of the thing to them.
 
 2. _Should not, then, this robber, or this adulterer, be destroyed?_ By
 no means, but take it rather this way: _This man who errs and is
 deceived concerning things of greatest moment, who is blinded, not in
 the vision which distinguisheth black and white, but in the judgment
 which distinguisheth Good and Evil--should we not destroy him?_ And thus
 speaking, you shall know how inhuman is that which you say, and how like
 as if you said, _Shall we not destroy this blind man, this deaf man?_
 For if it is the greatest injury to be deprived of the greatest things,
 and the greatest thing in every man is a Will such as he ought to have,
 and one be deprived of this, why are you still indignant with him? Man,
 you should not be moved contrary to Nature by the evil deeds of other
 men. Pity him rather, be not inclined to offense and hatred, abandon the
 phrases of the multitude, like "these cursed wretches." How have you
 suddenly become so wise and hard to please?
 
 3. Wherefore, then, have we indignation? Because we worship the things
 which they deprive us of. Do not worship fine raiment, and you shall not
 be wroth with the thief. Do not worship the beauty of a woman, and you
 shall not be wroth with the adulterer. Know that the thief and the
 adulterer have no part in that which is thine own, but in that which is
 foreign to thee, in that which is not in thy power. These things if thou
 dismiss, and count them for naught, with whom shalt thou still be wroth?
 But so long as thou dost value these things, be wroth with thyself
 rather than with others.
 
 4. Look now how it stands: You have fine raiment, your neighbor has not;
 you have a window, and wish to air your clothes at it. The neighbor
 knoweth not what is the true good of man, but thinks it is to have fine
 raiment, the same thing that you also think. Then shall he not come and
 take them away? Show a cake to greedy persons, and eat it up yourself
 alone, and will you have them not snatch at it? Nay, but provoke them
 not. Have no window, and do not air your clothes. I also had lately an
 iron lamp set beside the images of the Gods; hearing a noise at the
 door, I ran down, and found the lamp carried off. I reflected that the
 thief's impulse was not unnatural. What then? _To-morrow_, I said, _thou
 wilt find an earthen lamp_.[2] For a man loses only what he has. _I have
 lost a garment._ For you had a garment. _I have a pain in my head._ Have
 you any pain in your horns? Why, then, have you indignation? For there
 is no loss and no suffering save only in those things which we possess.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII.
 
 THE VOYAGE OF LIFE.
 
 
 Even as in a sea voyage, when the ship is brought to anchor, and you go
 out to fetch in water, you make a by-work of gathering a few roots and
 shells by the way, but have need ever to keep your mind fixed on the
 ship, and constantly to look round, lest at any time the master of the
 ship call, and you must, if he call, cast away all those things, lest
 you be treated like the sheep that are bound and thrown into the hold:
 So it is with human life also. And if there be given wife and children
 instead of shells and roots, nothing shall hinder us to take them. But
 if the master call, run to the ship, forsaking all those things, and
 looking not behind. And if thou be in old age, go not far from the ship
 at any time, lest the master should call, and thou be not ready.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII.
 
 THE MARK OF EFFORT.
 
 
 1. Seek not to have things happen as you choose them, but rather choose
 them to happen as they do, and so shall you live prosperously.
 
 2. Disease is a hindrance of the body, not of the Will, unless the Will
 itself consent. Lameness is a hindrance of the leg, not of the Will. And
 this you may say on every occasion, for nothing can happen to you but
 you will find it a hindrance not of yourself but of some other thing.
 
 3. What, then, are the things that oppress us and perturb us? What else
 than opinions? He that goeth away and leaveth his familiars and
 companions and wonted places and habits--with what else is he oppressed
 than his opinions? Now, little children, if they cry because their nurse
 has left them for a while, straightway forget their sorrow when they are
 given a small cake. Wilt thou be likened unto a little child?
 
 ----"Nay, by Zeus! for I would not be thus affected by a little cake,
 but by right opinions."
 
 And what are these?
 
 They are such as a man should study all day long to observe--that he be
 not subject to the effects of anything that is alien to him, neither of
 friend, nor place, nor exercises; yea, not even of his own body, but to
 remember the Law, and have it ever before his eyes. And what is the
 divine Law? To hold fast that which is his own, and to claim nothing
 that is another's; to use what is given him, and not to covet what is
 not given; to yield up easily and willingly what is taken away, giving
 thanks for the time that he has had it at his service. This do--or cry
 for the nurse and mamma; for what doth it matter to what or whom thou
 art subject, from what thy welfare hangs? Wherein art thou better than
 one who bewails himself for his mistress, if thou lament thy exercises
 and porticoes and comrades, and all such pastime? Another cometh,
 grieving because he shall no more drink of the water of Dirce. And is
 the Marcian water worse than that of Dirce?
 
 ----"But I was used to the other."
 
 And to this also thou shalt be used; and when thou art so affected
 towards it, lament for it too, and try to make a verse like that of
 Euripides--
 
   "The baths of Nero and the Marcian stream"[1]
 
 Behold how tragedies are made, when common chances happen to foolish
 men!
 
 4.----"But when shall I see Athens and the Acropolis again?"
 
 Wretched man! doth not that satisfy thee which thou seest every day?
 Hast thou aught better or greater to see than the sun, the moon, the
 stars, the common earth, the sea? But if withal thou mark the way of Him
 that governeth the whole and bear Him about within thee, wilt thou still
 long for cut stones and a fine rock? And when thou shalt come to leave
 the sun itself and the moon, what wilt thou do? Sit down and cry, like
 the children? What, then, wert thou doing in the school? What didst thou
 hear, what didst thou learn? Why didst thou write thyself down a
 philosopher, when thou mightest have written the truth, as thus:--_I
 made certain beginnings, and read Chrysippus, but did not so much as
 enter the door of a philosopher_? For how shouldst thou have aught in
 common with Socrates, who died as he died, who lived as he lived--or
 with Diogenes? Dost thou think that any of these men lamented or was
 indignant because he should see such a man or such a woman no more? or
 because he should not dwell in Athens or in Corinth, but, as it might
 chance, in Susa or Ecbatana? When a man can leave the banquet or the
 game when he pleases, shall such a one grieve if he remains? Shall he
 not, as in a game, stay only so long as he is entertained? A man of this
 stamp would easily endure such a thing as perpetual exile or sentence of
 death.
 
 Wilt thou not now be weaned as children are, and take more solid food,
 nor cry any more after thy mother and nurse, wailing like an old woman?
 
 ----"But if I quit them I shall grieve them."
 
 Thou grieve them? Never; but that shall grieve them which grieveth
 thee--Opinion. What hast thou then to do? Cast away thy own bad opinion;
 and they, if they do well, will cast away theirs; if not, they are the
 causes of their own lamenting.
 
 5. Man, be mad at last, as the saying is, for peace, for freedom, for
 magnanimity. Lift up thy head as one delivered from slavery. Dare to
 look up to God and say: _Deal with me henceforth as thou wilt; I am of
 one mind with thee; I am thine. I reject nothing that seems good to
 thee; lead me whithersoever thou wilt, clothe me in what dress thou
 wilt. Wilt thou have me govern or live privately, or stay at home, or go
 into exile, or be a poor man or a rich? For all these conditions I will
 be thy advocate with men--I show the nature of each of them, what it
 is._
 
 Nay, but sit in a corner and wait for thy mother to feed thee.[2]
 
 6. Who would Hercules have been if he had sat at home? He would have
 been Eurystheus, and not Hercules. And how many companions and friends
 had he in his journeying about the world? But nothing was dearer to him
 than God; and for this he was believed to be the son of God, yea, and
 was the son of God. And trusting in God, he went about purging away
 lawlessness and wrong. But thou art no Hercules, and canst not purge
 away evils not thine own? nor yet Theseus, who cleared Attica of evil
 things? Then clear away thine own. From thy breast, from thy mind cast
 out, instead of Procrustes and Sciron, grief, fear, covetousness, envy,
 malice, avarice, effeminacy, profligacy. And these things cannot
 otherwise be cast out than by looking to God only, being affected only
 by Him, and consecrated to His commands. But choosing anything else than
 this, thou wilt follow with groaning and lamentation whatever is
 stronger than thou, ever seeking prosperity in things outside thyself,
 and never able to attain it. For thou seekest it where it is not, and
 neglectest to seek it where it is.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV.
 
 FACULTIES.
 
 
 Remember at anything that shall befall thee to turn to thyself and seek
 what faculty thou hast for making use of it. If thou see a beautiful
 person, thou wilt find a faculty for that--namely, Self-mastery. If toil
 is laid upon thee, thou wilt find the faculty of Perseverance. If thou
 art reviled, thou wilt find Patience. And making this thy wont, thou
 shalt not be carried away by the appearances.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV.
 
 RETURNS.
 
 
 Never in any case say, _I have lost_ such a thing, but _I have returned
 it_. Is thy child dead? it is returned. Is thy wife dead? she is
 returned. Art thou deprived of thy estate? is not this also returned?
 
 ----"But he is wicked who deprives me of it!"
 
 But what is that to thee, through whom the Giver demands his own? As
 long, therefore, as he grants it to thee, steward it like another's
 property, as travelers use an inn.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI.
 
 THE PRICE OF TRANQUILLITY.
 
 
 1. If you would advance in philosophy you must abandon such thoughts as,
 _If I neglect my affairs I shall not have the means of living. If I do
 not correct my servant he will be good for nothing._ For it is better to
 die of hunger, having lived without grief and fear, than to live with a
 troubled spirit amid abundance. And it is better to have a bad servant
 than an afflicted mind.
 
 2. Make a beginning then in small matters. Is a little of your oil
 spilt, or a little wine stolen? Then say to yourself, _For so much peace
 is bought, this is the price of tranquillity_. For nothing can be gained
 without paying for it. And when you call your servant, bethink you that
 he may not hear, or, hearing, may not obey. For him, indeed, that is not
 well, but for you it is altogether well that he have not the power to
 trouble your mind.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII.
 
 A CHOICE.
 
 
 If thou wouldst advance, be content to let people think thee senseless
 and foolish as regards external things. Wish not ever to seem wise, and
 if ever thou shalt find thyself accounted to be somebody, then mistrust
 thyself. For know that it is not easy to make a choice that shall agree
 both with outward things and with Nature, but it must needs be that he
 who is careful of the one shall neglect the other.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII.
 
 THAT WHERE THE HEART IS THE BOND IS.
 
 
 1. Thou art a fool if thou desire wife and children and friends to live
 forever, for that is desiring things to be in thy power which are not in
 thy power, and things pertaining to others to be thine own. So also thou
 art a fool to desire that thy servant should never do anything amiss,
 for that is desiring evil not to be evil, but something else. But if
 thou desire never to fail in any pursuit, this thou canst do. This,
 therefore, practice to attain--namely, the attainable.
 
 2. The lord of each of us is he that hath power over the things that we
 desire or dislike, to give or to take them away. Whosoever, then, will
 be free, let him neither desire nor shun any of the things that are in
 others' power; otherwise he must needs be enslaved.
 
 3. Wherefore Demetrius[1] said to Nero, _You threaten me with death,
 but Nature threatens you_. If I am taken up with my poor body, or my
 property, I have given myself over to slavery, for I immediately show of
 my own self with what I may be captured. As when a snake draws in his
 head, I say, _Strike at that part of him which he guards_. And know
 thou, that at the part thou desirest to guard, there thy master will
 fall upon thee. Remembering this, whom wilt thou still flatter or fear?
 
 4. Think that thou shouldst conduct thyself in life as at a feast. Is
 some dish brought to thee? Then put forth thyself in seemly fashion.
 Doth it pass thee by? Then hold it not back. Hath it not yet come? Then
 do not reach out for it at a distance, but wait till it is at thine
 hand. And thus doing with regard to children and wife and governments
 and wealth, thou wilt be a worthy guest at the table of the Gods. And if
 thou even pass over things that are offered to thee, and refuse to take
 of them, then thou wilt not only share the banquet, but also the
 dominion of the Gods. For so doing Diogenes and Heracleitus, and the
 like, both were, and were reported to be, rightly divine.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIX.
 
 THAT WE LAMENT NOT FROM WITHIN.
 
 
 When thou seest one lamenting in grief because his son is gone abroad,
 or because he hath lost his goods, look to it that thou be not carried
 away by the appearance to think that he hath truly fallen into
 misfortune, in outward things. But be the thought at hand, _It is not
 the thing itself that afflicts this man--since there are others whom it
 afflicts not--but the opinion he has about it_. And so far as speech, be
 not slow to fit thyself to his mood, and even if so it be to lament with
 him. But have a care that thou lament not also from within.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XX.
 
 THAT A MAN MAY ACT HIS PART BUT NOT CHOOSE IT.
 
 
 1. Remember that thou art an actor in a play, of such a part as it may
 please the director to assign thee; of a short part if he choose a short
 part; of a long one if he choose a long. And if he will have thee take
 the part of a poor man, or of a cripple, or a governor, or a private
 person, mayest thou act that part with grace! For thine it is to act
 well the allotted part, but to choose it is another's.
 
 2. Say no more then, _How will it be with me?_ for however it be thou
 wilt settle it well, and the issue shall be fortunate. What would
 Hercules have been had he said, _How shall I contrive that a great lion
 may not appear to me, or a great boar, or a savage man?_ And what hast
 thou to do with that? if a great boar appear, thou wilt fight the
 greater fight; if evil men, thou wilt clear the earth of them. _But if I
 die thus?_ Thou wilt die a good man, in the accomplishing of a noble
 deed. For since we must by all means die, a man cannot be found but he
 will be doing somewhat, either tilling or digging or trading or
 governing, or having an indigestion or a diarrhoea. What wilt thou,
 then, that Death shall find thee doing? I, for my part, will choose some
 work, humane, beneficent, social, noble. But if I am not able to be
 found doing things of this greatness, then, at least, I will be doing
 that which none can hinder me to do, that which is given to me to
 do--namely, correcting myself, bettering my faculty for making use of
 appearances, working out my peace, giving what is due in every
 obligation of life; and if I prosper so far, then entering upon the
 third topic of philosophy, which concerneth the security of judgments.
 
 3. If Death shall find me in the midst of these studies, it shall
 suffice me if I can lift up my hands to God and say, _The means which
 thou gavest me for the perceiving of thy government, and for the
 following of the same, have I not neglected: so far as in me lies, I
 have not dishonored thee. Behold how I have used my senses, and my
 natural conceptions. Have I ever blamed thee? was I ever offended at
 aught that happened, or did I desire it should happen otherwise? Did I
 ever desire to transgress my obligations? That thou didst beget me I
 thank thee for what thou gavest. I am content that I have used thy gifts
 so long. Take them again, and set them in what place thou wilt, for
 thine were all things, and thou gavest them me._
 
 4. Is it not enough to depart in this condition? and what life is better
 and fairer than one like this, and what end more happy?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXI.
 
 DISTINCTIONS.
 
 
 1. When a raven croaks you a bad omen, be not carried away by the
 appearance; but straightway distinguish with yourself and say, _None of
 these things bodes aught to myself, but either to this poor body or this
 wretched property of mine, or to my good repute, or to my children, or
 to my wife. But to me all omens are fortunate if I choose to have it so.
 For whatever of these things may come to pass, it lies with me to have
 it serve me._
 
 2. You may be always victorious if you will never enter into any contest
 but where the victory depends upon yourself.
 
 3. When you shall see a man honored above others, or mighty in power, or
 otherwise esteemed, look to it that thou deem him not blessed, being
 carried away by the appearance. For if the essence of the Good be in
 those things that are in our own power, then neither envy nor jealousy
 have any place, nor thou thyself shalt not desire to be commander or
 prince or consul, but to be free. And to this there is one road--scorn
 of the things that are not in our own power.
 
 4. Remember, it is not he that strikes or he that reviles that doth any
 man an injury, but the opinion about these things, that they are
 injurious. When, then, some one may provoke thee to wrath, know that it
 is thine own conception which hath provoked thee. Strive, therefore, at
 the outset not to be carried away by the appearance; for if thou once
 gain time and delay, thou wilt more easily master thyself.
 
 5. Death and exile, and all things that appear dreadful, let these be
 every day before thine eyes. But Death most of all; for so thou wilt
 neither despise nor too greatly desire any condition of life.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXII.
 
 THAT A MAN IS SUFFICIENT TO HIMSELF.
 
 
 1. If thou set thine heart upon philosophy, prepare straightway to be
 laughed at and mocked by many who will say, _Behold, he has suddenly
 come back to us a philosopher_; or, _How came you by that brow of
 scorn?_ But do thou cherish no scorn, but hold to those things that seem
 to thee the best, as one set by God in that place. Remember, too, that
 if thou abide in that way, those that first mocked thee, the same shall
 afterwards reverence thee; but if thou yield to them, thou shalt receive
 double mockery.
 
 2. If it shall ever happen to thee to be turned to outward things in the
 desire to please some person, know that thou hast lost thy way of life.
 Let it be enough for thee in all things to _be_ a philosopher. But if
 thou desire also to seem one, then seem so to thyself, for this thou
 canst.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIII.
 
 THAT EVERY MAN FULFILL HIS OWN TASK.
 
 
 1. Let such thoughts never afflict thee as, _I shall live unhonored,
 and never be anybody anywhere_. For if lack of honor be an evil, thou
 canst no more fall into evil through another's doings than into vice. Is
 it, then, of thy own doing to be made a governor, or invited to feasts?
 By no means. How, then, is this to be unhonored? How shouldst thou
 _never be anybody anywhere_, whom it behooves to be somebody only in the
 things that are in thine own power, wherein it lies with thee to be of
 the greatest worth?
 
 2. _But I shall not be able to serve my friends._ How sayst thou? to
 serve them? They shall not have money from thee, nor shalt thou make
 them Roman citizens. Who, then, told thee that these were of the things
 that are in our power, and not alien to us? And who can give that which
 himself hath not?
 
 3. _Acquire, then_, they say, _that we may possess_. If I can acquire,
 and lose not piety, and faith, and magnanimity withal, show me the way,
 and I will do it. But if ye will have me lose the good things I possess,
 that ye may compass things that are not good at all, how unjust and
 unthinking are ye? But which will ye rather have--money, or a faithful
 and pious friend? Then, rather take part with me to this end; and ask me
 not to do aught through which I must cast away those things.
 
 4. _But_, he saith, _I shall not do my part in serving my country_.
 Again, what is this service? Thy country shall not have porticos nor
 baths from thee, and what then? Neither hath she shoes from the smith,
 nor arms from the cobbler; but it is enough if every man fulfill his own
 task. And if thou hast made one other pious and faithful citizen for
 her, art thou, then, of no service? Wherefore, neither shalt thou be
 useless to thy country.
 
 5. _What place, then_, he saith, _can I hold in the State_? Whatever
 place thou canst, guarding still thy faith and piety. But if in wishing
 to serve her thou cast away these things, what wilt thou profit her
 then, when perfected in shamelessness and faithlessness?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIV.
 
 THE WORLD'S PRICE FOR THE WORLD'S WORTH.
 
 
 1. Is some one preferred before thee at a feast, or in salutation, or in
 being invited to give counsel? Then, if these things are good, it
 behooves thee rejoice that he hath gained them; but if evil, be not
 vexed that thou hast not gained them; but remember that if thou act not
 as other men to gain the things that are not in our own power, neither
 canst thou be held worthy of a like reward with them.
 
 2. For how is it possible for him who will not hang about other men's
 doors to have a like reward with him who doth so? or him who will not
 attend on them with him who doth attend? or him who will not flatter
 them with the flatterer? Thou art unjust, then, and insatiable, if thou
 desire to gain those things for nothing, without paying the price for
 which they are sold.
 
 3. But how much is a lettuce sold for? A penny, perchance. If any one,
 then, will spend a penny, he shall have lettuce; but thou, not spending,
 shalt not have. But think not thou art worse off than he; for as he has
 the lettuce, so thou the penny which thou wouldst not give.
 
 4. And likewise in this matter. Thou art not invited to some man's
 feast? That is, for thou gavest not to the host the price of the supper;
 and it is sold for flattery, it is sold for attendance. Pay, then, the
 price, if it will profit thee, for which the thing is sold. But if thou
 wilt not give the price, and wilt have the thing, greedy art thou and
 infatuated.
 
 5. Shalt thou have nothing, then, instead of the supper? Thou shalt have
 this--not to have praised one whom thou hadst no mind to praise, and not
 to have endured the insolence of his door-keepers.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXV.
 
 AIMS OF NATURE.
 
 
 1. The will of Nature is to be learned from matters which do not concern
 ourselves.[1] Thus, when a boy may break the cup of another man, we are
 ready to say, _It is a common chance_. Know, then, that when thine own
 is broken, it behooves thee to be as though it were another man's. And
 apply this even to greater things. Has another man's child died, or his
 wife? who is there that will not say, _It is the lot of humanity_. But
 when his own may die, then straightway it is, _Alas, wretched that I
 am!_ But we should bethink ourselves what we felt on hearing of others
 in the same plight.
 
 2. As a mark is not set up to be missed, even so the nature of evil
 exists not in the universe.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVI.
 
 THE MIND'S SECURITY.
 
 
 If any one should set your body at the mercy of every passer-by, you
 would be indignant. When, therefore, you set your own mind at the mercy
 of every chance, to be troubled and perturbed when any one may revile
 you, have you no shame of this?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVII.
 
 THAT A MAN SHOULD BE ONE MAN.
 
 
 1. In every work you will take in hand mark well what must go before and
 what must follow, and so proceed. For else you shall at first set out
 eagerly, as not regarding what is to follow; but in the end, if any
 difficulties have arisen, you will leave it off with shame.
 
 2. So you wish to conquer in the Olympic games? And I, too, by the Gods;
 and a fine thing it would be. But mark the prefaces and the
 consequences, and then set to work. You must go under discipline, eat by
 rule, abstain from dainties, exercise yourself at the appointed hour, in
 heat or cold, whether you will or no, drink nothing cold, nor wine at
 will; in a word, you must give yourself over to the trainer as to a
 physician. Then in the contest itself there is the digging race,[1] and
 you are like enough to dislocate your wrist, or turn your ankle, to
 swallow a great deal of dust, to be soundly drubbed, and after all these
 things to be defeated.
 
 3. If, having considered these things, you are still in the mind to
 enter for the contest, then do so. But without consideration you will
 turn from one thing to another like a child, who now plays the wrestler,
 now the gladiator, now sounds the trumpet, then declaims like an actor;
 and so you, too, will be first an athlete, then a gladiator, then an
 orator, then a philosopher, and nothing with your whole soul; but as an
 ape you will mimic everything you see, and be charmed with one thing
 after another. For you approached nothing with consideration nor
 regularity, but rashly, and with a cold desire.
 
 4. And thus some men, having seen a philosopher, and heard discourse
 like that of Euphrates[2] (yet who indeed can say that any discourse is
 like his?), desire that they also may become philosophers.
 
 5. But, O man! consider first what it is you are about to do, and then
 inquire of your own nature whether you can carry it out. Will you be a
 pentathlos,[3] or a wrestler? Then, scan your arms and thighs; try your
 loins. For different men are made for different ends.
 
 6. Think you, you can be a sage, and continue to eat and drink and be
 wrathful and take offense just as you were wont? Nay, but you must watch
 and labor, and withdraw yourself from your household, and be despised by
 any serving boy, and be ridiculed by your neighbors, and take the lower
 place everywhere, in honors, in authority, in courts of justice, in
 dealings of every kind.[4]
 
 7. Consider these things--whether you are willing at such a price to
 gain peace, freedom, and an untroubled spirit. And if not, then attempt
 it not, nor, like a child, play now the philosopher, then the
 tax-gatherer, then the orator, then the Procurator of Caesar. For these
 things agree not among themselves; and, good or bad, it behooves you to
 be one man. You should be perfecting either your own ruling faculty, or
 your outward well-being; spending your art either on the life within or
 the life without; that is to say, you must hold your place either among
 the sages or the vulgar.
 
 END OF BOOK II.
 
 
 
 
 _BOOK III._
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 OBLIGATIONS.
 
 
 1. Obligations are universally defined by the bonds of relation. Is such
 a man your father? Then it is implied that you are to take care of him,
 to give place to him in all things, to bear his rebukes, his
 chastisement. _But if he be a bad father?_ Were you then related by any
 law of Nature to a good father? Nay, but simply to a father. Your
 brother does you wrong. Then guard your own place towards him, nor
 scrutinize what he is doing, but what you may do to keep your will in
 accord with Nature. For none other shall hurt you, if yourself choose it
 not, but you shall be hurt then when you conceive yourself to be so.
 
 2. Thus shall you discover your obligations from the offices of a
 neighbor, a citizen, a general, if you will accustom yourself to watch
 the relationships.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 AGAINST EPICURUS.
 
 
 1. Even Epicurus is conscious that we are by nature social, but having
 once placed the Good in the husk,[1] he cannot thereafter speak anything
 but what agrees with this; for again he affirms, and rightly affirms,
 that nothing is to be admired or received that is separated from the
 nature of the Good. How, then, Epicurus, do you suspect that we are
 social, if Nature had given us no affection for our offspring?[2]
 Wherefore do you counsel the sage against bringing up children? Why do
 you fear lest he fall into sorrow by so doing? Doth he fall into sorrow
 for the mouse that lives in his house? What careth he if a little mouse
 complain to him at home. But he knows well that if a little child be
 born, it is no longer in our power not to love it and be anxious for it.
 
 2. Thus, too, he saith that no man of sense will take part in affairs
 of the state, for he knows what he who takes part in them must do; but
 what should hinder one to take part, if he may behave among men as in a
 swarm of flies? But Epicurus, knowing these things, dares to say that we
 should not rear up our children. But even a sheep will not desert its
 young, nor a wolf; and shall a man? _What! will you have us to be silly
 creatures, like the sheep?_ Yet they desert not their young. _Or savage,
 like wolves?_ Yet even they desert them not. Come, then, who would obey
 you if he saw his little child fall on the ground and cry? For my part,
 I suppose that had it been prophesied to your mother and your father
 that you would say these things, not even so would they have cast you
 out.
 
 3. _But how can it be said of these outward things_[3] _that they are
 according to Nature, or contrary to Nature?_ That is to speak as if we
 were solitary and disunited from others. For to the foot I shall say it
 is according to Nature that it be clean; but if you take it as a foot,
 and not as a solitary thing, it shall beseem it to go into the mud, and
 to tread on thorns, and perchance to be cut off, for the sake of the
 whole; otherwise it is no longer a foot.
 
 4. And some such thing we should suppose about ourselves also. What art
 thou? A man. Look at thyself as a solitary creature, and it is according
 to Nature to live to old age, to grow rich, to keep good health. But if
 thou look at thyself as a man, and as a part of a certain Whole, for the
 sake of that Whole it may become thee now to have sickness, now to sail
 the seas and run into peril, now to suffer need, and perchance to die
 before thy time.
 
 5. Why, then, dost thou bear it hard? Knowest thou not, that as the foot
 alone is not a foot, so thou alone art not a man? For what is a man? A
 part of a polity, first of that which is made up of Gods and men; then
 of that which is said to be next to the other, which is a small copy of
 the Universal Polity.
 
 6. _Then must I now be brought to trial, and now must another have a
 fever, and another sail the seas, another die, another be sentenced?_
 Yea, for with such a body, in the bounds of such a universe, in such a
 throng of inhabitants, it cannot be but that different things of this
 nature should fall on different persons. This is thy task, then, having
 come into the world, to speak what thou shouldst, and to order these
 things as it is fitting.
 
 7. Then some one saith, _I charge you with wrong-doing_. Much good may
 it do thee! I have done my part--look to it thyself if thou have done
 thine, for of this too there is some danger, lest it escape thee.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 AGAINST THE EPICUREANS AND ACADEMICS.
 
 
 1. Beliefs which are sound and manifestly true are of necessity used
 even by those who deny them. And perhaps a man might adduce this as the
 greatest possible proof of the manifest truth of anything, that those
 who deny it are compelled to make use of it. Thus, if a man should deny
 that there is anything universally true, it is clear that he is obliged
 to affirm the contrary, the negation--that there is nothing universally
 true. Slave! not even this--for what is this but to say that if there is
 anything universal it is falsehood?
 
 2. Again, if one should come and say, _Know that nothing can be known,
 but all things are incapable of proof; or another, Believe me, and it
 shall profit thee, that no man ought to believe any man_; or again,
 another, _Learn from me, O man, that it is not possible to learn
 anything, and I tell thee this, and I will teach thee, if thou
 wilt_--now wherein do such men differ from those--whom shall I
 say?--those who call themselves Academics? _Assent, O men, that no man
 can assent to aught; believe us that no man can believe any one._
 
 3. Thus Epicurus, when he would abolish the natural fellowship of men
 with one another, employeth the very thing that is being abolished. For
 what saith he? _Be not deceived, O men, nor misguided nor
 mistaken--there is no natural fellowship among reasoning beings, believe
 me; and those who speak otherwise deceive us with sophisms._ What is
 that to thee? let us be deceived! Will it be the worse for thee if all
 other men are persuaded that we have a natural fellowship with one
 another, and that we should in all ways maintain it? Nay--but much the
 better and safer. Man, why dost thou take thought for us, and watch at
 night for our sakes? Why dost thou kindle thy lamp and rise early? why
 dost thou write so many books, lest any of us should be deceived about
 the Gods, in supposing that they cared for men? or lest any one should
 take the essence of the Good to be anything else than Pleasure? For if
 these things are so, then lie down and sleep, and live the life of a
 worm, wherefor thou hast judged thyself fit; eat and drink and cohabit
 and ease thyself and snore. What is it to thee how other men think
 concerning these matters, whether soundly or unsoundly? What hast thou
 to do with us? With sheep hast thou some concern, for that they serve us
 when they are shorn, and when they are milked, and at last when they
 have their throats cut. Were it not, then, to be desired, if men could
 be lulled and charmed to slumber by the Stoics, and give themselves to
 thee and the like of thee, to be shorn and milked? These things shouldst
 thou say to thy brother Epicureans; but shouldst thou not keep them
 hidden from other men, and seek in every way to persuade them above all
 things that we are by nature social, and that temperance is good; in
 order that everything may be kept for thee? Or should we preserve this
 fellowship with some and not with others? With whom, then, should we
 preserve it? With those who also preserve it towards us, or with those
 who transgress it? And who transgress it more than ye, who set forth
 such doctrines?
 
 4. What, then, was it that roused up Epicurus from his sleep, and
 compelled him to write the things he wrote? What else than Nature, the
 mightiest of all powers in humanity? Nature, that drags the man,
 reluctant and groaning, to her will. _For_, saith she, _since it seems
 to thee that there is no fellowship among men, write this down, and
 deliver it to others, and watch and wake for this, and be thyself by
 thine own deed the accuser of thine own opinions_. Shall we, then, say
 that Orestes was driven by the Furies and aroused from sleep, and did
 not crueller Furies and Avengers rouse this man as he slumbered, and
 suffered him not to rest, but compelled him, as madness and wine the
 priests of Cybele,[1] to proclaim his own evils? So mighty and
 invincible a thing is man's nature.
 
 5. For how can a vine be affected, and not in the manner of a vine, but
 of an olive? Or how, again, can an olive be affected not in the manner
 of an olive but of a vine? It is impossible, it cannot be conceived.
 Neither, then, is it possible for a man wholly to lose the affections of
 humanity, for even eunuchs cannot cut away for themselves the desires
 of men. And thus Epicurus has cut away all that belongs to a man as
 father of a family, and as citizen, and as friend; but the desires of
 humanity he hath not cut away, for he could not; no more than these
 pitiful Academics are able to cast away or to blind their own
 perceptions, although this is the thing that they have striven with all
 their zeal to do.
 
 6. How shameful is this! that a man having received from Nature measures
 and canons for the recognition of truth, should study not to add to them
 and perfect them where they are wanting, but the very contrary of this;
 if there be anything that may lead us to the knowledge of the truth,
 they strive to abolish and destroy it.
 
 7. What sayest thou, philosopher? religion and holiness, what dost thou
 take them for?[2]
 
 ----"If thou wilt, I shall prove that they are good."
 
 So be it; prove it then, in order that our citizens may be converted and
 honor the Divinity, and be no longer neglectful of the greatest things.
 
 ----"Now hast thou received the proofs?"
 
 I have, and am thankful therefor.
 
 8.----"Now since thou art exceedingly well pleased with these things,
 hear the contrary: There are no Gods, or if there be, they have no care
 for men, nor have we any communion with them; and this religion and
 holiness, whereof the multitude babble, is the lying of impostors and
 sophists, or of legislators, by Zeus! for the frighting and restraining
 of evil-doers."
 
 Well said, philosopher! the citizens shall have much profit of thee!
 thou hast already brought back all our youths to the contempt of sacred
 things.
 
 ----"What now? are these doctrines not pleasing to thee? Learn, then,
 that Righteousness is nothing, that Reverence is folly, that a father is
 nothing, a son nothing."
 
 Well said, philosopher! proceed, persuade the young, that we may
 multiply the number of those who believe and speak with thee. From these
 teachings have grown our well-governed States, from these did Sparta
 spring, and these beliefs, by his laws and discipline, did Lycurgus
 plant among his people:--That slavery is no more base than honorable,
 nor to be free men more honorable than base. Through these opinions died
 those who fell at Thermopylae, and through what others did the Athenians
 forsake their city?[8]
 
 9. Then those who speak such things marry, and beget children, and take
 part in public affairs, and make themselves priests and augurs--of what?
 Of beings that do not exist! and they question the Pythian oracle that
 they may learn falsehoods; and they declare the oracles to others. O
 monstrous impudence and imposture!
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 ON SLAVERY.
 
 
 1. A certain man having inquired how one may make his meals in a manner
 pleasing to the Gods, If he do it uprightly, said Epictetus, and
 considerately, and equably, and temperately, and orderly, shall it not
 also be thus pleasing to the Gods? But when you ask for hot water, and
 the boy does not hear, or, hearing, brings it only luke-warm; or if he
 is not even to be found in the house, then is it not pleasing to the
 Gods if you refrain from indignation, and do not burst with passion?
 _How shall one endure such fellows?_ Wretch, wilt thou not bear with
 thine own brother, who is of the progeny of Zeus, like a son sprung of
 the same seed as thyself, and of the same heavenly descent, but thou
 must straightway make thyself a tyrant, for the place of command in
 which thou art set? Wilt thou not remember who thou art, and whom thou
 rulest--that they are kinsmen, brethren by nature, the progeny of Zeus?
 _But I have bought them, and they have not bought me!_ Seest thou, then,
 whither thou art looking--towards the earth, towards the pit of
 perdition, towards these miserable laws of dead men? but towards the
 laws of the Gods thou dost not look.
 
 2. That which thou wouldst not suffer thyself, seek not to lay upon
 others. Thou wouldst not be a slave--look to it that others be not
 slaves to thee. For if thou endure to have slaves, it seems that thou
 thyself art first of all a slave. For virtue hath no communion with vice
 nor freedom with slavery.
 
 3. As one who is in health would not choose to be served by the sick,
 nor that those dwelling with him should be sick, so neither would one
 that is free bear to be served by slaves, or that those living with him
 should be slaves.[1]
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 TO THE ADMINISTRATOR OF THE FREE CITIES, WHO WAS AN EPICUREAN.
 
 
 1. The Administrator[1] having visited him (and this man was an
 Epicurean), It is proper, said Epictetus, that ignorant people like us
 should inquire of you that are philosophers (as men who come into a
 strange city make inquiry of the citizens and those familiar with the
 place) what is the chief thing in the world, to the end that, having
 learned it, we may go in search of it, and behold it, as men do with
 objects in the cities.
 
 2. Now, that there are three things with which man is concerned--soul,
 and body, and the outer world--scarce any one will deny. It remaineth,
 then, for men like ye to answer which is the chief of these things? What
 shall we declare to men? Is it the flesh? And was it for this that
 Maximus sent forth his son, and sailed with him through the tempest as
 far as Cassiope,[2] for somewhat that he should feel in the flesh?
 
 3. But the Epicurean denying this, and saying, _God forbid_, Epictetus
 said:
 
 Is it not fit, then, that we should be zealous about that, the chief
 thing?
 
 ----"Of all things most fit."
 
 What, then, have we greater than the flesh?
 
 ----"The soul," he said.
 
 And the good of the chief thing, is it greater than the good of the
 lower thing?
 
 ----"The good of the chief thing is greater."
 
 And the good things of the soul, are they in the power of the Will, or
 beyond the Will?
 
 ----"They are in the power of the Will."
 
 The pleasure of the soul, then, is within the power of the Will?
 
 He assented.
 
 And this pleasure itself, whence may it arise? From itself? But this is
 inconceivable; for we must suppose some original substance of the Good,
 whereof the soul doth make us sensible when we light upon it.
 
 This, too, he admitted.
 
 Wherein, then, are we sensible of this spiritual pleasure? for if it be
 in spiritual things, the nature of the Good is discovered. For the Good
 cannot be something different from the thing that justly delights us;
 nor, if the original thing be not good, can aught be good that proceeds
 from it; for, in order that the thing proceeding may be good, the
 original thing must be good also. But this ye would never say, if ye had
 your wits, for so ye would speak things that agree not with Epicurus and
 the rest of your opinions. It remains, then, that we are conscious in
 bodily things of this pleasure of the soul, and again, that these are
 the original things and the very substance of the Good.[3]
 
 4. Wherefore Maximus did foolishly if he made his voyage for the sake of
 anything else than the flesh; that is, than the chief thing. And any man
 doth foolishly who restraineth himself from others' good, if he be a
 judge, and able to take them. But, if you please, let us regard this
 only, how it may be done secretly and safely, and so that none may know
 it. For neither does Epicurus himself declare stealing to be bad, but
 only to be caught stealing; and because it is impossible to be certain
 of no discovery, therefore he saith, _Ye shall not steal_. But I say
 that if we steal with skill and discretion, we shall not be caught. And,
 moreover, if we have powerful friends among men and women at Rome, and
 the Greeks are feeble, no one will dare to go thither on this score. Why
 do you refrain from your own good? This is foolish--this is absurd. But
 not even if you tell me you do refrain will I believe you. For, as it is
 impossible to assent to anything that appeareth to be a falsehood or to
 turn away from what appeareth to be true, even so it is impossible to
 withhold oneself from anything that appeareth to be good. But riches are
 a good, and, at all events, the most potent means of pleasure.
 Wherefore, then, not compass them? And why not corrupt our neighbor's
 wife, if we may do it secretly? and also, if the husband talk nonsense
 about it, let us fling him out! If you will be a true and perfect
 philosopher, and obedient to your own doctrines, thus must you do; but
 if you do not, you differ no whit from us that are called Stoics. For
 truly we ourselves say one thing and do another; we speak fair and
 honest things, and do vile ones. But the opposite distemper will be
 thine--a vile creed and honorable deeds.
 
 5. And you think, God help you! of a city of Epicureans? _I do not
 marry. Nor I; for it is not right to marry, nor beget children, nor take
 part in public affairs._ What will come to pass then? Whence shall we
 have citizens? who shall educate them? who shall be the overseer of
 youth?[4] who the director of gymnastics? and how shall the youth be
 trained up? as the Lacedaemonians? or as the Athenians? Take me a youth,
 and bring him up after these doctrines of thine! Evil are they,
 subversive of States, mischievous to households, unbecoming to women.
 Abandon them, man! Thou dwellest in a chief city; it is thy part to
 rule, to judge righteously, to refrain from other men's goods; nor must
 any woman seem beautiful to thee save thine own wife, nor vessel of gold
 or silver. Seek for doctrines in harmony with these words, from which
 setting out thou mayest with gladness abandon things so potent to
 attract and overcome. But if beside the seduction of these things we
 have sought out some philosophy like this that pushes us towards them,
 and confirms us in them, what shall come of it?
 
 6. In the graver's work, which is the chief thing? the silver or the
 art? The substance of the hand is flesh, but the main things are the
 works of the hand. The obligations, therefore, are also three--those
 that concern us, firstly, in that we are; and secondly, as we are; and
 thirdly, the main things themselves. And thus in man, too, it is not
 meet to value the material, this flesh, but the main things. What are
 these? To take part in public affairs, to marry, to beget children, to
 fear God, to care for parents, and, in general, to pursue, to avoid, to
 desire, to dislike, as each of these things should be done, as Nature
 made us to do. And how made she us? To be free, generous, pious. For
 what other creature blushes? what other is capable of the sense of
 shame?
 
 7. And to these things let Pleasure be subject as a minister, a servant,
 that she may summon forth our ardor, and that she also may aid in works
 that are according to Nature.[5]
 
 8. ----"But I am a wealthy man, and have no need of aught."
 
 Why, then, dost thou profess philosophy? Thy vessels of gold and vessels
 of silver are enough for thee; what need hast thou of doctrines?
 
 ----"But I am also a judge of the Greeks!"
 
 Dost thou know how to judge--who made thee know?
 
 ----"Caesar wrote me a commission."
 
 Let him write thee a commission to be a judge of music, and what help
 will it be to thee? And how didst thou become a judge? by kissing of
 what man's hand? Was it that of Symphorus or Numenius? Before whose
 bed-chamber didst thou sleep? To whom didst thou send gifts? Dost thou
 not perceive, then, that to be a judge is worth just as much as Numenius
 is worth?
 
 ----"But I can cast into prison whom I will."
 
 As if he were a stone.
 
 ----"But I can flog any man I will."
 
 As if he were an ass. This is no government of men. Rule us as reasoning
 beings; show us what is for our good, and we shall follow it; show us
 what is for our ill, and we shall turn away from it; make us emulators
 of thyself, as Socrates made his disciples. He, indeed, was one that
 governed men as men, who made them subject unto him in their pursuit and
 their avoidance, their desire and dislike. _Do this, do not this, or I
 will cast thee into prison._ This is not the rule of reasoning beings.
 But, _As Zeus hath ordered, so do thou act; but if thou dost not, thou
 shall suffer loss and hurt_. What hurt? _None other than this--not to
 have done what it behooved thee to do. Thou shall lose faith, piety,
 decency--look for no greater injuries than these._
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 ON STATECRAFT.
 
 
 1. Not with the stones of Euboea and Sparta let the structure of your
 city walls be variegated; but let the discipline and teaching that comes
 from Greece penetrate with order the minds of citizens and statesmen.
 For with the thoughts of men are cities well established, and not with
 wood and stone.
 
 2. If thou wouldst have a household well established, then follow the
 example of the Spartan Lycurgus. For even as he did not fence the city
 with walls, but fortified the inhabitants with virtue, and so preserved
 the city free for ever, thus do thou not surround thyself with a great
 court and set up lofty towers, but confirm the dwellers in the house
 with good-will, and faith, and friendliness, and no harmful thing shall
 enter; no, not if the whole army of evil were arrayed against it.
 
 3. Which of us will not admire Lycurgus, the Lacedaemonian? For having
 lost an eye at the hands of one of the citizens, and having received the
 young man from the people that he should punish him as he would, he
 refrained from this; but having taught him and proved him to be a good
 man, he brought him into the theater. And when the Lacedaemonians
 marveled, _I received this man from you_, he said, _insolent and
 violent; I give him back to you mild and civil_.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 ON FRIENDSHIP.
 
 
 1. Whereinsoever a man is zealous, this, it is fair to suppose, he
 loveth. Are men, then, zealous for evil things? Never.[1] Or, perchance,
 for things which do not concern them? Nor for them either. It
 remaineth, then, that they are zealous about good things only; and that
 if they are zealous about them, they also love them. Whosoever, then,
 hath understanding of good things, the same would know how to love. But
 he who is not able to distinguish good things from evil, and things that
 are neither from both, how could this man yet be capable of loving? To
 love, then, is a quality of the wise alone.
 
 2. _And how is this_, saith one, _for I am foolish, and none the less do
 I love my child_. By the Gods! I wonder, then, how you have begun by
 confessing yourself to be foolish. For wherein do you lack? Do you not
 use your senses? do you not judge of appearances? do you not bring to
 the body the nourishment it needeth, and the covering and habitation?
 Wherefore, then, confess yourself to be a fool? Because, forsooth, you
 are often perplexed by appearances, and troubled, and you are vanquished
 by their plausibility; and you take the same things to be now good, and
 now evil, and then indifferent; and, in a word, you grieve and fear and
 envy, and are troubled, and changed--for these things you confess
 yourself a fool.
 
 3. But do you never change in love? But is it wealth, and pleasure,
 and, in short, things, alone that you sometimes take to be good and
 sometimes evil? and do you not take the same men to be now good, now
 evil? and sometimes you are friendly disposed towards them, and
 sometimes hostile? and sometimes you praise them, and sometimes you
 blame?
 
 ----"Yea, even so I do."
 
 What then? a man who hath been deceived about another, is he, think you,
 his friend?
 
 ----"Assuredly not."
 
 And one who hath taken a friend out of a humor for change, hath he
 good-will towards him?
 
 ----"Nor he either."
 
 And he who now reviles another, and afterwards reveres him?
 
 ----"Nor he."
 
 What then? Sawest thou never the whelps of a dog, how they fawn and
 sport with each other, that you would say nothing can be more loving?
 But to know what friendship is, fling a piece of flesh among them, and
 thou shalt learn. And cast between thee and thy child a scrap of land,
 and thou shalt learn how the child will quickly wish to bury thee, and
 thou wilt pray that he may die. And then thou wilt say, _What a child
 have I nourished! this long time he is burying me!_ Throw a handsome
 girl between you, and the old man will love her, and the young too;[2]
 and if it be glory, or some risk to run, it will be on the same fashion.
 You will speak the words of the father of Admetus[3]:--
 
   "Day gladdens thee; think'st thou it glads not me?
   Thou lovest light; think'st thou I love the dark?"
 
 Think you this man did not love his own child when it was little? nor
 was in agony if it had a fever? nor said many a time, _Would that I had
 the fever rather than he!_ Then when the trial cometh and is near at
 hand, lo, what words they utter! And Eteocles and Polyneices,[4] were
 they not children of the same mother and the same father? were they not
 brought up together, did they not live together, drink together, sleep
 together, and often kiss one another? So that any one who saw them, I
 think, would have laughed at the philosophers, for the things they say
 perversely about friendship. But when royalty, like a piece of flesh,
 hath fallen between them, hear what things they speak:--
 
   "_Pol._ Where wilt thou stand before the towers?"
 
   "_Et._ Wherefore seekest thou to know?"
 
   "_Pol._ There I too would stand and slay thee."
 
   "_Et._ Thou hast spoken my desire."
 
 4. For universally, be not deceived, nothing is so dear to any creature
 as its own profit. Whatsoever may seem to hinder this, be it father or
 child or friend or lover, this he will hate and abuse and curse. For
 Nature hath never so made anything as to love aught but its own profit:
 this is father and brother and kin and country and God. When, then, the
 Gods appear to hinder us in this, we revile even them, and overthrow
 their images and burn their temples; as Alexander, when his friend died,
 commanded to burn the temples of Esculapius.
 
 5. Therefore, if a man place in the same thing both profit and holiness,
 and the beautiful and fatherland, and parents and friends, all these
 things shall be saved; but if he place profit in one thing, and friends
 and fatherland and kinsfolk, yea, and righteousness itself some other
 where, all these things shall perish, for profit shall outweigh them.
 For where the I and the Mine are, thither, of necessity, inclineth every
 living thing: if in the flesh, then the supremacy is there; if in the
 Will, it is there; if in outward things, it is there. If, then, mine I
 is where my Will is, thus only shall I be the friend I should be, or the
 son or the father. For my profit then will be to cherish faith and piety
 and forbearance and continence and helpfulness; and to guard the bonds
 of relation. But if I set Myself in one place and Virtue some
 otherwhere, then the word of Epicurus waxeth strong, which declareth
 that there is no Virtue, or, at least, that Virtue is but conceit.
 
 6. Through this ignorance did Athenians and Lacedaemonians quarrel with
 each other, and Thebans with both of them, and the Great King with
 Hellas, and Macedonians with both of them, and even now Romans with
 Getae; and through this yet earlier the wars of Ilion arose. Paris was
 the guest of Menelaus; and if any one had seen how friendly-minded
 towards each other they were, he would have disbelieved any one who said
 they were not friends. But a morsel was flung between them--a fair
 woman, and about her there was war. And now when you see friends or
 brothers that seem to be of one mind, argue nothing from this concerning
 their friendship; nay, not if they swear it, not if they declare that
 they cannot be parted from each other. For in the ruling faculty of a
 worthless man there is no faith; it is unstable, unaccountable, victim
 of one appearance after another. But try them, not, as others do, if
 they were born of the same parents and nurtured together, and under the
 same tutor; but by this alone, wherein they place their profit, whether
 in outward things or in the will. If in outward things, call them no
 more friends than faithful or steadfast or bold or free; yea, nor even
 men, if you had sense. For that opinion hath nothing of humanity that
 makes men bite each other, and revile each other, and haunt the
 wildernesses, or the public places, like the mountains,[5] and in the
 courts of justice to show forth the character of thieves; nor that which
 makes men drunkards and adulterers and corruptors, nor whatever other
 ills men work against each other through this one and only opinion, that
 They and Theirs lie in matters beyond the Will. But if you hear, in
 sooth, that these men hold the Good to be there only where the Will is,
 where the right use of appearances is, then be not busy to inquire if
 they are father and son, or brothers, or have long time companied with
 each other as comrades; but, knowing this one thing alone, argue
 confidently that they are friends, even as they are faithful and
 upright. For where else is friendship than where faith is, where piety
 is, where there is an interchange of virtue, and none of other things
 than that?
 
 7. _But such a one hath shown kindness to me so long, and is he not my
 friend?_ Slave, whence knowest thou if he did not show thee kindness as
 he wipes his shoes or tends his beast? Whence knowest thou if, when thy
 use is at an end as a vessel, he will not cast thee away like a broken
 plate? _But she is my wife, and we have lived together so long?_ And how
 long lived Eriphyle with Amphiaraus, and was the mother, yea, of many
 children? But a necklace came between them.[6] But what is a necklace?
 It is the opinion men have concerning such things. That was the wild
 beast nature, that was the sundering of love, that which would not allow
 the woman to be a wife, or the mother a mother. And of you, whosoever
 hath longed either to be a friend himself or to win some other for a
 friend, let him cut out these opinions, let him hate them and drive them
 from his soul.
 
 8. And thus he will not revile himself, nor be at strife with himself,
 nor be variable, nor torment himself. And to another, if it be one like
 himself, he will be altogether as to himself, but with one unlike he
 will be forbearing and gentle and mild, ready to forgive him as an
 ignorant man, as one who is astray about the greatest things; but harsh
 to no man, being well assured of that dogma of Plato, that no soul is
 willingly deprived of the truth.
 
 9. But otherwise you may do all things whatsoever, even as friends are
 wont to do, and drink together, and dwell together, and voyage together,
 and be born from the same parents, for so are snakes; but friends they
 are not, nor are ye, so long as ye hold these accursed doctrines of wild
 beasts.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 TIME AND CHANGE.
 
 
 1. Let not another's vice be thy evil. For thou wast not born to be
 abject with others, or unfortunate with others, but to prosper with
 them. But if any one is unfortunate, remember that it is of his own
 doing. For God hath made all men to be happy, and of good estate. For
 this end hath He granted means and occasions, giving some things to each
 man as his own concern, and some things as alien; and the things that
 are hindered and subject to compulsion and lost are not his own concern,
 and those that are unhindered are; and the substance of Good and of
 Evil, as it were worthy of Him that careth for us and doth protect us as
 a father, He hath placed among our own concerns.
 
 2.----"But I have parted from such a one, and he is grieved."
 
 For why did he deem things alien to be his own concern? Why, when he
 rejoiced to see thee, did he not reason that thou wert mortal, and apt
 to travel to another land? Therefore doth he pay the penalty of his own
 folly. But thou, for what cause or reason dost thou bewail thyself? Hast
 thou also given no thought to these things; but like silly women
 consorted with all that pleased thee as though thou shouldst consort
 with them forever, places and persons and pastimes? and now thou sittest
 weeping, because thou canst see the same persons and frequent the same
 places no longer. This, truly, is what thou art fit for, to be more
 wretched than crows and ravens that can fly whithersoever they please,
 and change their nests, and pass across the seas, nor ever lament nor
 yearn for what they have left.
 
 ----"Yea, but they are thus because they are creatures without reason."
 
 To us, then, was Reason given by the Gods for our misfortune and misery?
 that we should be wretched and sorrowful forever? Let all men be
 immortal, forsooth, and no man migrate to another land, nor let us
 ourselves ever migrate, but remain rooted to one spot like plants; and
 if one of our companions go, let us sit down and weep, and if he return,
 dance and clap hands like children!
 
 3. Shall we not now at last wean ourselves, and remember what we heard
 from the philosophers? if, indeed, we did not listen to them as a
 wizard's incantation. For they said that the universe is one Polity, and
 one is the substance out of which it is made, and there must, of
 necessity, be a certain cycle, and some things must give place to
 others, some dissolving away, and others coming into being, some abiding
 in one place, and others being in motion. But all things are full of
 love, first of the Gods, then of men, that are by nature made to have
 affection towards each other; and it must needs be that some dwell with
 each other, and some are separated, rejoicing in those who are with
 them, and not distressed for those who go away. And man, they said, is
 magnanimous by nature, and contemneth all things beyond the Will; and
 hath also this quality, not to be rooted to one spot, nor grown into the
 earth, but able to go from place to place, sometimes urged by divers
 needs, sometimes for the sake of what he shall see.
 
 4. And such was the case with Ulysses:--
 
    "The cities of many peoples and minds of men he
    knew."--_Od._ i. 3.
 
 And yet earlier with Hercules, who went about the whole earth--
 
    "All disorders of men and orderly rule to see,"
                                      --_Od._ xvii. 487,
 
 casting out and purging the one, and bringing in the other in its place.
 And how many friends, think you, had he in Thebes? how many in Argos?
 how many in Athens? and how many did he gain in his journeyings? And he
 took a wife, too, when it seemed to him due time, and begat children,
 and left them behind him, not with lamentations or regrets, nor leaving
 them as orphans; for he knew that no man is an orphan, but that there is
 an Eternal Father who careth continually for all. For not of report
 alone had he heard that Zeus is the Father of men, whom also he thought
 to be his own father, and called Him so, and all that he did, he did
 looking unto Him. And thus it was that he was able to live happily in
 every place.
 
 5. For never can happiness and the longing for what is not exist
 together. For Happiness must have all its will. It is like unto one that
 hath eaten and is filled; thirst will not sort with it, nor hunger. _But
 Ulysses longed for his wife, and lamented as he sat on the rock._[1] And
 do you, then, follow Homer and his stories in everything? Or if he did
 in truth lament, what else was he than an unfortunate man? And what good
 man is unfortunate? Verily, the Whole is ill-governed if Zeus taketh no
 care of his own citizens, that they like himself may be happy; but these
 things it is not lawful nor pious even to think of. But Ulysses, if
 indeed he lamented and complained, was not a good man. For what good man
 is there that knoweth not who he is? and who knoweth this who forgets
 that things which come into existence also perish, and that no two human
 beings dwell together forever? To aim, then, at things which are
 impossible is a contemptible and foolish thing; it is the part of a
 stranger and alien in God's world who fights against God in the one way
 he can--by his own opinions.
 
 6. _But my mother laments if she sees me not._ And wherefore hath she
 never learned these teachings? Yet, I say not that it is no concern of
 ours to prevent her grieving; but that we should not absolutely, and
 without exception, desire what is not our own. And the grief of another
 is another's, and my grief is mine own. I will, therefore, absolutely
 end mine own grief, for this I can; and that of another according to my
 means, but this I will not attempt absolutely. For otherwise I shall be
 fighting with God. I shall be opposing and resisting Him in the
 government of the Whole; and of this strife against God, this obstinacy,
 not only my children's children, but I myself, too, shall pay the
 penalty by day and night; for I shall leap from my bed at visions of the
 night, confounded, trembling at every news, having my peace at the mercy
 of letters of other persons. _A messenger hath come from Rome; God grant
 it be no evil_. But what evil can come upon thee there, where thou art
 not? _There is a message from Greece; God grant it be no evil._ And thus
 to thee every place may be a source of misfortune. Is it not enough for
 thee to be unfortunate where thou art, and not also across the sea, and
 by writings? Is this the security of thine affairs? _But what if my
 friends which are abroad die there?_ What else than that creatures
 destined to die have died? And how dost thou desire to live to old age,
 and never to see the death of any whom thou lovest? Knowest thou not
 that in a great length of time many and various things must chance; that
 a fever shall overthrow one, and a robber another, and a tyrant another?
 Such is our environment, such our companions; cold and heat, and
 improper ways of living, and journeyings, and voyagings, and winds, and
 various circumstances will destroy one man, and exile another, and cast
 another into an embassy, and another into a campaign. Sit down, then,
 terrified at all these things; grieve and fail, and be unfortunate;
 depend on others, and that not on one or two, but myriads upon myriads.
 
 7. Is this what you heard, is this what you learned from the
 philosophers? Know you not that our business here is a warfare? and one
 must watch, and one go out as a spy, and one must fight? All cannot be
 the same thing, nor would it be better if they were. But you neglect to
 do the bidding of the commander, and complain when he hath laid somewhat
 rougher than common upon you; and you mark not what, so far as in you
 lies, you are making the army to become, so that if all copy you, none
 will dig a trench, none will cast up a rampart, none will watch, none
 will run any risk, but each will appear worthless for warfare. Again, in
 a ship, if you go for a sailor, take up one place, and never budge from
 it; and if you are wanted to go aloft, refuse; or to run upon the prow,
 refuse; and what captain will have patience with you? Will he not cast
 you out like some useless thing, nothing else than a hindrance and bad
 example to the other sailors?
 
 8. And thus here also: the life of every man is a sort of warfare, and
 a long one, and full of divers chances. And it behooveth a man to play a
 soldier's part, and do all at the nod of his commander; yea, and if it
 be possible, to divine what he intendeth. For that commander is not such
 a one as this, neither in power nor in exaltation of character. You are
 set in a great office, and in no mean place, but are a Senator forever.
 Know you not that such a one can attend but little to his household, but
 he must be oftentimes abroad, ruling or being ruled, or fulfilling some
 office, or serving in the field, or judging? And will you, then, desire
 to be fixed and rooted like a plant in the same place? _For it is
 pleasant._ Who denies it? But so is a dainty pleasant, and a fair woman
 is pleasant. How otherwise are those wont to speak who make pleasure
 their end? See you not what kind of men they are whose words you utter?
 They are the words of Epicureans and profligates. And doing the works of
 these men, and holding their doctrines, wilt thou speak to us with the
 speech of Zeno and Socrates?
 
 9. Will you not fling away from you as far as you can these alien
 sentiments wherewith you adorn yourself, which beseem you not at all?
 What other desire have such men than to sleep their fill unhindered, and
 when they have risen, to yawn for languor, and wash their face, and
 write and read whatever pleaseth them; then have some trivial talk, and
 be praised by their friends, whatever they say; then go forth to walk
 about, and having done this a little, go to the baths; then eat; then
 retire to rest--such a rest as is the wont of such men, and why need we
 say what, for it is easily guessed? Come, tell me, then, thine own way
 of life, such as thou desirest, O thou votary of the truth, and of
 Socrates and Diogenes! What wilt thou do in Athens? these very things,
 or others? Why, then, dost declare thyself a Stoic? Are not they sorely
 punished which falsely pretend to be Roman citizens; and should those go
 free who falsely pretend to so great and reverend a calling and name? or
 let this indeed be impossible; but this is the law, divine and mighty,
 and not to be escaped, that layeth the greatest punishments on the
 greatest sinners. For what saith this law? He who pretendeth to things
 that are not his own, let him be a cheat and braggart; he that is
 disobedient to the divine government, let him be an abject, a slave, let
 him grieve and envy and pity[2]--in a word, let him be misfortunate, and
 mourn.
 
 10.----"And now will you have me attend upon such a one, and hang about
 his doors?"
 
 If Reason demand it, for the sake of country, of kinsmen, of mankind,
 wherefore shouldst thou not go? Thou art not ashamed to go to the doors
 of a cobbler when thou art in want of shoes, nor to those of a gardener
 for lettuces; and why to those of a rich man when thou art in need of
 some like thing?
 
 ----"Yea, but I have no awe of the cobbler."
 
 Then have none of the rich.
 
 ----"Nor will I flatter the gardener."
 
 And do not flatter the rich.
 
 ----"How, then, shall I gain what I want?"
 
 Did I say to thee, _Go, for the sake of gaining it_; or did I not only
 say, _Go, that thou mayest do what it beseems thee to do_.
 
 ----"And why, then, should I yet go?"
 
 That thou mayest have gone; that thou mayest have played the part of a
 citizen, of a brother, of a friend. And, for the rest, remember that the
 shoemaker, the vegetable-seller, to whom thou didst go, hath nothing
 great or exalted to give, even though he sell it dear. Thy aim was
 lettuces; they are worth an obol, they are not worth a talent. And so it
 is here. Is the matter worth going to the rich man's door for? So be it;
 I will go. Is it worth speaking to him about? So be it; I will speak.
 But must I also kiss his hand, and fawn upon him with praise? Out upon
 it! that is a talent's worth. It is no profit to me, nor to the State,
 nor to my friends, that they should lose a good citizen and friend.
 
 11.----"How, then, shall I become of an affectionate disposition?"
 
 In having a generous and happy one. For Reason doth never decree that a
 man must be abject, or lament, or depend on another, or blame God or
 man. And thus be thou affectionate, as one who will keep this faith.
 But if through this affection, or what happens to be so called by thee,
 thou art like to prove a miserable slave, then it shall not profit thee
 to be affectionate. And what hinders us to love as though we loved a
 mortal, or one who may depart to other lands? Did Socrates not love his
 children? Yea, but as a free man; as one who remembered that he must
 first love the Gods. And, therefore, he never did transgress anything
 that it becomes a good man to observe, neither in his defense, nor in
 fixing his punishment, nor beforetime when he was of the Council, nor
 when he was serving in the field. But we are well supplied with every
 excuse for baseness; some through children, some through mothers, some
 through brothers. But it behooveth no man to be unhappy through any
 person, but happy through all, and most of all through God, which hath
 framed us to that end.
 
 12. And, for the rest, in all things which are delightful to thee, set
 before thyself the appearances that oppose them. What harm is it, while
 kissing thy child, to whisper, _To-morrow thou shalt die_; and likewise
 with thy friend, _To-morrow thou shall depart, either thou or I, and we
 shall see each other no more_?
 
 ----"But these are words of ill-omen."
 
 And so are some incantations, but in that they are useful I regard not
 this; only let them be of use. But dost thou call anything of ill-omen,
 save only that which betokeneth some evil? Cowardice is a word of
 ill-omen, and baseness and grief and mourning and shamelessness, these
 words are of ill-omen. And not even them must we dread to speak, if so
 we may defend ourselves against the things. But wilt thou say that any
 word is of ill-omen that betokeneth some natural thing? Say that it is
 of ill-omen to speak of the reaping of ears of corn, for it betokeneth
 the destruction of the ears--but not of the universe. Say that the
 falling of the leaves is of ill-omen, and the dried fig coming in the
 place of the green, and raisins in the place of grapes. For all these
 things are changes from the former estate to another; no destruction,
 but a certain appointed order and disposition. Here is parting for
 foreign lands, and a little change. Here is death--a greater change, not
 from that which now is to that which is not, but to that which is not
 now.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 ON SOLITUDE.
 
 
 1. Solitude is the state of one who is helpless. For he who is alone is
 not therefore solitary; even as he who is in a great company is not
 therefore not solitary. When, therefore, we have lost a brother or a son
 or a friend on whom we were wont to rest, we say that we are left
 solitary, and oftentimes we say it in Rome, with such a crowd meeting us
 and so many dwelling about us, and, it may be, having a multitude of
 slaves. For the solitary man, in his conception, meaneth to be thought
 helpless, and laid open to those who wish him harm. Therefore when we
 are on a journey we then, above all, say that we are solitary when we
 are fallen among thieves; for that which taketh away solitude is not the
 sight of a man, but of a faithful and pious and serviceable man. For if
 to be solitary it sufficeth to be alone, then say that Zeus is solitary
 in the conflagration,[1] and bewails himself. _Woe is me! I have neither
 Hera nor Athene nor Apollo_, nor, in short, either brother or son or
 descendant or kinsman. And so some say he doth when alone in the
 conflagration. For they comprehend not the life of a man who is alone,
 setting out from a certain natural principle, that we are by nature
 social, and inclined to love each other, and pleased to be in the
 company of other men. But none the less is it needful that one find the
 means to this also, to be able to suffice to himself, and to be his own
 companion. For as Zeus is his own companion, and is content with
 himself, and considereth his own government, what it is, and is occupied
 in designs worthy of himself; thus should we be able to converse with
 ourselves, and feel no need of others, nor want means to pass the time;
 but to observe the divine government, and the relation of ourselves with
 other things; to consider how we stood formerly towards the events that
 befall us, and how we stand now; what things they are that still afflict
 us; how these, too, may be healed, how removed; and if aught should need
 perfecting, to perfect it according to the reason of the case.
 
 2. Ye see now how that Caesar seemeth to have given us a great peace;
 how there are no longer wars nor battles nor bands of robbers nor of
 pirates, but a man may travel at every season, and sail from east to
 west. But can he give us peace from fever? or from shipwreck? or from
 fire? or earthquake? or lightning? ay, or from love? _He cannot._ Or
 from grief? _He cannot._ Or from envy? _He cannot._ Briefly, then, he
 cannot secure us from any of such things. But the word of the
 philosophers doth promise us peace even from these things. And what
 saith it? _If ye will hearken unto me, O men, wheresoever ye be,
 whatsoever ye do, ye shall not grieve, ye shall not be wroth, ye shall
 not be compelled or hindered, but ye shall live untroubled and free from
 every ill._ Whosoever hath this peace, which Caesar never proclaimed (for
 how could he proclaim it?), but which God proclaimed through His word,
 shall he not suffice to himself when he may be alone? for he beholdeth
 and considereth, _Now can no evil happen to me; for me there is no
 robber, no earthquake; all things are full of peace, full of calm; for
 me no way, no city, no assembly, no neighbor, no associate hath any
 hurt_. He is supplied by one, whose part that is, with food, by another
 with raiment, by another with senses, by another with natural
 conceptions. And when it may be that the necessary things are no longer
 supplied, that is the signal for retreat: the door is opened, and God
 saith to thee, _Depart_.
 
 ----"Whither?"
 
 To nothing dreadful, but to the place from whence thou camest--to things
 friendly and akin to thee, to the elements of Being. Whatever in thee
 was fire shall go to fire; of earth, to earth; of air, to air; of water,
 to water;[2] no Hades, nor Acheron, nor Coeytus, nor Phlegethon, but all
 things are full of Gods and Powers.[3] Whoso hath these things to think
 on, and seeth the sun and the moon and the stars, and rejoiceth in the
 earth and the sea, he is no more solitary than he is helpless.
 
 ----"What, then, if one come and find me alone and slay me?"
 
 Fool! not thee, but thy wretched body.
 
 3. Thou art a little soul bearing up a corpse.
 
 4. What solitude, then, is there any longer, what lack? Why do we make
 ourselves worse than children, which, when they are left alone, what do
 they?--they take shells and sand and build up somewhat, and then throw
 it down, and again build up something else, and so they never lack
 pastime. And shall I, if ye sail away from me, sit down and weep for
 that I am left alone and solitary? Shall I have no shells nor sand? But
 children do these things through their folly, and we through our wisdom
 are made unhappy.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 AGAINST THE CONTENTIOUS AND REVENGEFUL.
 
 
 1. To suppose that we shall become contemptible in the eyes of others,
 unless in some way we inflict an injury on those who first showed
 hostility to us, is the character of most ignoble and thoughtless men.
 For thus we say, that a man is to be despised according to his inability
 to do hurt; but much rather is he to be despised according to his
 inability to do good.
 
 2. The wise and good man neither strives with any himself, nor in the
 measure of his power will he allow another to strive. And in this, as in
 all other things, the life of Socrates is set before us as an example;
 who did not only himself fly all contention, but also forbade it to
 others. See in Xenophon's _Symposium_ how many quarrels he ended; and,
 again, how he bore with Thrasymachus, and how with Polus and with
 Callicles; and how he endured his wife, and how his son, which opposed
 him with sophistical arguments. For he remembered very well that no man
 can command the ruling faculty of another.
 
 3. How, then, is there yet any place for contention in one so minded?
 For what event can amaze him? what appear strange to him? Doth he not
 look for even worse and more grievous things at the hands of evil men
 than do befall him? Doth he not count everything for gain which is short
 of the extreme of injury? Hath such a one reviled thee? Much thanks to
 him that he did not strike thee. _But he did also strike me._ Much
 thanks that he did not wound thee. _But he did also wound me._ Much
 thanks that he did not slay thee. For when did he learn, or from whom,
 that he was a tame animal, and affectionate to others, and that to the
 wrongdoer the wrong-doing itself is a heavy injury? For since he hath not
 learned these things, nor believes them, wherefore should he not follow
 that which appears to be his advantage? Thy neighbor hath flung stones!
 Hast thou, then, sinned in aught? But he has broken things in the house?
 And art thou a household vessel? Nay--but a Will.
 
 4. What, then, hath been given thee for this occasion? To a wolf it were
 given to bite--to fling more stones. But if thou seek what is becoming
 for a man, look into thy stores, see what faculties thou hast come here
 furnished withal. Hast thou the nature of a wild beast? the temper of
 revenge?
 
 5. When is a horse in wretched case? When he is bereaved of his natural
 faculties; not when he cannot crow, but when he cannot run. When is a
 dog? Not when he cannot fly, but when he cannot track. Is not a man,
 then, also thus wretched, not when he cannot strangle lions or embrace
 statues[1]--for to this he came endowed with no faculties by Nature--but
 when he hath lost his honesty, his faithfulness? Surely we should meet
 together and lament over such a man; so great are the evils into which
 he hath fallen. Not, indeed, that we should lament for his birth, or for
 his death, but in that while yet living he hath suffered the loss of his
 own true possessions. I speak not of his paternal inheritance, not of
 his land, or his house, or his inn, or his slaves (for not one of these
 things is the true possession of a man, but all are alien, servile,
 subject, given now to some, now to others, by those that can command
 them); but of his human qualities, the stamps of his spirit wherewith he
 came into the world. Even such we seek for also on coins, and if we find
 them we approve the coins, and if not, we cast them away. What is the
 stamp of this sestertius? _The stamp of Trajan._ Then give it me. _The
 stamp of Nero._[2] Fling it away--it will not pass, it is bad. And so
 here too. What is the stamp of his mind? He is gentle, social,
 forbearing, affectionate. Come, then, I receive him, I admit him to
 citizenship, I receive him as a neighbor, a fellow-traveler. See to it
 only that he have not Nero's stamp. Is he wrathful, revengeful,
 complaining? Doth he, when it may seem good to him, break the heads of
 all who stand in his way? Why, then, didst thou say he was a man? Shall
 everything be judged by the bare form? If so, then say that a wax apple
 is a real apple, and that it has the smell and taste of an apple. But
 the outward shape doth not suffice, nor are eyes and nose enough to make
 a man, but he is a man only if he have a man's mind. Here is one that
 will not hear reason, that will not submit when he is confuted--he is an
 ass. In another, reverence hath died--he is worthless, anything rather
 than a man. This one seeketh whom he may meet and kick or bite--so that
 he is not even a sheep or an ass, but some kind of savage beast.
 
 6. But this is the nature of every creature, to pursue the Good and fly
 the Evil; and to hold every man an enemy and a plotter for our woe, were
 it even a brother, or son, or father, who takes away from us the one, or
 brings us into the other. For nothing is nearer or dearer to us than the
 Good. It remains, therefore, if outward things be good and evil, that a
 father is no longer the friend of his sons, nor the brother of his
 brother, but every place is full of enemies and plotters and slanderers.
 But if the only Good is that the Will should be as it ought to be, and
 the only Evil as it ought not, where is there then any place for strife,
 for reviling? For about what things shall we strive? about those that
 are nothing to us? and with whom? with the ignorant, the unhappy, with
 men who are deceived concerning the greatest things?
 
 7. Remembering these things, Socrates managed his own household,
 enduring a most shrewish wife and an undutiful son. For these doctrines
 make love in a household, and concord in a State, peace among nations,
 and gratitude towards God, with boldness in every place, as of one who
 hath to do with things alien to him, and of no estimation. And we are
 the men to write and read these things, and to applaud them when they
 are delivered to us, but to the belief of them we have not even come
 near. And therefore that saying concerning the Lacedaemonians,
 
   "Lions at home, but in Ephesus foxes,"[3]
 
 will fit us too--lions in the school and foxes without.
 
 END OF BOOK III.
 
 
 
 
 _BOOK IV._
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 OF RELIGION.
 
 
 1. Of religion towards the Gods, know that the chief element is to have
 right opinions concerning them, as existing and governing the whole in
 fair order and justice; and then to set thyself to obey them, and to
 yield to them in each event, and submit to it willingly, as accomplished
 under the highest counsels. For so shalt thou never blame the Gods, nor
 accuse them, as being neglectful of thee.
 
 2. But this may come to pass in no other way than by placing Good and
 Evil in the things that are in our own power, and withdrawing them from
 those that are not; for if thou take any of these things to be good or
 evil, then when thou shalt miss thy desire, or fall into what thou
 desirest not, it is altogether necessary that thou blame and hate those
 who caused thee to do so.
 
 3. For every living thing was so framed by Nature as to flee and turn
 from things, and the causes of things, that appear hurtful, and to
 follow and admire things, and the causes of things, that appear
 serviceable. For it is impossible that one who thinketh himself harmed
 should delight in that seemeth to harm him, even as he cannot delight in
 the very harm itself.
 
 4. And thus it comes that a father is reviled by his son when he will
 not give him of the things that appear to be good. And this it was that
 set Polyneices and Eteocles at war with each other--the opinion, namely,
 that royalty is a good. And through this the Gods are railed on by the
 husbandman and the sailor, by the merchant, and men who lose their wives
 or children. For where advantage is, there also is religion. Thus he who
 is careful to pursue and avoid as he ought, is careful, at the same
 time, of religion.
 
 5. But it is fitting also that every man should pour libations and offer
 sacrifices and first-fruits after the customs of his fathers, purely,
 and not languidly nor negligently, nor, indeed, scantily, nor yet beyond
 his means.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 OF PROVIDENCE.
 
 
 1. Concerning the Gods, there are some who say that a Divine Being does
 not exist; and others, that it exists indeed, but is idle and uncaring,
 and hath no forethought for anything; and a third class say that there
 is such a Being, and he taketh forethought also, but only in respect of
 great and heavenly things, but of nothing that is on the earth; and a
 fourth class, that he taketh thought of things both in heaven and earth,
 but only in general, and not of each thing severally. And there is a
 fifth class, whereof are Odysseus and Socrates, who say, _Nor can I move
 without thy knowledge_.[1]
 
 2. Before all things, then, it is necessary to investigate each of these
 opinions, whether it be justly affirmed or no. For if there be no Gods,
 how can the following of the Gods be an end? And if there are Gods, but
 such as take no care for anything, then also how can the following of
 them be truly an end? And how, again, if the Gods both exist and take
 care for things, yet if there be no communication from them to men, yea,
 by Zeus, and even to mine own self? The wise and good man, having
 investigated all these things, will submit his own mind to Him that
 governeth the Whole, even as good citizens to the laws of their State.
 
 3. But a certain man having inquired how one could be persuaded that
 every one of his actions is observed by God, Doth it not appear to you,
 said Epictetus, that all things are united in One?
 
 ----"It doth so appear."
 
 What then? Think you not that a sympathy exists between heavenly and
 earthly things?
 
 ----"I do think it."
 
 For how else do plants, as if at the command of God, when He bids them,
 flower in due season? and shoot forth when He bids them shoot, and bear
 fruit when He bids them bear? and ripen when He bids them ripen? and
 again they drop their fruit when He bids them drop it, and shed their
 leaves when He bids them shed them? and how else at His bidding do they
 fold themselves together, and remain motionless and at rest? And how
 else at the waxing and waning of the moon, and the approach and
 withdrawal of the sun, do we behold such a change and reversal in
 earthly things? But are the plants and our bodies so bound up in the
 whole, and have sympathy with it, and are our spirits not much more so?
 And our souls being thus bound up and in touch with God, seeing, indeed,
 that they are portions and fragments of Him, shall not every movement of
 them, inasmuch as it is something inward and akin to God, be perceived
 by Him? But you are able to meditate upon the divine government, and
 upon all divine and all human affairs, and to be affected at the same
 time in the senses and in the intellect by ten thousand things, and at
 the same time to assent to some and dissent to others, or suspend your
 judgment; and you preserve in your mind so many impressions of so many
 and various things, and being affected by them, you strike upon ideas
 similar to earlier impressions, and you retain many different arts, and
 memories of ten thousand things; and shall not God have the power to
 overlook all things, and be present with all, and have a certain
 communication with all? But is the sun able to illuminate so great a
 part of the All, and to leave so little without light,--that part,
 namely, which is filled with the shadow of the earth--and shall He who
 made the sun, and guideth it in its sphere--a small part of Him beside
 the Whole--shall He not be capable of perceiving all things?
 
 4. _But I_, saith the man, _cannot take heed of all these things at
 once_. And who said you could do this? that you had equal powers with
 God? But, nevertheless, He hath placed at every man's side a Guardian,
 the Genius of each man,[2] who is charged to watch over him, a Genius
 that cannot sleep, nor be deceived. To what greater and more watchful
 guardian could He have committed us? So, when ye have shut the doors,
 and made darkness in the house, remember never to say that ye are alone;
 for ye are not alone, but God is there, and your Genius is there; and
 what need have these of light to mark what ye are doing? To this God it
 were fitting also that ye should swear an oath, as soldiers do to Caesar.
 But those indeed who receive pay swear to prefer the safety of Caesar
 before all things; but ye, receiving so many and great things, will ye
 not swear? or swearing, will ye not abide by it? And what shall ye
 swear? Never to disobey, never to accuse, never to blame aught that He
 hath given, never unwillingly to do or suffer any necessary thing. Is
 this oath like unto that other? The soldiers swear to esteem no other
 man before Caesar; ye to esteem yourselves above all.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 OF PROVIDENCE.
 
 
 1. Marvel not if the other animals have all things that are needful for
 the body without preparation, not alone food and drink, but sleeping
 places also, and they have no need of shoes, nor bedding, nor raiment,
 while all these things must needs be added to us. For these creatures
 exist not for themselves, but for service; it were not expedient that
 they had been made with need of such additions. For, look you, what a
 task it were for us to take thought, not for ourselves alone, but also
 for the sheep and the asses, how they should be clad, how shod, how they
 should eat, how they should drink! But as soldiers are ready for their
 commands, shod, and clothed, and accoutred, and it would be a grievous
 thing if each captain of a thousand must go round and shoe or clothe
 his thousand; so also hath Nature formed the animals that are made for
 service, ready equipped, and needing no further care. And thus one
 little child with a rod will drive the sheep.
 
 2. But now we, neglecting to be grateful, for that we need not attend to
 the animals equally with ourselves, do accuse God for our own lack. And
 yet, by Zeus and all the Gods, there is no one thing in the frame of
 Nature but would give, at least to a reverent and grateful spirit,
 enough for the perceiving of the Providence of God. And to speak of no
 great things now, consider this alone, how milk is produced from grass,
 and cheese from milk, and wool from skins. Who is he that hath made
 these things or planned them? _No one_, sayest thou? O monstrous
 impudence and dullness!
 
 3. Well, then, let the large works of Nature pass, and let us look only
 at her by-works. Is there aught more useless than the hairs on the chin?
 What then? hath she not made such use even of these, that nothing could
 be comelier? hath she not by them distinguished male from female? Doth
 not the nature of every man cry aloud even at a distance, _I am a man,
 thus shalt thou approach me, thus speak to me, look for nothing else;
 behold the tokens!_ And again in women, as Nature hath mingled something
 of softness in the voice, so she hath taken away the hairs. _Nay_, will
 you say? _but every creature should have been left undistinguished, and
 each of us should proclaim_, "_I am a man_?" But how beautiful is not
 the token, and becoming, and reverend? how much more beautiful than the
 cock's comb? how much more becoming than the lion's mane? Wherefore it
 behooveth us to preserve God's tokens, nor to fling them away, nor to
 confound, as far as in us lies, the things that distinguish the sexes.
 
 4. Are these the only works of Providence in us?--but what may suffice
 to rightly praise and tell them? For had we understanding thereof, would
 any other thing better beseem us, either in company or alone, than to
 hymn the Divine Being, and laud Him and rehearse His gracious deeds?
 Should we not, as we dig or plow or eat, sing this hymn to God, _Great
 is God, who hath given us such instruments whereby we shall till the
 earth; great is God, who hath given us hands, and swallowing, and the
 belly; who maketh us to grow without our knowledge, and to breathe while
 we sleep_. These things it were fitting that every man should sing, and
 to chant the greatest and divinest hymns for this, that He hath given us
 the power to observe and consider His works and a Way wherein to
 walk.[1] What then? since the most of you have become blind, should
 there not be one to fill this place, and in the name of all to sing this
 hymn to God? For what else can I do, an old man and lame, than sing
 hymns to God? If I were a nightingale I would do after the nature of a
 nightingale; if a swan, after that of a swan. But now I am a reasoning
 creature, and it behooves me to sing the praise of God: this is my task,
 and this I do, nor, as long as it is granted me, will I ever abandon
 this post. And you, too, I summon to join me in the same song.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 GOD IN MAN.
 
 
 1. God is beneficial. But the Good is also beneficial. It is likely,
 then, that where the essence of God is, there also should be the essence
 of the Good. And what is the essence of God? Flesh? God forbid. A
 property in land? God forbid. Fame? God forbid. Mind, Intelligence,
 Right Reason? Even so. Here, then, once for all, seek the essence of the
 Good. For surely you will in no wise seek it in a plant? _Nay._ Or in
 any unreasoning creature? _Nay._ If, then, it is sought in a reasoning
 creature, wherefore continue to seek it anywhere else than in the
 difference between reasoning and unreasoning creatures?
 
 2. The plants have not so much as the use of appearances, therefore we
 speak not of the Good in their regard. The Good, then, needs the power
 of using appearances. And this alone? Nay; for if so, say then that Good
 and Happiness and Unhappiness are with the lower animals too. But this
 you will not say, and you are right; for though they possessed the use
 of appearances in the highest degree, yet the observing and considering
 of this use they do not possess, and naturally so, for they exist to
 serve others, nor have any supreme object in themselves.[1] For the ass
 was not made for any supreme object in himself? Nay, but he was made
 able to bear, because we had need of a back; and, by Zeus, we had need
 moreover that he should walk; wherefore he received also the power to
 use appearances, else had he not been able to walk. And thereupon the
 matter stopped. For had he also received the observing and considering
 of the use of appearances, it is clear that in reason he could no longer
 have been subject to us, nor have served those needs of ours, but he had
 been our equal and our like.
 
 3. For use is one thing, and observation and study is another. God had
 need of the other animals to use appearances, but of us to observe and
 study appearances. Wherefore it is enough for them to eat and drink, and
 rest and breed, and do whatever else each of them performs, but to us,
 to whom the faculty of observing and studying hath also been given,
 these things are not enough; but unless we act after a certain manner
 and ordinance, and conformably to the nature and constitution of man, we
 shall never attain the end of our being. For where the constitution is
 different, different there also is the task and the end. When,
 therefore, the constitution is one for use alone, then the use, of
 whatever kind it be, is enough; but where there is also observing and
 studying of the use, then, unless the due employment of this faculty be
 added, the end shall never be gained. What then? God hath constituted
 every other animal, one to be eaten, another to serve for tilling the
 land, another to yield cheese, another to some kindred use; for which
 things what need is there of the observing and studying of appearances,
 and the ability to make distinctions in them? But man he hath brought in
 to be a spectator of God and of His works, and not a spectator alone,
 but an interpreter of them. Wherefore it is shameful for a man to begin
 and to end where creatures do that are without Reason; but rather should
 he begin when they begin, and end where Nature ends in ourselves. But
 she ends in contemplation, in observing and studying, in a manner of
 life that is in harmony with Nature. See to it, then, that ye die not
 without having been spectators of these things.
 
 4. Seek, then, the essence of the Good there, where if it be not, thou
 wilt not say that the Good is in any other thing.
 
 5. But what? are not those creatures also works of God? Surely; yet not
 supreme objects, yet not parts of the Gods. But thou art a supreme
 object, thou art a piece of God, thou hast in thee something that is a
 portion of Him. Why, then, art thou ignorant of thy high ancestry? Why
 knowest thou not whence thou camest? Wilt thou not remember, in thine
 eating, who it is that eats, and whom thou dost nourish? in cohabiting,
 who it is that cohabits? in converse, in exercise, in argument, knowest
 thou not that thou art nourishing a God, exercising a God? Unhappy man!
 thou bearest about with thee a God, and knowest it not! Thinkest thou I
 speak of some God of gold and silver, and external to thee? Nay, but in
 thyself thou dost bear Him, and seest not that thou defilest Him with
 thine impure thoughts and filthy deeds. In the presence even of an image
 of God thou hadst not dared to do one of those things which thou dost.
 But in the presence of God Himself within thee, who seeth and heareth
 all things, thou art not ashamed of the things thou dost both desire and
 do, O thou unwitting of thine own nature, and subject to the wrath of
 God?
 
 6. Why, then, do we fear in sending forth a young man from the school
 into some of the business of life, lest he should do wrong in anything,
 and be luxurious or profligate, and lest a wrapping of rags degrade him,
 or fine raiment uplift him? Such a one knoweth not his own God, nor with
 whom he is setting out. But can we have patience with him, saying,
 _Would that I had you with me!_[2] And hast thou not God with thee
 there? or having Him, dost thou seek for any other? or will He speak
 other things to thee than even these?
 
 7. But wert thou a statue of Pheidias, an Athena or Zeus, then wert
 thou mindful both of thyself and of the artist; and if thou hadst any
 consciousness, thou wouldst strive to do nothing unworthy of thy maker
 nor of thyself, nor ever to appear in any unseemly guise. But now that
 Zeus hath made thee, thou carest therefore nothing what kind of creature
 thou showest thyself for? And yet, is the one Artist like the other
 artist, or the one work like the other work? And what kind of work is
 that which hath in itself the faculties that were manifest in the making
 of it? Do not artists work in stone or brass or gold or ivory? and the
 Athena of Pheidias, when she hath once stretched out her hand and
 received upon it the figure of Victory, standeth thus for all time? But
 the works of God have motion and breathing, and the use of appearances
 and the judgment of them. Wilt thou dishonor such a Maker, whose work
 thou art? Nay, for not only did He make thee, but to thee alone did He
 trust and commit thyself. Wilt thou not remember this too, or wilt thou
 dishonor thy charge? But if God had committed some orphan child to thee,
 wouldst thou have neglected it? Now He hath given thee to thyself, and
 saith, _I had none more worthy of trust than thee; keep this man such as
 he was made by nature--reverent, faithful, high, unterrified, unshaken
 of passions, untroubled_. And thou wilt not.
 
 8. But they may say: _Whence doth this fellow bring us that eye of scorn
 and solemn looks?_ I have it not yet as I should, For I am yet unbold in
 those things which I have learned and assented to; I yet fear my
 weakness. But let me be bold in them, and then ye shall see such a look,
 such a guise, as behooveth me to wear. Then shall I show you the statue
 when it is perfected and polished. What look ye for?--an eye of scorn?
 God forbid! For doth the Zeus in Olympia look scornfully?--nay, but his
 glance is steadfast, as becometh him who will say,
 
    "None trusts in vain my irrevocable word."--_Il._ i. 526.
 
 Such will I show myself to you--faithful, reverent, generous,
 untroubled. _Not also, then, deathless, ageless, deceaseless?_ Nay, but
 dying as God, sickening as a God. These I have, these I can; but other
 things I neither have nor can. I will show you the thews of a
 philosopher. And what are these? A pursuit that never fails, an
 avoidance that never miscarries, seemly desire, studious resolve,
 cautious assent.[3] These shall ye see.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 OF DIVINATION.
 
 
 1. When thou goest to inquire of an oracle, remember that what the event
 will be thou knowest not, for this is the thing thou art come to learn
 from the seer; but of what nature it is (if haply thou art a
 philosopher), thou knewest already in coming. For if it be any of those
 things that are not in our own power, it follows of necessity that it
 can be neither good nor evil.
 
 2. Bring, therefore, to the seer neither pursuit nor avoidance, nor go
 before him with trembling, but well knowing that all events are
 indifferent and nothing to thee. For whatever it may be, it shall lie
 with thee to use it nobly; and this no man can prevent. Go, then, with a
 good courage to the Gods as to counselors; and for the rest, when
 anything hath been counseled thee, remember of whom thou hast taken
 counsel, and whom thou wilt be slighting if thou art not obedient.
 
 3. Therefore, as Socrates would have it, go to the oracle for those
 matters only where thy whole inquiry bendeth solely towards the event,
 and where there are no means either from reason or any other art for
 knowing beforehand what is to happen. Thus, when it may be needful to
 share some peril with thy friend or thy country, inquire of no oracle
 whether thou shouldst do the thing. For if the seer should declare that
 the sacrifices are inauspicious, this signifies clearly either death, or
 the loss of some limb, or banishment; yet doth Reason decree that even
 so thou must stand by thy friend, and share thy country's danger.
 
 4. Mark, therefore, that greater seer, the Pythian, who cast out of his
 temple one that, when his friend was being murdered, did not help
 him.[2]
 
 END OF BOOK IV
 
 
 
 
 _BOOK V._
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 THE BEHAVIOUR OF A PHILOSOPHER.
 
 
 1. Ordain for thyself forthwith a certain form and type of conduct,
 which thou shalt maintain both alone and, when it may chance, among men.
 
 2. And for the most part keep silence, or speak only what is necessary,
 and in few words. But when occasion may call thee to speak, then speak,
 but sparingly, and not about any subject at hap-hazard, nor about
 gladiators, nor horse races, nor athletes, nor things to eat and drink,
 which are talked of everywhere; but, above all, not about men, as
 blaming or praising or comparing them.
 
 If, then, thou art able, let thy discourse draw that of the company
 towards what is seemly and good. But if thou find thyself apart among
 men of another sort, keep silence.
 
 3. Laugh not much, nor at many things, nor unrestrainedly.
 
 4. Refuse altogether, if thou canst, to take an oath; if thou canst not,
 then as the circumstances allow.[1]
 
 5. Shun banquets given by strangers and by the vulgar. But if any
 occasion bring thee to them, give strictest heed, lest thou fall
 unawares into the ways of the vulgar. For know that if thy companion be
 corrupt, he who hath conversation with him must needs be corrupted also,
 even if himself should chance to be pure.
 
 6. Hath any of you the art of a lute-player when he takes the lute in
 his hand, so as at once when he hath touched the strings to know which
 are out of tune, and then to tune the instrument?--such a gift as
 Socrates had, who in every company could lead those that were with him
 to his own topic? Whence should you have it? but ye must needs be
 carried about hither and thither by the vulgar. And wherefore, then, are
 they stronger than ye? For that they speak their sorry stuff from
 belief; but ye, your fine talk from the lips out. Wherefore it is flat
 and dead; and sickening it is to hear your exhortations and this
 wretched virtue of yours, which is prated of in every quarter. And thus
 the vulgar conquer you. For everywhere belief is mighty, belief is
 invincible. Until then the right opinions are hardened in you; and until
 ye shall have gained a certain strength for your safety, I counsel you
 to mingle cautiously with the vulgar, else every day, like wax in the
 sun, shall whatever hath been written in you in the school be melted
 away.
 
 7. In things that concern the body accept only so far as the bare
 need--as in food, drink, clothing, habitation, servants. But all that
 makes for glory or luxury thou must utterly proscribe.
 
 8. Concerning intercourse of the sexes, it is right to be pure before
 marriage, to the best of thy power. But, using it, let a man have to do
 only with what is lawful. Yet be not grievous to those who use such
 pleasures, nor censorious; nor be often putting thyself forward as not
 using them.
 
 9. If one shall bear thee word that such a one hath spoken evil of thee,
 then do not defend thyself against his accusations, but make answer: _He
 little knew my other vices, or he had not mentioned only these_.
 
 10. There is no necessity to go often to the arena, but if occasion
 should take thee there, do not appear ardent on any man's side but thine
 own; that is to say, choose that only to happen which does happen, and
 that the conqueror may be simply he who wins; for so shalt thou not be
 thwarted. But from shouting and laughing at this or that, or violent
 gesticulation, thou must utterly abstain. And when thou art gone away,
 converse little on the things that have passed, so far as they make not
 for thine own correction. For from that it would appear that admiration
 of the spectacle had overcome thee.
 
 11. Go not freely nor indiscriminately to recitations.[2] But if thou
 go, then preserve (yet without being grievous to others) thy gravity and
 calmness.
 
 12. When thou art about to meet any one, especially one of those that
 are thought high in rank, set before thy mind what Socrates or Zeno had
 done in such a case. And so thou wilt not fail to deal as it behooves
 thee with the occasion.
 
 13. When thou goest to any of those that are great in power, set before
 thy mind the case that thou wilt not find him at home, that thou wilt be
 shut out, that the doors may be slammed in thy face, that he will take
 no notice of thee. And if even with these things it behooves thee to go,
 then go, and bear all that happens; and never say to thyself--_It was
 not worth this_. For that is the part of the foolish, and of those that
 are offended at outward things.
 
 14. In company, be it far from thee to dwell much and over-measure on
 thine own deeds and dangers. For to dwell on thine own dangers is
 pleasant indeed to thee, but not equally pleasant for others is it to
 hear of the things that have chanced to thee.
 
 15. Be it far from thee to move laughter. For that habit is a slippery
 descent into vulgarity;[3] and it is always enough to relax thy
 neighbors' respect for thee.
 
 16. And it is dangerous to approach to vicious conversation. Therefore,
 when anything of the kind may arise, rebuke, if there is opportunity,
 him who approaches thereto. But if not, then at least by silence and
 blushing and grave looks, let it be plain that his talk is disagreeable
 to thee.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 ON HABIT.
 
 
 1. Every skill and faculty is maintained and increased by the
 corresponding acts; as, the faculty of walking by walking, of running by
 running. If you will read aloud well, then do it constantly; if you will
 write, then write. But when you have not read aloud for thirty days
 together, but done something else, you shall see the result. Thus, if
 you have lain down for ten days, then rise up and endeavor to walk a
 good distance, and you shall see how your legs are enfeebled. In
 general, then, if you would make yourself skilled in anything, then do
 it; and if you would refrain from anything, then do it not, but use
 yourself to do rather some other thing instead of it.
 
 2. And thus it is in spiritual things also. When thou art wrathful, know
 that not this single evil hath happened to thee, but that thou hast
 increased the aptness to it, and, as it were, poured oil upon the fire.
 When thou art overcome in passion, think not that this defeat is all;
 but thou hast nourished thine incontinence, and increased it. For it is
 impossible but that aptitudes and faculties should spring up where they
 were not before, or spread and grow mightier, by the corresponding acts.
 And thus, surely, do also, as the philosopher says, the infirmities of
 the soul grow up. For when thou hast once been covetous of money, if
 Reason, which leadeth to a sense of the vice, be called to aid, then
 both the desire is set at rest, and our ruling faculty is
 re-established, as it was in the beginning. But if thou bring no remedy
 to aid, then shall the soul return no more to the first estate; but when
 next excited by the corresponding appearance, shall be kindled to desire
 even more quickly than before. And when this is continually happening,
 the soul becomes callous in the end, and through its infirmity the love
 of money is strengthened. For he that hath had a fever, when the illness
 hath left him, is not what he was before his fever, unless he have been
 entirely healed. And somewhat on this wise also it happens in the
 affection of the soul: certain traces and scars are left in it, the
 which if a man do not wholly eradicate, when he hath been again scoured
 on the same place, it shall make no longer scars, but sores.
 
 3. Wouldst thou, then, be no longer of a wrathful temper? Then do not
 nourish the aptness to it, give it nothing that will increase it, be
 tranquil from the outset, and number the days when thou hast not been
 wrathful. _I have not been wrathful now for one, nor for two, nor for
 three days_; but if thou have saved thirty days, then sacrifice to God.
 For the aptness is at first enfeebled, and then destroyed. _To-day I was
 not vexed, nor to-morrow, nor for two or three months together; but I
 was heedful when anything happened to move me thus._ Know that thou art
 in good case. To-day, when I saw a fair woman, I did not say to myself,
 _Would that one could possess her_; nor, _Happy is her husband_, for he
 who saith this saith also, _Happy is her paramour_; nor do I picture to
 my mind what should follow. But I stroke my head, and say, _Well done,
 Epictetus! you have solved a fine sophism, finer by far than the master
 sophism_. But if she were also willing and consenting, and sent to me,
 and if she also laid hold of me, and drew near to me, and I should yet
 restrain myself and conquer, this were indeed then a sophism above the
 Liar, above the Quiescent. Verily, for this a man's spirit may rightly
 swell, and not for propounding the master sophism.[1]
 
 4. How, then, may this come to pass? Resolve at last to seek thine own
 commendation, to appear fair in the eyes of God; desire to become pure
 with thine own pure self, and with God. Then when thou shalt fall in
 with any appearance such as we have spoken of, what saith Plato? Go to
 the _purifying sacrifices, go and pray in the temples of the
 protecting Gods_.[2] It shall even suffice if thou seek the company of
 good and wise men, and try thyself by one of them, whether he be one of
 the living or of the dead.
 
 5. By opposing these remedies thou shalt conquer the appearance, nor be
 led captive by it. But at the outset, be not swept away by the vehemence
 of it; but say, _Await me a little, thou appearance; let me see what
 thou art, and with what thou hast to do; let me approve thee_. And then
 permit it not to lead thee forward, and to picture to thee what should
 follow, else it shall take possession of thee, and carry thee
 whithersoever it will. But rather bring in against it some other fair
 and noble appearance, and therewithal cast out this vile one. And if
 thou use to exercise thyself in this way, thou shalt see what shoulders
 and nerves and sinews thou wilt have! But now we have only wordiness,
 and nothing more.
 
 6. This is the true athlete,[3] he who exerciseth himself against such
 appearances. Hold, unhappy man! be not swept away. Great is the contest,
 divine the task, for kingship, for freedom, for prosperity, for
 tranquillity. Be mindful of God, call Him to be thy helper and defender,
 as men at sea call upon the Dioscuri in a storm.[4] For what greater
 tempest is there than that which proceedeth from appearances, that
 mightily overcome and expel the Reason? Yea, a storm itself, what is it
 but an appearance? For, take away only the dread of death, and bring as
 many thunderings and lightnings as thou wilt, and thou shalt see what
 fair weather and calm there will be in the ruling faculty. But if having
 been once defeated, thou shalt say, _The next time I will conquer_; and
 then the same thing over again, be sure that in the end thou wilt be
 brought to such a sorry and feeble state that henceforth thou wilt not
 so much as know that thou art sinning; but thou wilt begin to make
 excuses for the thing, and then confirm that saying of Hesiod to be
 true:--
 
   "With ills unending strives the putter off."
                              --_Works and Days_, 411.
 
 7. What then? can a man make this resolve, and so stand up faultless? He
 cannot; but this much he can--to be ever straining towards
 faultlessness. For happy it were if, by never relaxing this industrious
 heed, we shall rid ourselves of at least a few of our faults. But now,
 when thou sayest, _From to-morrow I shall be heedful_, know that this is
 what thou art saying:--_To-day I shall be shameless, importunate,
 abject; it shall be in others' power to afflict me; to-day I shall be
 wrathful, envious_. Lo, to how many vices dost thou give place! But if
 aught be well to-morrow, how much better to-day? if to-morrow suit, how
 much better to-day? Yea, and for this, too, that thou mayest have the
 power to-morrow, and not again put it off till the third day.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 ON DISPUTATION.
 
 
 1. What things a man must have learned in order to be able to reason
 well have been accurately defined by our philosophers; but in the
 fitting use of them we are wholly unexercised. Give any one of us whom
 ye please some ignorant man for a disputant, and he shall find no way to
 deal with him; but if, when he hath moved him a little, the man answer
 beside the purpose, he is no longer able to manage him, but either he
 will revile him, or mock him, and say, _He is an ignorant fellow;
 nothing can be done with him_.
 
 2. But a guide, when he hath found one straying from the way, leads him
 into the proper road, and does not mock him or revile him, and then go
 away. And do thou show such a man the truth, and thou shalt see that he
 will follow it. But so long as thou dost not show it, mock him not, but
 be sensible rather of thine own incapacity.
 
 3. But what? this business of instruction is not very safe at present,
 and least of all in Rome; for he who pursues it will of course feel
 constrained not to do it in a corner, but he must go to some man of
 consular rank, it may be, or some rich man, and inquire of him: Sir, can
 you tell me to whom you have committed the care of your horses?
 _Surely._ Was it, then, to any chance-comer and one inexperienced about
 horses? _By no means._ Well, then, to whom are your gold and silver
 vessels and raiment entrusted? _Neither are these committed to any
 chance person._ And your body, have you already sought out one to whom
 to commit the care of it? _How not?_ And that also one who is
 experienced in training and medicine? _Assuredly._ Whether, now, are
 these the best things you have, or do you possess aught that is better
 than all of them? _What thing do you mean?_ That, by Zeus, which useth
 all these, and approveth each of them and taketh counsel? _Is it the
 soul, then, that you mean?_ You have conceived me rightly; it is even
 this. _Truly I hold that I possess in this something much better than
 everything else._ Can you then declare to us in what manner you have
 taken thought for your soul? for it is not likely that a wise man like
 yourself, and one of repute in the State, would overlook the best think
 you possess, and use no diligence or design about it, but leave it
 neglected and perishing? _Surely not._ But do you provide for it
 yourself? and have you learned the way from another, or discovered it
 yourself?
 
 4. And then at last there is danger lest he say first, _Good sir, what
 is this to you? who are you?_ and then, if you persist in troubling him,
 that he may lift up his hands and smite you. Once I too was an admirer
 of this method until I fell into these difficulties.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 THAT WE SHOULD BE SLOW IN ACCEPTING PLEASURE.
 
 
 1. When thou hast received the appearance of some pleasure, then, as in
 other things, guard thyself lest thou be carried away by it, but delay
 with thyself a little, and let the thing await thee for a while. Then
 bethink thyself of the two periods of time, one when thou shalt be
 enjoying the pleasure, the other, when, having enjoyed it, thou shalt
 afterwards repent of it and reproach thyself. And set on the other side
 how thou shalt rejoice and commend thyself if thou abstain.
 
 2. But if it seem reasonable to thee to do the thing, beware lest thou
 have been conquered by the flattery and the sweetness and the allurement
 of it. But set on the other side how much better were the consciousness
 of having won that victory.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 THAT WE SHOULD BE OPEN IN OUR DEALINGS.
 
 
 In doing aught which thou hast clearly discerned as right to do, seek
 never to avoid being seen in the doing of it, even though the multitude
 should be destined to form some wrong opinion concerning it. For if thou
 dost not right, avoid the deed itself. But if rightly, why fear those
 who will wrongly rebuke thee?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 THAT HALF TRUE MAY BE ALL FALSE.
 
 
 As the sayings, _It is day_, _It is night_, are wholly justifiable if
 viewed disjunctively, but not if viewed together, even so at a feast, to
 pick out the largest portion for one's self may be justifiable, if we
 look to the needs of the body alone, but is unjustifiable if viewed as
 it concerns the preservation of the proper community in the feast.
 Therefore, in eating with another person, remember not to look only at
 the value for the body of the things that are set before thee, but to
 preserve also the reverence due to the giver of the feast.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 THAT EACH MAN PLAY HIS OWN PART.
 
 
 1. If thou hast assumed a part beyond thy power to play, then thou hast
 both come to shame in that, and missed one thou couldst have well
 performed.
 
 2. And some one having inquired, _How then, shall each of us perceive
 what character he befits?_ Whence, said Epictetus, doth the bull alone,
 when the lion approacheth, discover his own capacity, and advance to
 defend the whole herd? It is clear that with the capacity is ever joined
 the perception of the same, and thus, whoever of us may possess a like
 capacity will not be ignorant of it. But a bull is not made in a moment,
 nor is a man of generous spirit; but we must have preparation and
 winter-training,[1] and not lightly rush upon things that do not concern
 us.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 THAT WE SHOULD BE CAREFUL OF THE SOUL AS OF THE BODY.
 
 
 In going about, you are careful not to step upon a nail or to twist your
 foot. Care thus also lest you injure your ruling faculty. And if we
 observe this in each thing we do, we shall the more safely undertake it.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 THE MEASURE OF GAIN.
 
 
 The measure of gain for each man is the body, as the foot is for the
 shoe. Take your stand on this, and you shall preserve the measure. But
 if you transgress it, you must thenceforth be borne, as it were, down a
 steep. And so it is with the shoe, for if you will go beyond the measure
 of the foot, the shoe will be first gilded, then dyed purple, then
 embroidered. For that which hath once transgressed its measure hath no
 longer any limit.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 THE WORTH OF WOMEN.
 
 
 From the age of fourteen years women are flattered and worshiped by
 men. Seeing thus that there is nothing else for them but to serve the
 pleasure of men, they begin to beautify themselves, and to place all
 their hopes in this. It were well, then, that they should perceive
 themselves to be prized for nothing else than modesty and decorum.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI.
 
 A DULL NATURE.
 
 
 It betokens a dull nature to be greatly occupied in matters that concern
 the body, as to be much concerned about exercising one's self, or
 eating, or drinking, or other bodily acts. But these things should be
 done by the way, and all attention be given to the mind.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII.
 
 OF ADORNMENT OF THE PERSON.
 
 
 1. A certain young man, a rhetorician, having come to Epictetus with his
 hair dressed in an unusually elaborate way, and his other attire much
 adorned, Tell me, said Epictetus, think you not that some dogs are
 beautiful, and some horses, and so of the other animals?
 
 ----"I do think it," said he.
 
 And men too--are not some beautiful and some ill-favored?
 
 ----"How otherwise?"
 
 Whether, then, do we call each of these beautiful for the same reasons
 and in the same kind, or each for something proper to itself? And you
 shall see the matter thus: Inasmuch as we observe a dog to be formed by
 nature for one end, and a horse for another, and, let us say, a
 nightingale for another, we may in general say, not unreasonably, that
 each of them is then beautiful when it is excellent according to its own
 nature; but since the nature of each is different, different also, it
 seems to me, is the manner of being beautiful in each. Is it not so?
 
 He acknowledged that it was.
 
 Therefore, that which maketh a dog beautiful maketh a horse ill-favored;
 and that which maketh a horse beautiful, a dog ill-favored; if, indeed,
 their natures are different?
 
 ----"So it seems."
 
 And that which maketh a beautiful Pancratiast,[1] the same maketh a
 wrestler not good, and a runner utterly laughable? And he who is
 beautiful for the Pentathlon is very bad for wrestling?
 
 ----"It is so," he said.
 
 What is it, then, that makes a man beautiful? Is it not that which, in
 its kind, makes also a dog or a horse beautiful?
 
 ----"It is that," he answered.
 
 What, then, makes a dog beautiful? The presence of the virtue of a dog.
 And a horse? The presence of the virtue of a horse. And what, then, a
 man? Is it not also the presence of the virtue of a man? And, O youth,
 if thou wouldst be beautiful, do thou labor to perfect this, the virtue
 of a human being. But what is it? Look whom you praise when you praise
 any without affection--is it the righteous or the unrighteous?
 
 ----"The righteous."
 
 Is it the temperate or the profligate?
 
 ----"The temperate."
 
 Is it the continent or the incontinent?
 
 ----"The continent."
 
 Then making yourself such a one as you praise, you will know that you
 are making yourself beautiful; but so long as you neglect these things,
 though you sought out every device to appear beautiful, you must of
 necessity be ugly.
 
 2. For thou art not flesh and hair, but a Will: if thou keep this
 beautiful, then wilt thou be beautiful. But so far I dare not tell thee
 that thou art ugly, for I think thou wilt more easily bear to hear
 anything else than this. But see what Socrates saith to Alcibiades, the
 most beautiful and blooming of men: _Endeavor, then, to be beautiful_;
 and what saith he? _Curl thy locks, and pluck out the hairs of thy
 legs?_ God forbid. But _Set thy Will in order, cast out evil doctrines_.
 
 ----"And how then shall we deal with the body?"
 
 As nature made it. Another hath cared for this; commit it to Him.
 
 ----"But what? Shall the body then be uncleansed?"
 
 God forbid. But that which thou art and wast made by Nature, cleanse
 this; let a man be clean as a man, a woman as a woman, a child as a
 child.
 
 3. For we ought not even by the aspect of the body to scare away the
 multitude from philosophy; but by his body, as in all other things, a
 philosopher should show himself cheerful, and free from troubles.
 _Behold, friends, how I have nothing and need nothing; behold how I am
 homeless and landless, and an exile_, if so it chance, _and hearthless,
 and yet I live more free from troubles than all the lordly and the rich.
 But look on my body, too; ye see that it is not the worse for my hard
 life._ But if one saith this to me, having the countenance and garb of a
 condemned criminal, what God shall persuade me to approach to philosophy
 which makes such men as this? God forbid! I would not, were it even to
 become a sage.
 
 4. I, indeed, by the Gods, had rather a young man in his first movement
 towards philosophy came to me with his hair curled than disheveled and
 foul. For a certain impression of the beautiful is to be seen in him,
 and an aim at what is becoming; and to the thing wherein it seemeth to
 him to lie, there he applies his art. Thenceforth it only needs to show
 him its true place, and to say, _Young man, thou seekest the beautiful,
 and thou dost well. Know, then, that it flourishes there where thy
 Reason is; there seek it where are thy likes and dislikes, thy pursuits
 and avoidances, for this is what thou hast in thyself of choice and
 precious, but the body is by nature mud. Why dost thou spend thy labor
 upon it in vain? for that the body is naught, Time shall certainly teach
 thee, though it teach thee nothing else._ But if one come to me foul and
 filthy, and a mustache down to the knees, what have I to say to him?
 with what image or likeness can I draw him on? For with what that is
 like unto Beauty hath he ever busied himself, so as I may set him on
 another course, and say, _Not here is Beauty, but there_? Will you have
 me tell him, _Beauty consists not in being befouled, but in the Reason_?
 For doth he even seek Beauty? hath he any impression of it in his mind?
 Go, and reason with a hog, that he shall not roll himself in the mud.
 
 5. Behold a youth worthy of love--behold an old man worthy to love, and
 to be loved in return; to whom one may commit his sons, his daughters,
 to be taught; to whom young men may come, if it please you--that he may
 deliver lectures to them on a dunghill! God forbid. Every extravagance
 arises from something in human nature, but this is near to being one
 that is not human.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII.
 
 WHY WE SHOULD BEAR WITH WRONG.
 
 
 When some one may do you an injury, or speak ill of you, remember that
 he either does it or speaks it believing that it is right and meet for
 him to do so. It is not possible, then, that he can follow the thing
 that appears to you, but the thing that appears to him. Wherefore, if it
 appear evil to him, it is he that is injured, being deceived. For also
 if any one should take a true consequence to be false, it is not the
 consequence that is injured, but he which is deceived. Setting out,
 then, from these opinions, you will bear a gentle mind towards any man
 who may revile you. For, say on each occasion, _So it appeared to him_.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV.
 
 THAT EVERYTHING HATH TWO HANDLES.
 
 
 Every matter hath two handles--by the one it may be carried; by the
 other, not. If thy brother do thee wrong, take not this thing by the
 handle, _He wrongs me_; for that is the handle whereby it may not be
 carried. But take it rather by the handle, _He is my brother, nourished
 with me_; and thou wilt take it by a handle whereby it may be carried.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV.
 
 ON CERTAIN FALSE CONCLUSIONS.
 
 
 There is no true conclusion in these reasonings: _I am richer than thou,
 therefore I am better_: _I am more eloquent than thou, therefore I am
 better_. But the conclusions are rather these: _I am richer than thou,
 therefore my wealth is better_: _I am more eloquent than thou, therefore
 my speech is better_. But thou art not wealth, and thou art not speech.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI.
 
 PERCEPTION AND JUDGMENT.
 
 
 1. Doth a man bathe himself quickly? Then, say not, _Wrongly_, but
 _Quickly_. Doth he drink much wine? Then say not, _Wrongly_, but _Much_.
 For whence do you know if it were ill done till you have understood his
 opinion?
 
 2. Thus it shall not befall you to assent to any other things than
 those whereof you are truly and directly sensible.[1]
 
 3. What is the cause of assenting to anything? The appearance that it is
 so. But if it appear to be not so, it is impossible to assent to it.
 Wherefore? For that this is the nature of the mind, to receive the true
 with favor, the false with disfavor, and the uncertain with
 indifference. The proof of this? Be sure, if you can, at this moment,
 that it is night. You cannot. Cease to be sure that it is day. You
 cannot. Be sure that the stars are odd in number, or that they are even.
 You cannot. When, therefore, any man shall assent to what is false, know
 that he had no will to consent to falsehood; for, as saith Plato, no
 soul is willingly deprived of the truth, but the false appeared to it to
 be true. Come, then, what have we in actions corresponding to this true
 and false? The seemly and the unseemly, the profitable and the
 unprofitable, that which concerns me and that which doth not concern me,
 and such like. Can any man think that a certain thing is for his profit,
 and not elect to do it? He cannot. How, then, is it with her who saith--
 
   "And will I know the evils I shall do,
    But wrath is lord of all my purposes?"
                               _Medea_, 1079.
 
 For, did she hold this very thing, to gratify her wrath and avenge
 herself on her husband more profitable than to spare her children? Even
 so: but she was deceived. Show her clearly that she was deceived, and
 she will not do it; but so long as you show it not, what else hath she
 to follow than the thing as it appears to her? Nothing. Wherefore, then,
 have you indignation with her, that the unhappy wretch has gone astray
 concerning the greatest things, and has become a viper instead of a
 human being? If anything, will you not rather pity, as we pity the blind
 and the lame, those that are blinded and lamed in the chiefest of their
 faculties?
 
 4. ----"So that all these great and dreadful deeds have this same origin
 in the appearance of the thing?"
 
 The same, and no other. The _Iliad_ is nought but appearance, and the
 use of appearances. The thing that appeared to Paris was the carrying
 off of the wife of Menelaus; the thing that appeared to Helen was to
 accompany him. Had it, then, appeared to Menelaus to be sensible that it
 was a gain to be deprived of such a wife, what would have happened? Not
 only had there been no _Iliad_, but no _Odyssey_ neither.
 
 ----"On such a little thing do such great ones hang?"
 
 But what talk is this of great things? Wars and seditions and
 destructions of many men, and overthrow of cities? And what is there of
 great in these? Nothing. For what is there of greatness in the deaths
 of many oxen and sheep, and the burning or overthrow of many nests of
 swallows or storks?
 
 ----"But are these things like unto those?"
 
 They are most like. The bodies of men are destroyed, and the bodies of
 oxen and of sheep. The dwellings of men are burned, and the nests of
 storks. What is there great, what is there awful in this? Or show me
 wherein differeth the dwelling of a man, as a dwelling, from the nest of
 a stork, save that the one buildeth his little houses of planks and
 tiles and bricks, and the other of sticks and mud?
 
 ----"Are a stork and a man, then, alike?"
 
 What say you? In body they are most like.
 
 ----"Doth a man, then, differ in no respect from a stork?"
 
 God forbid; but in these matters there is no difference.
 
 ----"Wherein, then, doth he differ?"
 
 Seek, and you shall find that in another thing there is a difference.
 Look if it be not in the observing and studying of what he doth; look if
 it be not in his social instinct, in his faith, his reverence, his
 steadfastness, his understanding. Where, then, is the great Good or Evil
 for man? There, where the difference is. If this be saved, and abide, as
 it were, in a fortress, and reverence be not depraved, nor faith, nor
 understanding, then is the man also saved. But if one of these things
 perish, or be taken by storm, then doth the man also perish. And in this
 it is that great actions are done. It was a mighty downfall, they say,
 for Paris, when the Greeks came, and when they sacked Troy, and when his
 brothers perished. Not so: for through another's act can no man
 fall--that was the sacking of the storks' nests. But the downfall was
 then when he lost reverence and faith, when he betrayed hospitality and
 violated decorum. When was the fall of Achilles? When Patroclus died?
 God forbid; but when he was wrathful, when he bewept the loss of his
 girl, when he forgot that he was there not to win mistresses but to make
 war. These, for men, are downfall and storming and overthrow, when right
 opinions are demolished or depraved.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII.
 
 THAT THE PHILOSOPHER SHALL EXHIBIT TO THE VULGAR DEEDS, NOT WORDS.
 
 
 1. Thou shalt never proclaim thyself a philosopher, nor speak much
 among the vulgar of the philosophic maxims; but do the things that
 follow from the maxims. For example, do not discourse at a feast upon
 how one ought to eat, but eat as one ought. For remember that even so
 Socrates everywhere banished ostentation, so that men used to come to
 him desiring that he would recommend them to teachers of philosophy, and
 he brought them away and did so, so well did he bear to be overlooked.
 
 2. And if among the vulgar discourse should arise concerning some maxim
 of thy philosophy, do thou, for the most part, keep silence, for there
 is great risk that thou straightway vomit up what thou hast not
 digested. And when some one shall say to thee, _Thou knowest naught_,
 and it bites thee not, then know that thou hast begun the work.
 
 3. And as sheep do not bring their food to the shepherds to show how
 much they have eaten, but digesting inwardly their provender, bear
 outwardly wool and milk, even so do not thou, for the most part, display
 the maxims before the vulgar, but rather the works which follow from
 them when they are digested.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII.
 
 ASCESIS.
 
 
 When you have adapted the body to a frugal way of living, do not
 flatter yourself on that, nor if you drink only water, say, on every
 opportunity, _I drink only water_. And if you desire at any time to
 inure yourself to labor and endurance, do it to yourself and not unto
 the world. And do not embrace the statues; but some time when you are
 exceedingly thirsty take a mouthful of cold water, and spit it out, and
 say nothing about it.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIX.
 
 TOKENS.
 
 
 1. The position and token of the vulgar: he looks never to himself for
 benefit or hurt, but always to outward things. The position and
 character of the philosopher: he looks for benefit or hurt only to
 himself.
 
 2. The tokens of one that is making advance: he blames none, he praises
 none, he accuses none, he complains of none; he speaks never of himself,
 as being somewhat, or as knowing aught. When he is thwarted or hindered
 in aught, he accuseth himself. If one should praise him, he laughs at
 him in his sleeve; if one should blame him, he makes no defense. He goes
 about like the sick and feeble, fearing to move the parts that are
 settling together before they have taken hold. He hath taken out of
 himself all pursuit, and hath turned all avoidance to things in our
 power which are contrary to nature. Toward all things he will keep his
 inclination slack. If he is thought foolish or unlearned, he regardeth
 it not. In a word, he watches himself as he would a treacherous enemy.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XX.
 
 THAT THE LOGICAL ART IS NECESSARY.
 
 
 1. Since Reason is that by which all other things are organized and
 perfected,[1] it is meet that itself should not remain unorganized. But
 by what shall it be organized? For it is clear that this must be either
 by itself or by some other thing. But this must be Reason; or something
 else which is greater than Reason, which is impossible.
 
 2. "Yea," one may say, "but it is more pressing to cure our vices, and
 the like."
 
 You desire, then, to hear something of these things? Hear then; but if
 you shall say to me, _I know not if you are reasoning truly or falsely?_
 or if I utter something ambiguous, and you shall bid me distinguish,
 shall I lose patience with you and tell you, _It is more pressing to
 cure our vices than chop logic_?
 
 3. For this reason I think the logical are set at the beginning of our
 study, even as before the measuring of corn we set the examination of
 the measure. For unless we shall first establish what is a modius[2] and
 what is a balance, how shall we be able to measure or weigh anything?
 
 4. In this case, then, if you have not understood and accurately
 investigated the criterion of all other things, and that through which
 they are understood, shall we be able to investigate and understand
 anything else? and how could we? _Yea, but a modius is a wooden thing,
 and barren._ But it measures corn. _And logic is also barren._ As
 regards this, indeed, we shall see. But even if one should grant this,
 it sufficeth that logic is that which distinguishes and investigates
 other things, and, as one may say, measures and weighs them. Who saith
 these things? is it Chrysippus alone and Zeno and Cleanthes? but doth
 not Antisthenes[3] say it? And who wrote that the investigation of terms
 is the beginning of education?--was it not Socrates? and of whom doth
 Xenophon write that he began with the investigation of terms, what each
 of them signified?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXI.
 
 GRAMMARIAN OR SAGE.
 
 
 When some one may exalt himself in that he is able to understand and
 expound the works of Chrysippus, say then to thyself: If Chrysippus had
 not written obscurely, this man would have had nothing whereon to exalt
 himself. But I, what do I desire? Is it not to learn to understand
 Nature and to follow her? I inquire, then, who can expound Nature to me,
 and hearing that Chrysippus can, I betake myself to him. But I do not
 understand his writings, therefore I seek an expounder for them. And so
 far there is nothing exalted. But when I have found the expounder, it
 remaineth for me to put in practice what he declares to me, and in this
 alone is there anything exalted. But if I shall admire the bare
 exposition, what else have I made of myself than a grammarian instead of
 a philosopher, save, indeed, that the exposition is of Chrysippus and
 not of Homer? When, therefore, one may ask me to lecture on the
 philosophy of Chrysippus, I shall rather blush when I am not able to
 show forth works of a like nature and in harmony with the words.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXII.
 
 ACCOMPLISHMENTS.
 
 
 1. The clearer be the characters in which a book is writ, the more
 pleasantly and conveniently shall any man read it. Thus also a man shall
 listen more conveniently to any discourse if it be conveyed in
 well-ordered and graceful words. Be it not said, then, that there is no
 faculty of expression, for this is the thought of a man both impious and
 cowardly[1]--impious, for he holds in disesteem the gracious gifts of
 God, as if he would take away the serviceable faculty of seeing, or of
 hearing, or indeed this of speaking. Did God give the eyes for nothing?
 And was it for nothing that He mingled in them a spirit of such might
 and cunning as to reach a long way off and receive the impression of
 visible forms--a messenger so swift and faithful? Was it for nothing
 that He gave the intervening air such efficacy, and made it elastic, so
 that being, in a manner, strained,[2] our vision should traverse it? Was
 it for nothing that He made Light, without which there were no benefit
 of any other thing?
 
 2. Man, be not unthankful for these things, nor yet unmindful of better
 things. For seeing and hearing, and, by Zeus, for life itself, and the
 things that work together to maintain it, for dried fruits, for wine,
 for oil, do thou give thanks to God. But remember that He hath given
 thee another thing which is better than all these--that, namely, which
 uses them, which approves them, which taketh account of the worth of
 each. For what is that which declareth concerning all these faculties
 how much each of them is worth? Is it the faculty itself? Heard you
 ever the faculty of vision tell aught concerning itself? or that of
 hearing? or wheat, or barley, or a horse, or a dog? Nay, but as
 ministers and slaves are they appointed, to serve the faculty which
 makes use of appearances. And if you would learn how much any of them is
 worth, of whom will you inquire? who shall give answer? How then shall
 any other faculty be greater than this, which both useth the others as
 its servants, and the same approveth each of them and declareth
 concerning them? For which of them knoweth what itself is, and what it
 is worth? Which of them knoweth when it behooves to make use of it, and
 when not? What is that which openeth and closeth the eyes, turning them
 away from things which they should not behold, and guiding them towards
 other things? Is it the faculty of vision? Nay, but the faculty of the
 Will. What is that which closeth and openeth the ears?--that in
 obedience to which they become busy and curious, or again, unmoved by
 what they hear? Is it the faculty of hearing? It is no other than that
 of the Will.
 
 3. Being then so great a faculty, and set over all the rest, let it come
 to us and tell us that the best of existing things is the flesh! Not
 even if the flesh itself affirmed that it was the best, would any man
 have patience with it. Now what is it, Epicurus, which declares this
 doctrine, that the flesh is best, which wrote concerning the _End of
 Being_, and on _Laws of Nature_, and on the _Canon of Truth_?--which let
 thy beard grow? which wrote, when dying, that it was spending its last
 day and a happy one?[3] Is it the flesh or the Will? Wilt thou affirm,
 then, that thou hast aught better than the Will? Nay, but art thou not
 mad--so blind, in truth, and deaf as thou art?
 
 4. What then? Shall any man contemn the other faculties? God forbid!
 Doth any man say that there is no use or eminence in the faculty of
 eloquence? God forbid--that were senseless, impious, thankless towards
 God. But to each thing its true worth. For there is a certain use in an
 ass, but not so much as in an ox; and in a dog, but not so much as in a
 slave; and in a slave, but not so much as in a citizen; and in citizens,
 but not so much as in governors. Yet not because other things are better
 is the use which anything affords to be contemned. There is a certain
 worth in the faculty of eloquence, but not so much as in the Will. When,
 then, I speak thus, let no man deem that I would have you neglect the
 power of eloquence, for I would not have you neglect your eyes, or ears,
 or hands, or feet, or raiment, or shoes. But if one ask me which is,
 then, the best of existing things, what shall I say? The faculty of
 eloquence I cannot say, but that of the Will, when it is made right. For
 this is that which useth the other, and all the other faculties, both
 small and great. When this is set right, a man that was not good becomes
 good; when it is not right, the man becomes evil. This is that whereby
 we fail or prosper--whereby we blame others, or approve them; the
 neglect of which is the misery, and the care of it the happiness, of
 mankind.
 
 5. But to take away the faculty of eloquence, and to say that there is
 in truth no such faculty, is not only the part of a thankless man toward
 Him who hath given it, but also of a cowardly. For such a one seemeth to
 me to fear lest if there be any faculty of this kind we shall not be
 able to despise it. Such are they also which say that there is no
 difference between beauty and ugliness. Then were a man to be affected
 in like manner on seeing Thersites and Achilles, or on seeing Helen and
 any common woman?[4] Truly, a thought of fools and boors, and of men who
 know not the nature of each thing, but fear lest, if one perceive the
 difference, he shall be straightway swept away and overpowered by it.
 But the great thing is this--to leave to each the faculty that it hath,
 and so leaving it to scan the worth of the faculty, and to learn what is
 the greatest of existing things; and everywhere to pursue this, and be
 zealous about this, making all other things accessory to this, albeit,
 according to our powers, not neglecting even these. For of the eyes also
 must we take care, yet not as of the best thing; yet of these, too, by
 the very exercise of the best thing; since that shall in no other wise
 subsist according to Nature save by wise dealing in these matters, and
 preferring certain things to others.
 
 6. But what is done in the world? As if a man journeying to his own
 country should pass by an excellent inn, and the inn being agreeable to
 him, should stay, and abide in it. Man, thou hast forgotten thy purpose;
 thy journeying was not to this, but through this. _But this is
 pleasant._ And how many other inns are pleasant, and how many meadows?
 yet merely for passing through. But thy business is this, to arrive in
 thy native country, to remove the fears of thy kinsfolk, to do, thyself,
 the duties of a citizen, to marry, to beget children, to fill the
 customary offices. For thou art not come into this world to choose out
 its pleasanter places, but to dwell in those where thou wast born, and
 whereof thou wast appointed to be a citizen. And so in some wise it is
 with this matter. Since, by the aid of speech and such like deliverance,
 we must come to our aim, and purify the Will, and order aright the
 faculty which makes use of appearances; and it is necessary that this
 deliverance of the doctrines come to pass by a certain use of speech,
 and with a certain art and trenchancy of expression, there are some
 which are taken captive by these things themselves, and abide in
 them--one in the gift of speech, one in syllogisms, one in sophisms, one
 in some such another of these inns, and there they linger and molder
 away, as though they were fallen among the Sirens.
 
 7. Man, thy business was to make thyself fit to use the appearances that
 encounter thee according to Nature, not missing what thou pursuest, nor
 falling into what thou wouldst avoid, never failing of good fortune, nor
 overtaken of ill fortune, free, unhindered, uncompelled, agreeing with
 the governance of Zeus, obedient unto the same, and well-pleased
 therein; blaming none, charging none, able of thy whole soul to utter
 these lines:--
 
   "Lead me, O Zeus, and thou, Destiny!"
 
 Then, having this for thy business, if some little matter of eloquence
 please thee, or certain speculations, wilt thou stay and abide in them,
 and elect to settle in them, forgetting all that is at home? and wilt
 thou say, _These things are admirable_? Who saith they are not
 admirable? but for passing through, like inns. What should hinder one
 that spoke like Demosthenes to be unfortunate? or one that could resolve
 syllogisms like Chrysippus to be miserable, to grieve, to envy; in a
 word, to be troubled and unhappy? Nothing. Thou seest now that all these
 things are but inns, and of no worth; but our business was another
 thing. When I say these things to certain persons, they think I am
 rejecting all care about language or speculation. But I do not reject
 this; I reject the endless occupation with them, the putting our hopes
 in them. If a man by this teaching injureth those who hear him, reckon
 me also among those who do this injury. For I cannot, in order to please
 you, see that one thing is best and chief of all, and say that another
 is.[5]
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIII.
 
 CONSTANCY.
 
 
 Abide in the precepts as in laws which it were impious to transgress.
 And whatsoever any man may say of thee, regard it not; for neither is
 this anything of thine own.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIV.
 
 HOW LONG?
 
 
 1. How long wilt thou delay to hold thyself worthy of the best things,
 and to transgress in nothing the decrees of Reason? Thou hast received
 the maxims by which it behooves thee to live; and dost thou live by
 them? What teacher dost thou still look for to whom to hand over the
 task of thy correction? Thou art no longer a boy, but already a man full
 grown. If, then, thou art neglectful and sluggish, and ever making
 resolve after resolve, and fixing one day after another on which thou
 wilt begin to attend to thyself, thou wilt forget that thou art making
 no advance, but wilt go on as one of the vulgar sort, both living and
 dying.
 
 2. Now, at last, therefore hold thyself worthy to live as a man of full
 age and one who is pressing forward, and let everything that appeareth
 the best be to thee as an inviolable law. And if any toil or pleasure or
 reputation or the loss of it be laid upon thee, remember that now is the
 contest, here already are the Olympian games, and there is no deferring
 them any longer, and that in a single day and in a single trial ground
 is to be lost or gained.
 
 3. It was thus that Socrates made himself what he was, in all things
 that befell him having regard to no other thing than Reason. But thou,
 albeit thou be yet no Socrates, yet as one that would be Socrates, so it
 behooveth thee to live.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXV.
 
 PARTS OF PHILOSOPHY.
 
 
 1. The first and most necessary point in philosophy is the use of the
 precepts, for example, not to lie. The second is the proof of these, as,
 Whence it comes that it is wrong to lie? The third is that which giveth
 confirmation and coherence to the others, such as, Whence it comes that
 this is proof? for what is proof? what is consequence? what is
 contradiction? what is truth? what is falsehood?
 
 2. Thus the third point is necessary through the second, and the second
 through the first. But the most necessary of all, and that when we
 should rest, is the first, But we do the contrary. For we linger on the
 third point, and spend all our zeal on that, while of the first we are
 utterly neglectful, and thus we are liars; but the explanation of how it
 is shown to be wrong to lie we have ever ready to hand.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVI.
 
 MEMORABILIA.
 
 
 Hold in readiness for every need, these--
 
    "Lead me, O Zeus, and thou, Destiny, whithersoever ye
    have appointed me to go, and may I follow fearlessly. But
    if in an evil mind I be unwilling, still must I follow."
 
    "That man is wise among us, and hath understanding of
    things divine, who hath nobly agreed with Necessity."
 
 But the third also--
 
    "O Crito, if so it seem good to the Gods so let it be.
    Anytus and Meletus are able to kill me indeed, but to
    harm me, never."[1]
 
 THE END.
 
 
 
 
 NOTES.
 
 
 CLEANTHES HYMN TO ZEUS.
 
    [1] Professor Mahaffy, in his _Greek Life and Thought_, quotes
    the full text of this noble Hymn, which, he thinks, "would
    alone redeem the Hellenistic age, as it stands before us, from
    the charge of mere artificiality and pedantry."
 
    [2] [Greek: ies mimema lachontes mounon]. This is Zeller's
    reading, but not Professor Mahaffy's, who has [Greek: henos
    mimema].
 
 
 NOTES.
 
 
 BOOK I.
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 1. "Enter by the door" (_cf._ S. John, x. 1). The parallelisms in
 thought and expression between Epictetus and the New Testament have
 often been noticed, and the reader will discover many others, to which I
 have not thought it necessary to draw attention.
 
   "Conceit:" [Greek: oiesis], _Einbildung_.
 
 3. "To be elated:" [Greek: epairesthai]. One might translate, "to be
 puffed up," except that that expression is only used in a bad sense, and
 one may be "elated" in anything that is truly of the nature of the good.
 The Stoics distinguished between [Greek: chara], joy, and [Greek:
 hedone], pleasure; not rejecting or despising the former.
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 1. [Greek: ta men eisin eph' hemin, ta de ouk eph' hemin]. A
 fundamental distinction in the Epictetean system, which he sometimes
 expresses by the phrases, [Greek: ta hemetera] and [Greek: ta ton
 allon]--things that are our own and things that belong to others; or
 [Greek: ta idia] and [Greek: ta allotria]--things that are our
 proper concern, and things that are alien to us.
 
 2. On the Mons Palatinus in Rome there stood a temple to Fever. Upton
 quotes from Gruter, p. xcvii., an interesting inscription to this
 divinity: Febri. Divae. Febri. Sanctae. Febri. Magnae. Camilla. Amata. Pro.
 Filio. Male. Affecto. P.
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 1. There is excellent MS. authority for this reading of the passage,
 which, however, is not Schweighaeuser's. The latter reads: "Be content
 with them, and pray to the Gods."
 
 2. "Steward of the winds." A quotation from Homer, _Od._ x. 21.
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 1. "Through not being dazzled," etc. [Greek: An tas hylas me
 thaumase].
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 1. Note that in this passage "God" and "the Gods" and "the Divine" are
 all synonymous terms.
 
 2. Or "of names."
 
 3. Some texts add "such as Good or Evil."
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 1. Apparently a proverb, which maybe paralleled in its present
 application by Luther's "Pecca fortiter."
 
 2. A complex or conjunctive proposition is one which contains several
 assertions so united as to form a single statement which will be false
 if any one of its parts is false--_e.g._, "Brutus was the lover and
 destroyer both of Caesar and of his country." The disjunctive is when
 alternative propositions are made, as "Pleasure is either good or bad,
 or neither good nor bad."
 
 3. I have followed Lord Shaftesbury's explanation of this passage, which
 the other commentators have given up as corrupt. It seems clear that
 whether the passage can stand exactly in the form in which we have it,
 or not, Lord Shaftesbury's rendering represents what Epictetus
 originally conveyed.
 
 4. According to the usual reading, a scornful exclamation--"_Thou_
 exhort them!" I have followed the reading recommended by Schw. in his
 notes, although he does not adopt it in his text.
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 1. The founder of the Cynic school was Antisthenes, who taught in the
 gymnasium named the Cynosarges, at Athens; whence the name of his
 school. Zeller takes this striking chapter to exhibit Epictetus's
 "philosophisches Ideal," the Cynic being the "wahrer Philosoph," or
 perfect Stoic. (Phil. d. Gr. iii. S. 752.) This view seems to me no more
 true than that the missionary or monk is to be considered the ideal
 Christian. Epictetus takes pains to make it clear that the Cynic is a
 Stoic with a special and separate vocation, which all Stoics are by no
 means called upon to take up. Like Thoreau, that modern Stoic, when he
 went to live at Walden, the Cynic tries the extreme of abnegation in
 order to demonstrate practically that man has resources within himself
 which make him equal to any fate that circumstances can inflict.
 
 2. [Greek: tribonion], a coarse garment especially affected by the
 Cynics, as also by the early Christian ascetics.
 
 3. "Nor pity." Upton, in a note on _Diss._ i. 18. 3. (Schw.), refers to
 various passages in Epictetus where pity and envy are mentioned
 together as though they were related emotions, and aptly quotes Virgil
 (_Georg._ ii. 499):--
 
   "Aut doluit miserans inopem, aut invidit habenti."
 
 It will be clear to any careful reader that when Epictetus asserts that
 certain emotions or acts are unworthy of a man, he constantly means the
 "man" to be understood as his highest spiritual faculty, his deepest
 sense of reason, his soul. That we are not to pity or grieve means that
 that side of us which is related to the divine and eternal is not to be
 affected by emotions produced by calamities in mere outward and material
 things. St. Augustine corroborates this view in an interesting passage
 bearing on the Stoic doctrine of pity (_De Civ. Dei._ ix. 5; _Schw._ iv.
 132):--
 
 "Misericordiam Cicero non dubitavit appellare virtutem, quam Stoicos
 inter vitia numerare non pudet, qui tamen, ut docuit liber Epicteti
 nobilissimi Stoici ex decretis Zenonis et Chrysippi, qui hujus sectae
 primas partes habuerunt, hujuscemodi passiones in animum Sapientis
 admittunt, quem vitiis omnibus liberam esse volunt. Unde fit consequens,
 ut haec ipsa non putent vitia, quando Sapienti sic accidunt, ut contra
 virtutem mentis rationemque nihil possunt."
 
 The particular utterances of Epictetus here alluded to by St. Augustine
 must have been contained in some of the lost books of the
 _Dissertations_, as nothing like them is to be found explicitly in those
 which survive, although the latter afford us abundant means for deducing
 the conclusion which St. Augustine confirms.
 
 4. This cake seems to form a ridiculous anti-climax. But it appears to
 have been a vexed question in antiquity whether an ascetic philosopher
 might indulge in this particular luxury ([Greek: plakous]). Upton
 quotes Lucian and Diogenes Laertius for instances of this question being
 propounded, and an affirmative answer given (in one instance by the
 Cynic, Diogenes). The youth in the text is being addressed as a novice
 who must not use the freedom of an adept.
 
 Upton quotes from Cymbeline:--
 
   "Hath Britain all the sun that shines? Day, night,
   Art they not, but in Britain? Prythee, think,
   There's living out of Britain!"
 
 But Epictetus means more than this in his allusion to sun and
 stars.--See Preface, xxiv. This passage would lead us to suppose that
 Epictetus believed in a personal existence continued for some time after
 death. In the end, however, even sun and stars shall vanish.--See ii.
 13, 4.
 
 6. Being arrested by Philip's people, and asked if he were a spy,
 Diogenes replied, "Certainly I am, O Philip; a spy of thine ill-counsel
 and folly, who for no necessity canst set thy life and kingdom on the
 chances of an hour."
 
 7. According to Upton's conjecture, these were gladiators famous for
 bodily strength; and also, one would suspect, for some remarkable
 calamity.
 
 8. This highly crude view of the Trojan war might have been refuted out
 of the mouth of Epictetus himself. Evil-doers are not to be allowed
 their way because they are unable to hurt our souls, but the hurt may be
 in the cowardice or sloth that will not punish them.
 
 9. By wearing his cloak half falling off, in negligent fashion. Nothing
 is finer or more characteristic in Epictetus than his angry scorn of the
 pseudo-Stoics of his day.
 
 10. [Greek: anakrinon to daimonion]. The allusion evidently is to
 the genius or divine spirit by which Socrates felt himself guided.
 
 11. Crates was a disciple of Diogenes. His wife was named Hipparchia.
 Upton quotes Menander (_apud Diog. L._), "Thou wilt walk about with me
 in a cloak as once did his wife with Crates the Cynic."
 
 12. Danaus, father of the fifty Danaidae. AEolus is mentioned in _Od._ x.
 as having six sons and six daughters.
 
 13. [Greek: trapezeas pylaorous]. _Il._ xxi. 69.
 
 14. That is, he capped the quotation by quoting the following line
 (_Il._ ii. 24, 25). Not a very striking intellectual effort; but
 Epictetus evidently considered it a meritorious thing to know Homer well
 enough to quote him in one's sleep, and he was right.
 
 15. From a poem of Cleanthes.
 
 
 BOOK II.
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 1. According to the view of James Harris, in a long and valuable note
 communicated to Upton, the "master-argument" was so called from the
 supreme importance of the issues with which it dealt. On these issues
 different leaders of the Stoics took different sides, Diodorus holding
 both future and past things to be _necessary_, Cleanthes both
 _contingent_, and Chrysippus past things to be necessary and future
 contingent. Any two of the three propositions mentioned in the text
 exclude the third. For modern philosophy the distinction between the
 possible and the certain in the phenomenal world has, of course, no real
 existence; the possible being simply that of which we do not know
 whether it will come to pass or not.
 
 2. Of course Epictetus here speaks ironically; all this is just what it
 _is_ the business of a thinker to do.
 
 3. Epictetus, I suppose, means to complain that the current phrases of
 philosophy are dealt out in glib answer to great ethical questions, just
 as Homer might be quoted for an event in the life of Odysseus, by
 persons who in neither case think of gaining that vital conviction
 which only the strenuous exercise of one's own reason can produce. A
 little later he represents Hellanicus, the historian, as quoted on the
 distinction between good and evil, who never treated that subject. If it
 is to be a mere question of _authority_, one _name_ is as good as
 another, since none is any use at all.
 
 "Indifferent," be it observed, is _morally_ indifferent--that which has
 in _itself_ no bearing on our moral state. See Chap. II. 2.
 
 4. The followers of Aristotle called themselves Peripatetics.
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 1. The word in the Greek is [Greek: peristaseis], literally
 _circumstances_, but the word is evidently used in a bad sense, as
 equivalent to afflictions. Doom is likewise etymologically a neutral
 word, but one which has received an evil meaning.
 
 2. Socrates's faith in his genius or "Daemon" was well known. In this
 passage from his _Apologia_ (which Epictetus gives from a bad text), it
 is doubtless the manner only that conveyed the idea of mockery. Neither
 Socrates nor any one else ever had better evidence of God's existence
 than His voice in our conscience.
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 1. Briefly, the three divisions seem to be Action, Character, and
 Judgment. The last is to be approached through training in logic, in the
 penetration of fallacies, etc., by which means a man is to arrive at
 such an inward and vital conviction of the truth that he can never for a
 moment be taken off his guard by the delusion of Appearance.
 
 2. Passions, passionless, [Greek: ta pathe, apathes].--See Index of
 Philosophic Terms.
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 1. Euripides.--Musonius Rufus, the teacher of Epictetus, is reported to
 have said, "Take the chance of dying nobly when thou canst, lest after a
 little death indeed come to thee, but a noble death no more."
 
 2. This phrase of the "open door" occurs frequently in Epictetus,
 usually when, as here, he is telling the average non-philosophic man
 that it is unmanly to complain of a life which he can at any time
 relinquish. The philosopher has no need of such exhortation, for he does
 not complain, and as for death, is content to wait God's time. But the
 Stoics taught that the arrival of this time might be indicated by some
 disaster or affliction which rendered a natural and wholesome life
 impossible. Self-destruction was in such cases permissible, and is
 recorded to have been adopted by several leaders of the Stoics,
 generally when old age had begun to render them a burden to their
 friends.
 
 3. _Nay, thou shalt exist_, etc.--This is the sense given by Zeller's
 punctuation. Schweighaeuser's text would be rendered, "Thou shalt not
 exist, but something else will," etc. Upton changes the text (on his own
 authority) by transposing an [Greek: ouk]. "Thou shalt exist, but as
 something else, whereof the universe has now no need."
 
 4. This does not appear to have been the law in Epictetus's time, for he
 himself was educated while a slave. But it was a common provision in
 antique states.
 
 5. The ceremony in manumitting a slave.
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 1. Chap. VI. i. is a passage from the lost Fifth Book of the Discourses,
 preserved for us in a rather obscure Latin translation by Aulus Gellius.
 During a storm at sea, a certain Stoic on board was observed by him to
 look pale and anxious, though not indeed showing the signs of panic
 exhibited by the other passengers. Questioned afterwards by Gellius on
 this apparent feebleness in his professed faith, the Stoic produced the
 Fifth Book of Epictetus, and read this passage.
 
 2. The third Earl of Shaftesbury, an enthusiastic student of Epictetus,
 had this dish of water and ray of light engraved, and placed, with the
 inscription, [Greek: panta hypolepsis]--All is Opinion--as an emblem
 at the front of his _Characteristics_. The passage, though interesting,
 is obscure. At one time the "appearances," [Greek: phantasiai], are
 compared to the ray of light; at another, the doctrines (literally
 "arts," _i. e._, arts of life taught by philosophy) and virtues.
 Probably the explanation is to be found in the view of the Stoics that
 at birth the human soul is a _tabula rasa_, or blank sheet; all our
 knowledge coming from without; that is, from the "appearances" which
 surround us. Moral and philosophic convictions are thus, like all other
 mental states, the result of external impressions.
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 1. The school of Plato was continued at Athens under the title of the
 Academy. In its later days it produced little except logical puzzles.
 
 2. "Friend, if indeed, escaping from this war, we were destined
 thereafter to an ageless and deathless life, then neither would I fight
 in the van nor set thee in the press of glorious battle. But now, since
 death in a thousand kinds stands everywhere against us, which no man
 shall fly from nor elude, we go; either we shall give glory to another,
 or he to us."--Sarpedon's speech, _Iliad_, xii. 322-8.
 
 3. General consent.--The well-known philosophic doctrine, that what all
 men unite in believing must be true, which has so often been made the
 basis of arguments against Skepticism in various forms.
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 1. See chap. IV. i.
 
 2. He drew water by night for his gardens, and studied philosophy in the
 day.--_Diog. Laert._ [Upton.]
 
 3. A most characteristic feature of the whole Stoic school was its
 treatment of ancient mythology and legend. These things were closely and
 earnestly studied, with a constant view to the deeper meanings that
 underlay the vesture of fable, an attitude which contrasts very
 favorably with Plato's banishment of the poets from his Republic for
 "teaching false notions about the Gods."
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 1. Gyara, an island in the AEgean, used as a penal settlement.
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 1. _The captain ... the driver_--literally, "to him who has knowledge"
 (of the given art).
 
 2. Liberator--[Greek: karpistes]. The person appointed by law to carry
 out the ceremony of the manumission of slaves.
 
 
 CHAPTER XI.
 
 1. This chapter seems to me to contain a truth expressed so baldly and
 crudely as to appear a falsehood. The reader's mind will be fixed upon
 the truth or falsehood according as he is or is not capable of reading
 Epictetus with understanding.
 
 2. This earthen lamp was sold, according to Lucian, at the death of
 Epictetus for 3,000 drachmae (about L120).--_Adv. Indoct._ 13.
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII.
 
 1. Parodying a verse of Euripides on the stream of Dirce in Boeotia.
 The Marcian aqueduct brought water to Rome.
 
 2. I adopt Upton's conjecture for the inexplicable [Greek: en boos
 koilia].
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII.
 
 1. An eminent Cynic (also mentioned by Seneca and Tacitus).
 
 
 CHAPTER XXV.
 
 1. This is the reading of one of the Christian Paraphrases. The other
 versions add the words [Greek: pros allelous] after [Greek: ex hon
 ou diapherometha], giving the sense "from things in which we do not
 differ from each other." It is no uncommon thing for all the versions of
 Epictetus to unite in a manifestly corrupt reading, and though in this
 case the received text is not an impossible one, I have thought myself
 justified in following the variant of the Paraphrase.
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVII.
 
 1. There is an allusion to this curious feature of the Olympic contests
 in the Fourth Idyll of Theocritus. Casaubon (_Lect. Theocr._ ad Idyll.
 4) quoted by Schweighaeuser, in his note on this passage (_Diss._ III.
 xv. 4), shows from Festus Pompeius that there was a statue in the
 Capitol of a youth bearing a spade after the manner of the Olympic
 combatants.
 
 2. Euphrates, a Stoic philosopher, and contemporary of Epictetus. He was
 tutor of Pliny, the younger.
 
 3. The pentathlos contended in five athletic exercises--viz., running,
 leaping, throwing the quoit, throwing the javelin, wrestling.
 
 4. Much of this must refer to the period of probation or discipleship,
 for Epictetus is clear that the ordinary Stoic (who had not embraced the
 special mission of Cynicism) was not required to forsake his family, or
 his affairs, or his duties as a citizen, nor even justified in doing so.
 
 
 BOOK III.
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 1. The husk is, of course, the body. If it is maintained that Nature has
 made the ease of this our only proper pursuit, of course the altruistic,
 or social instincts have to be rejected and denied.
 
 2. The text is here almost certainly corrupt. It runs [Greek: pos oun
 hyponoetikoi esmen, hois me physike esti pros ta ekgona
 philostorgia]. All the MSS. agree in [Greek: hyponoetikoi], for which
 Schweighaeuser desires to read [Greek: pronoetikoi], and Wolf, [Greek:
 eti koinonikoi]. Salmasius declares emphatically for [Greek: pos
 oun epinoeis hoti koinonikoi esmen], and this, with a slight
 alteration suggested to me by an eminent living scholar, is the reading
 I have adopted: Let us suppose that Epictetus said [Greek: pos oun
 hyponoeis hoti k.e.], and that this was written in the short lines
 common in Greek MSS.:--
 
 [Greek:
 
   POSOUNYPO
   NOEISOTIKOI
   NONIKOI]
 
 The second line, beginning with the same letter as the third, might
 easily be dropped by a transcriber, and the next transcriber would
 certainly change the resulting [Greek: hypononikoi] to [Greek:
 hyponoetikoi]. The existing reading might give the sense, "How are we,
 then, suspicious of those (if any there be) to whom Nature has given no
 affection for their offspring?"
 
 3. Outward things--such as making provision for one's family, serving
 the State, etc.,--actions which are not directly concerned with our
 spiritual good.
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 1. Phrygia, the birthplace of Epictetus, was one of the great centers
 of the wild and fearful cult of Cybele, whose priests gashed and
 mutilated themselves in the excitement of the orgie.
 
 2. Philosophy is brought upon the scene, speaking first through the
 mouth of a Stoic, afterwards through that of an Epicurean, and the
 practical results of each system are exhibited.
 
 3. The Athenians, rather than submit to Xerxes, abandoned their city to
 be plundered, and took to their fleet, the victory at Salamis rewarding
 their resolve.
 
 Those who died at Thermopylae were the three hundred Spartans under
 Leonidas, who held the pass against the Persian host till all were
 slain. Often as their heroism has been celebrated, perhaps nothing more
 worthy of their valor has been written than the truly laconic epitaph
 composed for them by Simonides:
 
   "Stranger, the Spartans bade us die:
   Go, tell them, thou, that here we lie."
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 1. The sense of human dignity was strong in Epictetus, and he would have
 it practically observed in men's relations with each other. Compare Ch.
 v. 7. Zeller must have overlooked these Fragments of Epictetus when he
 asserted (p. 301) that no Stoic philosopher had ever condemned slavery.
 So far as we know, however, this is the only condemnation of that
 institution ever uttered by any Pagan thinker. The usual Stoic view was
 laid down by Chrysippus, who defined the slave very much as Carlyle
 does, as a "perpetuus mercenarius"--a man "hired for life, from whom
 work was to be required, a just return for it being accorded (_operam
 exegendam, justa proebenda_)". This utterance of Epictetus, as of one
 who knew slavery from within, and certainly was not inclined to
 exaggerate its discomforts, is noteworthy enough.
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 1. Administrator, [Greek: diorthotes]; in Latin, _Corrector_--a State
 officer of whom inscriptions, etc., make frequent mention, but of whose
 functions not much appears to be known beyond what the present chapter
 of Epictetus reveals.
 
 2. Cassiope was a port of Epirus, not far from Nicopolis, where
 Epictetus taught. Schw. conjectures that Maximus was sending his son to
 study philosophy at Nicopolis under Epictetus.
 
 3. "For a correct view of these matters will reduce every movement of
 preference and avoidance to health of body and tranquillity of soul; for
 this is the perfection of a happy life."--Epicurus, _Diog. Laert._ x.
 128. Epictetus's analysis of the Epicurean theory amounts to this, that
 the pleasure of the soul is the chief good, but that it is only felt
 through the body and its conditions.
 
 4. _The overseer of youth._--An officer in certain Greek cities. See
 Mahaffy's _Greek Life and Thought_, ch. xvii., on the organization of
 the _ephebi_.
 
 5. _Aid in works that are according to Nature._--The Greek is--[Greek:
 en tois kata physin ergois parakrate]. There is some difference
 of opinion among commentators as to the meaning of [Greek: parakrate].
 Wolf translates, "hold the chief place" in natural works. Upton, Schw.,
 and Long render it by "keep us constant," "sustain us," in such works. I
 do not see why we should not take the word in its plainest sense--that
 pleasure should _act together with other forces_ in leading us to do
 well.
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 1. _Zealous for evil things._--Epictetus must mean things which they
 know to be evil--evil things _as_ evil. It was a Socratic doctrine which
 we find again alluded to in this chapter, that no evil is ever willingly
 or wittingly done.
 
 2. A favorite theme of later Greek and of Roman comedy was the rivalship
 in love of a father and a son.
 
 3. Admetus, husband of Alcestis, being told by an oracle that his wife
 must die if no one offered himself in her stead, thought to lay the
 obligation on his father, as being an old man with but few more years to
 live. The first verse quoted is from the _Alcestis_ of Euripides; the
 second is not found in any extant version of that play.
 
 4. Eteocles and Polyneices, sons of Oedipus, quarreled with each other
 about the inheritance of their father's kingdom. Eteocles having gained
 possession of it, Polyneices brought up the famous seven kings, his
 allies, against Thebes, and fell in battle there by his brother's hand,
 whom he also killed. The verses quoted are from the _Phoenissae_ of
 Euripides.
 
 5. Schweighaeuser interprets this passage to mean that these men occupy
 the public places as wild beasts do the mountains, to prey on others. If
 we might read [Greek: hos ta theria] for [Greek: hos ta ore], we
 should get a less obscure sense, "haunt the wilderness--I should say the
 public places--like wild beasts." The passage is clearly corrupt
 somewhere.
 
 6. Polyneices bribed Eriphyle with the gift of this necklace to persuade
 her unwilling husband to march with him against Thebes where he died.
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 1. The allusion is to _Odyssey_, v. 82-4. "But he was sitting on the
 beach and weeping, where he was wont; and tormented his spirit with
 tears and groanings and woes, and wept as he gazed over the barren sea."
 
 2. _Let him pity._--See Bk. I., ch. viii., _note_ 3.
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 1. _The conflagration._--See Preface for an account of the Stoic
 Doctrine of the _Weltverbrennung_.
 
 2. Long suggests that the words translated "air to air" might be equally
 well rendered "spirit to spirit" ([Greek: hoson pneumatiou eis
 pneumation]), thus finding a place for the soul in this enumeration of
 the elements of man. But this metaphysical division of man's nature into
 a spiritual part and a material part would have been wholly contrary to
 Stoic teaching, which admitted no existence that was not material. As a
 matter of fact, if any of the terms in this enumeration is to be
 understood as meaning soul or spirit, it will be fire rather than air.
 
 3. Gods and Powers.--[Greek: theon kai Daimonon].
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 1. _To strangle lions or embrace statues._--Hercules did the former, and
 ostentatious philosophers sometimes did the latter in winter-time, by
 way of showing their power of endurance.
 
 2. _The stamp of Nero._--I believe there is no other record than this of
 any rejection of Nero's coins, and those which have come down to us are
 of perfectly good quality. He was declared a public enemy by the Senate,
 and possibly it was decreed at the same time that his coins should be
 withdrawn from circulation. Dion, quoted by Wise (_apud_ Schweighaeuser),
 reports that this was done in the case of Caligula, after the death of
 that tyrant.
 
 3. _Lions at home, but in Ephesus foxes._--"A proverb about the
 Spartans, who were defeated in Asia," notes the Scholiast on Aristoph.
 Pac., 1188-90.
 
 
 BOOK IV.
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 1. _Nor can I move without thy knowledge._--From Homer, _Il._ x. 279,
 280, Odysseus to Athene.
 
 2. _The Genius of each man._--[Greek: ton ekaston Daimona].
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 1. _A way wherein to walk._--Literally, the power of using a way. It
 seems to me likely that this term, way--[Greek: hodos], here signifies
 the Stoic philosophy, just as in the early Church it was used to signify
 Christianity (_e. g._, _Acts_ xxii. 4, and xix. 9, 23).
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 1. _Nor have any object in themselves._--Readers of Lotze will be
 reminded of the term Fuersichseinheit, used by him to denote the
 self-centered quality of true Being. The Greek here is [Greek: ouk
 auta proegoumena], [Greek: proegoumena], being the word used in Bk. I. viii.
 13, and Bk. III. v. 5, for the leading objects or obligations of man.
 
 2. _Would that I had you with me!_--In Long's translation the pronoun
 _you_ is explained to mean God. I can see no reason for this
 interpretation. The words are, I think, supposed to be uttered by a
 disciple to his master: they are such as Epictetus may have heard from
 many of his own disciples as they left him to take their part in the
 world of action.
 
 3. _Cautious assent_--_i. e._, caution in allowing oneself to entertain
 the impressions of appearances.
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 1. The strong and growing yearning for some direct, personal revelation
 of God, some supernatural manifestation of His existence and care for
 men, is noted by Zeller as a special trait of Hellenistic times. Such a
 revelation must have been longed for by many as the only satisfying
 answer to the destructive logic of the Pyrrhonists, and men's minds were
 also of course led that way by the insistence of the Stoic thinkers upon
 the communion of the individual with God, as the most important of all
 possible relations. Hence the growth of many wild and orgiastic cults at
 this epoch--all based on the state of ecstasy connected with their rites,
 which was ascribed to supernatural influence. With the Stoics this
 movement took the comparatively sober shape of attention to the
 established system of oracular divination. Zeller, however, shows that
 some Stoics were disposed to rationalize the revelations of the oracles
 by supposing a certain sympathy between the mind of the seer and the
 future events which led to the unconscious selection of means of
 divination which would exhibit the proper signs.--(Z. 339, 340.)
 Epictetus evidently thought more of God's revelation in the conscience
 than any other.
 
 2. The story is told by Simplicius in his commentary on this chapter.
 Two friends, journeying together to inquire of the oracle at Delphi,
 were set upon by robbers; one of them resisted, and was murdered, the
 other either fled or made no effort on his companion's behalf. Arriving
 at the temple of Apollo, he was greeted with the following deliverance
 of the oracle:--
 
   "Thou saw'st thy friend all undefended die--
   Foul with that sin, from Phoebus' temple fly."
 
 
 BOOK V.
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 1. Simplicius explains that the oath was to be refused, because to call
 God to witness in any merely personal and earthly interest implies a
 want of reverence towards Him; but that if there were a question of
 pledging one's faith on behalf of friends, or parents, or country, it
 was not improper to add the confirmation of an oath.
 
 2. Upton quotes allusions to these recitations from Juvenal, Martial,
 and Pliny. Authors would read their own works and invite crowds of
 flatterers to attend. Epict. _Diss._ iii. 23. (Schweighaeuser) is a
 scornful diatribe against the pretentious people who held forth on
 these occasions, and the people who assembled to hear and applaud them.
 He contrasts with fashionable reciters and lecturers his own master,
 Rufus. "Rufus was wont to say, _I speak to no purpose, if ye have time
 to praise me_. And, verily, he spoke in such a way that every man who
 sat there thought that some one had accused him to Rufus, he so handled
 all that was going on, he so set before each man's eyes his faults."
 
 3. Into vulgarity--[Greek: eis idiotismon].
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 1. The sophism, or puzzle, called the Liar, ran thus:--A liar says he
 lies: if it is true, he is no liar; and if he lies, he is speaking
 truth. The Quiescent ([Greek: ho hesychazon]) was an invention
 attributed by Cicero to Chrysippus (Acad. ii. 29). When asked of a
 gradually-increasing number of things to say when they ceased to be few
 and became many, he was wont to cease replying, or be "quiescent,"
 shortly before the limit was reached--a device which we have some
 difficulty in regarding as a fair example of Chrysippus's contributions
 to the science of logic. For the master sophism see Bk. II. chap. i.,
 _note_ 1.
 
 2. Plato, _Laws_, ix.:--"When any of such opinions visit thee, go to the
 purifying sacrifices, go and pray in the temples of the protecting Gods,
 go to the society of men whom thou hast heard of as good; and now hear
 from others, now say for thine own part, that it behooves every man to
 hold in regard the things that are honorable and righteous. But from the
 company of evil men, fly without a look behind. And if in doing these
 things thy disease give ground, well; but if not, hold death the better
 choice, and depart from life."
 
 3. _The true athlete._--Literally, ascetic, [Greek: asketes]; _i. e._,
 practicer.
 
 4. The Dioscuri, or Twins, Castor and Pollux, were the patron deities of
 sailors.
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 1. _If viewed disjunctively._--That is, if we say, It is day, or, It is
 night. This is a difficult chapter, and full of corruptions. The feast
 alluded to is, doubtless, the feast of life, where the Gods are the
 hosts.
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 1. _Winter training._--Such as the Roman troops underwent when in
 winter-quarters. They were accustomed to exercise themselves with arms
 of double the normal weight, and prepare themselves by marching,
 running, leaping, etc., for active service.
 
 
 CHAPTER XII.
 
 1. The Pancratium was a contest in which boxing and wrestling were both
 allowable. For the Pentathlon, see Bk. II. chap, xvii., _note_ 3.
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI.
 
 1. This means, apparently, that the judgment has no right to do more
 than endorse the deliverances of the perceptive faculty. If a man
 commits any error, he does it under the conviction that it is in some
 way for his profit or satisfaction; that is, that there is something of
 the nature of the Good in it. He may be mistaken in this; but so long as
 he does not know where Good and Evil really lie, he can do no other than
 he does. The true course, then, for the philosopher is not to condemn
 him for his actions, but to show him the fundamental error from which
 they proceed. The expression, "assent," [Greek: synkatatithesthai], is
 that used by Epictetus in II. vi., etc., where he speaks of the mind as
 being imposed on, or taken captive, by the outward shows of things.
 
 
 CHAPTER XX.
 
 1. The Greek is [Greek: Epeide logos estin ho diarthron kai
 exergazomenos ta loipa]. [Greek: diarthroo] means, literally, to
 fashion with joints, hence constitute organically, with interdependence
 of parts. Long translates "analyze."
 
 2. _Modius._--A measure of about two gallons.
 
 3. Antisthenes, about 400 B. C., founder of the Cynic school, which was
 established by him in the gymnasium called the Cynosarges (hence the
 name). As a Cynic, his authority would, of course, be respected by the
 hearers of Epictetus. This investigation of terms, or names, is, indeed,
 the beginning of philosophy and the guide to truth in any sphere, but
 perhaps not every one is competent to undertake it. There must be a real
 and not merely a formal appreciation of the contents of each term. A
 primrose is one thing to Peter Bell and another to Wordsworth. The term,
 let us say, Duty, is one thing to a Herbert Spencer and another to a
 Kant.
 
 
 CHAPTER XXII.
 
 1. "My friends, fly all culture," is an injunction reported of Epicurus
 (_Diog. L._ x. 6). However, neglect of form in literary style was a
 characteristic of philosophic writers of the Hellenistic period, which
 was by no means confined to the Epicureans.
 
 2. This passage is corrupt. I follow the reading adopted by
 Schweighaeuser (after Wolf); but it may be noted that Schweighaeuser's
 translation follows another reading than that which he adopts in his
 text, viz.--[Greek: kinoumenou] (being moved), instead of [Greek:
 teinomenou] (being strained). The original, in all versions, is [Greek:
 ginomenou], which makes no sense at all.--See Preface, xxiii.
 
 3. The writings enumerated are, of course, works of Epicurus. When
 dying, he wrote in a letter to a friend (_Diog. L._ x. 22) that he was
 spending a happy day, and his last.
 
 4. Stoic [Greek: apatheia] was anything but insensibility. Chrysippus
 held that many things in the Kosmos were created for their beauty
 alone.--_Zeller_, 171.
 
 5. There is another short chapter on the arts of ratiocination and
 expression (I. viii. _Schw._), which glances at the subject from a
 somewhat different point of view from that taken in the chapter which I
 have given. There Epictetus dwells chiefly on the danger that weak
 spirits should lose themselves in the fascination of these arts: "For,
 in general, in every faculty acquired by the uninstructed and feeble
 there is danger lest they be elated and puffed up through it. For how
 could one contrive to persuade a young man who excels in such things
 that he must not be an appendage to them, but make them an appendage to
 him?"
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVI.
 
 1. The first of these quotations is from the Stoic Cleanthes, the second
 from a lost play of Euripides; in the third Epictetus has joined
 together two sayings of Socrates, one from the _Crito_ and one from the
 _Apologia_. Anytus and Meletus were the principal accusers of Socrates
 in the trial which ended in his sentence to death.
 
 
 NOTES ON PRINCIPAL PHILOSOPHIC TERMS USED BY EPICTETUS.
 
 
    [I give under this head only those terms the exact force
    of which may not be apparent to the reader in a mere
    translation.]
 
    [Greek: Aidemon].--Pious, reverent, modest. The
      substantive is [Greek: aidos], the German Ehrfurcht
      (_Wilhelm Meister_, _Wanderjahre_, Bk. II. ch. ii.), a
      virtue in high regard with Epictetus, who generally
      mentions it in connection with that of "faithfulness,"
      [Greek: pistis]. In Wordsworth's poem, "My heart leaps
      up when I behold a rainbow in the sky," the "natural
      piety" which he prays may abide with him in his old age
      seems to be just that moral sensitiveness or [Greek:
      aidos] which passes into reverence and worship in the
      presence of certain things, and into shame and dread in
      that of others.
 
    [Greek: Apatheia].--Peace--that is, peace from passion,
      [Greek: pathe]. [Greek: Pathos] was any affection of
      the mind causing joy or grief. As it appears from Bk. II.
      iii. I., [Greek: apatheia] is not, in Epictetus, the
      state of absolute freedom from these passions, but that
      of being able to master them so that they shall not
      overwhelm the inner man.
 
    [Greek: Diarthrotikos].--That which _organizes_,
      constitutes organically, forms into a system. From
      [Greek: arthron], a joint. The word "analyze," by which
      Long translates [Greek: diarthroun], seems to me wanting
      in the formative sense expressed by the original.
 
    [Greek: Dogma].--An opinion, that which seems ([Greek:
      dokein]) true; generally in the special sense of a
      philosophic dogma.
 
    [Greek: Euroein].--To prosper; literally, to flow
      freely, [Greek: euroia], prosperity. A common Stoic
      phrase for a happy life.
 
    [Greek: Eusebeia].--Religion, piety. [Greek:
      sebomai]--"_to feel awe_ or _fear_ before God and man,
      especially when about to do something disgraceful"
      (_Liddell and Scott_); to worship, respect, reverence.
 
    [Greek: Hegemonikon to].--The Ruling Faculty--that in
      a man which chooses, determines, takes cognizance of good
      and evil, and sways the inferior faculties ([Greek:
      dynameis], powers) to its will. Lotze notes this
      _hegemonic_ quality in the human soul as that which
      distinguishes it from the bundle of sensations into which
      the Association Philosophy would resolve it.
 
    [Greek: thaumazein].--To admire, be dazzled with
      admiration by, to worship, to be taken up with a thing so
      as to lose the power of cool judgment. A frequent word in
      Epictetus, the sense of which is precisely rendered in
      Hor. _Sat._ I, 4, 28, "Hunc capit argenti splendor,
      _stupet_ Albius aere."
 
    [Greek: Idiotes].--One of the vulgar, an unlettered
      person; in Epictetus, one uninstructed in philosophy.
      Originally the word meant one who remained in private
      life, not filling any public office, or taking part in
      State affairs. A man might be an [Greek: idiotes], or
      "layman," with respect to any branch of science or art.
 
    [Greek: Kalos kai agathos].--The good and wise
      man--literally, beautiful and good. A standing phrase to
      denote the perfection of human character. [Greek: kalos]
      is a word sometimes difficult to render. Curtius connects
      it etymologically with Sanscrit, _kalyas_; Gothic,
      _hails_=healthy.
 
    [Greek: Oiesis].--"Conceit"--defined by Cicero as
      "Opinatio"--intellectual self-sufficiency, the supposing
      one's self to know something when one does not. "The first
       business of a philosopher," says Epictetus, "is to cast
      away [Greek: oiesis], for it is impossible that one can
      begin to learn the things that he thinks he knows"
      (_Diss._ II. xvii. 1.) He is not, in short, to be "wise in
      his own conceit."
 
    [Greek: orexis, ekklisis, horme, aphorme].--Pursuit,
      avoidance, desire, aversion. According to Simplicius
      (Comment. _Ench._ i.), [Greek: orexis] and [Greek: ekklisis]
      were used by the Stoics to express the counterparts
      in outward action of the mental affections, [Greek: horme]
      and [Greek: aphorme], and were regarded as consequent upon
      the latter.
 
    [Greek: proairesis].--The Will; but as used in
      Epictetus, this word implies much more than the mere
      faculty of volition. Literally, it means a choosing of
      one thing before another; in Epictetus, the power of
      deliberately resolving or purposing, the exercise of the
      reflective faculty being implied. It is hardly to be
      distinguished from [Greek: to hegemonikon], _q. v._
 
    [Greek: prolepseis].--"Natural Conceptions." See
      Preface, xxviii., xxix. The "primary truths" of Lord
      Herbert of Cherbury.
 
    [Greek: Synkatatithesthai].--To assent to or acquiesce
      in anything, to ratify by the judgment the emotions
      produced by external things or events, such as the sense
      of dread, or pleasure, or reprobation, which they arouse
      in us. To be on one's guard against the hasty yielding of
      this assent is one of Epictetus's main injunctions to the
      aspirant in philosophy.
 
    [Greek: Tarassesthai].--To be troubled; [Greek:
      a-taraxia], tranquillity. [Greek: Tarassein] is
      primarily to stir up, confuse, throw into disorder.
 
    [Greek: phantasia].--An appearance; with the Stoics, any
      mental impression as received by the perceptive faculty
      before the Reason has pronounced upon it, a bare
      perception.
 
 
 
 
 INDEX OF REFERENCES.
 
 
    [The references in the right-hand column are to the
    books, chapters, and verses of the _Dissertations_, to
    the chapters of the _Encheiridion_, and to the
    _Fragments_, in Schweighaeuser's edition of Epictetus.]
 
 
   BOOK I.
 
   Chap. I. 1            _Frag._ III.
   Chap. I. 2-5          _Diss._ II. xi. 1-25.
   Chap. II.             _Diss._ I. xxii. 1-16.
   Chap. III.            _Diss._ I. i. 1-17.
   Chap. IV. 1           _Diss._ III. iii. 1-4.
   Chap. IV. 2           _Diss._ I. xxix. 1-4 to [Greek: labe]
   Chap. IV. 3           _Diss._ I. xxv. 1-6.
   Chap. V.              _Ench._ I.
   Chap. VI.             _Diss._ II. xiv.
   Chap. VII. 1, 2       _Ench._ II.
   Chap. VII. 3          _Diss._ I. xv. 7, 8.
   Chap. VII. 4-6        _Diss._ II. ix. 1-12.
   Chap. VII. 7          _Frag._ LXXII.
   Chap. VII. 8          _Diss._ III. xiii. 20-23.
   Chap. VIII.           _Diss._ III. xxii.
 
 
   BOOK II.
 
   Chap. I.              _Diss._ II. xix.
   Chap. II. 1           _Frag._ LXIX.
   Chap. II. 2, 3        _Diss._ II. v. 1-9.
   Chap. II. 4           _Diss._ II. xvi. 15.
   Chap. II. 5, 6        _Diss._ II. vi. 9-19.
   Chap. II. 7, 8        _Diss._ II. v. 10-20.
   Chap. III. 1, 2       _Ench._ III., IV.
   Chap. III. 3          _Diss._ III. xix.
   Chap. III. 4, 5       _Ench._ V., VI.
   Chap. IV. 1, 2        _Diss._ III. ii. 1-10.
   Chap. V. 1-3          _Diss._ II. i. 1-20.
   Chap. V. 4            _Diss._ III. xxiv. 94.
   Chap. V. 5            _Diss._ II. i. 21-29.
   Chap. VI. 1           _Frag._ CLXXX.
   Chap. VI. 2           _Diss._ III. iii. 20-22.
   Chap. VII. 1-4        _Diss._ I. xxvii.
   Chap. VIII. 1         _Diss._ I. ix. 1-8.
   Chap. VIII. 2-6       _Diss._ III. xxvi. 1-36.
   Chap. IX. 1           _Diss._ I. ix. 10-18.
   Chap. IX. 2           _Diss._ I. xxv. 14-20.
   Chap. IX. 3           _Diss._ I. xxix. 29.
   Chap. X. 1-4          _Diss._ I. xix. 1-17.
   Chap. X. 5-6          _Diss._ IV. vii. 12-18.
   Chap. X. 7            _Diss._ I. xviii. 17.
   Chap. X. 8            _Diss._ IV. vii. 19-24.
   Chap. XI.             _Diss._ I. xviii. 1-16.
   Chap. XII.            _Ench._ VII.
   Chap. XIII. 1, 2      _Ench._ VIII.-IX.
   Chap. XIII. 3-6       _Diss._ II. xvi. 24-47.
   Chap. XIV.            _Ench._ X.
   Chap. XV.             _Ench._ XI.
   Chap. XVI.            _Ench._ XII.
   Chap. XVII.           _Ench._ XIII.
   Chap. XVIII. 1, 2     _Ench._ XIV.
   Chap. XVIII.    3     _Diss._ I. xxv. 22-25.
   Chap. XVIII.    4     _Ench._ XV.
   Chap. XIX.            _Ench._ XVI.
   Chap. XX. 1           _Ench._ XVII.
   Chap. XX. 2           _Diss._ IV. x. 9-17.
   Chap. XXI.            _Ench._ XVIII.-XXI.
   Chap. XXII.           _Ench._ XXII.-XXIII.
   Chap. XXIII.          _Ench._ XXIV.
   Chap. XXIV.           _Ench._ XXV.
   Chap. XXV.            _Ench._ XXVI., XXVII.
   Chap. XXVI.           _Ench._ XXVIII.
   Chap. XXVII.          _Ench._ XXIX.
 
 
   BOOK III.
 
   Chap. I.              _Ench._ XXX.
   Chap. II. 1, 2        _Diss._ I. xxiii.
   Chap. II. 3-7         _Diss._ II. v. 24-30.
   Chap. III. 1-9        _Diss._ II. xx. 1-27.
   Chap. IV. 1           _Diss._ I. xiii.
   Chap. IV. 2, 3        _Frag._ XLIII., XLIV.
   Chap. V.              _Diss._ III. vii.
   Chap. VI. 1           _Frag._ LXXXII.
   Chap. VI. 2           _Frag._ XLV.
   Chap. VI. 3           _Frag._ LXVII.
   Chap. VII.            _Diss._ II. xxii.
   Chap. VIII. 1-10      _Diss._ III. xxiv. 1-49.
   Chap. VIII. 11        _Diss._ III. xxiv. 58-63.
   Chap. VIII. 12        _Diss._ III. xxiv. 88-93.
   Chap. IX. 1, 2        _Diss._ III. xiii. 1-17.
   Chap. IX. 3           _Frag._ CLXXVI.
   Chap. IX. 4           _Diss._ III. xiii. 18, 19.
   Chap. X. 1            _Frag._ LXX.
   Chap. X. 2            _Diss._ IV. v. 1-4.
   Chap. X. 3-5          _Diss._ IV. v. 8-21.
   Chap. X. 6            _Diss._ IV. v. 30-32.
   Chap. X. 7            _Diss._ IV. v.  { 33 to [Greek: agnomonos].
                                         { 35-37.
 
   BOOK IV.
 
   Chap. I.              _Ench._ XXXI.
   Chap. II. 1, 2        _Diss._ I. xii. 1-7.
   Chap. II. 3, 4        _Diss._ I. xiv. 1-17.
   Chap. III.            _Diss._ I. xvi.
   Chap. IV. 1, 2        _Diss._ II. viii. 1-8.
   Chap. IV. 3           _Diss._ I. vi. 13 from [Greek: allo]--22.
   Chap. IV. 4-8         _Diss._ II. viii. 9-29.
   Chap. V.              _Ench._ XXXII.
 
 
   BOOK V.
 
   Chap. I. 1-5          _Ench._ XXXIII. 1-6,
   Chap. I. 6            _Diss._ III. xvi. 5-9.
   Chap. I. 7-16         _Ench._ XXXIII. 7-16.
   Chap. II. 1-4         _Diss._ II., xviii. 1-21 to [Greek: apothanonton]
   Chap. II. 5, 6        _Diss._ II. xviii. 23-32.
   Chap. II. 7           _Diss._ IV. xii. 19-21.
   Chap. III. 1, 2       _Diss._ II. xii. 1-4.
   Chap. III. 3, 4       _Diss._ II. xii. 17-25.
   Chap. IV.             _Ench._ XXXIV.
   Chap. V.              _Ench._ XXXV.
   Chap. VI.             _Ench._ XXXVI.
   Chap. VII. 1          _Ench._ XXXVII.
   Chap. VII. 2          _Diss._ I. ii. 30-32.
   Chap. VIII.           _Ench._ XXXVIII.
   Chap. IX.             _Ench._ XXXIX.
   Chap. X.              _Ench._ XL.
   Chap. XI.             _Ench._ XLI.
   Chap. XII. 1          _Diss._ III. i. 1-9.
   Chap. XII. 2          _Diss._ III. i. 40-44.
   Chap. XII. 3, 4       _Diss._ IV. xi. 22-29.
   Chap. XII. 5          _Diss._ IV. xi. 35, 36.
   Chap. XIII.           _Ench._ XLII.
   Chap. XIV.            _Ench._ XLIII.
   Chap. XV.             _Ench._ XLIV.
   Chap. XVI. 1, 2       _Ench._ XLV.
   Chap. XVI. 3          _Diss._ 1. xxviii. 1-9.
   Chap. XVI. 4          _Diss._ 1. xxviii. 11-25
   Chap. XVII.           _Ench._ XLVI.
   Chap. XVIII.          _Ench._ XLVII.
   Chap. XIX.            _Ench._ XLVIII.
   Chap. XX. 1           _Diss._ I. xvii. 1, 2.
   Chap. XX. 2-4         _Diss._ I. xvii. 4-12.
   Chap. XXI.            _Ench._ XLIX.
   Chap. XXII. 1, 2      _Diss._ II. xxiii. 1-10.
   Chap. XXII. 3-7       _Diss._ II. xxiii. 20-47.
   Chap. XXIII.          _Ench._ L.
   Chap. XXIV.           _Ench._ LI.
   Chap. XXV.            _Ench._ LII.
   Chap. XXVI.           _Ench._ LIII.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Stephen Hutcheson, Chris Curnow and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
                       The Library of Liberal Arts
                      OSKAR PIEST, _General Editor_
                              [NUMBER EIGHT]
 
 
                                EPICTETUS
                             The Enchiridion
 
 
 
 
                             The Enchiridion
                                    By
                                EPICTETUS
 
 
                              Translated by
                           THOMAS W. HIGGINSON
 
                         With an Introduction by
                              ALBERT SALOMON
                         _Professor of Sociology
                     New School for Social Research_
 
 
                          THE LIBERAL ARTS PRESS
                                 NEW YORK
 
 
                             COPYRIGHT, 1948
                       THE LIBERAL ARTS PRESS, INC.
 
                      First Edition, _October, 1948_
                                Reprinted
                     _December, 1950_; _August, 1954_
                     Second Edition, _November, 1955_
 
          Published at 153 West 72nd Street, New York 23, N. Y.
                 Printed in the United States of America
 
 
 
 
                                 CONTENTS
 
 
   Note on the Text                                                     6
   Introduction                                                         7
   Selected Bibliography                                               13
   The Enchiridion                                                     17
 
 
 
 
                             NOTE ON THE TEXT
 
 
 The text of the second edition is a reprint of the first edition except
 for a few minor corrections in style, punctuation, and spelling, which
 have been revised to conform to current American usage.
 
 The editorial staff of the publishers has added a few explanatory notes
 which are set in brackets and marked Ed.
 
                                                                     O.P.
 
 
 
 
                               INTRODUCTION
 
 
 The little book by Epictetus called _Enchiridion_ or manual has played
 a disproportionately large role in the rise of modern attitudes and
 modern philosophy. As soon as it had been translated into the vernacular
 languages, it became a bestseller among independent intellectuals, among
 anti-Christian thinkers, and among philosophers of a subjective cast.
 Montaigne had a copy of the _Enchiridion_ among his books. Pascal
 violently rejected the megalomaniac pride of the Stoic philosopher.
 Frederick the Great carried the book with him on all campaigns. It was a
 source of inspiration and encouragement to Anthony, Earl of Shaftesbury,
 in the serious illness which ended only in his death; many pages of his
 diaries contain passages copied from the _Enchiridion_. It has been
 studied and widely quoted by Scottish philosophers like Francis
 Hutcheson, Adam Smith, and Adam Ferguson who valued Stoic moral
 philosophy for its reconciliation of social dependency and personal
 independence.
 
 That there was a rebirth of Stoicism in the centuries of rebirth which
 marked the emergence of the modern age was not mere chance.
 Philosophical, moral, and social conditions of the time united to cause
 it. Roman Stoicism had been developed in times of despotism as a
 philosophy of lonely and courageous souls who had recognized the
 redeeming power of philosophical reason in all the moral and social
 purposes of life. Philosophy as a way of life makes men free. It is the
 last ditch stand of liberty in a world of servitude. Many elements in the
 new age led to thought which had structural affinity with Roman Stoicism.
 Modern times had created the independent thinker, the free intellectual
 in a secular civilization. Modern times had destroyed medieval liberties
 and had established the new despotism of the absolute state supported by
 ecclesiastical authority. Modern philosophies continued the basic trend
 in Stoicism in making the subjective consciousness the foundation of
 philosophy. The Stoic emphasis on moral problems was also appealing in an
 era of rapid transition when all the values which had previously been
 taken for granted were questioned and reconsidered.
 
 While it is interesting to observe how varied were the effects produced
 by this small volume, this epitome of the Stoic system of moral
 philosophy, these effects seem still more remarkable when we consider
 that it was not intended to be a philosophical treatise on Stoicism for
 students. It was, rather, to be a guide for the advanced student of
 Stoicism to show him the best roads toward the goal of becoming a true
 philosopher. Thus Epictetus and his _Enchiridion_ have a unique position
 in Roman Stoicism. Seneca and Marcus Aurelius had selected Stoic
 philosophy as the most adequate system for expressing their existential
 problems of independence, solitude, and history. In this enterprise,
 Seneca made tremendous strides toward the insights of social psychology
 as a by-product of his consciousness of decadence (in this he was close
 to Nietzsche), but he was not primarily concerned with the unity of the
 Stoic system. Marcus Aurelius changed the philosophical doctrine into the
 regimen of the lonesome ruler. In contrast to both, Epictetus was
 teaching Stoic philosophy as a doctrine and as a way of life. The
 _Enchiridion_ is a summary of theoretical and applied Stoicism.
 
 Epictetus was the son of a woman slave, born between 50 and 60 A.D. at
 Hieropolis in Phrygia. We do not know how he came to Rome. He was there
 as slave to one of Neros distinguished freedmen who served as the
 Emperors secretary. While still in service, Epictetus took courses with
 Musonius Rufus, the fashionable Stoic philosopher, who was impressed by
 the sincere and dynamic personality of the young slave and trained him to
 be a Stoic philosopher. Epictetus became a free man and began teaching
 philosophy on street corners, in the market, but he was not successful.
 During the rule of Domitian, Epictetus with many other philosophers was
 exiled from Rome, probably between 89 and 92 A.D. He went to Nicopolis,
 across Actium in Epirus, where he conducted his own school. He was so
 well regarded and highly esteemed that he established the reputation of
 the place as the town of Epictetus school. Students came from Athens and
 Rome to attend his classes. Private citizens came to ask his advice and
 guidance. Some of his students returned to their homes to enter the
 traditional careers to which they were socially obligated. Others assumed
 the philosophic way of life in order to escape into the sphere of Stoic
 freedom.
 
 Among the students was a young Roman, Flavius Arrian, who took courses at
 Nicopolis when Epictetus was already old. Flavius, who was born in 108
 A.D., was one of the intimates of Hadrian, who made him consul in 130
 A.D. He probably studied with Epictetus between the years 123 and 126
 A.D. The informal philosophical talks which Epictetus had with his
 students fascinated him. Needless to say there were also systematic
 courses in the fields of philosophy. But it was the informal discourses
 which convinced Arrian that he had finally discovered a Stoic Socrates or
 a Stoic Diogenes, who was not merely teaching a doctrine, but also living
 the truth. Arrian recorded many of the discourses and informal
 conversations of Epictetus with his intimate students. He took them down
 in shorthand in order not to lose the ineffable liveliness, grace, and
 wit of the beloved teacher. Arrian retired into private life after the
 death of Hadrian in 138 A.D. and dedicated himself to his literary work.
 He published his notes on Epictetus teaching under the title:
 _Discourses in Four Books_. The _Enchiridion_, which was also arranged by
 Arrian, is a brief summary of the basic ideas of Stoic philosophy and an
 introduction to the techniques required to transform Stoic philosophy
 into a way of life.
 
 Thus we do not have any original writings of Epictetus. Like G. H. Mead
 in recent times, he was completely dedicated to the human and
 intellectual problems of his students. He left it for them to preserve
 what they considered to be the lasting message of the teacher. In
 contrast to Seneca and Marcus Aurelius, Epictetus had no subjective
 approach to the Stoic doctrines. Moral philosophy was the center of his
 teaching, and epistemology was only instrumental. It is even permissible
 to say that he took physics or cosmology too lightly. If this is granted,
 we must admit that he is completely absorbed by the fundamentals of Stoic
 thought as presented in the _Enchiridion_. Epictetus personality is
 totally integrated in the act of reasoning which establishes conformity
 with nature.
 
 A remarkable difference between the _Discourses_ and the _Enchiridion_
 should be mentioned. The _Discourses_ are a living image of the teacher
 in action; they present the process of philosophizing, not the finished
 product. They show the enthusiastic and sober, the realistic and pathetic
 moralist in constantly changing perspectives determined by the changing
 students with their various concerns, problems, and questions; his
 teachings, his formulations, have direct reference to the various life
 situations in which the students should apply and practice the masters
 Stoic teaching. No human situation is omitted; as a guide to conduct,
 philosophy has relevance for all. Whether the students have to attend a
 dinner party, whether they are among competitors in a stadium or in a
 swimming pool, whether they have to present themselves at court or in an
 office, whether they are in the company of their mothers and sisters or
 of girl friends, in all human situations the philosopher knows the
 correct advice for the philosophical apprentice. Thus, in the
 _Discourses_, Arrian presents the unique individuality of the philosopher
 and of his applied moral method in living contact with various students
 in concrete situations. Epictetus as teacher anticipates very modern
 educational methods in his regard for the structure of situations and the
 changing perspectives in human relationships.
 
 Nothing like this is revealed in the _Enchiridion_. Gone is the Stoic
 philosopher as living spirit. What remains is the living spirit of
 Stoicism. The _Enchiridion_ is a manual for the combat officer. This
 analogy should be taken seriously. The Roman Stoics coined the formula:
 _Vivere militare!_ (Life is being a soldier.) The student of philosophy
 is a private, the advancing Stoic is a non-commissioned officer, and the
 philosopher is the combat officer. For this reason all Roman Stoics apply
 metaphors and images derived from military life. Apprentice students of
 Stoicism are described as messengers, as scouts of God, as
 representatives of divine nature. The advancing student who is close to
 the goal of being a philosopher has the rank of an officer. He is already
 able to establish inner freedom and independence. He understands the
 basic Stoic truth of subjective consciousness, which is to distinguish
 what is in our power from what is not in our power. Not in our power are
 all the elements which constitute our environment, such as wealth,
 health, reputation, social prestige, power, the lives of those we love,
 and death. In our power are our thinking, our intentions, our desires,
 our decisions. These make it possible for us to control ourselves and to
 make of ourselves elements and parts of the universe of nature. This
 knowledge of ourselves makes us free in a world of dependencies. This
 superiority of our powers enables us to live in conformity with nature.
 The rational philosophy of control of Self and of adjustment to the Whole
 implies an asceticism of the emotional and the sensitive life. The
 philosopher must examine and control his passions, his love, his
 tenderness at all times in order always to be ready for the inevitable
 moment of farewell. The Stoics practiced a Jesuitism _avant la lettre_.
 They were able to live in the world as if they did not live in it. To the
 Stoic, life is a military camp, a play on the stage, a banquet to which
 we are invited. The _Enchiridion_ briefly indicated the techniques which
 the philosopher should apply in acting well the diverse roles which God
 might assign to those whom he loves, the Stoic philosophers. From the
 rules of social conduct to the recommendations of sexual asceticism
 before marriage, and the method of true thinking, the advanced Stoic will
 find all principles of perfection and all precepts for realizing
 philosophical principles in his conduct in this tiny volume.
 
 Thus the _Enchiridion_ was liberating for all intellectuals who learned
 from it that there are philosophical ways of self-redemption. From its
 time, the secular thinker could feel jubilant because he was not in need
 of a divine grace. Epictetus had taught him that philosophical reason
 could make him free and that he was capable of redeeming himself by sound
 reasoning.
 
 In the Stoic distinctions of personality and world, of I and mine, of
 subjective consciousness and the world of objects, of freedom and
 dependence, we find implicit the basic elements of modern philosophies of
 rationalism and of objective idealism or pantheism. For this reason there
 is a continuous renascence of Stoicism from Descartes, Grotius, and
 Bishop Butler, to Montesquieu, Adam Smith, and Kant. In this long
 development in modern times, the tiny _Enchiridion_ of Epictetus played a
 remarkable part.
 
 The translations of Epictetus and of all other Stoics had the widest
 effect on philosophers, theologians, and lay thinkers. They were studied
 by the clergy of the various Christian denominations, by the scientists
 who were striving for a natural religion, and by the independent
 philosophers who were eager to separate philosophy from religion. There
 were many outstanding bishops in the Catholic and Anglican Churches who
 were eager to transform the traditions of Roman Stoicism into Christian
 Stoicism. Among the Calvinistic denominations were many thinkers who were
 in sympathy with Stoic moral principles because of their praise of the
 austerity of life and of the control of passions. Likewise the adherents
 of natural religion were propagating Stoicism as the ideal pattern of
 universally valid and intelligible religion. Renascent Stoicism had three
 functions in the rise of the modern world. First, it reconciled Christian
 traditions to modern rationalistic philosophies; secondly, it established
 an ideal pattern of natural religion; and, thirdly, it opened the way for
 the autonomy of morals.
 
                                                           ALBERT SALOMON
 
   The New School
     for Social Research
   _July, 1948_
 
 
 
 
                          SELECTED BIBLIOGRAPHY
 
 
                        _Epictetus: Life and Work_
 
 Arnim, Hans V., Epictetos in Pauli-Wissowa (ed), _Real-Encyclopaedie
         der classischen Altertumswissenschaft_, VI, col. 126-131.
 
 Arnold, E. V., Epictetus in Hastings, _Encyclopedia of Religion and
         Ethics_, 1912. Vol. V, pp. 323, 324.
 
 Bonhoeffer, A., _Epiktet und die Stoa_. Stuttgart, 1890.
 
 , _Ethik des Stoikers Epiktet_. Stuttgart, 1894.
 
 , _Epiktet und das Neue Testament_. Giessen, 1911.
 
 Bruns, Ivo, _De schola Epicteti_. Kiel, 1897.
 
 Bultmann, Rudolf, Das religise Moment in der ethischen Unterweisung des
         Epiktets und das Neue Testament, _Zeitschrift fr die
         neutestamentliche Wissenschaft und die Kunde des Urchristentums_,
         Vol. XIII, 1912; pp. 97-110; 177-191.
 
 Colardeau, Th., _Etude sur Epictte_. Paris, 1903.
 
 Hartmann, K., Arrian und Epiktet, _Neue Jahrbcher fr das klassische
         Altertum_, Vol. XV, 1905.
 
 Jagu, Amand, _Epictte et Platon_. Paris, 1944.
 
 Lagrange, M. J., La philosophie religieuse dEpictte et le
         Christianisme, _Revue Biblique_, Vol. IX, 1912; pp. 5-21,
         192-212.
 
 Oldfather, W. A., Introduction to _Epictetus_, Loeb Classics, Vol. I.
 
 Souilh, J., Introduction to _Entretiens_. Paris, 1943.
 
 Weber, Louis, La morale dEpictte et les besoins prsents de
         lenseignment moral, _Revue de Mtaphysique et de Morale_, 1905,
         pp. 830-858; 1906, pp. 342-360; 1907, pp. 327-347; 1909, pp.
         203-326.
 
 
              _Main Works on Stoicism and Related Problems_
 
 Arnold, E. V., _Roman Stoicism_. Cambridge, E., 1911.
 
 Bevan, E., _Stoics and Sceptics_. Oxford, 1913.
 
 Brochard, V., _Etudes de philosophie ancienne et de philosophie moderne_,
         Paris, 1912.
 
 Hicks, R. D., _Stoic and Epicurean_. New York, 1910.
 
 Martha, C., _Les moralistes sur lEmpire Romain_. Paris, 1886.
 
 Murray, Gilbert, _Stoic, Christian, Humanist_. London, 1940.
 
 Robin, L., _La morale antique_. Paris, 1938, pp. 57, 130, 152, 167.
 
 Wendland, Paul, _Philo und die cynisch-stoische Diatribe_. Berlin, 1895.
 
 , _Die hellenistische Kultur in ihren Beziehungen zum Judentum und
         Christentum_. Tbingen, 1912.
 
 Zanta, L., _La renaissance du Stoicisme au XVIime sicle_. Paris, 1914.
 
 Zeller, E., _The Stoics, Epicureans, and Sceptics_. London, 1892.
 
 
                         _Influence of Stoicism_
 
 Busson, Henry, _La pense religieuse Franaise de Charron  Pascal_.
         Paris, 1933. Chap. VIII: Stoiciens et Epicuriens, pp. 379-429.
 
 Dilthey, Wilhelm, _Gesammelte Werke_, Vol. II. Einfluss der Stoa auf die
         Ausbildung des natrlichen Systems der Geisteswissenschaften,
         pp. 153-162; Anthropologie, Stoa und natrliches System im XVII.
         Jahrhundert, pp. 439-457.
 
 Groethuysen, Bernard, _Philosophische Anthropologie_. Mnchen, 1928.
         (Chap. Die rmisch-griechische Lebensphilosophie.)
 
 Rand, B., _The Life, Letters, etc. of Anthony, Earl of Shaftesbury_.
         London, 1900.
 
 Saunders, Jason L., _Justus Lipsius. The Philosophy of Renaissance
         Stoicism_. New York, 1955.
 
 Wenley, R. M., _Stoicism and Its Influence_. New York, 1927.
 
 
 
 
                             THE ENCHIRIDION
 
 
                                    I
 
 There are things which are within our power, and there are things which
 are beyond our power. Within our power are opinion, aim, desire,
 aversion, and, in one word, whatever affairs are our own. Beyond our
 power are body, property, reputation, office, and, in one word, whatever
 are not properly our own affairs.
 
 Now the things within our power are by nature free, unrestricted,
 unhindered; but those beyond our power are weak, dependent, restricted,
 alien. Remember, then, that if you attribute freedom to things by nature
 dependent and take what belongs to others for your own, you will be
 hindered, you will lament, you will be disturbed, you will find fault
 both with gods and men. But if you take for your own only that which is
 your own and view what belongs to others just as it really is, then no
 one will ever compel you, no one will restrict you; you will find fault
 with no one, you will accuse no one, you will do nothing against your
 will; no one will hurt you, you will not have an enemy, nor will you
 suffer any harm.
 
 Aiming, therefore, at such great things, remember that you must not allow
 yourself any inclination, however slight, toward the attainment of the
 others; but that you must entirely quit some of them, and for the present
 postpone the rest. But if you would have these, and possess power and
 wealth likewise, you may miss the latter in seeking the former; and you
 will certainly fail of that by which alone happiness and freedom are
 procured.
 
 Seek at once, therefore, to be able to say to every unpleasing semblance,
 You are but a semblance and by no means the real thing. And then
 examine it by those rules which you have; and first and chiefly by this:
 whether it concerns the things which are within our own power or those
 which are not; and if it concerns anything beyond our power, be prepared
 to say that it is nothing to you.
 
 
                                    II
 
 Remember that desire demands the attainment of that of which you are
 desirous; and aversion demands the avoidance of that to which you are
 averse; that he who fails of the object of his desires is disappointed;
 and he who incurs the object of his aversion is wretched. If, then, you
 shun only those undesirable things which you can control, you will never
 incur anything which you shun; but if you shun sickness, or death, or
 poverty, you will run the risk of wretchedness. Remove [the habit of]
 aversion, then, from all things that are not within our power, and apply
 it to things undesirable which are within our power. But for the present,
 altogether restrain desire; for if you desire any of the things not
 within our own power, you must necessarily be disappointed; and you are
 not yet secure of those which are within our power, and so are legitimate
 objects of desire. Where it is practically necessary for you to pursue or
 avoid anything, do even this with discretion and gentleness and
 moderation.
 
 
                                   III
 
 With regard to whatever objects either delight the mind or contribute to
 use or are tenderly beloved, remind yourself of what nature they are,
 beginning with the merest trifles: if you have a favorite cup, that it is
 but a cup of which you are fond offor thus, if it is broken, you can
 bear it; if you embrace your child or your wife, that you embrace a
 mortaland thus, if either of them dies, you can bear it.
 
 
                                    IV
 
 When you set about any action, remind yourself of what nature the action
 is. If you are going to bathe, represent to yourself the incidents usual
 in the bathsome persons pouring out, others pushing in, others scolding,
 others pilfering. And thus you will more safely go about this action if
 you say to yourself, I will now go to bathe and keep my own will in
 harmony with nature. And so with regard to every other action. For thus,
 if any impediment arises in bathing, you will be able to say, It was not
 only to bathe that I desired, but to keep my will in harmony with nature;
 and I shall not keep it thus if I am out of humor at things that happen.
 
 
                                    V
 
 Men are disturbed not by things, but by the views which they take of
 things. Thus death is nothing terrible, else it would have appeared so to
 Socrates. But the terror consists in our notion of death, that it is
 terrible. When, therefore, we are hindered or disturbed, or grieved, let
 us never impute it to others, but to ourselvesthat is, to our own views.
 It is the action of an uninstructed person to reproach others for his own
 misfortunes; of one entering upon instruction, to reproach himself; and
 one perfectly instructed, to reproach neither others nor himself.
 
 
                                    VI
 
 Be not elated at any excellence not your own. If a horse should be
 elated, and say, I am handsome, it might be endurable. But when you are
 elated and say, I have a handsome horse, know that you are elated only
 on the merit of the horse. What then is your own? The use of the
 phenomena of existence. So that when you are in harmony with nature in
 this respect, you will be elated with some reason; for you will be elated
 at some good of your own.
 
 
                                   VII
 
 As in a voyage, when the ship is at anchor, if you go on shore to get
 water, you may amuse yourself with picking up a shellfish or a truffle in
 your way, but your thoughts ought to be bent toward the ship, and
 perpetually attentive, lest the captain should call, and then you must
 leave all these things, that you may not have to be carried on board the
 vessel, bound like a sheep; thus likewise in life, if, instead of a
 truffle or shellfish, such a thing as a wife or a child be granted you,
 there is no objection; but if the captain calls, run to the ship, leave
 all these things, and never look behind. But if you are old, never go far
 from the ship, lest you should be missing when called for.
 
 
                                   VIII
 
 Demand not that events should happen as you wish; but wish them to happen
 as they do happen, and you will go on well.
 
 
                                    IX
 
 Sickness is an impediment to the body, but not to the will unless itself
 pleases. Lameness is an impediment to the leg, but not to the will; and
 say this to yourself with regard to everything that happens. For you will
 find it to be an impediment to something else, but not truly to yourself.
 
 
                                    X
 
 Upon every accident, remember to turn toward yourself and inquire what
 faculty you have for its use. If you encounter a handsome person, you
 will find continence the faculty needed; if pain, then fortitude; if
 reviling, then patience. And when thus habituated, the phenomena of
 existence will not overwhelm you.
 
 
                                    XI
 
 Never say of anything, I have lost it, but, I have restored it. Has
 your child died? It is restored. Has your wife died? She is restored. Has
 your estate been taken away? That likewise is restored. But it was a bad
 man who took it. What is it to you by whose hands he who gave it has
 demanded it again? While he permits you to possess it, hold it as
 something not your own, as do travelers at an inn.
 
 
                                   XII
 
 If you would improve, lay aside such reasonings as these: If I neglect
 my affairs, I shall not have a maintenance; if I do not punish my
 servant, he will be good for nothing. For it were better to die of
 hunger, exempt from grief and fear, than to live in affluence with
 perturbation; and it is better that your servant should be bad than you
 unhappy.
 
 Begin therefore with little things. Is a little oil spilled or a little
 wine stolen? Say to yourself, This is the price paid for peace and
 tranquillity; and nothing is to be had for nothing. And when you call
 your servant, consider that it is possible he may not come at your call;
 or, if he does, that he may not do what you wish. But it is not at all
 desirable for him, and very undesirable for you, that it should be in his
 power to cause you any disturbance.
 
 
                                   XIII
 
 If you would improve, be content to be thought foolish and dull with
 regard to externals. Do not desire to be thought to know anything; and
 though you should appear to others to be somebody, distrust yourself. For
 be assured, it is not easy at once to keep your will in harmony with
 nature and to secure externals; but while you are absorbed in the one,
 you must of necessity neglect the other.
 
 
                                   XIV
 
 If you wish your children and your wife and your friends to live forever,
 you are foolish, for you wish things to be in your power which are not
 so, and what belongs to others to be your own. So likewise, if you wish
 your servant to be without fault, you are foolish, for you wish vice not
 to be vice but something else. But if you wish not to be disappointed in
 your desires, that is in your own power. Exercise, therefore, what is in
 your power. A mans master is he who is able to confer or remove whatever
 that man seeks or shuns. Whoever then would be free, let him wish
 nothing, let him decline nothing, which depends on others; else he must
 necessarily be a slave.
 
 
                                    XV
 
 Remember that you must behave as at a banquet. Is anything brought round
 to you? Put out your hand and take a moderate share. Does it pass by you?
 Do not stop it. Is it not yet come? Do not yearn in desire toward it, but
 wait till it reaches you. So with regard to children, wife, office,
 riches; and you will some time or other be worthy to feast with the gods.
 And if you do not so much as take the things which are set before you,
 but are able even to forego them, then you will not only be worthy to
 feast with the gods, but to rule with them also. For, by thus doing,
 Diogenes and Heraclitus, and others like them, deservedly became divine,
 and were so recognized.
 
 
                                   XVI
 
 When you see anyone weeping for grief, either that his son has gone
 abroad or that he has suffered in his affairs, take care not to be
 overcome by the apparent evil, but discriminate and be ready to say,
 What hurts this man is not this occurrence itselffor another man might
 not be hurt by itbut the view he chooses to take of it. As far as
 conversation goes, however, do not disdain to accommodate yourself to him
 and, if need be, to groan with him. Take heed, however, not to groan
 inwardly, too.
 
 
                                   XVII
 
 Remember that you are an actor in a drama of such sort as the Author
 choosesif short, then in a short one; if long, then in a long one. If it
 be his pleasure that you should enact a poor man, or a cripple, or a
 ruler, or a private citizen, see that you act it well. For this is your
 businessto act well the given part, but to choose it belongs to another.
 
 
                                  XVIII
 
 When a raven happens to croak unluckily, be not overcome by appearances,
 but discriminate and say, Nothing is portended to _me_, either to my
 paltry body, or property, or reputation, or children, or wife. But to
 _me_ all portents are lucky if I will. For whatsoever happens, it belongs
 to me to derive advantage therefrom.
 
 
                                   XIX
 
 You can be unconquerable if you enter into no combat in which it is not
 in your own power to conquer. When, therefore, you see anyone eminent in
 honors or power, or in high esteem on any other account, take heed not to
 be bewildered by appearances and to pronounce him happy; for if the
 essence of good consists in things within our own power, there will be no
 room for envy or emulation. But, for your part, do not desire to be a
 general, or a senator, or a consul, but to be free; and the only way to
 this is a disregard of things which lie not within our own power.
 
 
                                    XX
 
 Remember that it is not he who gives abuse or blows, who affronts, but
 the view we take of these things as insulting. When, therefore, anyone
 provokes you, be assured that it is your own opinion which provokes you.
 Try, therefore, in the first place, not to be bewildered by appearances.
 For if you once gain time and respite, you will more easily command
 yourself.
 
 
                                   XXI
 
 Let death and exile, and all other things which appear terrible, be daily
 before your eyes, but death chiefly; and you will never entertain an
 abject thought, nor too eagerly covet anything.
 
 
                                   XXII
 
 If you have an earnest desire toward philosophy, prepare yourself from
 the very first to have the multitude laugh and sneer, and say, He is
 returned to us a philosopher all at once; and, Whence this supercilious
 look? Now, for your part, do not have a supercilious look indeed, but
 keep steadily to those things which appear best to you, as one appointed
 by God to this particular station. For remember that, if you are
 persistent, those very persons who at first ridiculed will afterwards
 admire you. But if you are conquered by them, you will incur a double
 ridicule.
 
 
                                  XXIII
 
 If you ever happen to turn your attention to externals, for the pleasure
 of anyone, be assured that you have ruined your scheme of life. Be
 content, then, in everything, with being a philosopher; and if you wish
 to seem so likewise to anyone, appear so to yourself, and it will suffice
 you.
 
 
                                   XXIV
 
 Let not such considerations as these distress you: I shall live in
 discredit and be nobody anywhere. For if discredit be an evil, you can
 no more be involved in evil through another than in baseness. Is it any
 business of yours, then, to get power or to be admitted to an
 entertainment? By no means. How then, after all, is this discredit? And
 how it is true that you will be nobody anywhere when you ought to be
 somebody in those things only which are within your own power, in which
 you may be of the greatest consequence? But my friends will be
 unassisted. What do you mean by unassisted? They will not have money
 from you, nor will you make them Roman citizens. Who told you, then, that
 these are among the things within our own power, and not rather the
 affairs of others? And who can give to another the things which he
 himself has not? Well, but get them, then, that we too may have a
 share. If I can get them with the preservation of my own honor and
 fidelity and self-respect, show me the way and I will get them; but if
 you require me to lose my own proper good, that you may gain what is no
 good, consider how unreasonable and foolish you are. Besides, which would
 you rather have, a sum of money or a faithful and honorable friend?
 Rather assist me, then, to gain this character than require me to do
 those things by which I may lose it. Well, but my country, say you, as
 far as depends upon me, will be unassisted. Here, again, what assistance
 is this you mean? It will not have porticos nor baths of your providing?
 And what signifies that? Why, neither does a smith provide it with shoes,
 nor a shoemaker with arms. It is enough if everyone fully performs his
 own proper business. And were you to supply it with another faithful and
 honorable citizen, would not he be of use to it? Yes. Therefore neither
 are you yourself useless to it. What place, then, say you, shall I
 hold in the state? Whatever you can hold with the preservation of your
 fidelity and honor. But if, by desiring to be useful to that, you lose
 these, how can you serve your country when you have become faithless and
 shameless?
 
 
                                   XXV
 
 Is anyone preferred before you at an entertainment, or in courtesies, or
 in confidential intercourse? If these things are good, you ought to
 rejoice that he has them; and if they are evil, do not be grieved that
 you have them not. And remember that you cannot be permitted to rival
 others in externals without using the same means to obtain them. For how
 can he who will not haunt the door of any man, will not attend him, will
 not praise him, have an equal share with him who does these things? You
 are unjust, then, and unreasonable if you are unwilling to pay the price
 for which these things are sold, and would have them for nothing. For how
 much are lettuces sold? An obulus, for instance. If another, then, paying
 an obulus, takes the lettuces, and you, not paying it, go without them,
 do not imagine that he has gained any advantage over you. For as he has
 the lettuces, so you have the obulus which you did not give. So, in the
 present case, you have not been invited to such a persons entertainment
 because you have not paid him the price for which a supper is sold. It is
 sold for praise; it is sold for attendance. Give him, then, the value if
 it be for your advantage. But if you would at the same time not pay the
 one, and yet receive the other, you are unreasonable and foolish. Have
 you nothing, then, in place of the supper? Yes, indeed, you havenot to
 praise him whom you do not like to praise; not to bear the insolence of
 his lackeys.
 
 
                                   XXVI
 
 The will of nature may be learned from things upon which we are all
 agreed. As when our neighbors boy has broken a cup, or the like, we are
 ready at once to say, These are casualties that will happen; be
 assured, then, that when your own cup is likewise broken, you ought to be
 affected just as when anothers cup was broken. Now apply this to greater
 things. Is the child or wife of another dead? There is no one who would
 not say, This is an accident of mortality. But if anyones own child
 happens to die, it is immediately, Alas! how wretched am I! It should
 be always remembered how we are affected on hearing the same thing
 concerning others.
 
 
                                  XXVII
 
 As a mark[1] is not set up for the sake of missing the aim, so neither
 does the nature of evil exist in the world.
 
 
                                  XXVIII
 
 If a person had delivered up your body to some passer-by, you would
 certainly be angry. And do you feel no shame in delivering up your own
 mind to any reviler, to be disconcerted and confounded?
 
 
                                 XXIX[2]
 
 In every affair consider what precedes and what follows, and then
 undertake it. Otherwise you will begin with spirit, indeed, careless of
 the consequences, and when these are developed, you will shamefully
 desist. I would conquer at the Olympic Games. But consider what
 precedes and what follows, and then, if it be for your advantage, engage
 in the affair. You must conform to rules, submit to a diet, refrain from
 dainties; exercise your body, whether you choose it or not, at a stated
 hour, in heat and cold; you must drink no cold water, and sometimes no
 winein a word, you must give yourself up to your trainer as to a
 physician. Then, in the combat, you may be thrown into a ditch, dislocate
 your arm, turn your ankle, swallow an abundance of dust, receive stripes
 [for negligence], and, after all, lose the victory. When you have
 reckoned up all this, if your inclination still holds, set about the
 combat. Otherwise, take notice, you will behave like children who
 sometimes play wrestlers, sometimes gladiators, sometimes blow a trumpet,
 and sometimes act a tragedy, when they happen to have seen and admired
 these shows. Thus you too will be at one time a wrestler, and another a
 gladiator; now a philosopher, now an orator; but nothing in earnest. Like
 an ape you mimic all you see, and one thing after another is sure to
 please you, but is out of favor as soon as it becomes familiar. For you
 have never entered upon anything considerately; nor after having surveyed
 and tested the whole matter, but carelessly, and with a halfway zeal.
 Thus some, when they have seen a philosopher and heard a man speaking
 like Euphrates[3]though, indeed, who can speak like him?have a mind to
 be philosophers, too. Consider first, man, what the matter is, and what
 your own nature is able to bear. If you would be a wrestler, consider
 your shoulders, your back, your thighs; for different persons are made
 for different things. Do you think that you can act as you do and be a
 philosopher, that you can eat, drink, be angry, be discontented, as you
 are now? You must watch, you must labor, you must get the better of
 certain appetites, must quit your acquaintances, be despised by your
 servant, be laughed at by those you meet; come off worse than others in
 everythingin offices, in honors, before tribunals. When you have fully
 considered all these things, approach, if you pleasethat is, if, by
 parting with them, you have a mind to purchase serenity, freedom, and
 tranquillity. If not, do not come hither; do not, like children, be now a
 philosopher, then a publican, then an orator, and then one of Caesars
 officers. These things are not consistent. You must be one man, either
 good or bad. You must cultivate either your own reason or else externals;
 apply yourself either to things within or without youthat is, be either
 a philosopher or one of the mob.
 
 
                                   XXX
 
 Duties are universally measured by relations. Is a certain man your
 father? In this are implied taking care of him, submitting to him in all
 things, patiently receiving his reproaches, his correction. But he is a
 bad father. Is your natural tie, then, to a _good_ father? No, but to a
 father. Is a brother unjust? Well, preserve your own just relation toward
 him. Consider not what _he_ does, but what _you_ are to do to keep your
 own will in a state conformable to nature, for another cannot hurt you
 unless you please. You will then be hurt when you consent to be hurt. In
 this manner, therefore, if you accustom yourself to contemplate the
 relations of neighbor, citizen, commander, you can deduce from each the
 corresponding duties.
 
 
                                   XXXI
 
 Be assured that the essence of piety toward the gods lies in thisto form
 right opinions concerning them, as existing and as governing the universe
 justly and well. And fix yourself in this resolution, to obey them, and
 yield to them, and willingly follow them amidst all events, as being
 ruled by the most perfect wisdom. For thus you will never find fault with
 the gods, nor accuse them of neglecting you. And it is not possible for
 this to be affected in any other way than by withdrawing yourself from
 things which are not within our own power, and by making good or evil to
 consist only in those which are. For if you suppose any other things to
 be either good or evil, it is inevitable that, when you are disappointed
 of what you wish or incur what you would avoid, you should reproach and
 blame their authors. For every creature is naturally formed to flee and
 abhor things that appear hurtful and that which causes them; and to
 pursue and admire those which appear beneficial and that which causes
 them. It is impracticable, then, that one who supposes himself to be hurt
 should rejoice in the person who, as he thinks, hurts him, just as it is
 impossible to rejoice in the hurt itself. Hence, also, a father is
 reviled by his son when he does not impart the things which seem to be
 good; and this made Polynices and Eteocles[4] mutually enemiesthat
 empire seemed good to both. On this account the husbandman reviles the
 gods; [and so do] the sailor, the merchant, or those who have lost wife
 or child. For where our interest is, there, too, is piety directed. So
 that whoever is careful to regulate his desires and aversions as he ought
 is thus made careful of piety likewise. But it also becomes incumbent on
 everyone to offer libations and sacrifices and first fruits, according to
 the customs of his country, purely, and not heedlessly nor negligently;
 not avariciously, nor yet extravagantly.
 
 
                                  XXXII
 
 When you have recourse to divination, remember that you know not what the
 event will be, and you come to learn it of the diviner; but of what
 nature it is you knew before coming; at least, if you are of philosophic
 mind. For if it is among the things not within our own power, it can by
 no means be either good or evil. Do not, therefore, bring with you to the
 diviner either desire or aversionelse you will approach him
 tremblingbut first clearly understand that every event is indifferent
 and nothing to _you_, of whatever sort it may be; for it will be in your
 power to make a right use of it, and this no one can hinder. Then come
 with confidence to the gods as your counselors; and afterwards, when any
 counsel is given you, remember what counselors you have assumed, and
 whose advice you will neglect if you disobey. Come to divination as
 Socrates prescribed, in cases of which the whole consideration relates to
 the event, and in which no opportunities are afforded by reason or any
 other art to discover the matter in view. When, therefore, it is our duty
 to share the danger of a friend or of our country, we ought not to
 consult the oracle as to whether we shall share it with them or not. For
 though the diviner should forewarn you that the auspices are unfavorable,
 this means no more than that either death or mutilation or exile is
 portended. But we have reason within us; and it directs us, even with
 these hazards, to stand by our friend and our country. Attend, therefore,
 to the greater diviner, the Pythian God, who once cast out of the temple
 him who neglected to save his friend.[5]
 
 
                                  XXXIII
 
 Begin by prescribing to yourself some character and demeanor, such as you
 may preserve both alone and in company.
 
 Be mostly silent, or speak merely what is needful, and in few words. We
 may, however, enter sparingly into discourse sometimes, when occasion
 calls for it; but let it not run on any of the common subjects, as
 gladiators, or horse races, or athletic champions, or food, or drinkthe
 vulgar topics of conversationand especially not on men, so as either to
 blame, or praise, or make comparisons. If you are able, then, by your own
 conversation, bring over that of your company to proper subjects; but if
 you happen to find yourself among strangers, be silent.
 
 Let not your laughter be loud, frequent, or abundant.
 
 Avoid taking oaths, if possible, altogether; at any rate, so far as you
 are able.
 
 Avoid public and vulgar entertainments; but if ever an occasion calls you
 to them, keep your attention upon the stretch, that you may not
 imperceptibly slide into vulgarity. For be assured that if a person be
 ever so pure himself, yet, if his companion be corrupted, he who
 converses with him will be corrupted likewise.
 
 Provide things relating to the body no further than absolute need
 requires, as meat, drink, clothing, house, retinue. But cut off
 everything that looks toward show and luxury.
 
 Before marriage guard yourself with all your ability from unlawful
 intercourse with women; yet be not uncharitable or severe to those who
 are led into this, nor boast frequently that you yourself do otherwise.
 
 If anyone tells you that a certain person speaks ill of you, do not make
 excuses about what is said of you, but answer: He was ignorant of my
 other faults, else he would not have mentioned these alone.
 
 It is not necessary for you to appear often at public spectacles; but if
 ever there is a proper occasion for you to be there, do not appear more
 solicitous for any other than for yourselfthat is, wish things to be
 only just as they are, and only the best man to win; for thus nothing
 will go against you. But abstain entirely from acclamations and derision
 and violent emotions. And when you come away, do not discourse a great
 deal on what has passed and what contributes nothing to your own
 amendment. For it would appear by such discourse that you were dazzled by
 the show.
 
 Be not prompt or ready to attend private recitations; but if you do
 attend, preserve your gravity and dignity, and yet avoid making yourself
 disagreeable.
 
 When you are going to confer with anyone, and especially with one who
 seems your superior, represent to yourself how Socrates or Zeno[6] would
 behave in such a case, and you will not be at a loss to meet properly
 whatever may occur.
 
 When you are going before anyone in power, fancy to yourself that you may
 not find him at home, that you may be shut out, that the doors may not be
 opened to you, that he may not notice you. If, with all this, it be your
 duty to go, bear what happens and never say to yourself, It was not
 worth so much; for this is vulgar, and like a man bewildered by
 externals.
 
 In company, avoid a frequent and excessive mention of your own actions
 and dangers. For however agreeable it may be to yourself to allude to the
 risks you have run, it is not equally agreeable to others to hear your
 adventures. Avoid likewise an endeavor to excite laughter, for this may
 readily slide you into vulgarity, and, besides, may be apt to lower you
 in the esteem of your acquaintance. Approaches to indecent discourse are
 likewise dangerous. Therefore, when anything of this sort happens, use
 the first fit opportunity to rebuke him who makes advances that way, or,
 at least, by silence and blushing and a serious look show yourself to be
 displeased by such talk.
 
 
                                  XXXIV
 
 If you are dazzled by the semblance of any promised pleasure, guard
 yourself against being bewildered by it; but let the affair wait your
 leisure, and procure yourself some delay. Then bring to your mind both
 points of timethat in which you shall enjoy the pleasure, and that in
 which you will repent and reproach yourself, after you have enjoyed
 itand set before you, in opposition to these, how you will rejoice and
 applaud yourself if you abstain. And even though it should appear to you
 a seasonable gratification, take heed that its enticements and
 allurements and seductions may not subdue you, but set in opposition to
 this how much better it is to be conscious of having gained so great a
 victory.
 
 
                                   XXXV
 
 When you do anything from a clear judgment that it ought to be done,
 never shrink from being seen to do it, even though the world should
 misunderstand it; for if you are not acting rightly, shun the action
 itself; if you are, why fear those who wrongly censure you?
 
 
                                  XXXVI
 
 As the proposition, either it is day or it is night, has much force in
 a disjunctive argument, but none at all in a conjunctive one, so, at a
 feast, to choose the largest share is very suitable to the bodily
 appetite, but utterly inconsistent with the social spirit of the
 entertainment. Remember, then, when you eat with another, not only the
 value to the body of those things which are set before you, but also the
 value of proper courtesy toward your host.
 
 
                                  XXXVII
 
 If you have assumed any character beyond your strength, you have both
 demeaned yourself ill in that and quitted one which you might have
 supported.
 
 
                                 XXXVIII
 
 As in walking you take care not to tread upon a nail, or turn your foot,
 so likewise take care not to hurt the ruling faculty of your mind. And if
 we were to guard against this in every action, we should enter upon
 action more safely.
 
 
                                  XXXIX
 
 The body is to everyone the proper measure of its possessions, as the
 foot is of the shoe. If, therefore, you stop at this, you will keep the
 measure; but if you move beyond it, you must necessarily be carried
 forward, as down a precipice; as in the case of a shoe, if you go beyond
 its fitness to the foot, it comes first to be gilded, then purple, and
 then studded with jewels. For to that which once exceeds the fit measure
 there is no bound.
 
 
                                    XL
 
 Women from fourteen years old are flattered by men with the title of
 mistresses. Therefore, perceiving that they are regarded only as
 qualified to give men pleasure, they begin to adorn themselves, and in
 that to place all their hopes. It is worth while, therefore, to try that
 they may perceive themselves honored only so far as they appear beautiful
 in their demeanor and modestly virtuous.
 
 
                                   XLI
 
 It is a mark of want of intellect to spend much time in things relating
 to the body, as to be immoderate in exercises, in eating and drinking,
 and in the discharge of other animal functions. These things should be
 done incidentally and our main strength be applied to our reason.
 
 
                                   XLII
 
 When any person does ill by you, or speaks ill of you, remember that he
 acts or speaks from an impression that it is right for him to do so. Now
 it is not possible that he should follow what appears right to you, but
 only what appears so to himself. Therefore, if he judges from false
 appearances, he is the person hurt, since he, too, is the person
 deceived. For if anyone takes a true proposition to be false, the
 proposition is not hurt, but only the man is deceived. Setting out, then,
 from these principles, you will meekly bear with a person who reviles
 you, for you will say upon every occasion, It seemed so to him.
 
 
                                  XLIII
 
 Everything has two handles: one by which it may be borne, another by
 which it cannot. If your brother acts unjustly, do not lay hold on the
 affair by the handle of his injustice, for by that it cannot be borne,
 but rather by the oppositethat he is your brother, that he was brought
 up with you; and thus you will lay hold on it as it is to be borne.
 
 
                                   XLIV
 
 These reasonings have no logical connection: I am richer than you,
 therefore I am your superior. I am more eloquent than you, therefore I
 am your superior. The true logical connection is rather this: I am
 richer than you, therefore my possessions must exceed yours. I am more
 eloquent than you, therefore my style must surpass yours. But you, after
 all, consist neither in property nor in style.
 
 
                                   XLV
 
 Does anyone bathe hastily? Do not say that he does it ill, but hastily.
 Does anyone drink much wine? Do not say that he does ill, but that he
 drinks a great deal. For unless you perfectly understand his motives, how
 should you know if he acts ill? Thus you will not risk yielding to any
 appearances but such as you fully comprehend.
 
 
                                   XLVI
 
 Never proclaim yourself a philosopher, nor make much talk among the
 ignorant about your principles, but show them by actions. Thus, at an
 entertainment, do not discourse how people ought to eat, but eat as you
 ought. For remember that thus Socrates also universally avoided all
 ostentation. And when persons came to him and desired to be introduced by
 him to philosophers, he took them and introduced them; so well did he
 bear being overlooked. So if ever there should be among the ignorant any
 discussion of principles, be for the most part silent. For there is great
 danger in hastily throwing out what is undigested. And if anyone tells
 you that you know nothing, and you are not nettled at it, then you may be
 sure that you have really entered on your work. For sheep do not hastily
 throw up the grass to show the shepherds how much they have eaten, but,
 inwardly digesting their food, they produce it outwardly in wool and
 milk. Thus, therefore, do you not make an exhibition before the ignorant
 of your principles, but of the actions to which their digestion gives
 rise.
 
 
                                  XLVII
 
 When you have learned to nourish your body frugally, do not pique
 yourself upon it; nor, if you drink water, be saying upon every occasion,
 I drink water. But first consider how much more frugal are the poor
 than we, and how much more patient of hardship. If at any time you would
 inure yourself by exercise to labor and privation, for your own sake and
 not for the public, do not attempt great feats; but when you are
 violently thirsty, just rinse your mouth with water, and tell nobody.
 
 
                                  XLVIII
 
 The condition and characteristic of a vulgar person is that he never
 looks for either help or harm from himself, but only from externals. The
 condition and characteristic of a philosopher is that he looks to himself
 for all help or harm. The marks of a proficient are that he censures no
 one, praises no one, blames no one, accuses no one; says nothing
 concerning himself as being anybody or knowing anything. When he is in
 any instance hindered or restrained, he accuses himself; and if he is
 praised, he smiles to himself at the person who praises him; and if he is
 censured, he makes no defense. But he goes about with the caution of a
 convalescent, careful of interference with anything that is doing well
 but not yet quite secure. He restrains desire; he transfers his aversion
 to those things only which thwart the proper use of our own will; he
 employs his energies moderately in all directions; if he appears stupid
 or ignorant, he does not care; and, in a word, he keeps watch over
 himself as over an enemy and one in ambush.
 
 
                                   XLIX
 
 When anyone shows himself vain on being able to understand and interpret
 the works of Chrysippus,[7] say to yourself: Unless Chrysippus had
 written obscurely, this person would have had nothing to be vain of. But
 what do I desire? To understand nature, and follow her. I ask, then, who
 interprets her; and hearing that Chrysippus does, I have recourse to him.
 I do not understand his writings. I seek, therefore, one to interpret
 _them_. So far there is nothing to value myself upon. And when I find an
 interpreter, what remains is to make use of his instructions. This alone
 is the valuable thing. But if I admire merely the interpretation, what do
 I become more than a grammarian, instead of a philosopher, except,
 indeed, that instead of Homer I interpret Chrysippus? When anyone,
 therefore, desires me to read Chrysippus to him, I rather blush when I
 cannot exhibit actions that are harmonious and consonant with his
 discourse.
 
 
                                    L
 
 Whatever rules you have adopted, abide by them as laws, and as if you
 would be impious to transgress them; and do not regard what anyone says
 of you, for this, after all, is no concern of yours. How long, then, will
 you delay to demand of yourself the noblest improvements, and in no
 instance to transgress the judgments of reason? You have received the
 philosophic principles with which you ought to be conversant; and you
 have been conversant with them. For what other master, then, do you wait
 as an excuse for this delay in self-reformation? You are no longer a boy
 but a grown man. If, therefore, you will be negligent and slothful, and
 always add procrastination to procrastination, purpose to purpose, and
 fix day after day in which you will attend to yourself, you will
 insensibly continue to accomplish nothing and, living and dying, remain
 of vulgar mind. This instant, then, think yourself worthy of living as a
 man grown up and a proficient. Let whatever appears to be the best be to
 you an inviolable law. And if any instance of pain or pleasure, glory or
 disgrace, be set before you, remember that now is the combat, now the
 Olympiad comes on, nor can it be put off; and that by one failure and
 defeat honor may be lost orwon. Thus Socrates became perfect, improving
 himself by everything, following reason alone. And though you are not yet
 a Socrates, you ought, however, to live as one seeking to be a Socrates.
 
 
                                    LI
 
 The first and most necessary topic in philosophy is the practical
 application of principles, as, _We ought not to lie_; the second is that
 of demonstrations as, _Why it is that we ought not to lie_; the third,
 that which gives strength and logical connection to the other two, as,
 _Why this is a demonstration_. For what is demonstration? What is a
 consequence? What a contradiction? What truth? What falsehood? The third
 point is then necessary on account of the second; and the second on
 account of the first. But the most necessary, and that whereon we ought
 to rest, is the first. But we do just the contrary. For we spend all our
 time on the third point and employ all our diligence about that, and
 entirely neglect the first. Therefore, at the same time that we lie, we
 are very ready to show how it is demonstrated that lying is wrong.
 
 Upon all occasions we ought to have these maxims ready at hand:
 
   Conduct me, Zeus, and thou, O Destiny,
   Wherever your decrees have fixed my lot.
   I follow cheerfully; and, did I not,
   Wicked and wretched, I must follow still.[8]
 
   Whoer yields properly to Fate is deemed
   Wise among men, and knows the laws of Heaven.[9]
 
 And this third:
 
   O Crito, if it thus pleases the gods, thus let it be.[10]
 
   Anytus and Melitus may kill me indeed; but hurt me they cannot.[11]
 
 
 
 
                                Footnotes
 
 
 [1]Happiness, the effect of virtue, is the mark which God has set up for
    us to aim at. Our missing it is no work of His; nor so properly
    anything real, as a mere negative and failure of our own.
 
 [2][Chapter XV of the third book of the _Discourses_, which, with the
    exception of some very trifling differences, is the same as chapter
    XXIX of the _Enchiridion_.Ed.]
 
 [3]Euphrates was a philosopher of Syria, whose character is described,
    with the highest encomiums, by Pliny the Younger, _Letters_ I. 10.
 
 [4][The two inimical sons of Oedipus, who killed each other in
    battle.Ed.]
 
 [5][This refers to an anecdote given in full by Simplicius, in his
    commentary on this passage, of a man assaulted and killed on his way
    to consult the oracle, while his companion, deserting him, took refuge
    in the temple till cast out by the Deity.Tr.]
 
 [6][Reference is to Zeno of Cyprus (335-263 B.C.), the founder of the
    Stoic school.Ed.]
 
 [7][Chrysippus (_c._ 280-207 B.C.) was a Stoic philosopher who became
    head of the Stoa after Cleanthes. His works, which are lost, were most
    influential and were generally accepted as the authoritative
    interpretation of orthodox Stoic philosophy.Ed.]
 
 [8]Cleanthes, in Diogenes Laertius, quoted also by Seneca, _Epistle_ 107.
 
 [9]Euripides, Fragments.
 
 [10]Plato, _Crito_, Chap. XVII.
 
 [11]Plato, _Apology_, Chap. XVIII.
 
 
 
 
                       The Library of Liberal Arts
 
 
   Aeschylus: _Prometheus Bound_. Tr. E. B. Browning. (LLA 24)        .40
   *Alembert, d: _Introduction to the Encyclopdie of 1751_. Tr. T.
           D. Lockwood. (LLA 88)                                      .80
   *Aristotle: _Nicomachean Ethics_. Tr. M. Ostwald. (LLA 75)         .80
   : _On the Art of Poetry_. Tr. S. H. Butcher. (LLA 6)             .50
   *: _On Poetry and Style_. Tr. G. M. A. Grube. (LLA 68)           .75
   Augustine: _On Christian Doctrine_. Tr. D. W. Robertson, Jr. (LLA
           80)                                                        .95
   *Bacon: _The New Organon_. (LLA 97)                               1.00
   *Beccaria: _Of Crimes and Punishments_. Tr. H. Paolucci & V.
           Caporale. (LLA 107)                                        .60
   Bergson: _An Introduction to Metaphysics_. Tr. T. E. Hulme. (LLA
           10)                                                        .40
   *Berkeley: _An Essay Toward a New Theory of Vision & The Theory
           of Vision Vindicated_. (LLA 83)                            .80
   : _A Treatise Concerning the Principles of Human Knowledge_.
           (LLA 53)                                                   .75
   : _Three Dialogues between Hylas and Philonous_. (LLA 39)        .75
   _Boccaccio on Poetry._ Tr. C. G. Osgood. (LLA 82)     _cl. $3.50_ 1.25
   *Boethius: _The Consolation of Philosophy_. Tr. R. H. Green. (LLA
           86)                                                        .95
   Bonaventura: _The Minds Road to God_. Tr. G. Boas. (LLA 32)       .50
   Bowman: _The Absurdity of Christianity and Other Essays_. (LLA
           56)                                                        .75
   Bradley: _Ethical Studies (Selected Essays)_. (LLA 28) _cl. $2.00_ .85
   *Burke: _On the Sublime and Beautiful_. (LLA 99)                   .90
   : _Reflections on the Revolution in France_. (LLA 46)
                                                         _cl. $3.50_ 1.25
   Butler: _Five Sermons_. (LLA 21)                                   .60
   Calvin: _On the Christian Faith_. (LLA 93)                         .95
   : _On God and Political Duty_. (LLA 23)                          .60
   *_The Cid._ Tr. J. G. Markley. (LLA 77)                            .75
   Cornford: _Plato and Parmenides_. (LLA 102)                       1.60
   : _Platos Cosmology_. (LLA 101)                                1.75
   : _Platos Theory of Knowledge_. (LLA 100)                      1.75
   *Dante: _De vulgari eloquentia_. Tr. W. T. H. Jackson. (LLA 85)    .60
   : _On World-Government (De Monarchia)_. Tr. H. W. Schneider.
           (LLA 15)                                                   .60
   Descartes: _Discourse on Method_. Tr. L. J. Lafleur. (LLA 19)      .50
   *: _Discourse on Method and Meditations_. Tr. L. J. Lafleur.
           (LLA 89)                                                   .90
   : _Meditations_. Tr. L. J. Lafleur. (LLA 29)                     .60
   Dostoevski: _The Grand Inquisitor on the Nature of Man_. Tr. C.
           Garnett. (LLA 63)                                          .40
   *Dryden: _An Essay of Dramatic Poesy_. (LLA 104)                   .60
   Emerson: _Nature_. (LLA 2)                                         .40
   Epictetus: _The Enchiridion_. Tr. T. W. Higginson. (LLA 8)         .40
   Erasmus: _Ten Colloquies of Erasmus_. Tr. C. R. Thompson. (LLA
           48)                                            _cl. $3.00_ .90
   Euripides: _Electra_. Tr. M. Hadas. (LLA 26)                       .40
   Fichte: _The Vocation of Man_. Tr. W. Smith. (LLA 50)              .75
   Goethe: _Faust I._ Tr. B. Q. Morgan. (LLA 33)          _cl. $2.50_ .75
   Grotius: _Prolegomena to the Law of War and Peace_. Tr. F. W.
           Kelsey. (LLA 65)                                           .50
   Hanslick: _The Beautiful in Music_. (LLA 45)           _cl. $2.50_ .80
   Harrington: _The Political Writings of James Harrington_. (LLA
           38)                                            _cl. $3.00_ .90
   Hegel: _Reason in History_. Tr. R. S. Hartman. (LLA 35)
                                                          _cl. $2.75_ .75
   Hesiod: _Theogony_. Tr. N. O. Brown. (LLA 36)                      .50
   Hobbes: _Leviathan I-II_. (LLA 69)                                1.00
   *Hume.: _David Humes Literary Essays_. (LLA 84)                   .90
   : _David Humes Political Essays_. (LLA 34)          _cl. $3.00_ .90
   : _An Inquiry Concerning Human Understanding_. (LLA 49)          .80
   : _An Inquiry Concerning the Principles of Morals_. (LLA 62)     .75
   *Kant: _Critique of the Aesthetic Judgment_. Tr. W. Cerf. (LLA
           73)                                                       1.25
   : _Critique of Practical Reason_. Tr. L. W. Beck. (LLA 52)       .90
   : _Fundamental Principles of the Metaphysic of Morals_. Tr. T.
           K. Abbott. (LLA 16)                                        .60
   : _Perpetual Peace_. Tr. M. C. Smith. (LLA 3)                    .45
   : _Perpetual Peace_. Tr. L. W. Beck. (LLA 54)                    .50
   *: _Perpetual Peace and the Idea of a Universal Commonwealth_.
           Tr. L. W. Beck. (LLA 96)                                   .75
   *: _Philosophy of Right_. Tr. J. Ladd. (LLA 72)                 1.25
   : _Prolegomena to Any Future Metaphysics_. Tr. Mahaffy-Carus;
           rev. L. W. Beck. (LLA 27)                      _cl. $2.00_ .85
   *: _Religion within the Limits of Reason_. Tr. T. M. Green.
           (LLA 108)                                     _cl. $3.50_ 1.00
   Kleist: _The Prince of Homburg_. Tr. C. E. Passage. (LLA 60)       .75
   *Le Bon: _Mass Psychology (The Crowd)_. (LLA 90)                   .80
   *Leibniz: _Monadology and Other Philosophical Essays_. Tr. P. &
           A. Schrecker. (LLA 94)                                     .90
   *Lessing: _Laocon_. Tr. E. A. McCormick. (LLA 78)                 .95
   _The Life of Lazarillo de Tormes._ Tr. J. G. Markley. (LLA 37)     .50
   Locke: _A Letter Concerning Toleration_. (LLA 22)                  .40
   : _The Second Treatise of Government_. (LLA 31)      _cl. $2.50_ .80
   Longinus: _On Great Writing (On the Sublime)_. Tr. G. M. A.
           Grube. (LLA 79)                                            .60
   Machiavelli: _Mandragola_. Tr. A. & H. Paolucci. (LLA 58)          .60
   Mill, J.: _An Essay on Government_. (LLA 47)                       .50
   Mill, J. S.: _Autobiography_. (LLA 91)                             .90
   *: _Nature and Utility of Religion; Two Essays_. (LLA 81)        .60
   : _On Liberty_. (LLA 61)                                         .65
   : _Considerations on Representative Government_. (LLA 71)        .90
   Mill, J. S. (contd): _Theism_. (LLA 64)                           .75
   : _Utilitarianism_. (LLA 1)                                      .50
   *Moliere: _Tartuffe_. Tr. R. W. Hartle. (LLA 87)                   .50
   Nietzsche: _The Use and Abuse of History_. (LLA 11)                .50
   Paine: _The Age of Reason_. (LLA 5)                                .50
   Plato: _Euthyphro, Apology, Crito_. Tr. F. J. Church. (LLA 4)      .50
   : _Gorgias_. Tr. W. C. Helmbold. (LLA 20)                        .75
   : _Meno_. Tr. B. Jowett. (LLA 12)                                .40
   : _Phaedo_. Tr. F. J. Church. (LLA 30)                           .50
   : _Phaedrus_. Tr. W. C. Helmbold & W. G. Rabinowitz. (LLA 40)    .60
   *: _Philebus_. Tr. K. Herbert. (LLA 41)                          .75
   : _Protagoras_. Tr. B. Jowett. (LLA 59)                          .75
   : _Statesman_. Tr. J. B. Skemp. (LLA 57)                         .75
   : _Symposium_. Tr. B. Jowett. (LLA 7)                            .40
   *: _Theaetetus_. Tr. F. M. Cornford. (LLA 105)                   .80
   : _Timaeus_. Tr. F. M. Cornford. (LLA 106)                       .80
   Plautus: _The Haunted House (Mostellaria)_. Tr. F. O. Copley.
           (LLA 42)                                                   .45
   : _The Menaechmi_. Tr. F. O. Copley. (LLA 17)                    .45
   : _The Rope (Rudens)_. Tr. F. O. Copley. (LLA 43)                .45
   *Pope: _Essay on Man_. (LLA 103)                                   .50
   Post: _Significant Cases in British Constitutional Law_. (LLA 66)
                                                         _cl. $3.50_ 1.25
   *Rousseau: _Two Discourses_. Tr. V. Gourevitch. (LLA 109)          .80
   *Russell: _Selected Essays_. (LLA 74)                              .90
   Schneider: _Sources of Contemporary Philosophical Realism in
           America_. (LLA 92)                                         .60
   *Schopenhauer: _Essay on the Freedom of the Will_. Tr. K.
           Kolenda. (LLA 70)                                          .80
   Seneca: _Medea_. Tr. M. Hadas. (LLA 55)                            .45
   : _Oedipus_. Tr. M. Hadas. (LLA 44)                              .45
   : _Thyestes_. Tr. M. Hadas. (LLA 76)                             .45
   *Shelley: _Defence of Poetry_. (LLA 98)                            .50
   Sophocles: _Electra_. Tr. R. C. Jebb. (LLA 25)                     .40
   Spinoza: _On the Improvement of the Understanding_. Tr. J. Katz.
           (LLA 67)                                                   .50
   Terence: _Phormio_. Tr. F. O. Copley. (LLA 95)                     .45
   : _The Woman of Andros_. Tr. F. O. Copley. (LLA 18)              .45
   *Tolstoy: _What Is Art?_ Tr. A. Maude. (LLA 51)                    .90
   Whitman: _Democratic Vistas_. (LLA 9)                              .50
 
 
                 (_Complete catalogue sent upon request_)
 
 * _In preparation._
 
 
                       THE LIBERAL ARTS PRESS, INC.
                  153 W. 72nd Street, New York 23, N. Y.
 
 
 
 
                           Transcribers Notes
 
 
 --Retained copyright information from the printed edition, althogh this
   text is public-domain in the country of publication.
 
 --Silently corrected several palpable typos.
 
 --Provided an original cover, released for unrestricted use with this
   Distributed-Proofreaders eBook.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Stephen Hutcheson, Chris Curnow and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
                       The Library of Liberal Arts
                      OSKAR PIEST, _General Editor_
                              [NUMBER EIGHT]
 
 
                                EPICTETUS
                             The Enchiridion
 
 
 
 
                             The Enchiridion
                                    By
                                EPICTETUS
 
 
                              Translated by
                           THOMAS W. HIGGINSON
 
                         With an Introduction by
                              ALBERT SALOMON
                         _Professor of Sociology
                     New School for Social Research_
 
 
                          THE LIBERAL ARTS PRESS
                                 NEW YORK
 
 
                             COPYRIGHT, 1948
                       THE LIBERAL ARTS PRESS, INC.
 
                      First Edition, _October, 1948_
                                Reprinted
                     _December, 1950_; _August, 1954_
                     Second Edition, _November, 1955_
 
          Published at 153 West 72nd Street, New York 23, N. Y.
                 Printed in the United States of America
 
 
 
 
                                 CONTENTS
 
 
   Note on the Text                                                     6
   Introduction                                                         7
   Selected Bibliography                                               13
   The Enchiridion                                                     17
 
 
 
 
                             NOTE ON THE TEXT
 
 
 The text of the second edition is a reprint of the first edition except
 for a few minor corrections in style, punctuation, and spelling, which
 have been revised to conform to current American usage.
 
 The editorial staff of the publishers has added a few explanatory notes
 which are set in brackets and marked "Ed."
 
                                                                     O.P.
 
 
 
 
                               INTRODUCTION
 
 
 The little book by Epictetus called _Enchiridion_ or "manual" has played
 a disproportionately large role in the rise of modern attitudes and
 modern philosophy. As soon as it had been translated into the vernacular
 languages, it became a bestseller among independent intellectuals, among
 anti-Christian thinkers, and among philosophers of a subjective cast.
 Montaigne had a copy of the _Enchiridion_ among his books. Pascal
 violently rejected the megalomaniac pride of the Stoic philosopher.
 Frederick the Great carried the book with him on all campaigns. It was a
 source of inspiration and encouragement to Anthony, Earl of Shaftesbury,
 in the serious illness which ended only in his death; many pages of his
 diaries contain passages copied from the _Enchiridion_. It has been
 studied and widely quoted by Scottish philosophers like Francis
 Hutcheson, Adam Smith, and Adam Ferguson who valued Stoic moral
 philosophy for its reconciliation of social dependency and personal
 independence.
 
 That there was a rebirth of Stoicism in the centuries of rebirth which
 marked the emergence of the modern age was not mere chance.
 Philosophical, moral, and social conditions of the time united to cause
 it. Roman Stoicism had been developed in times of despotism as a
 philosophy of lonely and courageous souls who had recognized the
 redeeming power of philosophical reason in all the moral and social
 purposes of life. Philosophy as a way of life makes men free. It is the
 last ditch stand of liberty in a world of servitude. Many elements in the
 new age led to thought which had structural affinity with Roman Stoicism.
 Modern times had created the independent thinker, the free intellectual
 in a secular civilization. Modern times had destroyed medieval liberties
 and had established the new despotism of the absolute state supported by
 ecclesiastical authority. Modern philosophies continued the basic trend
 in Stoicism in making the subjective consciousness the foundation of
 philosophy. The Stoic emphasis on moral problems was also appealing in an
 era of rapid transition when all the values which had previously been
 taken for granted were questioned and reconsidered.
 
 While it is interesting to observe how varied were the effects produced
 by this small volume, this epitome of the Stoic system of moral
 philosophy, these effects seem still more remarkable when we consider
 that it was not intended to be a philosophical treatise on Stoicism for
 students. It was, rather, to be a guide for the advanced student of
 Stoicism to show him the best roads toward the goal of becoming a true
 philosopher. Thus Epictetus and his _Enchiridion_ have a unique position
 in Roman Stoicism. Seneca and Marcus Aurelius had selected Stoic
 philosophy as the most adequate system for expressing their existential
 problems of independence, solitude, and history. In this enterprise,
 Seneca made tremendous strides toward the insights of social psychology
 as a by-product of his consciousness of decadence (in this he was close
 to Nietzsche), but he was not primarily concerned with the unity of the
 Stoic system. Marcus Aurelius changed the philosophical doctrine into the
 regimen of the lonesome ruler. In contrast to both, Epictetus was
 teaching Stoic philosophy as a doctrine and as a way of life. The
 _Enchiridion_ is a summary of theoretical and applied Stoicism.
 
 Epictetus was the son of a woman slave, born between 50 and 60 A.D. at
 Hieropolis in Phrygia. We do not know how he came to Rome. He was there
 as slave to one of Nero's distinguished freedmen who served as the
 Emperor's secretary. While still in service, Epictetus took courses with
 Musonius Rufus, the fashionable Stoic philosopher, who was impressed by
 the sincere and dynamic personality of the young slave and trained him to
 be a Stoic philosopher. Epictetus became a free man and began teaching
 philosophy on street corners, in the market, but he was not successful.
 During the rule of Domitian, Epictetus with many other philosophers was
 exiled from Rome, probably between 89 and 92 A.D. He went to Nicopolis,
 across Actium in Epirus, where he conducted his own school. He was so
 well regarded and highly esteemed that he established the reputation of
 the place as the town of Epictetus' school. Students came from Athens and
 Rome to attend his classes. Private citizens came to ask his advice and
 guidance. Some of his students returned to their homes to enter the
 traditional careers to which they were socially obligated. Others assumed
 the philosophic way of life in order to escape into the sphere of Stoic
 freedom.
 
 Among the students was a young Roman, Flavius Arrian, who took courses at
 Nicopolis when Epictetus was already old. Flavius, who was born in 108
 A.D., was one of the intimates of Hadrian, who made him consul in 130
 A.D. He probably studied with Epictetus between the years 123 and 126
 A.D. The informal philosophical talks which Epictetus had with his
 students fascinated him. Needless to say there were also systematic
 courses in the fields of philosophy. But it was the informal discourses
 which convinced Arrian that he had finally discovered a Stoic Socrates or
 a Stoic Diogenes, who was not merely teaching a doctrine, but also living
 the truth. Arrian recorded many of the discourses and informal
 conversations of Epictetus with his intimate students. He took them down
 in shorthand in order not to lose the ineffable liveliness, grace, and
 wit of the beloved teacher. Arrian retired into private life after the
 death of Hadrian in 138 A.D. and dedicated himself to his literary work.
 He published his notes on Epictetus' teaching under the title:
 _Discourses in Four Books_. The _Enchiridion_, which was also arranged by
 Arrian, is a brief summary of the basic ideas of Stoic philosophy and an
 introduction to the techniques required to transform Stoic philosophy
 into a way of life.
 
 Thus we do not have any original writings of Epictetus. Like G. H. Mead
 in recent times, he was completely dedicated to the human and
 intellectual problems of his students. He left it for them to preserve
 what they considered to be the lasting message of the teacher. In
 contrast to Seneca and Marcus Aurelius, Epictetus had no subjective
 approach to the Stoic doctrines. Moral philosophy was the center of his
 teaching, and epistemology was only instrumental. It is even permissible
 to say that he took physics or cosmology too lightly. If this is granted,
 we must admit that he is completely absorbed by the fundamentals of Stoic
 thought as presented in the _Enchiridion_. Epictetus' personality is
 totally integrated in the act of reasoning which establishes conformity
 with nature.
 
 A remarkable difference between the _Discourses_ and the _Enchiridion_
 should be mentioned. The _Discourses_ are a living image of the teacher
 in action; they present the process of philosophizing, not the finished
 product. They show the enthusiastic and sober, the realistic and pathetic
 moralist in constantly changing perspectives determined by the changing
 students with their various concerns, problems, and questions; his
 teachings, his formulations, have direct reference to the various life
 situations in which the students should apply and practice the master's
 Stoic teaching. No human situation is omitted; as a guide to conduct,
 philosophy has relevance for all. Whether the students have to attend a
 dinner party, whether they are among competitors in a stadium or in a
 swimming pool, whether they have to present themselves at court or in an
 office, whether they are in the company of their mothers and sisters or
 of girl friends, in all human situations the philosopher knows the
 correct advice for the philosophical apprentice. Thus, in the
 _Discourses_, Arrian presents the unique individuality of the philosopher
 and of his applied moral method in living contact with various students
 in concrete situations. Epictetus as teacher anticipates very modern
 educational methods in his regard for the structure of situations and the
 changing perspectives in human relationships.
 
 Nothing like this is revealed in the _Enchiridion_. Gone is the Stoic
 philosopher as living spirit. What remains is the living spirit of
 Stoicism. The _Enchiridion_ is a manual for the combat officer. This
 analogy should be taken seriously. The Roman Stoics coined the formula:
 _Vivere militare!_ (Life is being a soldier.) The student of philosophy
 is a private, the advancing Stoic is a non-commissioned officer, and the
 philosopher is the combat officer. For this reason all Roman Stoics apply
 metaphors and images derived from military life. Apprentice students of
 Stoicism are described as messengers, as scouts of God, as
 representatives of divine nature. The advancing student who is close to
 the goal of being a philosopher has the rank of an officer. He is already
 able to establish inner freedom and independence. He understands the
 basic Stoic truth of subjective consciousness, which is to distinguish
 what is in our power from what is not in our power. Not in our power are
 all the elements which constitute our environment, such as wealth,
 health, reputation, social prestige, power, the lives of those we love,
 and death. In our power are our thinking, our intentions, our desires,
 our decisions. These make it possible for us to control ourselves and to
 make of ourselves elements and parts of the universe of nature. This
 knowledge of ourselves makes us free in a world of dependencies. This
 superiority of our powers enables us to live in conformity with nature.
 The rational philosophy of control of Self and of adjustment to the Whole
 implies an asceticism of the emotional and the sensitive life. The
 philosopher must examine and control his passions, his love, his
 tenderness at all times in order always to be ready for the inevitable
 moment of farewell. The Stoics practiced a Jesuitism _avant la lettre_.
 They were able to live in the world as if they did not live in it. To the
 Stoic, life is a military camp, a play on the stage, a banquet to which
 we are invited. The _Enchiridion_ briefly indicated the techniques which
 the philosopher should apply in acting well the diverse roles which God
 might assign to those whom he loves, the Stoic philosophers. From the
 rules of social conduct to the recommendations of sexual asceticism
 before marriage, and the method of true thinking, the advanced Stoic will
 find all principles of perfection and all precepts for realizing
 philosophical principles in his conduct in this tiny volume.
 
 Thus the _Enchiridion_ was liberating for all intellectuals who learned
 from it that there are philosophical ways of self-redemption. From its
 time, the secular thinker could feel jubilant because he was not in need
 of a divine grace. Epictetus had taught him that philosophical reason
 could make him free and that he was capable of redeeming himself by sound
 reasoning.
 
 In the Stoic distinctions of personality and world, of I and mine, of
 subjective consciousness and the world of objects, of freedom and
 dependence, we find implicit the basic elements of modern philosophies of
 rationalism and of objective idealism or pantheism. For this reason there
 is a continuous renascence of Stoicism from Descartes, Grotius, and
 Bishop Butler, to Montesquieu, Adam Smith, and Kant. In this long
 development in modern times, the tiny _Enchiridion_ of Epictetus played a
 remarkable part.
 
 The translations of Epictetus and of all other Stoics had the widest
 effect on philosophers, theologians, and lay thinkers. They were studied
 by the clergy of the various Christian denominations, by the scientists
 who were striving for a natural religion, and by the independent
 philosophers who were eager to separate philosophy from religion. There
 were many outstanding bishops in the Catholic and Anglican Churches who
 were eager to transform the traditions of Roman Stoicism into Christian
 Stoicism. Among the Calvinistic denominations were many thinkers who were
 in sympathy with Stoic moral principles because of their praise of the
 austerity of life and of the control of passions. Likewise the adherents
 of natural religion were propagating Stoicism as the ideal pattern of
 universally valid and intelligible religion. Renascent Stoicism had three
 functions in the rise of the modern world. First, it reconciled Christian
 traditions to modern rationalistic philosophies; secondly, it established
 an ideal pattern of natural religion; and, thirdly, it opened the way for
 the autonomy of morals.
 
                                                           ALBERT SALOMON
 
   The New School
     for Social Research
   _July, 1948_
 
 
 
 
                          SELECTED BIBLIOGRAPHY
 
 
                        _Epictetus: Life and Work_
 
 Arnim, Hans V., "Epictetos" in Pauli-Wissowa (ed), _Real-Encyclopaedie
         der classischen Altertumswissenschaft_, VI, col. 126-131.
 
 Arnold, E. V., "Epictetus" in Hastings, _Encyclopedia of Religion and
         Ethics_, 1912. Vol. V, pp. 323, 324.
 
 Bonhoeffer, A., _Epiktet und die Stoa_. Stuttgart, 1890.
 
 ----, _Ethik des Stoikers Epiktet_. Stuttgart, 1894.
 
 ----, _Epiktet und das Neue Testament_. Giessen, 1911.
 
 Bruns, Ivo, _De schola Epicteti_. Kiel, 1897.
 
 Bultmann, Rudolf, "Das religioese Moment in der ethischen Unterweisung des
         Epiktets und das Neue Testament," _Zeitschrift fuer die
         neutestamentliche Wissenschaft und die Kunde des Urchristentums_,
         Vol. XIII, 1912; pp. 97-110; 177-191.
 
 Colardeau, Th., _Etude sur Epictete_. Paris, 1903.
 
 Hartmann, K., "Arrian und Epiktet," _Neue Jahrbuecher fuer das klassische
         Altertum_, Vol. XV, 1905.
 
 Jagu, Amand, _Epictete et Platon_. Paris, 1944.
 
 Lagrange, M. J., "La philosophie religieuse d'Epictete et le
         Christianisme," _Revue Biblique_, Vol. IX, 1912; pp. 5-21,
         192-212.
 
 Oldfather, W. A., "Introduction" to _Epictetus_, "Loeb Classics," Vol. I.
 
 Souilhe, J., "Introduction" to _Entretiens_. Paris, 1943.
 
 Weber, Louis, "La morale d'Epictete et les besoins presents de
         l'enseignment moral," _Revue de Metaphysique et de Morale_, 1905,
         pp. 830-858; 1906, pp. 342-360; 1907, pp. 327-347; 1909, pp.
         203-326.
 
 
              _Main Works on Stoicism and Related Problems_
 
 Arnold, E. V., _Roman Stoicism_. Cambridge, E., 1911.
 
 Bevan, E., _Stoics and Sceptics_. Oxford, 1913.
 
 Brochard, V., _Etudes de philosophie ancienne et de philosophie moderne_,
         Paris, 1912.
 
 Hicks, R. D., _Stoic and Epicurean_. New York, 1910.
 
 Martha, C., _Les moralistes sur l'Empire Romain_. Paris, 1886.
 
 Murray, Gilbert, _Stoic, Christian, Humanist_. London, 1940.
 
 Robin, L., _La morale antique_. Paris, 1938, pp. 57, 130, 152, 167.
 
 Wendland, Paul, _Philo und die cynisch-stoische Diatribe_. Berlin, 1895.
 
 ----, _Die hellenistische Kultur in ihren Beziehungen zum Judentum und
         Christentum_. Tuebingen, 1912.
 
 Zanta, L., _La renaissance du Stoicisme au XVIieme siecle_. Paris, 1914.
 
 Zeller, E., _The Stoics, Epicureans, and Sceptics_. London, 1892.
 
 
                         _Influence of Stoicism_
 
 Busson, Henry, _La pensee religieuse Francaise de Charron a Pascal_.
         Paris, 1933. Chap. VIII: Stoiciens et Epicuriens, pp. 379-429.
 
 Dilthey, Wilhelm, _Gesammelte Werke_, Vol. II. "Einfluss der Stoa auf die
         Ausbildung des natuerlichen Systems der Geisteswissenschaften,"
         pp. 153-162; "Anthropologie, Stoa und natuerliches System im XVII.
         Jahrhundert," pp. 439-457.
 
 Groethuysen, Bernard, _Philosophische Anthropologie_. Muenchen, 1928.
         (Chap. "Die roemisch-griechische Lebensphilosophie.")
 
 Rand, B., _The Life, Letters, etc. of Anthony, Earl of Shaftesbury_.
         London, 1900.
 
 Saunders, Jason L., _Justus Lipsius. The Philosophy of Renaissance
         Stoicism_. New York, 1955.
 
 Wenley, R. M., _Stoicism and Its Influence_. New York, 1927.
 
 
 
 
                             THE ENCHIRIDION
 
 
                                    I
 
 There are things which are within our power, and there are things which
 are beyond our power. Within our power are opinion, aim, desire,
 aversion, and, in one word, whatever affairs are our own. Beyond our
 power are body, property, reputation, office, and, in one word, whatever
 are not properly our own affairs.
 
 Now the things within our power are by nature free, unrestricted,
 unhindered; but those beyond our power are weak, dependent, restricted,
 alien. Remember, then, that if you attribute freedom to things by nature
 dependent and take what belongs to others for your own, you will be
 hindered, you will lament, you will be disturbed, you will find fault
 both with gods and men. But if you take for your own only that which is
 your own and view what belongs to others just as it really is, then no
 one will ever compel you, no one will restrict you; you will find fault
 with no one, you will accuse no one, you will do nothing against your
 will; no one will hurt you, you will not have an enemy, nor will you
 suffer any harm.
 
 Aiming, therefore, at such great things, remember that you must not allow
 yourself any inclination, however slight, toward the attainment of the
 others; but that you must entirely quit some of them, and for the present
 postpone the rest. But if you would have these, and possess power and
 wealth likewise, you may miss the latter in seeking the former; and you
 will certainly fail of that by which alone happiness and freedom are
 procured.
 
 Seek at once, therefore, to be able to say to every unpleasing semblance,
 "You are but a semblance and by no means the real thing." And then
 examine it by those rules which you have; and first and chiefly by this:
 whether it concerns the things which are within our own power or those
 which are not; and if it concerns anything beyond our power, be prepared
 to say that it is nothing to you.
 
 
                                    II
 
 Remember that desire demands the attainment of that of which you are
 desirous; and aversion demands the avoidance of that to which you are
 averse; that he who fails of the object of his desires is disappointed;
 and he who incurs the object of his aversion is wretched. If, then, you
 shun only those undesirable things which you can control, you will never
 incur anything which you shun; but if you shun sickness, or death, or
 poverty, you will run the risk of wretchedness. Remove [the habit of]
 aversion, then, from all things that are not within our power, and apply
 it to things undesirable which are within our power. But for the present,
 altogether restrain desire; for if you desire any of the things not
 within our own power, you must necessarily be disappointed; and you are
 not yet secure of those which are within our power, and so are legitimate
 objects of desire. Where it is practically necessary for you to pursue or
 avoid anything, do even this with discretion and gentleness and
 moderation.
 
 
                                   III
 
 With regard to whatever objects either delight the mind or contribute to
 use or are tenderly beloved, remind yourself of what nature they are,
 beginning with the merest trifles: if you have a favorite cup, that it is
 but a cup of which you are fond of--for thus, if it is broken, you can
 bear it; if you embrace your child or your wife, that you embrace a
 mortal--and thus, if either of them dies, you can bear it.
 
 
                                    IV
 
 When you set about any action, remind yourself of what nature the action
 is. If you are going to bathe, represent to yourself the incidents usual
 in the bath--some persons pouring out, others pushing in, others
 scolding, others pilfering. And thus you will more safely go about this
 action if you say to yourself, "I will now go to bathe and keep my own
 will in harmony with nature." And so with regard to every other action.
 For thus, if any impediment arises in bathing, you will be able to say,
 "It was not only to bathe that I desired, but to keep my will in harmony
 with nature; and I shall not keep it thus if I am out of humor at things
 that happen."
 
 
                                    V
 
 Men are disturbed not by things, but by the views which they take of
 things. Thus death is nothing terrible, else it would have appeared so to
 Socrates. But the terror consists in our notion of death, that it is
 terrible. When, therefore, we are hindered or disturbed, or grieved, let
 us never impute it to others, but to ourselves--that is, to our own
 views. It is the action of an uninstructed person to reproach others for
 his own misfortunes; of one entering upon instruction, to reproach
 himself; and one perfectly instructed, to reproach neither others nor
 himself.
 
 
                                    VI
 
 Be not elated at any excellence not your own. If a horse should be
 elated, and say, "I am handsome," it might be endurable. But when you are
 elated and say, "I have a handsome horse," know that you are elated only
 on the merit of the horse. What then is your own? The use of the
 phenomena of existence. So that when you are in harmony with nature in
 this respect, you will be elated with some reason; for you will be elated
 at some good of your own.
 
 
                                   VII
 
 As in a voyage, when the ship is at anchor, if you go on shore to get
 water, you may amuse yourself with picking up a shellfish or a truffle in
 your way, but your thoughts ought to be bent toward the ship, and
 perpetually attentive, lest the captain should call, and then you must
 leave all these things, that you may not have to be carried on board the
 vessel, bound like a sheep; thus likewise in life, if, instead of a
 truffle or shellfish, such a thing as a wife or a child be granted you,
 there is no objection; but if the captain calls, run to the ship, leave
 all these things, and never look behind. But if you are old, never go far
 from the ship, lest you should be missing when called for.
 
 
                                   VIII
 
 Demand not that events should happen as you wish; but wish them to happen
 as they do happen, and you will go on well.
 
 
                                    IX
 
 Sickness is an impediment to the body, but not to the will unless itself
 pleases. Lameness is an impediment to the leg, but not to the will; and
 say this to yourself with regard to everything that happens. For you will
 find it to be an impediment to something else, but not truly to yourself.
 
 
                                    X
 
 Upon every accident, remember to turn toward yourself and inquire what
 faculty you have for its use. If you encounter a handsome person, you
 will find continence the faculty needed; if pain, then fortitude; if
 reviling, then patience. And when thus habituated, the phenomena of
 existence will not overwhelm you.
 
 
                                    XI
 
 Never say of anything, "I have lost it," but, "I have restored it." Has
 your child died? It is restored. Has your wife died? She is restored. Has
 your estate been taken away? That likewise is restored. "But it was a bad
 man who took it." What is it to you by whose hands he who gave it has
 demanded it again? While he permits you to possess it, hold it as
 something not your own, as do travelers at an inn.
 
 
                                   XII
 
 If you would improve, lay aside such reasonings as these: "If I neglect
 my affairs, I shall not have a maintenance; if I do not punish my
 servant, he will be good for nothing." For it were better to die of
 hunger, exempt from grief and fear, than to live in affluence with
 perturbation; and it is better that your servant should be bad than you
 unhappy.
 
 Begin therefore with little things. Is a little oil spilled or a little
 wine stolen? Say to yourself, "This is the price paid for peace and
 tranquillity; and nothing is to be had for nothing." And when you call
 your servant, consider that it is possible he may not come at your call;
 or, if he does, that he may not do what you wish. But it is not at all
 desirable for him, and very undesirable for you, that it should be in his
 power to cause you any disturbance.
 
 
                                   XIII
 
 If you would improve, be content to be thought foolish and dull with
 regard to externals. Do not desire to be thought to know anything; and
 though you should appear to others to be somebody, distrust yourself. For
 be assured, it is not easy at once to keep your will in harmony with
 nature and to secure externals; but while you are absorbed in the one,
 you must of necessity neglect the other.
 
 
                                   XIV
 
 If you wish your children and your wife and your friends to live forever,
 you are foolish, for you wish things to be in your power which are not
 so, and what belongs to others to be your own. So likewise, if you wish
 your servant to be without fault, you are foolish, for you wish vice not
 to be vice but something else. But if you wish not to be disappointed in
 your desires, that is in your own power. Exercise, therefore, what is in
 your power. A man's master is he who is able to confer or remove whatever
 that man seeks or shuns. Whoever then would be free, let him wish
 nothing, let him decline nothing, which depends on others; else he must
 necessarily be a slave.
 
 
                                    XV
 
 Remember that you must behave as at a banquet. Is anything brought round
 to you? Put out your hand and take a moderate share. Does it pass by you?
 Do not stop it. Is it not yet come? Do not yearn in desire toward it, but
 wait till it reaches you. So with regard to children, wife, office,
 riches; and you will some time or other be worthy to feast with the gods.
 And if you do not so much as take the things which are set before you,
 but are able even to forego them, then you will not only be worthy to
 feast with the gods, but to rule with them also. For, by thus doing,
 Diogenes and Heraclitus, and others like them, deservedly became divine,
 and were so recognized.
 
 
                                   XVI
 
 When you see anyone weeping for grief, either that his son has gone
 abroad or that he has suffered in his affairs, take care not to be
 overcome by the apparent evil, but discriminate and be ready to say,
 "What hurts this man is not this occurrence itself--for another man might
 not be hurt by it--but the view he chooses to take of it." As far as
 conversation goes, however, do not disdain to accommodate yourself to him
 and, if need be, to groan with him. Take heed, however, not to groan
 inwardly, too.
 
 
                                   XVII
 
 Remember that you are an actor in a drama of such sort as the Author
 chooses--if short, then in a short one; if long, then in a long one. If
 it be his pleasure that you should enact a poor man, or a cripple, or a
 ruler, or a private citizen, see that you act it well. For this is your
 business--to act well the given part, but to choose it belongs to
 another.
 
 
                                  XVIII
 
 When a raven happens to croak unluckily, be not overcome by appearances,
 but discriminate and say, "Nothing is portended to _me_, either to my
 paltry body, or property, or reputation, or children, or wife. But to
 _me_ all portents are lucky if I will. For whatsoever happens, it belongs
 to me to derive advantage therefrom."
 
 
                                   XIX
 
 You can be unconquerable if you enter into no combat in which it is not
 in your own power to conquer. When, therefore, you see anyone eminent in
 honors or power, or in high esteem on any other account, take heed not to
 be bewildered by appearances and to pronounce him happy; for if the
 essence of good consists in things within our own power, there will be no
 room for envy or emulation. But, for your part, do not desire to be a
 general, or a senator, or a consul, but to be free; and the only way to
 this is a disregard of things which lie not within our own power.
 
 
                                    XX
 
 Remember that it is not he who gives abuse or blows, who affronts, but
 the view we take of these things as insulting. When, therefore, anyone
 provokes you, be assured that it is your own opinion which provokes you.
 Try, therefore, in the first place, not to be bewildered by appearances.
 For if you once gain time and respite, you will more easily command
 yourself.
 
 
                                   XXI
 
 Let death and exile, and all other things which appear terrible, be daily
 before your eyes, but death chiefly; and you will never entertain an
 abject thought, nor too eagerly covet anything.
 
 
                                   XXII
 
 If you have an earnest desire toward philosophy, prepare yourself from
 the very first to have the multitude laugh and sneer, and say, "He is
 returned to us a philosopher all at once"; and, "Whence this supercilious
 look?" Now, for your part, do not have a supercilious look indeed, but
 keep steadily to those things which appear best to you, as one appointed
 by God to this particular station. For remember that, if you are
 persistent, those very persons who at first ridiculed will afterwards
 admire you. But if you are conquered by them, you will incur a double
 ridicule.
 
 
                                  XXIII
 
 If you ever happen to turn your attention to externals, for the pleasure
 of anyone, be assured that you have ruined your scheme of life. Be
 content, then, in everything, with being a philosopher; and if you wish
 to seem so likewise to anyone, appear so to yourself, and it will suffice
 you.
 
 
                                   XXIV
 
 Let not such considerations as these distress you: "I shall live in
 discredit and be nobody anywhere." For if discredit be an evil, you can
 no more be involved in evil through another than in baseness. Is it any
 business of yours, then, to get power or to be admitted to an
 entertainment? By no means. How then, after all, is this discredit? And
 how it is true that you will be nobody anywhere when you ought to be
 somebody in those things only which are within your own power, in which
 you may be of the greatest consequence? "But my friends will be
 unassisted." What do you mean by "unassisted"? They will not have money
 from you, nor will you make them Roman citizens. Who told you, then, that
 these are among the things within our own power, and not rather the
 affairs of others? And who can give to another the things which he
 himself has not? "Well, but get them, then, that we too may have a
 share." If I can get them with the preservation of my own honor and
 fidelity and self-respect, show me the way and I will get them; but if
 you require me to lose my own proper good, that you may gain what is no
 good, consider how unreasonable and foolish you are. Besides, which would
 you rather have, a sum of money or a faithful and honorable friend?
 Rather assist me, then, to gain this character than require me to do
 those things by which I may lose it. Well, but my country, say you, as
 far as depends upon me, will be unassisted. Here, again, what assistance
 is this you mean? It will not have porticos nor baths of your providing?
 And what signifies that? Why, neither does a smith provide it with shoes,
 nor a shoemaker with arms. It is enough if everyone fully performs his
 own proper business. And were you to supply it with another faithful and
 honorable citizen, would not he be of use to it? Yes. Therefore neither
 are you yourself useless to it. "What place, then," say you, "shall I
 hold in the state?" Whatever you can hold with the preservation of your
 fidelity and honor. But if, by desiring to be useful to that, you lose
 these, how can you serve your country when you have become faithless and
 shameless?
 
 
                                   XXV
 
 Is anyone preferred before you at an entertainment, or in courtesies, or
 in confidential intercourse? If these things are good, you ought to
 rejoice that he has them; and if they are evil, do not be grieved that
 you have them not. And remember that you cannot be permitted to rival
 others in externals without using the same means to obtain them. For how
 can he who will not haunt the door of any man, will not attend him, will
 not praise him, have an equal share with him who does these things? You
 are unjust, then, and unreasonable if you are unwilling to pay the price
 for which these things are sold, and would have them for nothing. For how
 much are lettuces sold? An obulus, for instance. If another, then, paying
 an obulus, takes the lettuces, and you, not paying it, go without them,
 do not imagine that he has gained any advantage over you. For as he has
 the lettuces, so you have the obulus which you did not give. So, in the
 present case, you have not been invited to such a person's entertainment
 because you have not paid him the price for which a supper is sold. It is
 sold for praise; it is sold for attendance. Give him, then, the value if
 it be for your advantage. But if you would at the same time not pay the
 one, and yet receive the other, you are unreasonable and foolish. Have
 you nothing, then, in place of the supper? Yes, indeed, you have--not to
 praise him whom you do not like to praise; not to bear the insolence of
 his lackeys.
 
 
                                   XXVI
 
 The will of nature may be learned from things upon which we are all
 agreed. As when our neighbor's boy has broken a cup, or the like, we are
 ready at once to say, "These are casualties that will happen"; be
 assured, then, that when your own cup is likewise broken, you ought to be
 affected just as when another's cup was broken. Now apply this to greater
 things. Is the child or wife of another dead? There is no one who would
 not say, "This is an accident of mortality." But if anyone's own child
 happens to die, it is immediately, "Alas! how wretched am I!" It should
 be always remembered how we are affected on hearing the same thing
 concerning others.
 
 
                                  XXVII
 
 As a mark[1] is not set up for the sake of missing the aim, so neither
 does the nature of evil exist in the world.
 
 
                                  XXVIII
 
 If a person had delivered up your body to some passer-by, you would
 certainly be angry. And do you feel no shame in delivering up your own
 mind to any reviler, to be disconcerted and confounded?
 
 
                                 XXIX[2]
 
 In every affair consider what precedes and what follows, and then
 undertake it. Otherwise you will begin with spirit, indeed, careless of
 the consequences, and when these are developed, you will shamefully
 desist. "I would conquer at the Olympic Games." But consider what
 precedes and what follows, and then, if it be for your advantage, engage
 in the affair. You must conform to rules, submit to a diet, refrain from
 dainties; exercise your body, whether you choose it or not, at a stated
 hour, in heat and cold; you must drink no cold water, and sometimes no
 wine--in a word, you must give yourself up to your trainer as to a
 physician. Then, in the combat, you may be thrown into a ditch, dislocate
 your arm, turn your ankle, swallow an abundance of dust, receive stripes
 [for negligence], and, after all, lose the victory. When you have
 reckoned up all this, if your inclination still holds, set about the
 combat. Otherwise, take notice, you will behave like children who
 sometimes play wrestlers, sometimes gladiators, sometimes blow a trumpet,
 and sometimes act a tragedy, when they happen to have seen and admired
 these shows. Thus you too will be at one time a wrestler, and another a
 gladiator; now a philosopher, now an orator; but nothing in earnest. Like
 an ape you mimic all you see, and one thing after another is sure to
 please you, but is out of favor as soon as it becomes familiar. For you
 have never entered upon anything considerately; nor after having surveyed
 and tested the whole matter, but carelessly, and with a halfway zeal.
 Thus some, when they have seen a philosopher and heard a man speaking
 like Euphrates[3]--though, indeed, who can speak like him?--have a mind
 to be philosophers, too. Consider first, man, what the matter is, and
 what your own nature is able to bear. If you would be a wrestler,
 consider your shoulders, your back, your thighs; for different persons
 are made for different things. Do you think that you can act as you do
 and be a philosopher, that you can eat, drink, be angry, be discontented,
 as you are now? You must watch, you must labor, you must get the better
 of certain appetites, must quit your acquaintances, be despised by your
 servant, be laughed at by those you meet; come off worse than others in
 everything--in offices, in honors, before tribunals. When you have fully
 considered all these things, approach, if you please--that is, if, by
 parting with them, you have a mind to purchase serenity, freedom, and
 tranquillity. If not, do not come hither; do not, like children, be now a
 philosopher, then a publican, then an orator, and then one of Caesar's
 officers. These things are not consistent. You must be one man, either
 good or bad. You must cultivate either your own reason or else externals;
 apply yourself either to things within or without you--that is, be either
 a philosopher or one of the mob.
 
 
                                   XXX
 
 Duties are universally measured by relations. Is a certain man your
 father? In this are implied taking care of him, submitting to him in all
 things, patiently receiving his reproaches, his correction. But he is a
 bad father. Is your natural tie, then, to a _good_ father? No, but to a
 father. Is a brother unjust? Well, preserve your own just relation toward
 him. Consider not what _he_ does, but what _you_ are to do to keep your
 own will in a state conformable to nature, for another cannot hurt you
 unless you please. You will then be hurt when you consent to be hurt. In
 this manner, therefore, if you accustom yourself to contemplate the
 relations of neighbor, citizen, commander, you can deduce from each the
 corresponding duties.
 
 
                                   XXXI
 
 Be assured that the essence of piety toward the gods lies in this--to
 form right opinions concerning them, as existing and as governing the
 universe justly and well. And fix yourself in this resolution, to obey
 them, and yield to them, and willingly follow them amidst all events, as
 being ruled by the most perfect wisdom. For thus you will never find
 fault with the gods, nor accuse them of neglecting you. And it is not
 possible for this to be affected in any other way than by withdrawing
 yourself from things which are not within our own power, and by making
 good or evil to consist only in those which are. For if you suppose any
 other things to be either good or evil, it is inevitable that, when you
 are disappointed of what you wish or incur what you would avoid, you
 should reproach and blame their authors. For every creature is naturally
 formed to flee and abhor things that appear hurtful and that which causes
 them; and to pursue and admire those which appear beneficial and that
 which causes them. It is impracticable, then, that one who supposes
 himself to be hurt should rejoice in the person who, as he thinks, hurts
 him, just as it is impossible to rejoice in the hurt itself. Hence, also,
 a father is reviled by his son when he does not impart the things which
 seem to be good; and this made Polynices and Eteocles[4] mutually
 enemies--that empire seemed good to both. On this account the husbandman
 reviles the gods; [and so do] the sailor, the merchant, or those who have
 lost wife or child. For where our interest is, there, too, is piety
 directed. So that whoever is careful to regulate his desires and
 aversions as he ought is thus made careful of piety likewise. But it also
 becomes incumbent on everyone to offer libations and sacrifices and first
 fruits, according to the customs of his country, purely, and not
 heedlessly nor negligently; not avariciously, nor yet extravagantly.
 
 
                                  XXXII
 
 When you have recourse to divination, remember that you know not what the
 event will be, and you come to learn it of the diviner; but of what
 nature it is you knew before coming; at least, if you are of philosophic
 mind. For if it is among the things not within our own power, it can by
 no means be either good or evil. Do not, therefore, bring with you to the
 diviner either desire or aversion--else you will approach him
 trembling--but first clearly understand that every event is indifferent
 and nothing to _you_, of whatever sort it may be; for it will be in your
 power to make a right use of it, and this no one can hinder. Then come
 with confidence to the gods as your counselors; and afterwards, when any
 counsel is given you, remember what counselors you have assumed, and
 whose advice you will neglect if you disobey. Come to divination as
 Socrates prescribed, in cases of which the whole consideration relates to
 the event, and in which no opportunities are afforded by reason or any
 other art to discover the matter in view. When, therefore, it is our duty
 to share the danger of a friend or of our country, we ought not to
 consult the oracle as to whether we shall share it with them or not. For
 though the diviner should forewarn you that the auspices are unfavorable,
 this means no more than that either death or mutilation or exile is
 portended. But we have reason within us; and it directs us, even with
 these hazards, to stand by our friend and our country. Attend, therefore,
 to the greater diviner, the Pythian God, who once cast out of the temple
 him who neglected to save his friend.[5]
 
 
                                  XXXIII
 
 Begin by prescribing to yourself some character and demeanor, such as you
 may preserve both alone and in company.
 
 Be mostly silent, or speak merely what is needful, and in few words. We
 may, however, enter sparingly into discourse sometimes, when occasion
 calls for it; but let it not run on any of the common subjects, as
 gladiators, or horse races, or athletic champions, or food, or drink--the
 vulgar topics of conversation--and especially not on men, so as either to
 blame, or praise, or make comparisons. If you are able, then, by your own
 conversation, bring over that of your company to proper subjects; but if
 you happen to find yourself among strangers, be silent.
 
 Let not your laughter be loud, frequent, or abundant.
 
 Avoid taking oaths, if possible, altogether; at any rate, so far as you
 are able.
 
 Avoid public and vulgar entertainments; but if ever an occasion calls you
 to them, keep your attention upon the stretch, that you may not
 imperceptibly slide into vulgarity. For be assured that if a person be
 ever so pure himself, yet, if his companion be corrupted, he who
 converses with him will be corrupted likewise.
 
 Provide things relating to the body no further than absolute need
 requires, as meat, drink, clothing, house, retinue. But cut off
 everything that looks toward show and luxury.
 
 Before marriage guard yourself with all your ability from unlawful
 intercourse with women; yet be not uncharitable or severe to those who
 are led into this, nor boast frequently that you yourself do otherwise.
 
 If anyone tells you that a certain person speaks ill of you, do not make
 excuses about what is said of you, but answer: "He was ignorant of my
 other faults, else he would not have mentioned these alone."
 
 It is not necessary for you to appear often at public spectacles; but if
 ever there is a proper occasion for you to be there, do not appear more
 solicitous for any other than for yourself--that is, wish things to be
 only just as they are, and only the best man to win; for thus nothing
 will go against you. But abstain entirely from acclamations and derision
 and violent emotions. And when you come away, do not discourse a great
 deal on what has passed and what contributes nothing to your own
 amendment. For it would appear by such discourse that you were dazzled by
 the show.
 
 Be not prompt or ready to attend private recitations; but if you do
 attend, preserve your gravity and dignity, and yet avoid making yourself
 disagreeable.
 
 When you are going to confer with anyone, and especially with one who
 seems your superior, represent to yourself how Socrates or Zeno[6] would
 behave in such a case, and you will not be at a loss to meet properly
 whatever may occur.
 
 When you are going before anyone in power, fancy to yourself that you may
 not find him at home, that you may be shut out, that the doors may not be
 opened to you, that he may not notice you. If, with all this, it be your
 duty to go, bear what happens and never say to yourself, "It was not
 worth so much"; for this is vulgar, and like a man bewildered by
 externals.
 
 In company, avoid a frequent and excessive mention of your own actions
 and dangers. For however agreeable it may be to yourself to allude to the
 risks you have run, it is not equally agreeable to others to hear your
 adventures. Avoid likewise an endeavor to excite laughter, for this may
 readily slide you into vulgarity, and, besides, may be apt to lower you
 in the esteem of your acquaintance. Approaches to indecent discourse are
 likewise dangerous. Therefore, when anything of this sort happens, use
 the first fit opportunity to rebuke him who makes advances that way, or,
 at least, by silence and blushing and a serious look show yourself to be
 displeased by such talk.
 
 
                                  XXXIV
 
 If you are dazzled by the semblance of any promised pleasure, guard
 yourself against being bewildered by it; but let the affair wait your
 leisure, and procure yourself some delay. Then bring to your mind both
 points of time--that in which you shall enjoy the pleasure, and that in
 which you will repent and reproach yourself, after you have enjoyed
 it--and set before you, in opposition to these, how you will rejoice and
 applaud yourself if you abstain. And even though it should appear to you
 a seasonable gratification, take heed that its enticements and
 allurements and seductions may not subdue you, but set in opposition to
 this how much better it is to be conscious of having gained so great a
 victory.
 
 
                                   XXXV
 
 When you do anything from a clear judgment that it ought to be done,
 never shrink from being seen to do it, even though the world should
 misunderstand it; for if you are not acting rightly, shun the action
 itself; if you are, why fear those who wrongly censure you?
 
 
                                  XXXVI
 
 As the proposition, "either it is day or it is night," has much force in
 a disjunctive argument, but none at all in a conjunctive one, so, at a
 feast, to choose the largest share is very suitable to the bodily
 appetite, but utterly inconsistent with the social spirit of the
 entertainment. Remember, then, when you eat with another, not only the
 value to the body of those things which are set before you, but also the
 value of proper courtesy toward your host.
 
 
                                  XXXVII
 
 If you have assumed any character beyond your strength, you have both
 demeaned yourself ill in that and quitted one which you might have
 supported.
 
 
                                 XXXVIII
 
 As in walking you take care not to tread upon a nail, or turn your foot,
 so likewise take care not to hurt the ruling faculty of your mind. And if
 we were to guard against this in every action, we should enter upon
 action more safely.
 
 
                                  XXXIX
 
 The body is to everyone the proper measure of its possessions, as the
 foot is of the shoe. If, therefore, you stop at this, you will keep the
 measure; but if you move beyond it, you must necessarily be carried
 forward, as down a precipice; as in the case of a shoe, if you go beyond
 its fitness to the foot, it comes first to be gilded, then purple, and
 then studded with jewels. For to that which once exceeds the fit measure
 there is no bound.
 
 
                                    XL
 
 Women from fourteen years old are flattered by men with the title of
 mistresses. Therefore, perceiving that they are regarded only as
 qualified to give men pleasure, they begin to adorn themselves, and in
 that to place all their hopes. It is worth while, therefore, to try that
 they may perceive themselves honored only so far as they appear beautiful
 in their demeanor and modestly virtuous.
 
 
                                   XLI
 
 It is a mark of want of intellect to spend much time in things relating
 to the body, as to be immoderate in exercises, in eating and drinking,
 and in the discharge of other animal functions. These things should be
 done incidentally and our main strength be applied to our reason.
 
 
                                   XLII
 
 When any person does ill by you, or speaks ill of you, remember that he
 acts or speaks from an impression that it is right for him to do so. Now
 it is not possible that he should follow what appears right to you, but
 only what appears so to himself. Therefore, if he judges from false
 appearances, he is the person hurt, since he, too, is the person
 deceived. For if anyone takes a true proposition to be false, the
 proposition is not hurt, but only the man is deceived. Setting out, then,
 from these principles, you will meekly bear with a person who reviles
 you, for you will say upon every occasion, "It seemed so to him."
 
 
                                  XLIII
 
 Everything has two handles: one by which it may be borne, another by
 which it cannot. If your brother acts unjustly, do not lay hold on the
 affair by the handle of his injustice, for by that it cannot be borne,
 but rather by the opposite--that he is your brother, that he was brought
 up with you; and thus you will lay hold on it as it is to be borne.
 
 
                                   XLIV
 
 These reasonings have no logical connection: "I am richer than you,
 therefore I am your superior." "I am more eloquent than you, therefore I
 am your superior." The true logical connection is rather this: "I am
 richer than you, therefore my possessions must exceed yours." "I am more
 eloquent than you, therefore my style must surpass yours." But you, after
 all, consist neither in property nor in style.
 
 
                                   XLV
 
 Does anyone bathe hastily? Do not say that he does it ill, but hastily.
 Does anyone drink much wine? Do not say that he does ill, but that he
 drinks a great deal. For unless you perfectly understand his motives, how
 should you know if he acts ill? Thus you will not risk yielding to any
 appearances but such as you fully comprehend.
 
 
                                   XLVI
 
 Never proclaim yourself a philosopher, nor make much talk among the
 ignorant about your principles, but show them by actions. Thus, at an
 entertainment, do not discourse how people ought to eat, but eat as you
 ought. For remember that thus Socrates also universally avoided all
 ostentation. And when persons came to him and desired to be introduced by
 him to philosophers, he took them and introduced them; so well did he
 bear being overlooked. So if ever there should be among the ignorant any
 discussion of principles, be for the most part silent. For there is great
 danger in hastily throwing out what is undigested. And if anyone tells
 you that you know nothing, and you are not nettled at it, then you may be
 sure that you have really entered on your work. For sheep do not hastily
 throw up the grass to show the shepherds how much they have eaten, but,
 inwardly digesting their food, they produce it outwardly in wool and
 milk. Thus, therefore, do you not make an exhibition before the ignorant
 of your principles, but of the actions to which their digestion gives
 rise.
 
 
                                  XLVII
 
 When you have learned to nourish your body frugally, do not pique
 yourself upon it; nor, if you drink water, be saying upon every occasion,
 "I drink water." But first consider how much more frugal are the poor
 than we, and how much more patient of hardship. If at any time you would
 inure yourself by exercise to labor and privation, for your own sake and
 not for the public, do not attempt great feats; but when you are
 violently thirsty, just rinse your mouth with water, and tell nobody.
 
 
                                  XLVIII
 
 The condition and characteristic of a vulgar person is that he never
 looks for either help or harm from himself, but only from externals. The
 condition and characteristic of a philosopher is that he looks to himself
 for all help or harm. The marks of a proficient are that he censures no
 one, praises no one, blames no one, accuses no one; says nothing
 concerning himself as being anybody or knowing anything. When he is in
 any instance hindered or restrained, he accuses himself; and if he is
 praised, he smiles to himself at the person who praises him; and if he is
 censured, he makes no defense. But he goes about with the caution of a
 convalescent, careful of interference with anything that is doing well
 but not yet quite secure. He restrains desire; he transfers his aversion
 to those things only which thwart the proper use of our own will; he
 employs his energies moderately in all directions; if he appears stupid
 or ignorant, he does not care; and, in a word, he keeps watch over
 himself as over an enemy and one in ambush.
 
 
                                   XLIX
 
 When anyone shows himself vain on being able to understand and interpret
 the works of Chrysippus,[7] say to yourself: "Unless Chrysippus had
 written obscurely, this person would have had nothing to be vain of. But
 what do I desire? To understand nature, and follow her. I ask, then, who
 interprets her; and hearing that Chrysippus does, I have recourse to him.
 I do not understand his writings. I seek, therefore, one to interpret
 _them_." So far there is nothing to value myself upon. And when I find an
 interpreter, what remains is to make use of his instructions. This alone
 is the valuable thing. But if I admire merely the interpretation, what do
 I become more than a grammarian, instead of a philosopher, except,
 indeed, that instead of Homer I interpret Chrysippus? When anyone,
 therefore, desires me to read Chrysippus to him, I rather blush when I
 cannot exhibit actions that are harmonious and consonant with his
 discourse.
 
 
                                    L
 
 Whatever rules you have adopted, abide by them as laws, and as if you
 would be impious to transgress them; and do not regard what anyone says
 of you, for this, after all, is no concern of yours. How long, then, will
 you delay to demand of yourself the noblest improvements, and in no
 instance to transgress the judgments of reason? You have received the
 philosophic principles with which you ought to be conversant; and you
 have been conversant with them. For what other master, then, do you wait
 as an excuse for this delay in self-reformation? You are no longer a boy
 but a grown man. If, therefore, you will be negligent and slothful, and
 always add procrastination to procrastination, purpose to purpose, and
 fix day after day in which you will attend to yourself, you will
 insensibly continue to accomplish nothing and, living and dying, remain
 of vulgar mind. This instant, then, think yourself worthy of living as a
 man grown up and a proficient. Let whatever appears to be the best be to
 you an inviolable law. And if any instance of pain or pleasure, glory or
 disgrace, be set before you, remember that now is the combat, now the
 Olympiad comes on, nor can it be put off; and that by one failure and
 defeat honor may be lost or--won. Thus Socrates became perfect, improving
 himself by everything, following reason alone. And though you are not yet
 a Socrates, you ought, however, to live as one seeking to be a Socrates.
 
 
                                    LI
 
 The first and most necessary topic in philosophy is the practical
 application of principles, as, _We ought not to lie_; the second is that
 of demonstrations as, _Why it is that we ought not to lie_; the third,
 that which gives strength and logical connection to the other two, as,
 _Why this is a demonstration_. For what is demonstration? What is a
 consequence? What a contradiction? What truth? What falsehood? The third
 point is then necessary on account of the second; and the second on
 account of the first. But the most necessary, and that whereon we ought
 to rest, is the first. But we do just the contrary. For we spend all our
 time on the third point and employ all our diligence about that, and
 entirely neglect the first. Therefore, at the same time that we lie, we
 are very ready to show how it is demonstrated that lying is wrong.
 
 Upon all occasions we ought to have these maxims ready at hand:
 
   Conduct me, Zeus, and thou, O Destiny,
   Wherever your decrees have fixed my lot.
   I follow cheerfully; and, did I not,
   Wicked and wretched, I must follow still.[8]
 
   Who'er yields properly to Fate is deemed
   Wise among men, and knows the laws of Heaven.[9]
 
 And this third:
 
   "O Crito, if it thus pleases the gods, thus let it be."[10]
 
   "Anytus and Melitus may kill me indeed; but hurt me they cannot."[11]
 
 
 
 
                                Footnotes
 
 
 [1]Happiness, the effect of virtue, is the mark which God has set up for
    us to aim at. Our missing it is no work of His; nor so properly
    anything real, as a mere negative and failure of our own.
 
 [2][Chapter XV of the third book of the _Discourses_, which, with the
    exception of some very trifling differences, is the same as chapter
    XXIX of the _Enchiridion_.--Ed.]
 
 [3]Euphrates was a philosopher of Syria, whose character is described,
    with the highest encomiums, by Pliny the Younger, _Letters_ I. 10.
 
 [4][The two inimical sons of Oedipus, who killed each other in
    battle.--Ed.]
 
 [5][This refers to an anecdote given in full by Simplicius, in his
    commentary on this passage, of a man assaulted and killed on his way
    to consult the oracle, while his companion, deserting him, took refuge
    in the temple till cast out by the Deity.--Tr.]
 
 [6][Reference is to Zeno of Cyprus (335-263 B.C.), the founder of the
    Stoic school.--Ed.]
 
 [7][Chrysippus (_c._ 280-207 B.C.) was a Stoic philosopher who became
    head of the Stoa after Cleanthes. His works, which are lost, were most
    influential and were generally accepted as the authoritative
    interpretation of orthodox Stoic philosophy.--Ed.]
 
 [8]Cleanthes, in Diogenes Laertius, quoted also by Seneca, _Epistle_ 107.
 
 [9]Euripides, Fragments.
 
 [10]Plato, _Crito_, Chap. XVII.
 
 [11]Plato, _Apology_, Chap. XVIII.
 
 
 
 
                       The Library of Liberal Arts
 
 
   Aeschylus: _Prometheus Bound_. Tr. E. B. Browning. (LLA 24)        .40
   *Alembert, d': _Introduction to the Encyclopedie of 1751_. Tr. T.
           D. Lockwood. (LLA 88)                                      .80
   *Aristotle: _Nicomachean Ethics_. Tr. M. Ostwald. (LLA 75)         .80
   ----: _On the Art of Poetry_. Tr. S. H. Butcher. (LLA 6)           .50
   *----: _On Poetry and Style_. Tr. G. M. A. Grube. (LLA 68)         .75
   Augustine: _On Christian Doctrine_. Tr. D. W. Robertson, Jr. (LLA
           80)                                                        .95
   *Bacon: _The New Organon_. (LLA 97)                               1.00
   *Beccaria: _Of Crimes and Punishments_. Tr. H. Paolucci & V.
           Caporale. (LLA 107)                                        .60
   Bergson: _An Introduction to Metaphysics_. Tr. T. E. Hulme. (LLA
           10)                                                        .40
   *Berkeley: _An Essay Toward a New Theory of Vision & The Theory
           of Vision Vindicated_. (LLA 83)                            .80
   ----: _A Treatise Concerning the Principles of Human Knowledge_.
           (LLA 53)                                                   .75
   ----: _Three Dialogues between Hylas and Philonous_. (LLA 39)      .75
   _Boccaccio on Poetry._ Tr. C. G. Osgood. (LLA 82)     _cl. $3.50_ 1.25
   *Boethius: _The Consolation of Philosophy_. Tr. R. H. Green. (LLA
           86)                                                        .95
   Bonaventura: _The Mind's Road to God_. Tr. G. Boas. (LLA 32)       .50
   Bowman: _The Absurdity of Christianity and Other Essays_. (LLA
           56)                                                        .75
   Bradley: _Ethical Studies (Selected Essays)_. (LLA 28) _cl. $2.00_ .85
   *Burke: _On the Sublime and Beautiful_. (LLA 99)                   .90
   ----: _Reflections on the Revolution in France_. (LLA 46)
                                                         _cl. $3.50_ 1.25
   Butler: _Five Sermons_. (LLA 21)                                   .60
   Calvin: _On the Christian Faith_. (LLA 93)                         .95
   ----: _On God and Political Duty_. (LLA 23)                        .60
   *_The Cid._ Tr. J. G. Markley. (LLA 77)                            .75
   Cornford: _Plato and Parmenides_. (LLA 102)                       1.60
   ----: _Plato's Cosmology_. (LLA 101)                              1.75
   ----: _Plato's Theory of Knowledge_. (LLA 100)                    1.75
   *Dante: _De vulgari eloquentia_. Tr. W. T. H. Jackson. (LLA 85)    .60
   ----: _On World-Government (De Monarchia)_. Tr. H. W. Schneider.
           (LLA 15)                                                   .60
   Descartes: _Discourse on Method_. Tr. L. J. Lafleur. (LLA 19)      .50
   *----: _Discourse on Method and Meditations_. Tr. L. J. Lafleur.
           (LLA 89)                                                   .90
   ----: _Meditations_. Tr. L. J. Lafleur. (LLA 29)                   .60
   Dostoevski: _The Grand Inquisitor on the Nature of Man_. Tr. C.
           Garnett. (LLA 63)                                          .40
   *Dryden: _An Essay of Dramatic Poesy_. (LLA 104)                   .60
   Emerson: _Nature_. (LLA 2)                                         .40
   Epictetus: _The Enchiridion_. Tr. T. W. Higginson. (LLA 8)         .40
   Erasmus: _Ten Colloquies of Erasmus_. Tr. C. R. Thompson. (LLA
           48)                                            _cl. $3.00_ .90
   Euripides: _Electra_. Tr. M. Hadas. (LLA 26)                       .40
   Fichte: _The Vocation of Man_. Tr. W. Smith. (LLA 50)              .75
   Goethe: _Faust I._ Tr. B. Q. Morgan. (LLA 33)          _cl. $2.50_ .75
   Grotius: _Prolegomena to the Law of War and Peace_. Tr. F. W.
           Kelsey. (LLA 65)                                           .50
   Hanslick: _The Beautiful in Music_. (LLA 45)           _cl. $2.50_ .80
   Harrington: _The Political Writings of James Harrington_. (LLA
           38)                                            _cl. $3.00_ .90
   Hegel: _Reason in History_. Tr. R. S. Hartman. (LLA 35)
                                                          _cl. $2.75_ .75
   Hesiod: _Theogony_. Tr. N. O. Brown. (LLA 36)                      .50
   Hobbes: _Leviathan I-II_. (LLA 69)                                1.00
   *Hume.: _David Hume's Literary Essays_. (LLA 84)                   .90
   ----: _David Hume's Political Essays_. (LLA 34)        _cl. $3.00_ .90
   ----: _An Inquiry Concerning Human Understanding_. (LLA 49)        .80
   ----: _An Inquiry Concerning the Principles of Morals_. (LLA 62)   .75
   *Kant: _Critique of the Aesthetic Judgment_. Tr. W. Cerf. (LLA
           73)                                                       1.25
   ----: _Critique of Practical Reason_. Tr. L. W. Beck. (LLA 52)     .90
   ----: _Fundamental Principles of the Metaphysic of Morals_. Tr.
           T. K. Abbott. (LLA 16)                                     .60
   ----: _Perpetual Peace_. Tr. M. C. Smith. (LLA 3)                  .45
   ----: _Perpetual Peace_. Tr. L. W. Beck. (LLA 54)                  .50
   *----: _Perpetual Peace and the Idea of a Universal
           Commonwealth_. Tr. L. W. Beck. (LLA 96)                    .75
   *----: _Philosophy of Right_. Tr. J. Ladd. (LLA 72)               1.25
   ----: _Prolegomena to Any Future Metaphysics_. Tr. Mahaffy-Carus;
           rev. L. W. Beck. (LLA 27)                      _cl. $2.00_ .85
   *----: _Religion within the Limits of Reason_. Tr. T. M. Green.
           (LLA 108)                                     _cl. $3.50_ 1.00
   Kleist: _The Prince of Homburg_. Tr. C. E. Passage. (LLA 60)       .75
   *Le Bon: _Mass Psychology (The Crowd)_. (LLA 90)                   .80
   *Leibniz: _Monadology and Other Philosophical Essays_. Tr. P. &
           A. Schrecker. (LLA 94)                                     .90
   *Lessing: _Laocooen_. Tr. E. A. McCormick. (LLA 78)                 .95
   _The Life of Lazarillo de Tormes._ Tr. J. G. Markley. (LLA 37)     .50
   Locke: _A Letter Concerning Toleration_. (LLA 22)                  .40
   ----: _The Second Treatise of Government_. (LLA 31)    _cl. $2.50_ .80
   Longinus: _On Great Writing (On the Sublime)_. Tr. G. M. A.
           Grube. (LLA 79)                                            .60
   Machiavelli: _Mandragola_. Tr. A. & H. Paolucci. (LLA 58)          .60
   Mill, J.: _An Essay on Government_. (LLA 47)                       .50
   Mill, J. S.: _Autobiography_. (LLA 91)                             .90
   *----: _Nature and Utility of Religion; Two Essays_. (LLA 81)      .60
   ----: _On Liberty_. (LLA 61)                                       .65
   ----: _Considerations on Representative Government_. (LLA 71)      .90
   Mill, J. S. (cont'd): _Theism_. (LLA 64)                           .75
   ----: _Utilitarianism_. (LLA 1)                                    .50
   *Moliere: _Tartuffe_. Tr. R. W. Hartle. (LLA 87)                   .50
   Nietzsche: _The Use and Abuse of History_. (LLA 11)                .50
   Paine: _The Age of Reason_. (LLA 5)                                .50
   Plato: _Euthyphro, Apology, Crito_. Tr. F. J. Church. (LLA 4)      .50
   ----: _Gorgias_. Tr. W. C. Helmbold. (LLA 20)                      .75
   ----: _Meno_. Tr. B. Jowett. (LLA 12)                              .40
   ----: _Phaedo_. Tr. F. J. Church. (LLA 30)                         .50
   ----: _Phaedrus_. Tr. W. C. Helmbold & W. G. Rabinowitz. (LLA 40)  .60
   *----: _Philebus_. Tr. K. Herbert. (LLA 41)                        .75
   ----: _Protagoras_. Tr. B. Jowett. (LLA 59)                        .75
   ----: _Statesman_. Tr. J. B. Skemp. (LLA 57)                       .75
   ----: _Symposium_. Tr. B. Jowett. (LLA 7)                          .40
   *----: _Theaetetus_. Tr. F. M. Cornford. (LLA 105)                 .80
   ----: _Timaeus_. Tr. F. M. Cornford. (LLA 106)                     .80
   Plautus: _The Haunted House (Mostellaria)_. Tr. F. O. Copley.
           (LLA 42)                                                   .45
   ----: _The Menaechmi_. Tr. F. O. Copley. (LLA 17)                  .45
   ----: _The Rope (Rudens)_. Tr. F. O. Copley. (LLA 43)              .45
   *Pope: _Essay on Man_. (LLA 103)                                   .50
   Post: _Significant Cases in British Constitutional Law_. (LLA 66)
                                                         _cl. $3.50_ 1.25
   *Rousseau: _Two Discourses_. Tr. V. Gourevitch. (LLA 109)          .80
   *Russell: _Selected Essays_. (LLA 74)                              .90
   Schneider: _Sources of Contemporary Philosophical Realism in
           America_. (LLA 92)                                         .60
   *Schopenhauer: _Essay on the Freedom of the Will_. Tr. K.
           Kolenda. (LLA 70)                                          .80
   Seneca: _Medea_. Tr. M. Hadas. (LLA 55)                            .45
   ----: _Oedipus_. Tr. M. Hadas. (LLA 44)                            .45
   ----: _Thyestes_. Tr. M. Hadas. (LLA 76)                           .45
   *Shelley: _Defence of Poetry_. (LLA 98)                            .50
   Sophocles: _Electra_. Tr. R. C. Jebb. (LLA 25)                     .40
   Spinoza: _On the Improvement of the Understanding_. Tr. J. Katz.
           (LLA 67)                                                   .50
   Terence: _Phormio_. Tr. F. O. Copley. (LLA 95)                     .45
   ----: _The Woman of Andros_. Tr. F. O. Copley. (LLA 18)            .45
   *Tolstoy: _What Is Art?_ Tr. A. Maude. (LLA 51)                    .90
   Whitman: _Democratic Vistas_. (LLA 9)                              .50
 
 
                 (_Complete catalogue sent upon request_)
 
 * _In preparation._
 
 
                       THE LIBERAL ARTS PRESS, INC.
                  153 W. 72nd Street, New York 23, N. Y.
 
 
 
 
                           Transcriber's Notes
 
 
 --Retained copyright information from the printed edition, althogh this
   text is public-domain in the country of publication.
 
 --Silently corrected several palpable typos.
 
 --Provided an original cover, released for unrestricted use with this
   Distributed-Proofreaders eBook.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by David P. Steelman and David Widger
 
 
 
 
 
 THE GOLDEN SAYINGS OF EPICTETUS
 
 
 Translated and Arranged by Hastings Crossley
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 Are these the only works of Providence within us? What words suffice to
 praise or set them forth? Had we but understanding, should we ever cease
 hymning and blessing the Divine Power, both openly and in secret, and
 telling of His gracious gifts? Whether digging or ploughing or eating,
 should we not sing the hymn to God:--
 
 Great is God, for that He hath given us such instruments to till
 the ground withal: Great is God, for that He hath given us hands and
 the power of swallowing and digesting; of unconsciously growing and
 breathing while we sleep!
 
 Thus should we ever have sung; yea and this, the grandest and divinest
 hymn of all:--
 
 Great is God, for that He hath given us a mind to apprehend these
 things, and duly to use them!
 
 What then! seeing that most of you are blinded, should there not be some
 one to fill this place, and sing the hymn to God on behalf of all
 men? What else can I that am old and lame do but sing to God? Were I
 a nightingale, I should do after the manner of a nightingale. Were I
 a swan, I should do after the manner of a swan. But now, since I am a
 reasonable being, I must sing to God: that is my work: I do it, nor will
 I desert this my post, as long as it is granted me to hold it; and upon
 you too I call to join in this self-same hymn.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 How then do men act? As though one returning to his country who had
 sojourned for the night in a fair inn, should be so captivated thereby
 as to take up his abode there.
 
 "Friend, thou hast forgotten thine intention! This was not thy
 destination, but only lay on the way thither."
 
 "Nay, but it is a proper place."
 
 "And how many more of the sort there may be; only to pass through
 upon thy way! Thy purpose was to return to thy country; to relieve thy
 kinsmen's fears for thee; thyself to discharge the duties of a citizen;
 to marry a wife, to beget offspring, and to fill the appointed round of
 office. Thou didst not come to choose out what places are most pleasant;
 but rather to return to that wherein thou wast born and where wert
 appointed to be a citizen."
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 Try to enjoy the great festival of life with other men.
 
 
 
 
 IV
 
 But I have one whom I must please, to whom I must be subject, whom I
 must obey:--God, and those who come next to Him. He hath entrusted me
 with myself: He hath made my will subject to myself alone and given me
 rules for the right use thereof.
 
 
 
 
 V
 
 Rufus used to say, If you have leisure to praise me, what I say is
 naught. In truth he spoke in such wise, that each of us who sat there,
 though that some one had accused him to Rufus:--so surely did he lay his
 finger on the very deeds we did: so surely display the faults of each
 before his very eyes.
 
 
 
 
 VI
 
 But what saith God?--"Had it been possible, Epictetus, I would have made
 both that body of thine and thy possessions free and unimpeded, but as
 it is, be not deceived:--it is not thine own; it is but finely tempered
 clay. Since then this I could not do, I have given thee a portion of
 Myself, in the power of desiring and declining and of pursuing and
 avoiding, and in a word the power of dealing with the things of sense.
 And if thou neglect not this, but place all that thou hast therein, thou
 shalt never be let or hindered; thou shalt never lament; thou shalt
 not blame or flatter any. What then? Seemth this to thee a little
 thing?"--God forbid!--"Be content then therewith!"
 
 And so I pray the Gods.
 
 
 
 
 VII
 
 What saith Antisthenes? Hast thou never heard?--
 
 It is a kingly thing, O Cyrus, to do well and to be evil spoken of.
 
 
 
 
 VIII
 
 "Aye, but to debase myself thus were unworthy of me."
 
 "That," said Epictetus, "is for you to consider, not for me. You know
 yourself what you are worth in your own eyes; and at what price you will
 sell yourself. For men sell themselves at various prices. This was why,
 when Florus was deliberating whether he should appear at Nero's shows,
 taking part in the performance himself, Agrippinus replied, 'But why
 do not you appear?' he answered, 'Because I do not even consider the
 question.' For the man who has once stooped to consider such questions,
 and to reckon up the value of external things, is not far from
 forgetting what manner of man he is. Why, what is it that you ask me?
 Is death preferable, or life? I reply, Life. Pain or pleasure? I reply,
 Pleasure."
 
 "Well, but if I do not act, I shall lose my head."
 
 "Then go and act! But for my part I will not act."
 
 "Why?"
 
 "Because you think yourself but one among the many threads which make
 up the texture of the doublet. You should aim at being like men in
 general--just as your thread has no ambition either to be anything
 distinguished compared with the other threads. But I desire to be the
 purple--that small and shining part which makes the rest seem fair and
 beautiful. Why then do you bid me become even as the multitude? Then
 were I no longer the purple."
 
 
 
 
 IX
 
 If a man could be throughly penetrated, as he ought, with this thought,
 that we are all in an especial manner sprung from God, and that God
 is the Father of men as well as of Gods, full surely he would never
 conceive aught ignoble or base of himself. Whereas if Caesar were to
 adopt you, your haughty looks would be intolerable; will you not be
 elated at knowing that you are the son of God? Now however it is not
 so with us: but seeing that in our birth these two things are
 commingled--the body which we share with the animals, and the Reason and
 Thought which we share with the Gods, many decline towards this unhappy
 kinship with the dead, few rise to the blessed kinship with the Divine.
 Since then every one must deal with each thing according to the view
 which he forms about it, those few who hold that they are born for
 fidelity, modesty, and unerring sureness in dealing with the things
 of sense, never conceive aught base or ignoble of themselves: but the
 multitude the contrary. Why, what am I?--A wretched human creature; with
 this miserable flesh of mine. Miserable indeed! but you have something
 better than that paltry flesh of yours. Why then cling to the one, and
 neglect the other?
 
 
 
 
 X
 
 Thou art but a poor soul laden with a lifeless body.
 
 
 
 
 XI
 
 The other day I had an iron lamp placed beside my household gods. I
 heard a noise at the door and on hastening down found my lamp carried
 off. I reflected that the culprit was in no very strange case.
 "Tomorrow, my friend," I said, "you will find an earthenware lamp; for a
 man can only lose what he has."
 
 
 
 
 XII
 
 The reason why I lost my lamp was that the thief was superior to me in
 vigilance. He paid however this price for the lamp, that in exchange
 for it he consented to become a thief: in exchange for it, to become
 faithless.
 
 
 
 
 XIII
 
 But God hath introduced Man to be a spectator of Himself and of His
 works; and not a spectator only, but also an interpreter of them.
 Wherefore it is a shame for man to begin and to leave off where the
 brutes do. Rather he should begin there, and leave off where Nature
 leaves off in us: and that is at contemplation, and understanding, and a
 manner of life that is in harmony with herself.
 
 See then that ye die not without being spectators of these things.
 
 
 
 
 XIV
 
 You journey to Olympia to see the work of Phidias; and each of you holds
 it a misfortune not to have beheld these things before you die. Whereas
 when there is no need even to take a journey, but you are on the spot,
 with the works before you, have you no care to contemplate and study
 these?
 
 Will you not then perceive either who you are or unto what end you were
 born: or for what purpose the power of contemplation has been bestowed
 on you?
 
 "Well, but in life there are some things disagreeable and hard to bear."
 
 And are there none at Olympia? Are you not scorched by the heat? Are you
 not cramped for room? Have you not to bathe with discomfort? Are you not
 drenched when it rains? Have you not to endure the clamor and shouting
 and such annoyances as these? Well, I suppose you set all this over
 against the splendour of the spectacle and bear it patiently. What then?
 have you not received greatness of heart, received courage, received
 fortitude? What care I, if I am great of heart, for aught that can come
 to pass? What shall cast me down or disturb me? What shall seem painful?
 Shall I not use the power to the end for which I received it, instead of
 moaning and wailing over what comes to pass?
 
 
 
 
 XV
 
 If what philosophers say of the kinship of God and Man be true, what
 remains for men to do but as Socrates did:--never, when asked one's
 country, to answer, "I am an Athenian or a Corinthian," but "I am a
 citizen of the world."
 
 
 
 
 XVI
 
 He that hath grasped the administration of the World, who hath learned
 that this Community, which consists of God and men, is the foremost and
 mightiest and most comprehensive of all:--that from God have descended
 the germs of life, not to my father only and father's father, but to all
 things that are born and grow upon the earth, and in an especial manner
 to those endowed with Reason (for those only are by their nature fitted
 to hold communion with God, being by means of Reason conjoined with
 Him)--why should not such an one call himself a citizen of the world?
 Why not a son of God? Why should he fear aught that comes to pass among
 men? Shall kinship with Caesar, or any other of the great at Rome, be
 enough to hedge men around with safety and consideration, without a
 thought of apprehension: while to have God for our Maker, and Father,
 and Kinsman, shall not this set us free from sorrows and fears?
 
 
 
 
 XVII
 
 I do not think that an old fellow like me need have been sitting here
 to try and prevent your entertaining abject notions of yourselves, and
 talking of yourselves in an abject and ignoble way: but to prevent there
 being by chance among you any such young men as, after recognising their
 kindred to the Gods, and their bondage in these chains of the body and
 its manifold necessities, should desire to cast them off as burdens
 too grievous to be borne, and depart their true kindred. This is the
 struggle in which your Master and Teacher, were he worthy of the name,
 should be engaged. You would come to me and say: "Epictetus, we can no
 longer endure being chained to this wretched body, giving food and
 drink and rest and purification: aye, and for its sake forced to be
 subservient to this man and that. Are these not things indifferent and
 nothing to us? Is it not true that death is no evil? Are we not in
 a manner kinsmen of the Gods, and have we not come from them? Let us
 depart thither, whence we came: let us be freed from these chains that
 confine and press us down. Here are thieves and robbers and tribunals:
 and they that are called tyrants, who deem that they have after a
 fashion power over us, because of the miserable body and what appertains
 to it. Let us show them that they have power over none."
 
 
 
 
 XVIII
 
 And to this I reply:--
 
 "Friends, wait for God. When He gives the signal, and releases you from
 this service, then depart to Him. But for the present, endure to dwell
 in the place wherein He hath assigned you your post. Short indeed is the
 time of your habitation therein, and easy to those that are minded. What
 tyrant, what robber, what tribunals have any terrors for those who thus
 esteem the body and all that belong to it as of no account? Stay; depart
 not rashly hence!"
 
 
 
 
 XIX
 
 Something like that is what should pass between a teacher and ingenuous
 youths. As it is, what does pass? The teacher is a lifeless body, and
 you are lifeless bodies yourselves. When you have had enough to eat
 today, you sit down and weep about tomorrow's food. Slave! if you
 have it, well and good; if not, you will depart: the door is open--why
 lament? What further room is there for tears? What further occasion for
 flattery? Why should one envy another? Why should you stand in awe of
 them that have much or are placed in power, especially if they be also
 strong and passionate? Why, what should they do to us? What they can do,
 we will not regard: what does concern us, that they cannot do. Who then
 shall rule one that is thus minded?
 
 
 
 
 XX
 
 Seeing this then, and noting well the faculties which you have, you
 should say,--"Send now, O God, any trial that Thou wilt; lo, I have
 means and powers given me by Thee to acquit myself with honour through
 whatever comes to pass!"--No; but there you sit, trembling for fear
 certain things should come to pass, and moaning and groaning and
 lamenting over what does come to pass. And then you upbraid the Gods.
 Such meanness of spirit can have but one result--impiety.
 
 Yet God has not only given us these faculties by means of which we may
 bear everything that comes to pass without being crushed or depressed
 thereby; but like a good King and Father, He has given us this without
 let or hindrance, placed wholly at our own disposition, without
 reserving to Himself any power of impediment or restraint. Though
 possessing all these things free and all you own, you do not use them!
 you do not perceive what it is you have received nor whence it comes,
 but sit moaning and groaning; some of you blind to the Giver, making no
 acknowledgment to your Benefactor; others basely giving themselves to
 complaints and accusations against God.
 
 Yet what faculties and powers you possess for attaining courage and
 greatness of heart, I can easily show you; what you have for upbraiding
 and accusation, it is for you to show me!
 
 
 
 
 XXI
 
 How did Socrates bear himself in this regard? How else than as became
 one who was fully assured that he was the kinsman of Gods?
 
 
 
 
 XXII
 
 If God had made that part of His own nature which He severed from
 Himself and gave to us, liable to be hindered or constrained either by
 Himself or any other, He would not have been God, nor would He have been
 taking care of us as He ought . . . . If you choose, you are free; if
 you choose, you need blame no man--accuse no man. All things will be at
 once according to your mind and according to the Mind of God.
 
 
 
 
 XXIII
 
 Petrifaction is of two sorts. There is petrifaction of the
 understanding; and also of the sense of shame. This happens when a
 man obstinately refuses to acknowledge plain truths, and persists in
 maintaining what is self-contradictory. Most of us dread mortification
 of the body, and would spare no pains to escape anything of that kind.
 But of mortification of the soul we are utterly heedless. With regard,
 indeed, to the soul, if a man is in such a state as to be incapable of
 following or understanding anything, I grant you we do think him in a
 bad way. But mortification of the sense of shame and modesty we go so
 far as to dub strength of mind!
 
 
 
 
 XXIV
 
 If we were as intent upon our business as the old fellows at Rome are
 upon what interests them, we too might perhaps accomplish something.
 I know a man older than I am, now Superintendent of the Corn-market at
 Rome, and I remember when he passed through this place on his way back
 from exile, what an account he gave me of his former life, declaring
 that for the future, once home again, his only care should be to pass
 his remaining years in quiet and tranquility. "For how few years have
 I left!" he cried. "That," I said, "you will not do; but the moment the
 scent of Rome is in your nostrils, you will forget it all; and if you
 can but gain admission to Court, you will be glad enough to elbow your
 way in, and thank God for it." "Epictetus," he replied, "if ever you
 find me setting as much as one foot within the Court, think what you
 will of me."
 
 Well, as it was, what did he do? Ere ever he entered the city, he was
 met by a despatch from the Emperor. He took it, and forgot the whole
 of his resolutions. From that moment, he has been piling one thing upon
 another. I should like to be beside him to remind him of what he said
 when passing this way, and to add, How much better a prophet I am than
 you!
 
 What then? do I say man is not made for an active life? Far from it!
 . . . But there is a great difference between other men's occupations and
 ours. . . . A glance at theirs will make it clear to you. All day long
 they do nothing but calculate, contrive, consult how to wring their
 profit out of food-stuffs, farm-plots and the like. . . . Whereas, I
 entreat you to learn what the administration of the World is, and what
 place a Being endowed with reason holds therein: to consider what you
 are yourself, and wherein your Good and Evil consists.
 
 
 
 
 XXV
 
 A man asked me to write to Rome on his behalf who, as most people
 thought, had met with misfortune; for having been before wealthy and
 distinguished, he had afterwards lost all and was living here. So I
 wrote about him in a humble style. He however on reading the letter
 returned it to me, with the words: "I asked for your help, not for your
 pity. No evil has happened unto me."
 
 
 
 
 XXVI
 
 True instruction is this:--to learn to wish that each thing should come
 to pass as it does. And how does it come to pass? As the Disposer has
 disposed it. Now He has disposed that there should be summer and winter,
 and plenty and dearth, and vice and virtue, and all such opposites, for
 the harmony of the whole.
 
 
 
 
 XXVII
 
 Have this thought ever present with thee, when thou losest any outward
 thing, what thou gainest in its stead; and if this be the more precious,
 say not, I have suffered loss.
 
 
 
 
 XXVIII
 
 Concerning the Gods, there are who deny the very existence of the
 Godhead; others say that it exists, but neither bestirs nor concerns
 itself nor has forethought for anything. A third party attribute to it
 existence and forethought, but only for great and heavenly matters, not
 for anything that is on earth. A fourth party admit things on earth as
 well as in heaven, but only in general, and not with respect to each
 individual. A fifth, of whom were Ulysses and Socrates are those that
 cry:--
 
 I move not without Thy knowledge!
 
 
 
 
 XXIX
 
 Considering all these things, the good and true man submits his
 judgement to Him that administers the Universe, even as good citizens to
 the law of the State. And he that is being instructed should come thus
 minded:--How may I in all things follow the Gods; and, How may I rest
 satisfied with the Divine Administration; and, How may I become free?
 For he is free for whom all things come to pass according to his will,
 and whom none can hinder. What then, is freedom madness? God forbid. For
 madness and freedom exist not together.
 
 "But I wish all that I desire to come to pass and in the manner that I
 desire."
 
 --You are mad, you are beside yourself. Know you not that Freedom is a
 glorious thing and of great worth? But that what I desired at random I
 should wish at random to come to pass, so far from being noble, may well
 be exceeding base.
 
 
 
 
 XXX
 
 You must know that it is no easy thing for a principle to become a man's
 own, unless each day he maintain it and hear it maintained, as well as
 work it out in life.
 
 
 
 
 XXXI
 
 You are impatient and hard to please. If alone, you call it solitude: if
 in the company of men, you dub them conspirators and thieves, and find
 fault with your very parents, children, brothers, and neighbours.
 Whereas when by yourself you should have called it Tranquillity and
 Freedom: and herein deemed yourself like unto the Gods. And when in the
 company of many, you should not have called it a wearisome crowd and
 tumult, but an assembly and a tribunal; and thus accepted all with
 contentment.
 
 
 
 
 XXXII
 
 What then is the chastisement of those who accept it not? To be as they
 are. Is any discontented with being alone? let him be in solitude. Is
 any discontented with his parents? let him be a bad son, and lament. Is
 any discontented with his children? let him be a bad father.--"Throw
 him into prison!"--What prison?--Where he is already: for he is there
 against his will; and wherever a man is against his will, that to him is
 a prison. Thus Socrates was not in prison, since he was there with his
 own consent.
 
 
 
 
 XXXIII
 
 Knowest thou what a speck thou art in comparison with the
 Universe?---That is, with respect to the body; since with respect to
 Reason, thou art not inferior to the Gods, nor less than they. For the
 greatness of Reason is not measured by length or height, but by the
 resolves of the mind. Place then thy happiness in that wherein thou art
 equal to the Gods.
 
 
 
 
 XXXIV
 
 Asked how a man might eat acceptably to the Gods, Epictetus replied:--If
 when he eats, he can be just, cheerful, equable, temperate, and orderly,
 can he not thus eat acceptably to the Gods? But when you call for warm
 water, and your slave does not answer, or when he answers brings it
 lukewarm, or is not even found to be in the house at all, then not to be
 vexed nor burst with anger, is not that acceptable to the Gods?
 
 "But how can one endure such people?"
 
 Slave, will you not endure your own brother, that has God to his
 forefather, even as a son sprung from the same stock, and of the same
 high descent as yourself? And if you are stationed in a high position,
 are you therefor forthwith set up for a tyrant? Remember who you are,
 and whom you rule, that they are by nature your kinsmen, your brothers,
 the offspring of God.
 
 "But I paid a price for them, not they for me."
 
 Do you see whither you are looking--down to the earth, to the pit, to
 those despicable laws of the dead? But to the laws of the Gods you do
 not look.
 
 
 
 
 XXXV
 
 When we are invited to a banquet, we take what is set before us; and
 were one to call upon his host to set fish upon the table or sweet
 things, he would be deemed absurd. Yet in a word, we ask the Gods for
 what they do not give; and that, although they have given us so many
 things!
 
 
 
 
 XXXVI
 
 Asked how a man might convince himself that every single act of his was
 under the eye of God, Epictetus answered:--
 
 "Do you not hold that things on earth and things in heaven are
 continuous and in unison with each other?"
 
 "I do," was the reply.
 
 "Else how should the trees so regularly, as though by God's command,
 at His bidding flower; at His bidding send forth shoots, bear fruit and
 ripen it; at His bidding let it fall and shed their leaves, and folded
 up upon themselves lie in quietness and rest? How else, as the Moon
 waxes and wanes, as the Sun approaches and recedes, can it be that such
 vicissitude and alternation is seen in earthly things?
 
 "If then all things that grow, nay, our own bodies, are thus bound up
 with the whole, is not this still truer of our souls? And if our souls
 are bound up and in contact with God, as being very parts and fragments
 plucked from Himself, shall He not feel every movement of theirs as
 though it were His own, and belonging to His own nature?"
 
 
 
 
 XXXVII
 
 "But," you say, "I cannot comprehend all this at once."
 
 "Why, who told you that your powers were equal to God's?"
 
 Yet God hath placed by the side of each a man's own Guardian Spirit, who
 is charged to watch over him--a Guardian who sleeps not nor is deceived.
 For to what better or more watchful Guardian could He have committed
 which of us? So when you have shut the doors and made a darkness within,
 remember never to say that you are alone; for you are not alone, but
 God is within, and your Guardian Spirit, and what light do they need to
 behold what you do? To this God you also should have sworn allegiance,
 even as soldiers unto Caesar. They, when their service is hired, swear
 to hold the life of Caesar dearer than all else: and will you not swear
 your oath, that are deemed worthy of so many and great gifts? And will
 you not keep your oath when you have sworn it? And what oath will you
 swear? Never to disobey, never to arraign or murmur at aught that comes
 to you from His hand: never unwillingly to do or suffer aught that
 necessity lays upon you.
 
 "Is this oath like theirs?"
 
 They swear to hold no other dearer than Caesar: you, to hold our true
 selves dearer than all else beside.
 
 
 
 
 XXXVIII
 
 "How shall my brother cease to be wroth with me?"
 
 Bring him to me, and I will tell him. But to thee I have nothing to say
 about his anger.
 
 
 
 
 XXXIX
 
 When one took counsel of Epictetus, saying, "What I seek is this, how
 even though my brother be not reconciled to me, I may still remain as
 Nature would have me to be," he replied: "All great things are slow of
 growth; nay, this is true even of a grape or of a fig. If then you say
 to me now, I desire a fig, I shall answer, It needs time: wait till it
 first flower, then cast its blossom, then ripen. Whereas then the fruit
 of the fig-tree reaches not maturity suddenly nor yet in a single hour,
 do you nevertheless desire so quickly, and easily to reap the fruit of
 the mind of man?--Nay, expect it not, even though I bade you!"
 
 
 
 
 XL
 
 Epaphroditus had a shoemaker whom he sold as being good-for-nothing.
 This fellow, by some accident, was afterwards purchased by one of
 Caesar's men, and became a shoemaker to Caesar. You should have seen
 what respect Epaphroditus paid him then. "How does the good Felicion?
 Kindly let me know!" And if any of us inquired, "What is Epaphroditus
 doing?" the answer was, "He is consulting about so and so with
 Felicion."--Had he not sold him as good-for-nothing? Who had in a trice
 converted him into a wiseacre?
 
 This is what comes of holding of importance anything but the things that
 depend on the Will.
 
 
 
 
 XLI
 
 What you shun enduring yourself, attempt not to impose on others. You
 shun slavery--beware of enslaving others! If you can endure to do that,
 one would think you had been once upon a time a slave yourself. For Vice
 has nothing in common with virtue, nor Freedom with slavery.
 
 
 
 
 XLII
 
 Has a man been raised to tribuneship? Every one that he meets
 congratulates him. One kisses him on the eyes, another on the neck,
 while the slaves kiss his hands. He goes home to find torches burning;
 he ascends to the Capitol to sacrifice.--Who ever sacrificed for having
 had right desires; for having conceived such inclinations as Nature
 would have him? In truth we thank the Gods for that wherein we place our
 happiness.
 
 
 
 
 XLIII
 
 A man was talking to me to-day about the priesthood of Augustus. I said
 to him, "Let the thing go, my good Sir; you will spend a good deal to no
 purpose."
 
 "Well, but my name will be inserted in all documents and contracts."
 
 "Will you be standing there to tell those that read them, That is my
 name written there? And even if you could now be there in every case,
 what will you do when you are dead?"
 
 "At all events my name will remain."
 
 "Inscribe it on a stone and it will remain just as well. And think,
 beyond Nicopolis what memory of you will there be?"
 
 "But I shall have a golden wreath to wear."
 
 "If you must have a wreath, get a wreath of roses and put it on; you
 will look more elegant!"
 
 
 
 
 XLIV
 
 Above all, remember that the door stands open. Be not more fearful than
 children; but as they, when they weary of the game, cry, "I will play
 no more," even so, when thou art in the like case, cry, "I will play no
 more" and depart. But if thou stayest, make no lamentation.
 
 
 
 
 XLV
 
 Is there smoke in the room? If it be slight, I remain; if grievous,
 I quit it. For you must remember this and hold it fast, that the door
 stands open.
 
 "You shall not dwell at Nicopolis!"
 
 Well and good.
 
 "Nor at Athens."
 
 Then I will not dwell at Athens either.
 
 "Nor at Rome."
 
 Nor at Rome either.
 
 "You shall dwell in Gyara!"
 
 Well: but to dwell in Gyara seems to me like a grievous smoke; I depart
 to a place where none can forbid me to dwell: that habitation is open
 unto all! As for the last garment of all, that is the poor body; beyond
 that, none can do aught unto me. This why Demetrius said to Nero: "You
 threaten me with death; it is Nature who threatens you!"
 
 
 
 
 XLVI
 
 The beginning of philosophy is to know the condition of one's own mind.
 If a man recognises that this is in a weakly state, he will not then
 want to apply it to questions of the greatest moment. As it is, men who
 are not fit to swallow even a morsel, buy whole treatises and try to
 devour them. Accordingly they either vomit them up again, or suffer from
 indigestion, whence come gripings, fluxions, and fevers. Whereas they
 should have stopped to consider their capacity.
 
 
 
 
 XLVII
 
 In theory it is easy to convince an ignorant person: in actual life, men
 not only object to offer themselves to be convinced, but hate the man
 who has convinced them. Whereas Socrates used to say that we should
 never lead a life not subjected to examination.
 
 
 
 
 XLVIII
 
 This is the reason why Socrates, when reminded that he should prepare
 for his trial, answered: "Thinkest thou not that I have been preparing
 for it all my life?"
 
 "In what way?"
 
 "I have maintained that which in me lay!"
 
 "How so?"
 
 "I have never, secretly or openly, done a wrong unto any."
 
 
 
 
 XLIX
 
 In what character dost thou now come forward?
 
 As a witness summoned by God. "Come thou," saith God, "and testify for
 me, for thou art worthy of being brought forward as a witness by Me. Is
 aught that is outside thy will either good or bad? Do I hurt any man?
 Have I placed the good of each in the power of any other than himself?
 What witness dost thou bear to God?"
 
 "I am in evil state, Master, I am undone! None careth for me, none
 giveth me aught: all men blame, all speak evil of me."
 
 Is this the witness thou wilt bear, and do dishonour to the calling
 wherewith He hath called thee, because He hath done thee so great
 honour, and deemed thee worthy of being summoned to bear witness in so
 great a cause?
 
 
 
 
 L
 
 Wouldst thou have men speak good of thee? speak good of them. And when
 thou hast learned to speak good of them, try to do good unto them, and
 thus thou wilt reap in return their speaking good of thee.
 
 
 
 
 LI
 
 When thou goest in to any of the great, remember that Another from above
 sees what is passing, and that thou shouldst please Him rather than man.
 He therefore asks thee:--
 
 "In the Schools, what didst thou call exile, imprisonment, bonds, death
 and shame?"
 
 "I called them things indifferent."
 
 "What then dost thou call them now? Are they at all changed?"
 
 "No."
 
 "Is it then thou that art changed?"
 
 "No."
 
 "Say then, what are things indifferent?"
 
 "Things that are not in our power."
 
 "Say then, what follows?"
 
 "That things which are not in our power are nothing to me."
 
 "Say also what things you hold to be good."
 
 "A will such as it ought to be, and a right use of the things of sense."
 
 "And what is the end?"
 
 "To follow Thee!"
 
 
 
 
 LII
 
 "That Socrates should ever have been so treated by the Athenians!"
 
 Slave! why say "Socrates"? Speak of the thing as it is: That ever then
 the poor body of Socrates should have been dragged away and haled by
 main force to prison! That ever hemlock should have been given to the
 body of Socrates; that that should have breathed its life away!--Do you
 marvel at this? Do you hold this unjust? Is it for this that you accuse
 God? Had Socrates no compensation for this? Where then for him was the
 ideal Good? Whom shall we hearken to, you or him? And what says he?
 
 "Anytus and Melitus may put me to death: to injure me is beyond their
 power."
 
 And again:--
 
 "If such be the will of God, so let it be."
 
 
 
 
 LIII
 
 Nay, young man, for heaven's sake; but once thou hast heard these words,
 go home and say to thyself:--"It is not Epictetus that has told me these
 things: how indeed should he? No, it is some gracious God through him.
 Else it would never have entered his head to tell me them--he that is
 not used to speak to any one thus. Well, then, let us not lie under the
 wrath of God, but be obedient unto Him."---Nay, indeed; but if a raven
 by its croaking bears thee any sign, it is not the raven but God that
 sends the sign through the raven; and if He signifies anything to thee
 through human voice, will He not cause the man to say these words to
 thee, that thou mayest know the power of the Divine--how He sends a sign
 to some in one way and to others in another, and on the greatest and
 highest matters of all signifies His will through the noblest messenger?
 
 What else does the poet mean:--
 
      I spake unto him erst Myself, and sent
      Hermes the shining One, to check and warn him,
      The husband not to slay, nor woo the wife!
 
 
 
 
 LIV
 
 In the same way my friend Heraclitus, who had a trifling suit about a
 petty farm at Rhodes, first showed the judges that his cause was just,
 and then at the finish cried, "I will not entreat you: nor do I care
 what sentence you pass. It is you who are on your trial, not I!"--And so
 he ended the case.
 
 
 
 
 LV
 
 As for us, we behave like a herd of deer. When they flee from the
 huntsman's feathers in affright, which way do they turn? What haven of
 safety do they make for? Why, they rush upon the nets! And thus they
 perish by confounding what they should fear with that wherein no danger
 lies. . . . Not death or pain is to be feared, but the fear of death or
 pain. Well said the poet therefore:--
 
 Death has no terror; only a Death of shame!
 
 
 
 
 LVI
 
 How is it then that certain external things are said to be natural, and
 other contrary to Nature?
 
 Why, just as it might be said if we stood alone and apart from others.
 A foot, for instance, I will allow it is natural should be clean. But if
 you take it as a foot, and as a thing which does not stand by itself, it
 will beseem it (if need be) to walk in the mud, to tread on thorns, and
 sometimes even to be cut off, for the benefit of the whole body; else
 it is no longer a foot. In some such way we should conceive of ourselves
 also. What art thou?--A man.--Looked at as standing by thyself and
 separate, it is natural for thee in health and wealth long to live.
 But looked at as a Man, and only as a part of a Whole, it is for that
 Whole's sake that thou shouldest at one time fall sick, at another brave
 the perils of the sea, again, know the meaning of want and perhaps die
 an early death. Why then repine? Knowest thou not that as the foot is
 no more a foot if detached from the body, so thou in like case art no
 longer a Man? For what is a Man? A part of a City:--first of the City
 of Gods and Men; next, of that which ranks nearest it, a miniature of
 the universal City. . . . In such a body, in such a world enveloping us,
 among lives like these, such things must happen to one or another. Thy
 part, then, being here, is to speak of these things as is meet, and to
 order them as befits the matter.
 
 
 
 
 LVII
 
 That was a good reply which Diogenes made to a man who asked him for
 letters of recommendation.--"That you are a man, he will know when he
 sees you;--whether a good or bad one, he will know if he has any skill
 in discerning the good or bad. But if he has none, he will never know,
 though I write him a thousand times."--It is as though a piece of silver
 money desired to be recommended to some one to be tested. If the man be
 a good judge of silver, he will know: the coin will tell its own tale.
 
 
 
 
 LVIII
 
 Even as the traveller asks his way of him that he meets, inclined in no
 wise to bear to the right rather than to the left (for he desires only
 the way leading whither he would go), so should we come unto God as to a
 guide; even as we use our eyes without admonishing them to show us some
 things rather than others, but content to receive the images of such
 things as they present to us. But as it is we stand anxiously
 watching the victim, and with the voice of supplication call upon the
 augur:--"Master, have mercy on me: vouchsafe unto me a way of escape!"
 Slave, would you then have aught else then what is best? is there
 anything better than what is God's good pleasure? Why, as far as in you
 lies, would you corrupt your Judge, and lead your Counsellor astray?
 
 
 
 
 LIX
 
 God is beneficent. But the Good also is beneficent. It should seem then
 that where the real nature of God is, there too is to be found the real
 nature of the Good. What then is the real nature of God?--Intelligence,
 Knowledge, Right Reason. Here then without more ado seek the real nature
 of the Good. For surely thou dost not seek it in a plant or in an animal
 that reasoneth not.
 
 
 
 
 LX
 
 Seek then the real nature of the Good in that without whose presence
 thou wilt not admit the Good to exist in aught else.--What then? Are not
 these other things also works of God?--They are; but not preferred to
 honour, nor are they portions of God. But thou art a thing preferred to
 honour: thou art thyself a fragment torn from God:--thou hast a portion
 of Him within thyself. How is it then that thou dost not know thy high
 descent--dost not know whence thou comest? When thou eatest, wilt
 thou not remember who thou art that eatest and whom thou feedest? In
 intercourse, in exercise, in discussion knowest thou not that it is
 a God whom thou feedest, a God whom thou exercisest, a God whom thou
 bearest about with thee, O miserable! and thou perceivest it not.
 Thinkest thou that I speak of a God of silver or gold, that is without
 thee? Nay, thou bearest Him within thee! all unconscious of polluting Him
 with thoughts impure and unclean deeds. Were an image of God present,
 thou wouldest not dare to act as thou dost, yet, when God Himself is
 present within thee, beholding and hearing all, thou dost not blush to
 think such thoughts and do such deeds, O thou that art insensible of
 thine own nature and liest under the wrath of God!
 
 
 
 
 LXI
 
 Why then are we afraid when we send a young man from the Schools into
 active life, lest he should indulge his appetites intemperately, lest
 he should debase himself by ragged clothing, or be puffed up by fine
 raiment? Knows he not the God within him; knows he not with whom he is
 starting on his way? Have we patience to hear him say to us, Would I
 had thee with me!--Hast thou not God where thou art, and having Him dost
 thou still seek for any other! Would He tell thee aught else than these
 things? Why, wert thou a statue of Phidias, an Athena or a Zeus, thou
 wouldst bethink thee both of thyself and thine artificer; and hadst thou
 any sense, thou wouldst strive to do no dishonour to thyself or him that
 fashioned thee, nor appear to beholders in unbefitting guise. But now,
 because God is thy Maker, is that why thou carest not of what sort
 thou shalt show thyself to be? Yet how different the artists and their
 workmanship! What human artist's work, for example, has in it the
 faculties that are displayed in fashioning it? Is it aught but marble,
 bronze, gold, or ivory? Nay, when the Athena of Phidias has put forth
 her hand and received therein a Victory, in that attitude she stands
 for evermore. But God's works move and breathe; they use and judge the
 things of sense. The workmanship of such an Artist, wilt thou dishonor
 Him? Ay, when he not only fashioned thee, but placed thee, like a ward,
 in the care and guardianship of thyself alone, wilt thou not only forget
 this, but also do dishonour to what is committed to thy care! If God had
 entrusted thee with an orphan, wouldst thou have thus neglected him? He
 hath delivered thee to thine own care, saying, I had none more faithful
 than myself: keep this man for me such as Nature hath made him--modest,
 faithful, high-minded, a stranger to fear, to passion, to perturbation.
 . . .
 
 Such will I show myself to you all.--"What, exempt from sickness also:
 from age, from death?"--Nay, but accepting sickness, accepting death as
 becomes a God!
 
 
 
 
 LXII
 
 No labour, according to Diogenes, is good but that which aims at
 producing courage and strength of soul rather than of body.
 
 
 
 
 LXIII
 
 A guide, on finding a man who has lost his way, brings him back to the
 right path--he does not mock and jeer at him and then take himself off.
 You also must show the unlearned man the truth, and you will see that he
 will follow. But so long as you do not show it him, you should not mock,
 but rather feel your own incapacity.
 
 
 
 
 LXIV
 
 It was the first and most striking characteristic of Socrates never to
 become heated in discourse, never to utter an injurious or insulting
 word--on the contrary, he persistently bore insult from others and thus
 put an end to the fray. If you care to know the extent of his power
 in this direction, read Xenophon's Banquet, and you will see how many
 quarrels he put an end to. This is why the Poets are right in so highly
 commending this faculty:--
 
 Quickly and wisely withal even bitter feuds would he settle.
 
 Nevertheless the practice is not very safe at present, especially in
 Rome. One who adopts it, I need not say, ought not to carry it out in an
 obscure corner, but boldly accost, if occasion serve, some personage of
 rank or wealth.
 
 "Can you tell me, sir, to whose care you entrust your horses?"
 
 "I can."
 
 "Is it to the first comer, who knows nothing about them?"
 
 "Certainly not."
 
 "Well, what of the man who takes care of your gold, your silver or your
 raiment?"
 
 "He must be experienced also."
 
 "And your body--have you ever considered about entrusting it to any
 one's care?"
 
 "Of course I have."
 
 "And no doubt to a person of experience as a trainer, a physician?"
 
 "Surely."
 
 "And these things the best you possess, or have you anything more
 precious?"
 
 "What can you mean?"
 
 "I mean that which employs these; which weights all things; which takes
 counsel and resolve."
 
 "Oh, you mean the soul."
 
 "You take me rightly; I do mean the soul. By Heaven, I hold that far
 more precious than all else I possess. Can you show me then what care
 you bestow on a soul? For it can scarcely be thought that a man of your
 wisdom and consideration in the city would suffer your most precious
 possession to go to ruin through carelessness and neglect."
 
 "Certainly not."
 
 "Well, do you take care of it yourself? Did any one teach you the right
 method, or did you discover it yourself?"
 
 Now here comes in the danger: first, that the great man may answer,
 "Why, what is that to you, my good fellow? are you my master?" And then,
 if you persist in troubling him, may raise his hand to strike you. It is
 a practice of which I was myself a warm admirer until such experiences
 as these befell me.
 
 
 
 
 LXV
 
 When a youth was giving himself airs in the Theatre and saying, "I am
 wise, for I have conversed with many wise men," Epictetus replied, "I
 too have conversed with many rich men, yet I am not rich!"
 
 
 
 
 LXVI
 
 We see that a carpenter becomes a carpenter by learning certain things:
 that a pilot, by learning certain things, becomes a pilot. Possibly also
 in the present case the mere desire to be wise and good is not enough.
 It is necessary to learn certain things. This is then the object of our
 search. The Philosophers would have us first learn that there is a God,
 and that His Providence directs the Universe; further, that to hide
 from Him not only one's acts but even one's thoughts and intentions is
 impossible; secondly, what the nature of God is. Whatever that nature is
 discovered to be, the man who would please and obey Him must strive with
 all his might to be made like unto him. If the Divine is faithful, he
 also must be faithful; if free, he also must be free; if beneficent, he
 also must be beneficent; if magnanimous, he also must be magnanimous.
 Thus as an imitator of God must he follow Him in every deed and word.
 
 
 
 
 LXVII
 
 If I show you, that you lack just what is most important and necessary
 to happiness, that hitherto your attention has been bestowed on
 everything rather than that which claims it most; and, to crown all,
 that you know neither what God nor Man is--neither what Good or Evil is:
 why, that you are ignorant of everything else, perhaps you may bear to
 be told; but to hear that you know nothing of yourself, how could you
 submit to that? How could you stand your ground and suffer that to be
 proved? Clearly not at all. You instantly turn away in wrath. Yet what
 harm have I done to you? Unless indeed the mirror harms the ill-favoured
 man by showing him to himself just as he is; unless the physician can
 be thought to insult his patient, when he tells him:--"Friend, do you
 suppose there is nothing wrong with you? why, you have a fever. Eat
 nothing to-day, and drink only water." Yet no one says, "What an
 insufferable insult!" Whereas if you say to a man, "Your desires are
 inflamed, your instincts of rejection are weak and low, your aims
 are inconsistent, your impulses are not in harmony with Nature, your
 opinions are rash and false," he forthwith goes away and complains that
 you have insulted him.
 
 
 
 
 LXVIII
 
 Our way of life resembles a fair. The flocks and herds are passing along
 to be sold, and the greater part of the crowd to buy and sell. But there
 are some few who come only to look at the fair, to inquire how and why
 it is being held, upon what authority and with what object. So too, in
 this great Fair of life, some, like the cattle, trouble themselves about
 nothing but the fodder. Know all of you, who are busied about land,
 slaves and public posts, that these are nothing but fodder! Some few
 there are attending the Fair, who love to contemplate what the world
 is, what He that administers it. Can there be no Administrator? is it
 possible, that while neither city nor household could endure even a
 moment without one to administer and see to its welfare, this Fabric, so
 fair, so vast, should be administered in order so harmonious, without a
 purpose and by blind chance? There is therefore an Administrator. What
 is His nature and how does He administer? And who are we that are
 His children and what work were we born to perform? Have we any close
 connection or relation with Him or not?
 
 Such are the impressions of the few of whom I speak. And further, they
 apply themselves solely to considering and examining the great assembly
 before they depart. Well, they are derided by the multitude. So are the
 lookers-on by the traders: aye, and if the beasts had any sense, they
 would deride those who thought much of anything but fodder!
 
 
 
 
 LXIX
 
 I think I know now what I never knew before--the meaning of the common
 saying, A fool you can neither bend nor break. Pray heaven I may never
 have a wise fool for my friend! There is nothing more intractable.--"My
 resolve is fixed!"--Why so madman say too; but the more firmly they
 believe in their delusions, the more they stand in need of treatment.
 
 
 
 
 LXX
 
 --"O! when shall I see Athens and its Acropolis again?"--Miserable man!
 art thou not contented with the daily sights that meet thine eyes? canst
 thou behold aught greater or nobler than the Sun, Moon, and Stars;
 than the outspread Earth and Sea? If indeed thou apprehendest Him who
 administers the universe, if thou bearest Him about within thee, canst
 thou still hanker after mere fragments of stone and fine rock? When thou
 art about to bid farewell to the Sun and Moon itself, wilt thou sit down
 and cry like a child? Why, what didst thou hear, what didst thou learn?
 why didst thou write thyself down a philosopher, when thou mightest have
 written what was the fact, namely, "I have made one or two Compendiums,
 I have read some works of Chrysippus, and I have not even touched the
 hem of Philosophy's robe!"
 
 
 
 
 LXXI
 
 Friend, lay hold with a desperate grasp, ere it is too late, on Freedom,
 on Tranquility, on Greatness of soul! Lift up thy head, as one escaped
 from slavery; dare to look up to God, and say:--"Deal with me henceforth
 as Thou wilt; Thou and I are of one mind. I am Thine: I refuse nothing
 that seeeth good to Thee; lead on whither Thou wilt; clothe me in what
 garb Thou pleasest; wilt Thou have me a ruler or a subject--at home or
 in exile--poor or rich? All these things will I justify unto men for
 Thee. I will show the true nature of each. . . ."
 
 Who would Hercules have been had he loitered at home? no Hercules, but
 Eurystheus. And in his wanderings through the world how many friends and
 comrades did he find? but nothing dearer to him than God. Wherefore he
 was believed to be God's son, as indeed he was. So then in obedience to
 Him, he went about delivering the earth from injustice and lawlessness.
 
 But thou art not Hercules, thou sayest, and canst not deliver others
 from their iniquity--not even Theseus, to deliver the soil of Attica
 from its monsters? Purge away thine own, cast forth thence--from thine
 own mind, not robbers and monsters, but Fear, Desire, Envy, Malignity,
 Avarice, Effeminacy, Intemperance. And these may not be cast out, except
 by looking to God alone, by fixing thy affections on Him only, and by
 consecrating thyself to His commands. If thou choosest aught else, with
 sighs and groans thou wilt be forced to follow a Might greater than
 thine own, ever seeking Tranquillity without, and never able to attain
 unto her. For thou seekest her where she is not to be found; and where
 she is, there thou seekest her not!
 
 
 
 
 LXXII
 
 If a man would pursue Philosophy, his first task is to throw away
 conceit. For it is impossible for a man to begin to learn what he has a
 conceit that he already knows.
 
 
 
 
 LXXIII
 
 Give me but one young man, that has come to the School with this
 intention, who stands forth a champion of this cause, and says, "All
 else I renounce, content if I am but able to pass my life free from
 hindrance and trouble; to raise my head aloft and face all things as a
 free man; to look up to heaven as a friend of God, fearing nothing that
 may come to pass!" Point out such a one to me, that I may say, "Enter,
 young man, into possession of that which is thine own. For thy lot is to
 adorn Philosophy. Thine are these possessions; thine these books, these
 discourses!"
 
 And when our champion has duly exercised himself in this part of the
 subject, I hope he will come back to me and say:--"What I desire is to
 be free from passion and from perturbation; as one who grudges no pains
 in the pursuit of piety and philosophy, what I desire is to know my duty
 to the Gods, my duty to my parents, to my brothers, to my country, to
 strangers."
 
 "Enter then on the second part of the subject; it is thine also."
 
 "But I have already mastered the second part; only I wished to stand
 firm and unshaken--as firm when asleep as when awake, as firm when
 elated with wine as in despondency and dejection."
 
 "Friend, you are verily a God! you cherish great designs."
 
 
 
 
 LXXIV
 
 "The question at stake," said Epictetus, "is no common one; it is
 this:--Are we in our senses, or are we not?"
 
 
 
 
 LXXV
 
 If you have given way to anger, be sure that over and above the evil
 involved therein, you have strengthened the habit, and added fuel to
 the fire. If overcome by a temptation of the flesh, do not reckon it
 a single defeat, but that you have also strengthened your dissolute
 habits. Habits and faculties are necessarily affected by the
 corresponding acts. Those that were not there before, spring up: the
 rest gain in strength and extent. This is the account which Philosophers
 give of the origin of diseases of the mind:--Suppose you have once
 lusted after money: if reason sufficient to produce a sense of evil
 be applied, then the lust is checked, and the mind at once regains its
 original authority; whereas if you have recourse to no remedy, you can
 no longer look for this return--on the contrary, the next time it is
 excited by the corresponding object, the flame of desire leaps up more
 quickly than before. By frequent repetition, the mind in the long
 run becomes callous; and thus this mental disease produces confirmed
 Avarice.
 
 One who has had fever, even when it has left him, is not in the same
 condition of health as before, unless indeed his cure is complete.
 Something of the same sort is true also of diseases of the mind. Behind,
 there remains a legacy of traces and blisters: and unless these are
 effectually erased, subsequent blows on the same spot will produce
 no longer mere blisters, but sores. If you do not wish to be prone
 to anger, do not feed the habit; give it nothing which may tend its
 increase. At first, keep quiet and count the days when you were not
 angry: "I used to be angry every day, then every other day: next every
 two, next every three days!" and if you succeed in passing thirty days,
 sacrifice to the Gods in thanksgiving.
 
 
 
 
 LXXVI
 
 How then may this be attained?--Resolve, now if never before, to approve
 thyself to thyself; resolve to show thyself fair in God's sight; long to
 be pure with thine own pure self and God!
 
 
 
 
 LXXVII
 
 That is the true athlete, that trains himself to resist such outward
 impressions as these.
 
 "Stay, wretched man! suffer not thyself to be carried away!" Great is
 the combat, divine the task! you are fighting for Kingship, for Liberty,
 for Happiness, for Tranquillity. Remember God: call upon Him to aid
 thee, like a comrade that stands beside thee in the fight.
 
 
 
 
 LXXVIII
 
 Who then is a Stoic--in the sense that we call a statue of Phidias
 which is modelled after that master's art? Show me a man in this sense
 modelled after the doctrines that are ever upon his lips. Show me a man
 that is sick--and happy; an exile--and happy; in evil report--and happy!
 Show me him, I ask again. So help me Heaven, I long to see one Stoic!
 Nay, if you cannot show me one fully modelled, let me at least see one
 in whom the process is at work--one whose bent is in that direction. Do
 me that favour! Grudge it not to an old man, to behold a sight he has
 never yet beheld. Think you I wish to see the Zeus or Athena of Phidias,
 bedecked with gold and ivory?--Nay, show me, one of you, a human soul,
 desiring to be of one mind with God, no more to lay blame on God or man,
 to suffer nothing to disappoint, nothing to cross him, to yield neither
 to anger, envy, nor jealousy--in a word, why disguise the matter? one
 that from a man would fain become a God; one that while still imprisoned
 in this dead body makes fellowship with God his aim. Show me him!--Ah,
 you cannot! Then why mock yourselves and delude others? why stalk about
 tricked out in other men's attire, thieves and robbers that you are of
 names and things to which you can show no title!
 
 
 
 
 LXXIX
 
 If you have assumed a character beyond your strength, you have both
 played a poor figure in that, and neglected one that is within your
 powers.
 
 
 
 
 LXXX
 
 Fellow, you have come to blows at home with a slave: you have turned the
 household upside down, and thrown the neighbourhood into confusion; and
 do you come to me then with airs of assumed modesty--do you sit down
 like a sage and criticise my explanation of the readings, and whatever
 idle babble you say has come into my head? Have you come full of envy,
 and dejected because nothing is sent you from home; and while the
 discussion is going on, do you sit brooding on nothing but how your
 father or your brother are disposed towards you:--"What are they saying
 about me there? at this moment they imagine I am making progress and
 saying, He will return perfectly omniscient! I wish I could become
 omniscient before I return; but that would be very troublesome. No one
 sends me anything--the baths at Nicopolis are dirty; things are wretched
 at home and wretched here." And then they say, "Nobody is any the better
 for the School."--Who comes to the School with a sincere wish to learn:
 to submit his principles to correction and himself to treatment? Who, to
 gain a sense of his wants? Why then be surprised if you carry home from
 the School exactly what you bring into it?
 
 
 
 
 LXXXI
 
 "Epictetus, I have often come desiring to hear you speak, and you have
 never given me any answer; now if possible, I entreat you, say something
 to me."
 
 "Is there, do you think," replied Epictetus, "an art of speaking as
 of other things, if it is to be done skilfully and with profit to the
 hearer?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 "And are all profited by what they hear, or only some among them? So
 that it seems there is an art of hearing as well as of speaking. . . .
 To make a statue needs skill: to view a statue aright needs skill also."
 
 "Admitted."
 
 "And I think all will allow that one who proposes to hear philosophers
 speak needs a considerable training in hearing. Is that not so? The tell
 me on what subject your are able to hear me."
 
 "Why, on good and evil."
 
 "The good and evil of what? a horse, an ox?"
 
 "No; of a man."
 
 "Do we know then what Man is? what his nature is? what is the idea we
 have of him? And are our ears practised in any degree on the subject?
 Nay, do you understand what Nature is? can you follow me in any degree
 when I say that I shall have to use demonstration? Do you understand
 what Demonstration is? what True or False is? . . . must I drive you to
 Philosophy? . . . Show me what good I am to do by discoursing with you.
 Rouse my desire to do so. The sight of a pasture it loves stirs in
 a sheep the desire to feed: show it a stone or a bit of bread and it
 remains unmoved. Thus we also have certain natural desires, aye, and one
 that moves us to speak when we find a listener that is worth his salt:
 one that himself stirs the spirit. But if he sits by like a stone or a
 tuft of grass, how can he rouse a man's desire?"
 
 "Then you will say nothing to me?"
 
 "I can only tell you this: that one who knows not who he is and to
 what end he was born; what kind of world this is and with whom he is
 associated therein; one who cannot distinguish Good and Evil, Beauty and
 Foulness, . . . Truth and Falsehood, will never follow Reason in shaping
 his desires and impulses and repulsions, nor yet in assent, denial, or
 suspension of judgement; but will in one word go about deaf and blind,
 thinking himself to be somewhat, when he is in truth of no account. Is
 there anything new in all this? Is not this ignorance the cause of all
 the mistakes and mischances of men since the human race began? . . ."
 
 "This is all I have to say to you, and even this against the grain. Why?
 Because you have not stirred my spirit. For what can I see in you to
 stir me, as a spirited horse will stir a judge of horses? Your body?
 That you maltreat. Your dress? That is luxurious. You behavior, your
 look?--Nothing whatever. When you want to hear a philosopher, do not
 say, You say nothing to me'; only show yourself worthy or fit to hear,
 and then you will see how you will move the speaker."
 
 
 
 
 LXXXII
 
 And now, when you see brothers apparently good friends and living in
 accord, do not immediately pronounce anything upon their friendship,
 though they should affirm it with an oath, though they should declare,
 "For us to live apart in a thing impossible!" For the heart of a bad
 man is faithless, unprincipled, inconstant: now overpowered by one
 impression, now by another. Ask not the usual questions, Were they born
 of the same parents, reared together, and under the same tutor; but ask
 this only, in what they place their real interest--whether in outward
 things or in the Will. If in outward things, call them not friends, any
 more than faithful, constant, brave or free: call them not even human
 beings, if you have any sense. . . . But should you hear that these men
 hold the Good to lie only in the Will, only in rightly dealing with the
 things of sense, take no more trouble to inquire whether they are father
 and son or brothers, or comrades of long standing; but, sure of this
 one thing, pronounce as boldly that they are friends as that they are
 faithful and just: for where else can Friendship be found than where
 Modesty is, where there is an interchange of things fair and honest, and
 of such only?
 
 
 
 
 LXXXIII
 
 No man can rob us of our Will--no man can lord it over that!
 
 
 
 
 LXXXIV
 
 When disease and death overtake me, I would fain be found engaged in
 the task of liberating mine own Will from the assaults of passion, from
 hindrance, from resentment, from slavery.
 
 Thus would I fain to be found employed, so that I may say to God, "Have
 I in aught transgressed Thy commands? Have I in aught perverted the
 faculties, the senses, the natural principles that Thou didst give me?
 Have I ever blamed Thee or found fault with Thine administration? When
 it was Thy good pleasure, I fell sick--and so did other men: by my will
 consented. Because it was Thy pleasure, I became poor: but my heart
 rejoiced. No power in the State was mine, because Thou wouldst not:
 such power I never desired! Hast Thou ever seen me of more doleful
 countenance on that account? Have I not ever drawn nigh unto Thee with
 cheerful look, waiting upon Thy commands, attentive to Thy signals? Wilt
 Thou that I now depart from the great Assembly of men? I go: I give Thee
 all thanks, that Thou hast deemed me worthy to take part with Thee
 in this Assembly: to behold Thy works, to comprehend this Thine
 administration."
 
 Such I would were the subject of my thoughts, my pen, my study, when
 death overtakes me.
 
 
 
 
 LXXXV
 
 Seemeth it nothing to you, never to accuse, never to blame either God or
 Man? to wear ever the same countenance in going forth as in coming
 in? This was the secret of Socrates: yet he never said that he knew
 or taught anything. . . . Who amongst you makes this his aim? Were it
 indeed so, you would gladly endure sickness, hunger, aye, death itself.
 
 
 
 
 LXXXVI
 
 How are we constituted by Nature? To be free, to be noble, to be modest
 (for what other living thing is capable of blushing, or of feeling the
 impression of shame?) and to subordinate pleasure to the ends for which
 Nature designed us, as a handmaid and a minister, in order to call forth
 our activity; in order to keep us constant to the path prescribed by
 Nature.
 
 
 
 
 LXXXVII
 
 The husbandman deals with land; physicians and trainers with the body;
 the wise man with his own Mind.
 
 
 
 
 LXXXVIII
 
 Which of us does not admire what Lycurgus the Spartan did? A young
 citizen had put out his eye, and been handed over to him by the people
 to be punished at his own discretion. Lycurgus abstained from all
 vengeance, but on the contrary instructed and made a good man of him.
 Producing him in public in the theatre, he said to the astonished
 Spartans:--"I received this young man at your hands full of violence
 and wanton insolence; I restore him to you in his right mind and fit to
 serve his country."
 
 
 
 
 LXXXIX
 
 A money-changer may not reject Caesar's coin, nor may the seller of
 herbs, but must when once the coin is shown, deliver what is sold for
 it, whether he will or no. So is it also with the Soul. Once the Good
 appears, it attracts towards itself; evil repels. But a clear and
 certain impression of the Good the Soul will never reject, any more than
 men do Caesar's coin. On this hangs every impulse alike of Man and God.
 
 
 
 
 XC
 
 Asked what Common Sense was, Epictetus replied:--
 
 As that may be called a Common Ear which distinguishes only sounds,
 while that which distinguishes musical notes is not common but produced
 by training; so there are certain things which men not entirely
 perverted see by the natural principles common to all. Such a
 constitution of the Mind is called Common Sense.
 
 
 
 
 XCI
 
 Canst thou judge men? . . . then make us imitators of thyself, as
 Socrates did. Do this, do not do that, else will I cast thee into
 prison; this is not governing men like reasonable creatures. Say
 rather, As God hath ordained, so do; else thou wilt suffer chastisement
 and loss. Askest thou what loss? None other than this: To have left
 undone what thou shouldst have done: to have lost the faithfulness, the
 reverence, the modesty that is in thee! Greater loss than this seek not
 to find!
 
 
 
 
 XCII
 
 "His son is dead."
 
 What has happened?
 
 "His son is dead."
 
 Nothing more?
 
 "Nothing."
 
 "His ship is lost."
 
 "He has been haled to prison."
 
 What has happened?
 
 "He has been haled to prison."
 
 But that any of these things are misfortunes to him, is an addition
 which every one makes of his own. But (you say) God is unjust is
 this.--Why? For having given thee endurance and greatness of soul? For
 having made such things to be no evils? For placing happiness within thy
 reach, even when enduring them? For open unto thee a door, when things
 make not for thy good?--Depart, my friend and find fault no more!
 
 
 
 
 XCIII
 
 You are sailing to Rome (you tell me) to obtain the post of Governor of
 Cnossus. You are not content to stay at home with the honours you had
 before; you want something on a larger scale, and more conspicuous. But
 when did you ever undertake a voyage for the purpose of reviewing your
 own principles and getting rid of any of them that proved unsound? Whom
 did you ever visit for that object? What time did you ever set yourself
 for that? What age? Run over the times of your life--by yourself, if you
 are ashamed before me. Did you examine your principles when a boy? Did
 you not do everything just as you do now? Or when you were a stripling,
 attending the school of oratory and practising the art yourself, what
 did you ever imagine you lacked? And when you were a young man, entered
 upon public life, and were pleading causes and making a name, who any
 longer seemed equal to you? And at what moment would you have endured
 another examining your principles and proving that they were unsound?
 What then am I to say to you? "Help me in this matter!" you cry. Ah, for
 that I have no rule! And neither did you, if that was your object, come
 to me as a philosopher, but as you might have gone to a herb-seller or
 a cobbler.--"What do philosophers have rules for, then?"--Why, that
 whatever may betide, our ruling faculty may be as Nature would have it,
 and so remain. Think you this a small matter? Not so! but the greatest
 thing there is. Well, does it need but a short time? Can it be grasped
 by a passer-by?--grasp it, if you can!
 
 Then you will say, "Yes, I met Epictetus!"
 
 Aye, just as you might a statue or a monument. You saw me! and that is
 all. But a man who meets a man is one who learns the other's mind, and
 lets him see his in turn. Learn my mind--show me yours; and then go
 and say that you met me. Let us try each other; if I have any wrong
 principle, rid me of it; if you have, out with it. That is what meeting
 a philosopher means. Not so, you think; this is only a flying visit;
 while we are hiring the ship, we can see Epictetus too! Let us see
 what he has to say. Then on leaving you cry, "Out on Epictetus for a
 worthless fellow, provincial and barbarous of speech!" What else indeed
 did you come to judge of?
 
 
 
 
 XCIV
 
 Whether you will or no, you are poorer than I!
 
 "What then do I lack?"
 
 What you have not: Constancy of mind, such as Nature would have it be:
 Tranquillity. Patron or no patron, what care I? but you do care. I am
 richer than you: I am not racked with anxiety as to what Caesar may
 think of me; I flatter none on that account. This is what I have,
 instead of vessels of gold and silver! your vessels may be of gold, but
 your reason, your principles, your accepted views, your inclinations,
 your desires are of earthenware.
 
 
 
 
 XCV
 
 To you, all you have seems small: to me, all I have seems great. Your
 desire is insatiable, mine is satisfied. See children thrusting their
 hands into a narrow-necked jar, and striving to pull out the nuts and
 figs it contains: if they fill the hand, they cannot pull it out again,
 and then they fall to tears.--"Let go a few of them, and then you
 can draw out the rest!"--You, too, let your desire go! covet not many
 things, and you will obtain.
 
 
 
 
 XCVI
 
 Pittacus wronged by one whom he had it in his power to punish, let
 him go free, saying, Forgiveness is better than revenge. The one shows
 native gentleness, the other savagery.
 
 
 
 
 XCVII
 
 "My brother ought not to have treated me thus."
 
 True: but he must see to that. However he may treat me, I must deal
 rightly by him. This is what lies with me, what none can hinder.
 
 
 
 
 XCVIII
 
 Nevertheless a man should also be prepared to be sufficient unto
 himself--to dwell with himself alone, even as God dwells with Himself
 alone, shares His repose with none, and considers the nature of His own
 administration, intent upon such thoughts as are meet unto Himself. So
 should we also be able to converse with ourselves, to need none else
 beside, to sigh for no distraction, to bend our thoughts upon the Divine
 Administration, and how we stand related to all else; to observe how
 human accidents touched us of old, and how they touch us now; what
 things they are that still have power to hurt us, and how they may
 be cured or removed; to perfect what needs perfecting as Reason would
 direct.
 
 
 
 
 XCIX
 
 If a man has frequent intercourse with others, either in the way of
 conversation, entertainment, or simple familiarity, he must either
 become like them, or change them to his own fashion. A live coal placed
 next a dead one will either kindle that or be quenched by it. Such being
 the risk, it is well to be cautious in admitting intimacies of this
 sort, remembering that one cannot rub shoulders with a soot-stained man
 without sharing the soot oneself. What will you do, supposing the talk
 turns on gladiators, or horses, or prize-fighters, or (what is worse) on
 persons, condemning this and that, approving the other? Or suppose a man
 sneers and jeers or shows a malignant temper? Has any among us the skill
 of the lute-player, who knows at the first touch which strings are out
 of tune and sets the instrument right: has any of you such power as
 Socrates had, in all his intercourse with men, of winning them over
 to his own convictions? Nay, but you must needs be swayed hither and
 thither by the uninstructed. How comes it then that they prove so
 much stronger than you? Because they speak from the fulness of the
 heart--their low, corrupt views are their real convictions: whereas your
 fine sentiments are but from the lips, outwards; that is why they are
 so nerveless and dead. It turns one's stomach to listen to your
 exhortations, and hear of your miserable Virtue, that you prate of
 up and down. Thus it is that the Vulgar prove too strong for you.
 Everywhere strength, everywhere victory waits your conviction!
 
 
 
 
 C
 
 In general, any methods of discipline applied to the body which tend
 to modify its desires or repulsions, are good--for ascetic ends. But if
 done for display, they betray at once a man who keeps an eye on outward
 show; who has an ulterior purpose, and is looking for spectators to
 shout, "Oh what a great man!" This is why Apollonius so well said: "If
 you are bent upon a little private discipline, wait till you are choking
 with heat some day--then take a mouthful of cold water, and spit it out
 again, and tell no man!"
 
 
 
 
 CI
 
 Study how to give as one that is sick: that thou mayest hereafter give
 as one that is whole. Fast; drink water only; abstain altogether from
 desire, that thou mayest hereafter conform thy desire to Reason.
 
 
 
 
 CII
 
 Thou wouldst do good unto men? then show them by thine own example
 what kind of men philosophy can make, and cease from foolish trifling.
 Eating, do good to them that eat with thee; drinking, to them that drink
 with thee; yield unto all, give way, and bear with them. Thus shalt thou
 do them good: but vent not upon them thine own evil humour!
 
 
 
 
 CIII
 
 Even as bad actors cannot sing alone, but only in chorus: so some cannot
 walk alone.
 
 Man, if thou art aught, strive to walk alone and hold converse with
 thyself, instead of skulking in the chorus! at length think; look around
 thee; bestir thyself, that thou mayest know who thou art!
 
 
 
 
 CIV
 
 You would fain be victor at the Olympic games, you say. Yes, but weigh
 the conditions, weigh the consequences; then and then only, lay to your
 hand--if it be for your profit. You must live by rule, submit to diet,
 abstain from dainty meats, exercise your body perforce at stated hours,
 in heat or in cold; drink no cold water, nor, it may be, wine. In a
 word, you must surrender yourself wholly to your trainer, as though to a
 physician.
 
 Then in the hour of contest, you will have to delve the ground, it may
 chance dislocate an arm, sprain an ankle, gulp down abundance of yellow
 sand, be scourge with the whip--and with all this sometimes lose the
 victory. Count the cost--and then, if your desire still holds, try the
 wrestler's life. Else let me tell you that you will be behaving like a
 pack of children playing now at wrestlers, now at gladiators; presently
 falling to trumpeting and anon to stage-playing, when the fancy takes
 them for what they have seen. And you are even the same: wrestler,
 gladiator, philosopher, orator all by turns and none of them with your
 whole soul. Like an ape, you mimic what you see, to one thing constant
 never; the thing that is familiar charms no more. This is because you
 never undertook aught with due consideration, nor after strictly testing
 and viewing it from every side; no, your choice was thoughtless; the
 glow of your desire had waxed cold . . . .
 
 Friend, bethink you first what it is you would do, and then what your
 own nature is able to bear. Would you be a wrestler, consider your
 shoulders, your thighs, your loins--not all men are formed to the same
 end. Think you to be a philosopher while acting as you do? think you go
 on thus eating, thus drinking, giving way in like manner to wrath and
 to displeasure? Nay, you must watch, you must labour; overcome certain
 desires; quit your familiar friends, submit to be despised by your
 slave, to be held in derision by them that meet you, to take the lower
 place in all things, in office, in positions of authority, in courts of
 law.
 
 Weigh these things fully, and then, if you will, lay to your hand; if
 as the price of these things you would gain Freedom, Tranquillity, and
 passionless Serenity.
 
 
 
 
 CV
 
 He that hath no musical instruction is a child in Music; he that hath no
 letters is a child in Learning; he that is untaught is a child in Life.
 
 
 
 
 CVI
 
 Can any profit be derived from these men? Aye, from all.
 
 "What, even from a reviler?"
 
 Why, tell me what profit a wrestler gains from him who exercises
 him beforehand? The very greatest: he trains me in the practice of
 endurance, of controlling my temper, of gentle ways. You deny it. What,
 the man who lays hold of my neck, and disciplines loins and shoulders,
 does me good, . . . while he that trains me to keep my temper does me
 none? This is what it means, not knowing how to gain advantage from men!
 Is my neighbour bad? Bad to himself, but good to me: he brings my good
 temper, my gentleness into play. Is my father bad? Bad to himself, but
 good to me. This is the rod of Hermes; touch what you will with it,
 they say, and it becomes gold. Nay, but bring what you will and I will
 transmute it into Good. Bring sickness, bring death, bring poverty and
 reproach, bring trial for life--all these things through the rod of
 Hermes shall be turned to profit.
 
 
 
 
 CVII
 
 Till then these sound opinions have taken firm root in you, and you
 have gained a measure of strength for your security, I counsel you to be
 cautious in associating with the uninstructed. Else whatever impressions
 you receive upon the tablets of your mind in the School will day by day
 melt and disappear, like wax in the sun. Withdraw then somewhere far
 from the sun, while you have these waxen sentiments.
 
 
 
 
 CVIII
 
 We must approach this matter in a different way; it is great and
 mystical: it is no common thing; nor given to every man. Wisdom alone,
 it may be, will not suffice for the care of youth: a man needs also
 a certain measure of readiness--an aptitude for the office; aye, and
 certain bodily qualities; and above all, to be counselled of God Himself
 to undertake this post; even as He counselled Socrates to fill the post
 of one who confutes error, assigning to Diogenes the royal office of
 high reproof, and to Zeno that of positive instruction. Whereas you
 would fain set up for a physician provided with nothing but drugs! Where
 and how they should be applied you neither know nor care.
 
 
 
 
 CIX
 
 If what charms you is nothing but abstract principles, sit down and turn
 them over quietly in your mind: but never dub yourself a Philosopher,
 nor suffer others to call you so. Say rather: He is in error; for my
 desires, my impulses are unaltered. I give in my adhesion to what I did
 before; nor has my mode of dealing with the things of sense undergone
 any change.
 
 
 
 
 CX
 
 When a friend inclined to Cynic views asked Epictetus, what sort of
 person a true Cynic should be, requesting a general sketch of the
 system, he answered:--"We will consider that at leisure. At present
 I content myself with saying this much: If a man put his hand to so
 weighty a matter without God, the wrath of God abides upon him. That
 which he covets will but bring upon him public shame. Not even on
 finding himself in a well-ordered house does a man step forward and say
 to himself, I must be master here! Else the lord of that house takes
 notice of it, and, seeing him insolently giving orders, drags him forth
 and chastises him. So it is also in this great City, the World. Here
 also is there a Lord of the House, who orders all thing:--
 
      "Thou are the Sun! in thine orbit thou hast
      power to make the year and the seasons;
      to bid the fruits of the earth to grow
      and increase, the winds arise and fall;
      thou canst in due measure cherish with
      thy warmth the frames of men; go make
      thy circuit, and thus minister unto all
      from the greatest to the least! . . ."
 
      "Thou canst lead a host against Troy; be Agamemnon!"
 
      "Thou canst meet Hector in single combat; be Achilles!"
 
 "But had Thersites stepped forward and claimed the chief command, he
 had been met with a refusal, or obtained it only to his own shame and
 confusion of face, before a cloud of witnesses."
 
 
 
 
 CXI
 
 Others may fence themselves with walls and houses, when they do such
 deeds as these, and wrap themselves in darkness--aye, they have many
 a device to hide themselves. Another may shut his door and station one
 before his chamber to say, if any comes, He has gone forth! he is not at
 leisure! But the true Cynic will have none of these things; instead of
 them, he must wrap himself in Modesty: else he will but bring himself
 to shame, naked and under the open sky. That is his house; that is his
 door; that is the slave that guards his chamber; that is his darkness!
 
 
 
 
 CXII
 
 Death? let it come when it will, whether it smite but a part of the
 whole: Fly, you tell me--fly! But whither shall I fly? Can any man cast
 me beyond the limits of the World? It may not be! And whithersoever I
 go, there shall I still find Sun, Moon, and Stars; there I shall find
 dreams, and omens, and converse with the Gods!
 
 
 
 
 CXIII
 
 Furthermore the true Cynic must know that he is sent as a Messenger from
 God to men, to show unto them that as touching good and evil they are
 in error; looking for these where they are not to be found, nor ever
 bethinking themselves where they are. And like Diogenes when brought
 before Philip after the battle of Chaeronea, the Cynic must remember
 that he is a Spy. For a Spy he really is--to bring back word what things
 are on Man's side, and what against him. And when he had diligently
 observed all, he must come back with a true report, not terrified into
 announcing them to be foes that are no foes, nor otherwise perturbed or
 confounded by the things of sense.
 
 
 
 
 CXIV
 
 How can it be that one who hath nothing, neither raiment, nor house,
 nor home, nor bodily tendance, nor servant, nor city, should yet live
 tranquil and contented? Behold God hath sent you a man to show you in
 act and deed that it may be so. Behold me! I have neither house nor
 possessions nor servants: the ground is my couch; I have no wife, no
 children, no shelter--nothing but earth and sky, and one poor cloak. And
 what lack I yet? am I not untouched by sorrow, by fear? am I not free?
 . . . when have I laid anything to the charge of God or Man? when have I
 accused any? hath any of you seen me with a sorrowful countenance? And
 in what wise treat I those of whom you stand in fear and awe? Is it not
 as slaves? Who when he seeth me doth not think that he beholdeth his
 Master and his King?
 
 
 
 
 CXV
 
 Give thyself more diligently to reflection: know thyself: take counsel
 with the Godhead: without God put thine hand unto nothing!
 
 
 
 
 CXVI
 
 "But to marry and to rear offspring," said the young man, "will the
 Cynic hold himself bound to undertake this as a chief duty?"
 
 Grant me a republic of wise men, answered Epictetus, and perhaps none
 will lightly take the Cynic life upon him. For on whose account should
 he embrace that method of life? Suppose however that he does, there will
 then be nothing to hinder his marrying and rearing offspring. For his
 wife will be even such another as himself, and likewise her father; and
 in like manner will his children be brought up.
 
 But in the present condition of things, which resembles an Army in
 battle array, ought not the Cynic to be free from all distraction and
 given wholly to the service of God, so that he can go in and out among
 men, neither fettered by the duties nor entangled by the relations of
 common life? For if he transgress them, he will forfeit the character of
 a good man and true; whereas if he observe them, there is an end to him
 as the Messenger, the Spy, the Herald of the Gods!
 
 
 
 
 CXVII
 
 Ask me if you choose if a Cynic shall engage in the administration of
 the State. O fool, seek you a nobler administration that that in which
 he is engaged? Ask you if a man shall come forward in the Athenian
 assembly and talk about revenue and supplies, when his business is to
 converse with all men, Athenians, Corinthians, and Romans alike, not
 about supplies, not about revenue, nor yet peace and war, but about
 Happiness and Misery, Prosperity and Adversity, Slavery and Freedom?
 
 Ask you whether a man shall engage in the administration of the State
 who has engaged in such an Administration as this? Ask me too if he
 shall govern; and again I will answer, Fool, what greater government
 shall he hold than he holds already?
 
 
 
 
 CXVIII
 
 Such a man needs also to have a certain habit of body. If he appears
 consumptive, thin and pale, his testimony has no longer the same
 authority. He must not only prove to the unlearned by showing them what
 his Soul is that it is possible to be a good man apart from all that
 they admire; but he must also show them, by his body, that a plain
 and simple manner of life under the open sky does no harm to the body
 either. "See, I am proof of this! and my body also." As Diogenes used to
 do, who went about fresh of look and by the very appearance of his body
 drew men's eyes. But if a Cynic is an object of pity, he seems a
 mere beggar; all turn away, all are offended at him. Nor should he be
 slovenly of look, so as not to scare men from him in this way either; on
 the contrary, his very roughness should be clean and attractive.
 
 
 
 
 CXIX
 
 Kings and tyrants have armed guards wherewith to chastise certain
 persons, though they themselves be evil. But to the Cynic conscience
 gives this power--not arms and guards. When he knows that he has watched
 and laboured on behalf of mankind: that sleep hath found him pure,
 and left him purer still: that his thoughts have been the thought of
 a Friend of the Gods--of a servant, yet one that hath a part in the
 government of the Supreme God: that the words are ever on his lips:--
 
 Lead me, O God, and thou, O Destiny!
 
 as well as these:--
 
 If this be God's will, so let it be!
 
 Why should he not speak boldly unto his own brethren, unto his
 children--in a word, unto all that are akin to him!
 
 
 
 
 CXX
 
 Does a Philosopher apply to people to come and hear him? does he not
 rather, of his own nature, attract those that will be benefited
 by him--like the sun that warms, the food that sustains them? What
 Physician applies to men to come and be healed? (Though indeed I hear
 that the Physicians at Rome do nowadays apply for patients--in my time
 they were applied to.) I apply to you to come and hear that you are in
 evil case; that what deserves your attention most is the last thing to
 gain it; that you know not good from evil, and are in short a hapless
 wretch; a fine way to apply! though unless the words of the Philosopher
 affect you thus, speaker and speech are alike dead.
 
 
 
 
 CXXI
 
 A Philosopher's school is a Surgery: pain, not pleasure, you should have
 felt therein. For on entering none of you is whole. One has a shoulder
 out of joint, another an abscess: a third suffers from an issue, a
 fourth from pains in the head. And am I then to sit down and treat you
 to pretty sentiments and empty flourishes, so that you may applaud me
 and depart, with neither shoulder, nor head, nor issue, nor abscess a
 whit the better for your visit? Is it then for this that young men are
 to quit their homes, and leave parents, friends, kinsmen and substance
 to mouth out Bravo to your empty phrases!
 
 
 
 
 CXXII
 
 If any be unhappy, let him remember that he is unhappy by reason of
 himself alone. For God hath made all men to enjoy felicity and constancy
 of good.
 
 
 
 
 CXXII
 
 Shall we never wean ourselves--shall we never heed the teachings of
 Philosophy (unless perchance they have been sounding in our ears like
 an enchanter's drone):--
 
 This World is one great City, and one is the substance whereof it is
 fashioned: a certain period indeed there needs must be, while these give
 place to those; some must perish for others to succeed; some move and
 some abide: yet all is full of friends--first God, then Men, whom Nature
 hath bound by ties of kindred each to each.
 
 
 
 
 CXXIV
 
 Nor did the hero weep and lament at leaving his children orphans. For he
 knew that no man is an orphan, but it is the Father that careth for all
 continually and for evermore. Not by mere report had he heard that
 the Supreme God is the Father of men: seeing that he called Him Father
 believing Him so to be, and in all that he did had ever his eyes fixed
 upon Him. Wherefore in whatsoever place he was, there is was given him
 to live happily.
 
 
 
 
 CXXV
 
 Know you not that the thing is a warfare? one man's duty is to mount
 guard, another must go out to reconnoitre, a third to battle; all cannot
 be in one place, nor would it even be expedient. But you, instead of
 executing you Commander's orders, complain if aught harsher than usual
 is enjoined; not understanding to what condition you are bringing the
 army, so far as in you lies. If all were to follow your example, none
 would dig a trench, none would cast a rampart around the camp, none
 would keep watch, or expose himself to danger; but all turn out useless
 for the service of war. . . . Thus it is here also. Every life is a
 warfare, and that long and various. You must fulfil a soldier's duty,
 and obey each order at your commander's nod: aye, if it be possible,
 divine what he would have done; for between that Command and this, there
 is no comparison, either in might or in excellence.
 
 CXXVI
 
 Have you again forgotten? Know you not that a good man does nothing for
 appearance' sake, but for the sake of having done right? . . .
 
 "Is there no reward then?"
 
 Reward! do you seek any greater reward for a good man than doing what is
 right and just? Yet at the Great Games you look for nothing else; there
 the victor's crown you deem enough. Seems it to you so small a thing and
 worthless, to be a good man, and happy therein?
 
 
 
 
 CXXVII
 
 It befits thee not to be unhappy by reason of any, but rather to be
 happy by reason of all men, and especially by reason of God, who formed
 us to this end.
 
 
 
 
 CXXVIII
 
 What, did Diogenes love no man, he that was so gentle, so true a friend
 to men as cheerfully to endure such bodily hardships for the common
 weal of all mankind? But how loved he them? As behoved a minister of the
 Supreme God, alike caring for men and subject unto God.
 
 
 
 
 CXXIX
 
 I am by Nature made for my own good; not for my own evil.
 
 
 
 
 CXXX
 
 Remind thyself that he whom thou lovest is mortal--that what thou lovest
 is not thine own; it is given thee for the present, not irrevocably nor
 for ever, but even as a fig or a bunch of grapes at the appointed season
 of the year. . . .
 
 "But these are words of evil omen.". . .
 
 What, callest thou aught of evil omen save that which signifies some
 evil thing? Cowardice is a word of evil omen, if thou wilt, and meanness
 of spirit, and lamentation and mourning, and shamelessness. . . .
 
 But do not, I pray thee, call of evil omen a word that is significant of
 any natural thing:--as well call of evil omen the reaping of the corn;
 for that means the destruction of the ears, though not of the World!--as
 well say that the fall of the leaf is of evil omen; that the dried fig
 should take the place of the green; that raisins should be made from
 grapes. All these are changes from a former state into another; not
 destruction, but an ordered economy, a fixed administration. Such
 is leaving home, a change of small account; such is Death, a greater
 change, from what now is, not to what is not, but to what is not now.
 
 "Shall I then no longer be?"
 
 Not so; thou wilt be; but something different, of which the World now
 hath need. For thou too wert born not when thou chosest, but when the
 World had need of thee.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXI
 
 Wherefore a good man and true, bearing in mind who he is and whence he
 came and from whom he sprang, cares only how he may fill his post with
 due discipline and obedience to God.
 
 Wilt thou that I continue to live? Then will I live, as one that is
 free and noble, as Thou wouldst have me. For Thou hast made me free from
 hindrance in what appertaineth unto me. But hast Thou no further need
 of me? I thank Thee! Up to this hour have I stayed for Thy sake and none
 other's: and now in obedience to Thee I depart.
 
 "How dost thou depart?"
 
 Again I say, as Thou wouldst have me; as one that is free, as Thy
 servant, as one whose ear is open unto what Thou dost enjoin, what Thou
 dost forbid.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXII
 
 Whatsoever place or post Thou assignest me, sooner will I die a thousand
 deaths, as Socrates said, than desert it. And where wilt Thou have me to
 be? At Rome or Athens? At Thebes or on a desert island? Only remember me
 there! Shouldst Thou send me where man cannot live as Nature would have
 him, I will depart, not in disobedience to Thee, but as though Thou wert
 sounding the signal for my retreat: I am not deserting Thee--far be that
 from me! I only perceive that thou needest me no longer.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXIII
 
 If you are in Gyaros, do not let your mind dwell upon life at Rome,
 and all the pleasures it offered to you when living there, and all that
 would attend your return. Rather be intent on this--how he that lives in
 Gyaros may live in Gyaros like a man of spirit. And if you are at Rome,
 do not let your mind dwell upon the life at Athens, but study only how
 to live at Rome.
 
 Finally, in the room of all other pleasures put this--the pleasure which
 springs from conscious obedience to God.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXIV
 
 To a good man there is no evil, either in life or death. And if God
 supply not food, has He not, as a wise Commander, sounded the signal
 for retreat and nothing more? I obey, I follow--speaking good of my
 Commander, and praising His acts. For at His good pleasure I came; and I
 depart when it pleases Him; and while I was yet alive that was my work,
 to sing praises unto God!
 
 
 
 
 CXXXV
 
 Reflect that the chief source of all evils to Man, and of baseness and
 cowardice, is not death, but the fear of death.
 
 Against this fear then, I pray you, harden yourself; to this let all
 your reasonings, your exercises, your reading tend. Then shall you know
 that thus alone are men set free.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXVI
 
 He is free who lives as he wishes to live; to whom none can do violence,
 none hinder or compel; whose impulses are unimpeded, whose desires are
 attain their purpose, who falls not into what he would avoid. Who then
 would live in error?--None. Who would live deceived and prone to fall,
 unjust, intemperate, in abject whining at his lot?--None. Then doth no
 wicked man live as he would, and therefore neither is he free.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXVII
 
 Thus do the more cautious of travellers act. The road is said to be
 beset by robbers. The traveller will not venture alone, but awaits the
 companionship on the road of an ambassador, a quaestor or a proconsul.
 To him he attaches himself and thus passes by in safety. So doth the
 wise man in the world. Many are the companies of robbers and tyrants,
 many the storms, the straits, the losses of all a man holds dearest.
 Whither shall he fall for refuge--how shall he pass by unassailed? What
 companion on the road shall he await for protection? Such and such a
 wealthy man, of consular rank? And how shall I be profited, if he
 is stripped and falls to lamentation and weeping? And how if my
 fellow-traveller himself turns upon me and robs me? What am I to do? I
 will become a friend of Caesar's! in his train none will do me wrong! In
 the first place--O the indignities I must endure to win distinction! O
 the multitude of hands there will be to rob me! And if I succeed, Caesar
 too is but a mortal. While should it come to pass that I offend him,
 whither shall I flee from his presence? To the wilderness? And may not
 fever await me there? What then is to be done? Cannot a fellow-traveller
 be found that is honest and loyal, strong and secure against surprise?
 Thus doth the wise man reason, considering that if he would pass through
 in safety, he must attach himself unto God.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXVIII
 
 "How understandest thou attach himself to God?"
 
 That what God wills, he should will also; that what God wills not,
 neither should he will.
 
 "How then may this come to pass?"
 
 By considering the movements of God, and His administration.
 
 
 
 
 CXXXIX
 
 And dost thou that hast received all from another's hands, repine and
 blame the Giver, if He takes anything from thee? Why, who art thou, and
 to what end comest thou here? was it not He that made the Light manifest
 unto thee, that gave thee fellow-workers, and senses, and the power to
 reason? And how brought He thee into the world? Was it not as one
 born to die; as one bound to live out his earthly life in some small
 tabernacle of flesh; to behold His administration, and for a little
 while share with Him in the mighty march of this great Festival
 Procession? Now therefore that thou hast beheld, while it was permitted
 thee, the Solemn Feast and Assembly, wilt thou not cheerfully depart,
 when He summons thee forth, with adoration and thanksgiving for what
 thou hast seen and heard?--"Nay, but I would fain have stayed longer at
 the Festival."--Ah, so would the mystics fain have the rites prolonged;
 so perchance would the crowd at the Great Games fain behold more
 wrestlers still. But the Solemn Assembly is over! Come forth, depart
 with thanksgiving and modesty--give place to others that must come into
 being even as thyself.
 
 
 
 
 CXL
 
 Why art thou thus insatiable? why thus unreasonable? why encumber
 the world?--"Aye, but I fain would have my wife and children with me
 too."--What, are they then thine, and not His that gave them--His that
 made thee? Give up then that which is not thine own: yield it to One who
 is better than thou. "Nay, but why did He bring one into the world on
 these conditions?"--If it suits thee not, depart! He hath no need of a
 spectator who finds fault with his lot! Them that will take part in the
 Feast he needeth--that will lift their voices with the rest that men
 may applaud the more, and exalt the Great Assembly in hymns and songs
 of praise. But the wretched and the fearful He will not be displeased to
 see absent from it: for when they were present, they did not behave
 as at a Feast, nor fulfil their proper office; but moaned as though
 in pain, and found fault with their fate, their fortune and their
 companions; insensible to what had fallen to their lot, insensible to
 the powers they had received for a very different purpose--the powers of
 Magnanimity, Nobility of Heart, of Fortitude, or Freedom!
 
 
 
 
 CXLI
 
 Art thou then free? a man may say. So help me heaven, I long and pray
 for freedom! But I cannot look my masters boldly in the face; I still
 value the poor body; I still set much store on its preservation whole
 and sound.
 
 But I can point thee out a free man, that thou mayest be no more in
 search of an example. Diogenes was free. How so? Not because he was of
 free parentage (for that, indeed, was not the case), but because he was
 himself free. He had cast away every handle whereby slavery might lay
 hold of him to enslave him, nor was it possible for any to approach
 and take hold of him to enslave him. All things sat loose upon him--all
 things were to him attached by but slender ties. Hadst thou seized upon
 his possessions, he would rather have let them go than have followed
 thee for them--aye, had it been even a limb, or mayhap his whole body;
 and in like manner, relatives, friends, and country. For he knew whence
 they came--from whose hands and on what terms he had received them.
 His true forefathers, the Gods, his true Country, he never would
 have abandoned; nor would he have yielded to any man in obedience and
 submission to the one nor in cheerfully dying for the other. For he
 was ever mindful that everything that comes to pass has its source and
 origin there; being indeed brought about for the weal of that his true
 Country, and directed by Him in whose governance it is.
 
 
 
 
 CXLII
 
 Ponder on this--on these convictions, on these words: fix thine eyes on
 these examples, if thou wouldst be free, if thou hast thine heart set
 upon the matter according to its worth. And what marvel if thou purchase
 so great a thing at so great and high a price? For the sake of this that
 men deem liberty, some hang themselves, others cast themselves down from
 the rock; aye, time has been when whole cities came utterly to an end:
 while for the sake of Freedom that is true, and sure, and unassailable,
 dost thou grudge to God what He gave, when He claims it? Wilt thou not
 study, as Plato saith, to endure, not death alone, but torture, exile,
 stripes--in a word, to render up all that is not thine own? Else thou
 wilt be a slave amid slaves, wert thou ten thousand times a consul; aye,
 not a whit the less, though thou climb the Palace steps. And thou
 shalt know how true the saying of Cleanthes, that though the words of
 philosophers may run counter to the opinions of the world, yet have they
 reason on their side.
 
 
 
 
 CXLIII
 
 Asked how a man should best grieve his enemy, Epictetus replied, "By
 setting himself to live the noblest life himself."
 
 
 
 
 CXLIV
 
 I am free, I am a friend of God, ready to render Him willing obedience.
 Of all else I may set store by nothing--neither by mine own body, nor
 possessions, nor office, nor good report, nor, in a word, aught else
 beside. For it is not His Will, that I should so set store by these
 things. Had it been His pleasure, He would have placed my Good therein.
 But now He hath not done so: therefore I cannot transgress one jot of
 His commands. In everything hold fast to that which is thy Good--but to
 all else (as far as is given thee) within the measure of Reason only,
 contented with this alone. Else thou wilt meet with failure, ill
 success, let and hindrance. These are the Laws ordained of God--these
 are His Edicts; these a man should expound and interpret; to these
 submit himself, not to the laws of Masurius and Cassius.
 
 
 
 
 CXLV
 
 Remember that not the love of power and wealth sets us under the heel
 of others, but even the love of tranquillity, of leisure, of change of
 scene--of learning in general, it matters not what the outward thing
 may be--to set store by it is to place thyself in subjection to another.
 Where is the difference then between desiring to be a Senator, and
 desiring not to be one: between thirsting for office and thirsting to
 be quit of it? Where is the difference between crying, Woe is me, I know
 not what to do, bound hand and foot as I am to my books so that I cannot
 stir! and crying, Woe is me, I have not time to read! As though a book
 were not as much an outward thing and independent of the will, as office
 and power and the receptions of the great.
 
 Or what reason hast thou (tell me) for desiring to read? For if thou
 aim at nothing beyond the mere delight of it, or gaining some scrap of
 knowledge, thou art but a poor, spiritless knave. But if thou desirest
 to study to its proper end, what else is this than a life that flows on
 tranquil and serene? And if thy reading secures thee not serenity, what
 profits it?--"Nay, but it doth secure it," quoth he, "and that is why I
 repine at being deprived of it."--And what serenity is this that lies at
 the mercy of every passer-by? I say not at the mercy of the Emperor or
 Emperor's favorite, but such as trembles at a raven's croak and piper's
 din, a fever's touch or a thousand things of like sort! Whereas the
 life serene has no more certain mark than this, that it ever moves with
 constant unimpeded flow.
 
 
 
 
 CXLVI
 
 If thou hast put malice and evil speaking from thee, altogether, or
 in some degree: if thou hast put away from thee rashness, foulness of
 tongue, intemperance, sluggishness: if thou art not moved by what once
 moved thee, or in like manner as thou once wert moved--then thou mayest
 celebrate a daily festival, to-day because thou hast done well in this
 manner, to-morrow in that. How much greater cause is here for offering
 sacrifice, than if a man should become Consul or Prefect?
 
 
 
 
 CXLVII
 
 These things hast thou from thyself and from the Gods: only remember who
 it is that giveth them--to whom and for what purpose they were given.
 Feeding thy soul on thoughts like these, dost thou debate in what place
 happiness awaits thee? in what place thou shalt do God's pleasure?
 Are not the Gods nigh unto all places alike; see they not alike what
 everywhere comes to pass?
 
 
 
 
 CXLVIII
 
 To each man God hath granted this inward freedom. These are the
 principles that in a house create love, in a city concord, among nations
 peace, teaching a man gratitude towards God and cheerful confidence,
 wherever he may be, in dealing with outward things that he knows are
 neither his nor worth striving after.
 
 
 
 
 CXLIX
 
 If you seek Truth, you will not seek to gain a victory by every possible
 means; and when you have found Truth, you need not fear being defeated.
 
 
 
 
 CL
 
 What foolish talk is this? how can I any longer lay claim to right
 principles, if I am not content with being what I am, but am all
 aflutter about what I am supposed to be?
 
 
 
 
 CLI
 
 God hath made all things in the world, nay, the world itself, free from
 hindrance and perfect, and its parts for the use of the whole. No other
 creature is capable of comprehending His administration thereof; but the
 reasonable being Man possesses faculties for the consideration of all
 these things--not only that he is himself a part, but what part he is,
 and how it is meet that the parts should give place to the whole. Nor is
 this all. Being naturally constituted noble, magnanimous, and free, he
 sees that the things which surround him are of two kinds. Some are
 free from hindrance and in the power of the will. Other are subject to
 hindrance, and depend on the will of other men. If then he place his own
 good, his own best interest, only in that which is free from hindrance
 and in his power, he will be free, tranquil, happy, unharmed,
 noble-hearted, and pious; giving thanks to all things unto God,
 finding fault with nothing that comes to pass, laying no charge against
 anything. Whereas if he place his good in outward things, depending not
 on the will, he must perforce be subject to hindrance and restraint, the
 slave of those that have power over the things he desires and fears;
 he must perforce be impious, as deeming himself injured at the hands
 of God; he must be unjust, as ever prone to claim more than his due; he
 must perforce be of a mean and abject spirit.
 
 
 
 
 CLII
 
 Whom then shall I fear? the lords of the Bedchamber, lest they should
 shut me out? If they find me desirous of entering in, let them shut me
 out, if they will.
 
 "Then why comest thou to the door?"
 
 Because I think it meet and right, so long as the Play lasts, to take
 part therein.
 
 "In what sense art thou then shut out?"
 
 Because, unless I am admitted, it is not my will to enter: on the
 contrary, my will is simply that which comes to pass. For I esteem what
 God wills better than what I will. To Him will I cleave as His minister
 and attendant; having the same movements, the same desires, in a word
 the same Will as He. There is no such thing as being shut out for me,
 but only for them that would force their way in.
 
 
 
 
 CLIII
 
 But what says Socrates?--"One man finds pleasure in improving his land,
 another his horses. My pleasure lies in seeing that I myself grow better
 day by day."
 
 
 
 
 CLIV
 
 The dress is suited to the craft; the craftsman takes his name from
 the craft, not from the dress. For this reason Euphrates was right in
 saying, "I long endeavoured to conceal my following the philosophic
 life; and this profited me much. In the first place, I knew that what I
 did aright, I did not for the sake of lookers-on, but for my own. I
 ate aright--unto myself; I kept the even tenor of my walk, my glance
 composed and serene--all unto myself and unto God. Then as I fought
 alone, I was alone in peril. If I did anything amiss or shameful,
 the cause of Philosophy was not in me endangered; nor did I wrong the
 multitude by transgressing as a professed philosopher. Wherefore those
 that knew not my purpose marvelled how it came about, that whilst all my
 life and conversation was passed with philosophers without exception, I
 was yet none myself. And what harm that the philosopher should be known
 by his acts, instead of mere outward signs and symbols?"
 
 
 
 
 CLV
 
 First study to conceal what thou art; seek wisdom a little while unto
 thyself. Thus grows the fruit; first, the seed must be buried in the
 earth for a little space; there it must be hid and slowly grow, that it
 may reach maturity. But if it produce the ear before the jointed stalk,
 it is imperfect--a thing from the garden of Adonis. Such a sorry growth
 art thou; thou hast blossomed too soon: the winter cold will wither thee
 away!
 
 
 
 
 CLVI
 
 First of all, condemn the life thou art now leading: but when thou
 hast condemned it, do not despair of thyself--be not like them of mean
 spirit, who once they have yielded, abandon themselves entirely and
 as it were allow the torrent to sweep them away. No; learn what the
 wrestling masters do. Has the boy fallen? "Rise," they say, "wrestle
 again, till thy strength come to thee." Even thus should it be with
 thee. For know that there is nothing more tractable than the human soul.
 It needs but to will, and the thing is done; the soul is set upon the
 right path: as on the contrary it needs but to nod over the task, and
 all is lost. For ruin and recovery alike are from within.
 
 
 
 
 CLVII
 
 It is the critical moment that shows the man. So when the crisis is upon
 you, remember that God, like a trainer of wrestlers, has matched you
 with a rough and stalwart antagonist.--"To what end?" you ask. That you
 may prove the victor at the Great Games. Yet without toil and sweat this
 may not be!
 
 
 
 
 CLVIII
 
 If thou wouldst make progress, be content to seem foolish and void of
 understanding with respect to outward things. Care not to be thought to
 know anything. If any should make account of thee, distrust thyself.
 
 
 
 
 CLIX
 
 Remember that in life thou shouldst order thy conduct as at a banquet.
 Has any dish that is being served reached thee? Stretch forth thy hand
 and help thyself modestly. Doth it pass thee by? Seek not to detain
 it. Has it not yet come? Send not forth thy desire to meet it, but wait
 until it reaches thee. Deal thus with children, thus with wife; thus
 with office, thus with wealth--and one day thou wilt be meet to share
 the Banquets of the Gods. But if thou dost not so much as touch that
 which is placed before thee, but despisest it, then shalt thou not only
 share the Banquets of the Gods, but their Empire also.
 
 
 
 
 CLX
 
 Remember that thou art an actor in a play, and of such sort as the
 Author chooses, whether long or short. If it be his good pleasure to
 assign thee the part of a beggar, a ruler, or a simple citizen, thine it
 is to play it fitly. For thy business is to act the part assigned thee,
 well: to choose it, is another's.
 
 
 
 
 CLXI
 
 Keep death and exile daily before thine eyes, with all else that men
 deem terrible, but more especially Death. Then wilt thou never think a
 mean though, nor covet anything beyond measure.
 
 
 
 
 CLXII
 
 As a mark is not set up in order to be missed, so neither is such a
 thing as natural evil produced in the World.
 
 
 
 
 CLXIII
 
 Piety toward the Gods, to be sure, consists chiefly in thinking rightly
 concerning them--that they are, and that they govern the Universe with
 goodness and justice; and that thou thyself art appointed to obey them,
 and to submit under all circumstances that arise; acquiescing cheerfully
 in whatever may happen, sure it is brought to pass and accomplished by
 the most Perfect Understanding. Thus thou wilt never find fault with the
 Gods, nor charge them with neglecting thee.
 
 
 
 
 CLXIV
 
 Lose no time in setting before you a certain stamp of character and
 behaviour both when by yourself and in company with others. Let silence
 be your general rule; or say only what is necessary and in few words. We
 shall, however, when occasion demands, enter into discourse sparingly.
 avoiding common topics as gladiators, horse-races, athletes; and
 the perpetual talk about food and drink. Above all avoid speaking of
 persons, either in way of praise or blame, or comparison.
 
 If you can, win over the conversation of your company to what it should
 be by your own. But if you find yourself cut off without escape among
 strangers and aliens, be silent.
 
 
 
 
 CLXV
 
 Laughter should not be much, nor frequent, nor unrestrained.
 
 
 
 
 CLXVI
 
 Refuse altogether to take an oath if you can, if not, as far as may be.
 
 
 
 
 CLXVII
 
 Banquets of the unlearned and of them that are without, avoid. But
 if you have occasion to take part in them, let not your attention be
 relaxed for a moment, lest you slip after all into evil ways. For you
 may rest assured that be a man ever so pure himself, he cannot escape
 defilement if his associates are impure.
 
 
 
 
 CLXVIII
 
 Take what relates to the body as far as the bare use warrants--as meat,
 drink, raiment, house and servants. But all that makes for show and
 luxury reject.
 
 
 
 
 CLXIX
 
 If you are told that such an one speaks ill of you, make no defence
 against what was said, but answer, He surely knew not my other faults,
 else he would not have mentioned these only!
 
 
 
 
 CLXX
 
 When you visit any of those in power, bethink yourself that you will not
 find him in: that you may not be admitted: that the door may be shut in
 your face: that he may not concern himself about you. If with all this,
 it is your duty to go, bear what happens, and never say to yourself,
 It was not worth the trouble! For that would smack of the foolish and
 unlearned who suffer outward things to touch them.
 
 
 
 
 CLXXI
 
 In company avoid frequent and undue talk about your own actions and
 dangers. However pleasant it may be to you to enlarge upon the risks
 you have run, others may not find such pleasure in listening to your
 adventures. Avoid provoking laughter also: it is a habit from which
 one easily slides into the ways of the foolish, and apt to diminish the
 respect which your neighbors feel for you. To border on coarse talk is
 also dangerous. On such occasions, if a convenient opportunity offer,
 rebuke the speaker. If not, at least by relapsing into silence,
 colouring, and looking annoyed, show that you are displeased with the
 subject.
 
 
 
 
 CLXXII
 
 When you have decided that a thing ought to be done, and are doing it,
 never shun being seen doing it, even though the multitude should be
 likely to judge the matter amiss. For if you are not acting rightly,
 shun the act itself; if rightly, however, why fear misplaced censure?
 
 
 
 
 CLXXIII
 
 It stamps a man of mean capacity to spend much time on the things of the
 body, as to be long over bodily exercises, long over eating, long over
 drinking, long over other bodily functions. Rather should these
 things take the second place, while all your care is directed to the
 understanding.
 
 
 
 
 CLXXIV
 
 Everything has two handles, one by which it may be borne, the other by
 which it may not. If your brother sin against you lay not hold of it by
 the handle of injustice, for by that it may not be borne: but rather by
 this, that he is your brother, the comrade of your youth; and thus you
 will lay hold on it so that it may be borne.
 
 
 
 
 CLXXV
 
 Never call yourself a Philosopher nor talk much among the unlearned
 about Principles, but do that which follows from them. Thus at a
 banquet, do not discuss how people ought to eat; but eat as you ought.
 Remember that Socrates thus entirely avoided ostentation. Men would come
 to him desiring to be recommended to philosophers, and he would conduct
 them thither himself--so well did he bear being overlooked. Accordingly
 if any talk concerning principles should arise among the unlearned, be
 you for the most part silent. For you run great risk of spewing up what
 you have ill digested. And when a man tells you that you know nothing
 and you are not nettled at it, then you may be sure that you have begun
 the work.
 
 
 
 
 CLXXVI
 
 When you have brought yourself to supply the needs of the body at small
 cost, do not pique yourself on that, nor if you drink only water, keep
 saying on each occasion, I drink water! And if you ever want to practise
 endurance and toil, do so unto yourself and not unto others--do not
 embrace statues!
 
 
 
 
 CLXXVII
 
 When a man prides himself on being able to understand and interpret the
 writings of Chrysippus, say to yourself:--
 
 If Chrysippus had not written obscurely, this fellow would have had
 nothing to be proud of. But what is it that I desire? To understand
 Nature, and to follow her! Accordingly I ask who is the Interpreter.
 On hearing that it is Chrysippus, I go to him. But it seems I do not
 understand what he wrote. So I seek one to interpret that. So far there
 is nothing to pride myself on. But when I have found my interpreter,
 what remains is to put in practice his instructions. This itself is the
 only thing to be proud of. But if I admire the interpretation and that
 alone, what else have I turned out but a mere commentator instead of
 a lover of wisdom?--except indeed that I happen to be interpreting
 Chrysippus instead of Homer. So when any one says to me, Prithee, read
 me Chrysippus, I am more inclined to blush, when I cannot show my deeds
 to be in harmony and accordance with his sayings.
 
 
 
 
 CLXXVIII
 
 At feasts, remember that you are entertaining two guests, body and soul.
 What you give to the body, you presently lose; what you give to the
 soul, you keep for ever.
 
 
 
 
 CLXXIX
 
 At meals, see to it that those who serve be not more in number than
 those who are served. It is absurd for a crowd of persons to be dancing
 attendance on half a dozen chairs.
 
 
 
 
 CLXXX
 
 It is best to share with your attendants what is going forward, both in
 the labour of preparation and in the enjoyment of the feast itself. If
 such a thing be difficult at the time, recollect that you who are
 not weary are being served by those that are; you who are eating and
 drinking by those who do neither; you who are talking by those who are
 silent; you who are at ease by those who are under constraint. Thus no
 sudden wrath will betray you into unreasonable conduct, nor will you
 behave harshly by irritating another.
 
 
 
 
 CLXXXI
 
 When Xanthippe was chiding Socrates for making scanty preparation for
 entertaining his friends, he answered:--"If they are friends of ours
 they will not care for that; if they are not, we shall care nothing for
 them!"
 
 
 
 
 CLXXXII
 
 Asked, Who is the rich man? Epictetus replied, "He who is content."
 
 
 
 
 CLXXXIII
 
 Favorinus tells us how Epictetus would also say that there were two
 faults far graver and fouler than any others--inability to bear, and
 inability to forbear, when we neither patiently bear the blows that
 must be borne, nor abstain from the things and the pleasures we ought to
 abstain from. "So," he went on, "if a man will only have these two words
 at heart, and heed them carefully by ruling and watching over himself,
 he will for the most part fall into no sin, and his life will be
 tranquil and serene." He meant the words [Greek: Anechou kai
 apechou]--"Bear and Forbear."
 
 
 
 
 CLXXXIV
 
 On all occasions these thoughts should be at hand:--
 
      Lead me, O God, and Thou, O Destiny
      Be what it may the goal appointed me,
      Bravely I'll follow; nay, and if I would not,
      I'd prove a coward, yet must follow still!
 
 Again:
 
      Who to Necessity doth bow aright,
      Is learn'd in wisdom and the things of God.
 
 Once more:--
 
      Crito, if this be God's will, so let it be. As for me,
      Anytus and Meletus can indeed put me to death, but injure me,
      never!
 
 
 
 
 CLXXXV
 
 We shall then be like Socrates, when we can indite hymns of praise to
 the Gods in prison.
 
 
 
 
 CLXXXVI
 
 It is hard to combine and unite these two qualities, the carefulness
 of one who is affected by circumstances, and the intrepidity of one
 who heeds them not. But it is not impossible: else were happiness also
 impossible. We should act as we do in seafaring.
 
 "What can I do?"--Choose the master, the crew, the day, the opportunity.
 Then comes a sudden storm. What matters it to me? my part has been fully
 done. The matter is in the hands of another--the Master of the ship.
 The ship is foundering. What then have I to do? I do the only thing
 that remains to me--to be drowned without fear, without a cry, without
 upbraiding God, but knowing that what has been born must likewise
 perish. For I am not Eternity, but a human being--a part of the whole,
 as an hour is part of the day. I must come like the hour, and like the
 hour must pass!
 
 
 
 
 CLXXXVII
 
 And now we are sending you to Rome to spy out the land; but none send
 a coward as such a spy, that, if he hear but a noise and see a shadow
 moving anywhere, loses his wits and comes flying to say, The enemy are
 upon us!
 
 So if you go now, and come and tell us: "Everything at Rome is terrible:
 Death is terrible, Exile is terrible, Slander is terrible, Want is
 terrible; fly, comrades! the enemy are upon us!" we shall reply, Get you
 gone, and prophesy to yourself! we have but erred in sending such a spy
 as you. Diogenes, who was sent as a spy long before you, brought us back
 another report than this. He says that Death is no evil; for it need not
 even bring shame with it. He says that Fame is but the empty noise of
 madmen. And what report did this spy bring us of Pain, what of Pleasure,
 what of Want? That to be clothed in sackcloth is better than any purple
 robe; that sleeping on the bare ground is the softest couch; and in
 proof of each assertion he points to his own courage, constancy, and
 freedom; to his own healthy and muscular frame. "There is no enemy
 near," he cries, "all is perfect peace!"
 
 
 
 
 CLXXXVIII
 
 If a man has this peace--not the peace proclaimed by Caesar (how indeed
 should he have it to proclaim?), nay, but the peace proclaimed by God
 through reason, will not that suffice him when alone, when he beholds
 and reflects:--Now can no evil happen unto me; for me there is no
 robber, for me no earthquake; all things are full of peace, full of
 tranquillity; neither highway nor city nor gathering of men, neither
 neighbor nor comrade can do me hurt. Another supplies my food, whose
 care it is; another my raiment; another hath given me perceptions of
 sense and primary conceptions. And when He supplies my necessities no
 more, it is that He is sounding the retreat, that He hath opened the
 door, and is saying to thee, Come!--Wither? To nought that thou needest
 fear, but to the friendly kindred elements whence thou didst spring.
 Whatsoever of fire is in thee, unto fire shall return; whatsoever of
 earth, unto earth; of spirit, unto spirit; of water, unto water. There
 is no Hades, no fabled rivers of Sighs, of Lamentation, or of Fire: but
 all things are full of Beings spiritual and divine. With thoughts like
 these, beholding the Sun, Moon, and Stars, enjoying earth and sea, a man
 is neither helpless nor alone!
 
 
 
 
 CLXXXIX
 
 What wouldst thou be found doing when overtaken by Death? If I might
 choose, I would be found doing some deed of true humanity, of wide
 import, beneficent and noble. But if I may not be found engaged in aught
 so lofty, let me hope at least for this--what none may hinder, what is
 surely in my power--that I may be found raising up in myself that which
 had fallen; learning to deal more wisely with the things of sense;
 working out my own tranquillity, and thus rendering that which is its
 due to every relation of life. . . .
 
 If death surprise me thus employed, it is enough if I can stretch forth
 my hands to God and say, "The faculties which I received at Thy hands
 for apprehending this thine Administration, I have not neglected. As far
 as in me lay, I have done Thee no dishonour. Behold how I have used the
 senses, the primary conceptions which Thous gavest me. Have I ever laid
 anything to Thy charge? Have I ever murmured at aught that came to pass,
 or wished it otherwise? Have I in anything transgressed the relations
 of life? For that Thou didst beget me, I thank Thee for that Thou hast
 given: for the time during which I have used the things that were Thine,
 it suffices me. Take them back and place them wherever Thou wilt! They
 were all Thine, and Thou gavest them me."--If a man depart thus minded,
 is it not enough? What life is fairer and more noble, what end happier
 than his?
 
 
 
 
 (APPENDIX A)
 
 
 
 
 Fragments Attributed to Epictetus
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 A life entangled with Fortune is like a torrent. It is turbulent
 and muddy; hard to pass and masterful of mood: noisy and of brief
 continuance.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 The soul that companies with Virtue is like an ever-flowing source. It
 is a pure, clear, and wholesome draught; sweet, rich, and generous of
 its store; that injures not, neither destroys.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 It is a shame that one who sweetens his drink with the gifts of the bee,
 should embitter God's gift Reason with vice.
 
 
 
 
 IV
 
 Crows pick out the eyes of the dead, when the dead have no longer need
 of them; but flatterers mar the soul of the living, and her eyes they
 blind.
 
 
 
 
 V
 
 Keep neither a blunt knife nor an ill-disciplined looseness of tongue.
 
 
 
 
 VI
 
 Nature hath given men one tongue but two ears, that we may hear from
 others twice as much as we speak.
 
 
 
 
 VII
 
 Do not give sentence in another tribunal till you have been yourself
 judged in the tribunal of Justice.
 
 
 
 
 VIII
 
 If is shameful for a Judge to be judged by others.
 
 
 
 
 IX
 
 Give me by all means the shorter and nobler life, instead of one that is
 longer but of less account!
 
 
 
 
 X
 
 Freedom is the name of virtue: Slavery, of vice. . . . None is a slave
 whose acts are free.
 
 
 
 
 XI
 
 Of pleasures, those which occur most rarely give the most delight.
 
 
 
 
 XII
 
 Exceed due measure, and the most delightful things become the least
 delightful.
 
 
 
 
 XIII
 
 The anger of an ape--the threat of a flatterer:--these deserve equal
 regard.
 
 
 
 
 XIV
 
 Chastise thy passions that they avenge not themselves upon thee.
 
 
 
 
 XV
 
 No man is free who is not master of himself.
 
 
 
 
 XVI
 
 A ship should not ride on a single anchor, nor life on a single hope.
 
 
 
 
 XVII
 
 Fortify thyself with contentment: that is an impregnable stronghold.
 
 
 
 
 XVIII
 
 No man who is a lover of money, of pleasure, of glory, is likewise a
 lover of Men; but only he that is a lover of whatsoever things are fair
 and good.
 
 XIX
 
 Think of God more often than thou breathest.
 
 
 
 
 XX
 
 Choose the life that is noblest, for custom can make it sweet to thee.
 
 
 
 
 XXI
 
 Let thy speech of God be renewed day by day, aye, rather than thy meat
 and drink.
 
 
 
 
 XXII
 
 Even as the Sun doth not wait for prayers and incantations to rise, but
 shines forth and is welcomed by all: so thou also wait not for clapping
 of hands and shouts and praise to do thy duty; nay, do good of thine own
 accord, and thou wilt be loved like the Sun.
 
 
 
 
 XXIII
 
 Let no man think that he is loved by any who loveth none.
 
 
 
 
 XXIV
 
 If thou rememberest that God standeth by to behold and visit all that
 thou doest; whether in the body or in the soul, thou surely wilt not err
 in any prayer or deed; and thou shalt have God to dwell with thee.
 
 
 Note.--Schweighueser's great edition collects 181 fragments attributed
 to Epictetus, of which but a few are certainly genuine. Some (as xxi.,
 xxiv., above) bear the stamp of Pythagorean origin; others, though
 changed in form, may well be based upon Epictetean sayings. Most have
 been preserved in the Anthology of John of Stobi (Stobaeus), a Byzantine
 collector, of whom scarcely anything is known but that he probably wrote
 towards the end of the fifth century, and made his vast body of
 extracts from more than five hundred authors for his son's use. The
 best examination of the authenticity of the Fragments is Quaestiones
 Epicteteae, by R. Asmus, 1888. The above selection includes some of
 doubtful origin but intrinsic interest.--Crossley.
 
 
 
 
 (APPENDIX B)
 
 
 
 
 The Hymn of Cleanthes
 
      Chiefest glory of deathless Gods, Almighty for ever,
      Sovereign of Nature that rulest by law, what Name shall we
           give Thee?--
      Blessed be Thou! for on Thee should call all things that are
           mortal.
      For that we are Thine offspring; nay, all that in myriad motion
      Lives for its day on the earth bears one impress--Thy
           likeness--upon it.
      Wherefore my song is of Thee, and I hymn thy power for ever.
 
      Lo, the vast orb of the Worlds, round the Earth evermore as it
           rolleth,
      Feels Thee its Ruler and Guide, and owns Thy lordship rejoicing.
      Aye, for Thy conquering hands have a servant of living fire--
      Sharp is the bolt!--where it falls, Nature shrinks at the shock
      and doth shudder.
      Thus Thou directest the Word universal that pulses through all
           things,
      Mingling its life with Lights that are great and Lights that
           are lesser,
      E'en as beseemeth its birth, High King through ages unending.
 
      Nought is done that is done without Thee in the earth or the waters
      Or in the heights of heaven, save the deed of the fool and the
           sinner.
      Thou canst make rough things smooth; at Thy voice, lo, jarring
           disorder
      Moveth to music, and Love is born where hatred abounded.
      Thus hast Thou fitted alike things good and things evil together,
      That over all might reign one Reason, supreme and eternal;
      Though thereunto the hearts of the wicked be hardened and
           heedless--
      Woe unto them!--for while ever their hands are grasping at
           good things,
      Blind are their eyes, yea, stopped are their ears to God's Law
           universal,
      Calling through wise disobedience to live the life that is noble.
      This they mark not, but heedless of right, turn each to his
           own way,
      Here, a heart fired with ambition, in strife and straining
           unhallowed;
      There, thrusting honour aside, fast set upon getting and gaining;
      Others again given over to lusts and dissolute softness,
      Working never God's Law, but that which wareth upon it.
 
      Nay, but, O Giver of all things good, whose home is the dark cloud,
      Thou that wields Heaven's bolt, save men from their
           ignorance grievous;
      Scatter its night from their souls, and grant them to come to
           that Wisdom
      Wherewithal, sistered with Justice, Thou rulest and governest
           all things;
      That we, honoured by Thee, may requite Thee with worship and
           honour,
      Evermore praising thy works, as is meet for men that shall perish;
      Seeing that none, be he mortal or God, hath privilege nobler
      Than without stint, without stay, to extol Thy Law universal.
 
 
 
 
 
 
